Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



^ 4 



\ 



JSBACH 



BY 



ALBERT SCHWEITZER, dr.philos. 

P&IVATDOZBNT AT TTOI KAISDl WILBXLM UmVEBSITY AT STRASSBUtG 
OKOANIST TO TBX BACH 80CIBTY OP PARIS 



WITH A PREFACE BY C. M. WIDOR 



ENGLISH TRANSLATION 

BY 

ERNEST NEWMAN 

IN TWO VOLUMES^ 

VOLUME n 
WITH 2 ILLUSTRATIONS 




BREITKOPF & HARTEL 

LEIPZIG, BERLIN LONDON BRUSSELS, NEW YORK 

1911 




6 



P '. ^. H I J. 
V. J. 



Ih 7 r I 



i 



' . f ^ .^ 



t •• 



!l 



/ . " } 



J 



CONTENTS. 

Volume II. 
Chapter XIX. Bach and Aesthetics 1—7 

Spitta'a embanassment with regard to Bach's 
tone-paintiiig i — 5. Neglect of Bach by estheti- 
cians $ — 7. 

Chapter XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music 7 — 25 

Art per ss 7 — 8. Poetry and Pamting 8 — 11. 
Poetry and Music 1 1 — 13. The connection of the arts 
in the receptive imagination 1 3 — 17. The inadequacy 
of artistic expression 17 — 18. The explanation of 
music 18 — 20. The poetic element in Beethoven and 
in Wagner 20 — 23. The pictorial element in Schubert. 
Berlioz and Bach 23 — 25. 

Chapter XXI. Word and Tone in Bach . . . 25—56 

The relation between the verbal and the musical 
phrase 25 — 28. The declamation in the recitatives 
28 — 30. The poetical element in Bach's chorale 
movements 30 — 35. The expression of emotions 
35 — 39* Bach and programme music 39 — ^40. Bach's 
tone-painting 41 — ^49. Pictorial S3rmbolism in music 
49 — 50. Bach's tonal language 51 — 53. Origin and 
development of Bach's tonal language 53 — 56. 

Chapter XXII. The Musical Language of the 

Chorales 56 — 74 

Pictorial and symbolical r^resentation 56—60. 
The "step" motives 60 — 6$, The motives of peace 
and grief 6$ — 65. The motives of joy 65 — 67. The 
illustration of single words and of the sequence of 
I>oetical ideas 67 — 72. The chorale fantasia on 
"Jesus Christus unser Heiland'^ 72 — 74. 

Chapter XXIII. The Musical Language of the 74 — 122 
Cantatas 

Pictorial themes 74 — 86. The "step" motives 
S6 — 90. The "tumult" motive 90 — 92. The motives 



I 



IV Contents. 

of exhaustion gz — 94. The rhythm ^T^^T^ 

94 — 99. The rhythms of felicity 99 — 103. I^e mo- 
tive of terror 103 — 105. The motives of grief 105 — 109. 
The motives of joy 109 — 114. The co-cyperatkm of 
the motives 114 — 120. Conclusion 13 1 — 122. 

Chapter XXIV. The Amstadt, MiihUiausen, 

Weimar and Cothen Cantatas 12a — 148 

Chapter XXV. The Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 

1724 148 — ^165 

Chapter XXVI. The Magnificat and the St. John 

Passion 166^185 

The Magnificat 166 — 171. The unauthentic Pas- 
sion and the two lost Fissions 171 — 172. Origin 
and first performance of the St John Passion 173 
— 174. The musical character of the St John PaS' 
sion 174 — 177. The choruses of the people 177 — 179. 
The recitatives and arias 179 — 183. Opening and 
final choruses 183 — 185. 

Chapter XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years 

1725— 1727 186—203 

Chapter XXVIII. The Trauerode and the St. Mat- 
thew Passion 203 — 232 

The Trauerode 203 — 208. The text of the Si, Mai- 
thew Passion 208 — 21 z. The choruses of the St MaP- 
thew Passion 211 — 214. The recitatives 2x4 — 2x7. 
The arias 217 — 232. 

Chapter XXIX. The Cantatas of the Years 

1728 — ^1734 232—260 

Chapter XXX. The Secular Cantatas .... 261 — 294 

Chapter XXXI. The Motets and Songs . . . 294 — ^301 

The origin of the motets 294. With or without 
accompaniment? 297 — 301. 

Chapter XXXII. The Oratorios 302—311 

Origin and history of the Christmas Oratorio 
302 — 304. Its musical character 304 — 306. The 
sinfonia and its performance 306 — 307. "Cuts" in 
the Christmas Oratorio 308. The Easter Oratorio 
309 — 3 10. The A scension Oratorio {Lobet Gott; No. 1 1 ) 
310— 311. 



i 



Contents. V 

Chapter XXXIII. The Masses . / 311—328 

Origin and history of the B minor Mass 311 — 314. 
The Kyrie and the Gloria 314 — 316. The Crfido 
317 — 322. The Sanctus and the Osanna 322. The 
instrumentation of the Credo and the Confiteor 
323 — 325. Smaller Masses 327. Sanctus 328. 

Chapter XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734 . 328—378 

Chapter XXXV. The Performance of the Canta- 
tas and Passions 379 — 468 

The phrasing 379 — 391. The accentuation 391 
— 400. The tempo 400—404. The ornaments 405 
— 409. The d3mamic3 409 — ^412. The rendering of 
the vocal solos 412 — ^413. The employment of boys' 
voices 413 — ^415. The rendering of the final chorales 
41 5 — ^416. The choir in general 417 — 42 1 . The inter- 
pretation of Bach's instrumentation 421 — ^428. The 
Bach orchestra in general 428 — 430. Bach's strings 
430—432. Bach's flutes» oboes, bassoons and cor- 
netti 432 — ^434. Bach's trumpets and horns 435 — ^442. 
The right proportions of the Bach orchestra 442 — ^444. 
The figured bass part 444 — 452. The rendering of the 
organ accompaniment 452 — 459. The proper choice of 
cantatas 459 — 464. Simple music for the church 
service in the cantatas 464 — ^466. Conclusion 
467 — ^468. 



CHAPTER XIX. 

BACH AND AESTHETICS. 

We axgue about absolute music, tone-painting, pro- 
gramme music and tone-language as about actual 
fundamental problems, and think it a matter for historians 
only that tendencies towards tone-painting, programme 
music, or avowed musical "^narration" were noticeable in 
Italian, German and French music as early as the seven- 
teenth and eighteenth centuries. However primitive the 
pictorial and poetic music of the two or three generations 
before Bach may have been, in respect of their means 
and possibilities of expression, we can see in it the same 
instincts and pretensions as in the most modem and most 
subtilised progranune music of a Liszt or a Strauss. 

This old art, however, was not wholly primitive. It 
may be possible to regard Froberger, Kuhnau and the 
composers of the Italian and French character-pieces as 
simply n^ve painters in music, who overstepped the bounds 
of pure music without realising all the bearings of what 
they were doing. But the composers for the Hamburg 
theatre knew what they wanted. Music, in their eyes, 
was a representation of actions, scenes, and ideas. They 
thought themselves capable of expressing everything in 
tone. Mattheson even gives recipes for the clear and correct 
expression of the emotions in music. In a cantata of 1744 
for the eighth Sunday after Trinity, Telemann represents 
the false prophets in sheeps' clothing by a complete circle 
of fifths through all the twelve major scales*. Here the 



* Jacob Adlung, AnlHhtng xur musihalischen Gelahrtheit, 
3nd ed. 1783, p. 395. 

Schweitter, Bach. IL I 



I 

r J 



2 XIX. Bach and Aesthetics. 

symbolism is rather metaphysical. But there are many 
other passages in Telemann that are admirable in their 
pictorial purpose and achievement. 

The music among which Bach grew up, whose full un- 
folding he was able to witness, and whose consummation 
he is, took for itself by preference the title of "expressive" 
(affektvoU) in distinction from all others, meaning to 
indicate thereby that its purpose was graphic characterisa- 
tion and realism. Although our musical aestheticians 
must have known this — for the histories of music testify 
sufficiently to it — they made no attempt to examine the 
music of that epoch thoroughly and to enquire what light 
it might throw on the nature of the art, but took the line 
of sweeping aside these phenomena as merely transitory 
pathological perversions of pure muisc. 

Bach proves himself an exponent of the "affektvoU** 
music of his epoch by the Capriccio — the programme- 
sonata on the departure of his brother. Instead of asking 
themselves, however, whether the same spirit cannot be 
detected in his later music, the aestheticians chose to regard 
the Capriccio as an interesting indiscretion of his youth, 
with which he paid his tribute to his epoch, and which we 
can forgive him in consideration of the "pure music" of 
the preludes and fugues. But they omitted to analyse 
the music he wrote in conjunction with poetry in the 
chorales, cantatas and passions, and to ask whether the 
pictorial tendencies of contemporary music may not be 
found in Bach also. 

Only one of the musical aestheticians, Mosewius, had 
tried to comprehend Bach's art as the art of characteristic 
musical representation*. He had, however, no successor. 
His book Johann Sebastian Bach in seinen Kirchenkantaten 
(1845), although it is cited here and there, did not exercise 
the slightest influence on Bach research. 

From the second half of the nineteenth century on- 



* See ante, p. 246 ff> 



Spitta and Bach's Tone-Painting. 3 

wards, when the struggle over modem music began, men's 
views upon Bach were not so unprejudiced as those of 
Mosewius. It was admitted, of course, that there were some 
curious things in his works. Now and then it had to be 
admitted that the imitative or pictorial purpose was quite 
obvious : for instance, in the chorale "Durch Adams Fall 
ist ganz verderbt" (V, No. 13), where the fall of Adam is 
suggested by falling sevenths in the bass, or in an aria in 
Hercules am Scheidewege^ where the music depicts the 
serpents mentioned in the text, and where there are other 
striking examples of the same kind. If anyone noticed 
such a case, he thought it his duty to represent it as quite 
without significance, so as not to injure the reputation 
Bach had achieved as a classical composer, and to save 
him from the suspicion of having done anything to pervert 
pure music into representative music. Spitta took care 
that no one should be misled by this or that piece of charac- 
terisation into doubting for a moment that Bach was a 
priest of absolute music, or should fail to get the "right 
conception of his art". 

When he came to what seemed to him a particularly 
dangerous place in a cantata, he thought it as well to 
protect humanity, as it were, by putting a fence round it. 
"Ready as Bach was," he sdiys at one point, "to sprinkle 
his works with picturesque figures, he did not do so as a 
result of fundamental principles based on a sense of the 
graphic power of music. Those figures are transient flashes, 
and their presence or absence cannot alter the value or 
intelligibility of the composition in its integrity. In 
stud5dng Bach, when we meet with some conspicuously 
melodious line or some strikingly harmonious tune, that 
happens to coincide with an emphatic or emotional word, 
we are too ready to attribute to them a much closer and 
deeper connection than can ever have dwelt in the purpose 
of the composer."* This citation is typical of Spitta*s 



♦ Spitta II. 575, 576. 



I* 



4 XIX. Bach and Aesthetics. 

point of view. His anal57ses, — in other respects so wonder- 
ful and penetrating — fail just at the point where he should 
look for the inmost connection between the poetic thought 
and Bach's musical expression. The many striking instances 
of tone-painting do not impel him to enquire whether 
other characteristic themes and figures are not ^dso prompt- 
ed by the pictures and ideas suggested in the text, and 
whether Bach's Stimmung is not so much a generalised 
emotional state as one woven out of concrete musical ideas. 
He could not see the possibility of the text being reflected 
in the music as in clear running water. He wishes to guard 
against it being thought too characteristic. So Spitta 
regards the coincidence of strikingly expressive themes or 
figures with "characteristic or expressive words" as mostly 
accidental, and warns us against "attributing to them a 
much closer and deeper connection than can ever have 
dwelt in the purpose of the composer." Thus in order 
to prove that Bach's music was not materialistic, the most 
remarkable feature of his work has to be explained as a 
kind of musical accident. It reminds us of the famous 
Dutch philosopher Geulinx, whose dread of philosoph- 
ical materialism was so great that he would not admit 
any influence of the thought and the will upon the move- 
ments of the limbs, and held that God had regulated the 
body and the soul like two absolutely parallel pieces of 
clock-work, so that the same thing would always happen 
at precisely the same time in the corporeal sphere and in 
the spiritual. Thus what seemed expUcable, from the ex- 
ternal standpoint, only by a direct connection of the two, 
was really the coincidence, predestined from eternity, of 
a mental idea and a bodily movement. In the same way 
Spitta's dread of musical materialism absolved him from 
the necessity of a careful enquiry into the connection of 
word and tone in Bach by a few authoritative dicta upon 
"the true nature of the art". With his "la question ne 
sera pas pos6e" he tries to scare off any one who would 
like fxu-ther information as to Bach's attitude towards 



Spitta and Bach's Tone-Painting. 5 

his texts, — a question of interest for the understanding 
not only of Bach's work but of the nature of music in 
general. 

We can partly comprehend this point of view, for the 
architectonic and contrapuntal perfection of his works 
gives such deep and pure satisfaction to the mind that 
appreciates these purely musical qualities of them, that 
almost everything else that could be found in them must 
seem of secondary importance. In Spitta, too, there was 
the instinctive fear that Bach might be pressed into 
the service of a certain kind of modem pictorial music 
that was anathema to him and his adherents. He was 
partly influenced also by a justifiable dislike for the kind 
of superficial modernisation of the old music that some* 
times takes the place of thorough research, and prides 
itself on bringing the old masters nearer to our own time. 

Thus Bach's cantatas were issued, year after year, just 
at the time when Wagner and Berlioz were setting mu- 
sicians by the ears, and no one perceived what treasures 
in the way of dramatic and pictorial music were hidden 
in the big grey volumes, and what vistas they opened out 
to musical aesthetics. Today it is still a reproach to our 
aesthetidans, even the best of them, that they know no- 
thing of the two hundred Bach cantatas and but a few 
of the organ chorales. The extraordinarily expressive and 
pictorial conception of music that these works reveal have 
exercised no influence whatever on the ordinarily accepted 
or debated theories of the nature of music. 

One would have thought that the most pressing duty 
of aesthetics was to study these latest discoveries, search- 
ing in them for light on the basic problem of all music, — 
the question of the nature of thematic invention. Tlie 
attraction was truly great enough, for one had only to 
read through five or six volmnes of the cantatas to be 
struck, more than happens in the case of any other music, 
by certain recurring singularities, inner affinities, variants of 
the same theme, and some inexplicable bizarreries. What 



6 XIX. Bach and Aesthetics. 

an enigma is offered us by the themes of the St, Matthew 
Passion alone! Think of the joyous writing in Judah's 
air of contrition, "Gebt mir meinen Jesum wieder", ("Give 
me my dear Lord beloved"); of the wild two-part flute 
accompaniment in the bass arioso "Ja freilich will in uns 
das Fleisch und Blut zum Kreuz gezwungen sein", ("Aye, 
surely now can flesh and blood atone"); of the shapeless- 
ness — so senseless from the musical point of view — of 
the theme of the aria "Konnen Tranen meiner Wangen 
nichts eriangen", ("Though in vain be all my wailing"); 
of the remarkable affinity between certain ariosos and 
the arias that follow them, — in short, of all the things 
that surprise the musician the more he studies the work, 
that become, to his sorrow, more and more inexplicable to 
him, and which he does not know how to perform, for the 
meaning of them is imknown to him, until he guesses that 
this music is not self-existent, but has sprung from some 
strong external force, that will not obey the laws of 
harmonious thematic structure. 

Aesthetics, however, lost this chance of being, for once, 
directly helpful to practical art; it passed by almost un- 
regardingly the singular problem presented by the motives 
of the Passions, the cantatas, and the chorale preludes, 
and had no perception that this classical master probably 
had something like a definite musical language of his own, 
in which ideas struggled for concrete expression. On the 
other hand the artists, who worked at the cantatas, had 
an intuition of where the key to this music was to be sought. 
Their practical experiences brought them many a sur- 
prising discovery. But they failed to correlate their know- 
ledge, of which they spoke in vague terms and mostly among 
themselves, their chief concern being to let the works 
speak for themselves by bringing out correct editions of 
them. 

We thus have a musical aesthetic in which Bach has 
not had his say. Statistics of the number of times his 
name appears in works dealing with the nature of music 



Neglect of Bach in Contemporary Aesthetics. ^ 

i¥Otild leave us very disappointed. Even in so thorough a 
treatise as Combarieu's Les rapports de la musique et de la 
poisie^ Bach pla}^ hardly any part. The French author 
has this excuse, that he had not a sufficiently intimate 
knowledge of German to enable him to fathom the Bach 
of the cantatas. The German aestheticians, however, go 
no more thoroughly into his works. This is due not only 
to the fact that Bach is as yet really very little known, 
but to the whole character of our investigations into the 
nature of music. Our sestheticians do not set out from the 
works of art themselv^. They usually stop just where 
music begins. Schopenhauer, Lotze and Helmholtz occupy 
a much larger place in their studies than Bach, Mozart, 
Schubert, Beethoven, Berlioz and Wagner. In the aesthetic 
treatises that deal with painting we find a much more 
thorough esthetic of the art-works than in those devoted 
to music. Therefore we need not wonder that musical 
aesthetic stands perplexed before the problems that actual 
music presents to it. At the end, when all the theories 
derived from definitions and from the physiology of sound 
have been properly dealt with, the real problems of music — 
tone-painting, descriptive music, programme music, the 
cooperation of music with the other arts — are polished 
off in a few supplementary words. 



CHAPTER XX. 

POETIC MUSIC AND PICTORIAL MUSIC. 

The inunediate impression Bach's works make upon us 
is of a dual kind. Their message is quite modern; but 
at the same time we feel that they have no kinship what- 
ever with post-Beethovenian art. Bach's music seems to 
us modem in so far as it makes a strong effort to get beyond 



'^ Paris* Alcan, 1894. 



8 XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

the natural indefiniteness of musical sound, and aims at 
the most thorough musical expression possible of the poem 
with which it is associated. Its object is pictorial, repre- 
sentative. It differs from modem art, however, in its 
manner of reproducing the poem, and the means by which 
it does so. There lies between Bach and Wagner not only 
a century and a half of time, but a whole world. The 
former represents a wholly different species of represen- 
tative music from that of his Bayreuth champion. It is 
thus necessary first of all to get clear ideas as to the nature 
of representative music and the several varieties of it. 

The problem is part of the general one of the coopera- 
tion of the arts. This is always wrongly regarded from 
the standpoint of one art alone. In reality it is a universal 
problem, and one that lies at the root of our thinking 
upon art in general. But we must first of all get away 
from the conventional verbal formulae that here, as else- 
where, stand in the way of better knowledge. 

We classify the arts according to the material they use in 
order to express the world aroimd them. One who ex- 
presses himself in tones is called a musician; one who em- 
plo}^ colours, a painter; one who uses words, a poet. 
This, however, is a purely external division. In reality, 
the material in which the artist expresses himself is a 
secondary matter. He is not only a painter, or only a 
poet, or only a musician, but all in one. Various artists have 
their habitation in his soul. His work is the product of 
their cooperation ; all have a part in each one of his ideas. 
The distinction consists only in this, that one idea is domi- 
nated by one of these artists, another by another of them, 
and they always choose the language that suits them best. 

It may happen that the "other artist" and the pos- 
sibilities of the "other language" assume so prominent a 
place in their consciousness that they are at variance with 
themselves, not knowing which art they really ought to 
cultivate. It was so with Goethe, who, on his return from 
Wetzlar, did not know whether he should devote himself 



Poetry and Painting. g 

to painting or to poetry. "I wandered," he tells in his 
DichHing und Wakrheiiy ''down the Lahn, free of will but 
fettered by my feelings, in one of those frames of mind 
in which the presence of dumb nature is so grateful to us. 
My eye, practised in detecting the pictorial and super- 
pictoiial beauties of the landscape, revelled in the view of 
the tufted rocks, the sunny summits, the moist groimd, 
the towering castles and the blue hills smiling in the 
distance. I wandered on the right bank of the stream 
that flowed along in the sunlight at some distance below 
me, partly hidden by thick willows. The old desire sprang 
up in me to be able to paint these things worthily. I 
chanced to have a fine pocket-knife in my left hand; all 
at once I heard an imperious command from the depths of 
my soul to throw the knife into the stream. If it fell into 
the water, my desire to be an artist would be satisfied; if 
its immersion were hidden from me by the overhanging 
willows, I should renounce the desire. The whim was 
carried out as quickly as it was conceived. Without any 
regard for the usefulness of the knife, which was of a com^ 
posite kind, I threw it as far as I could into the stream 
with my left hand. But I experienced that deceptive 
ambiguity of oracles about which the ancients used to 
complain so bitterly. The furthest willows prevented my 
seeing my knife fall into the stream, but the water leaped 
up like a fountain and was perfectly visible to me. I did 
not interpret the phenomenon in my favour, and the doubt 
it awoke in me had the unfortunate consequence that I 
henceforth pursued my studies in painting more n^ligently 
and intermittently, thereby fulfilling the judgment of the 
oracle myself." 

For all that he remained a painter. His designs indeed 
are amateurish, and his understanding of the masterpieces 
of painting is not so complete as he himself thought it 
was. But he sees and depicts everything like a painter. 
He is alwa}^ congratulating himself on the gift of seeing 
the world with the eye of a painter, whose pictures were 



10 XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

always before him. Venice appeared to him as a succession 
o£ pictures by the Venetian school. The unfathomable 
mystery of his style is the way in which a couple of sen- 
tences, without any real attempt at description on his 
part, will bring the whole scene as it appeared to him before 
the eye of the reader, suggesting to him all kinds of things 
he neither sees nor hears, but which he can no more forget 
than if they had been actually part of his own experience. 
In Faust we have a succession not so much of scenes as 
of vivid pictures. Goethe paints his own portrait at 
different periods of his life, against an idyllic, naive, tragic, 
burlesque, fantastic or allegorical background. His land- 
scapes are not merely built up out of words ; like the painter, 
he has really seen them all, and he employs words like 
resonant spots of colour, in such a way that they conjure 
up the living scene before the reader's eye. 

Many other authors since Goethe's time have passed 
from painting to verbal description and remained pictorial 
in essence, though choosing the material in which they 
could best depict the world as they saw it. Taine is cer- 
tainly a painter. We can only understand rightly the 
loose and yet wonderfully clear structure of Gottfried 
Keller's stories when we realise that it is not the poet but 
the dramatic painter who guides the pen. In Michel- 
angelo, again, who is the greater, — the poet or the painter? 
We call Heine our greatest lyrist. Should we not call him, 
from the standpoint of "the universal art", the most in- 
spired painter among the l)nic poets? Bocklin is a poet 
who has got among the painters. It is the poetic imagina- 
tion that has led him to the fictions of his wonderful but 
in the last resort unreal landscapes. His visions master 
him to such an extent that impossibilities in the com- 
position, even errors of drawing that are at first sight 
disconcerting, are matters of indifference to him. He had 
recourse to pencil and palette because he thought he could 
thus reproduce most vividly his poems of the elemental 
forces. His paintings are in the last resort symbols of poems 



Poetry and Paintmg. II 

that were inexpressible in words. It is thus quite natural 
that the reaction against him comes from the French 
painters, who, with their objective realism, have no sym- 
pathy with such a relation of poetry and painting, and 
combat an art showing tendencies of this kind from the 
standpoint of absolute painting, just as the partisans of 
absolute music make war on the music that bases itself on 
poetry. The painter cannot do otherwise than criticise with 
almost unjust harshness BockUn's picture of the plague, 
in the Basel Museum. But if we let the picture — that 
almost seems like the drawing of a child of genius — appeal 
to us as poetry, we see at once its real greatness. 

The essential distinction between German and French 
painting comes from this attitude towards poetry. Anyone 
who comes in contact with artists of both countries, and 
anal}^es the first impressions of German artists in Paris 
and the impressions of French artists at the sight of German 
works, and tries to see to the root of the unjust judgments 
on both sides, will soon observe that the difference in their 
views has its origin in the difference of their attitudes 
towards poetry. The German painter is more of a poet 
than the French. Therefore French painting reproaches 
German painting with a lack of real, objective feeling for 
nature. German painting, on the other hand, in spite of 
its admiration for the splendid technique of the French, 
feels somewhat chilled by a kind of deliberate poverty of 
imagination that it detects in it. In literature these con- 
trasted waj^ of looking at nature have given Germany 
a splendid l3nical poetry that the French have never been 
able to achieve. 

Painting, then, is suffused with poetry, and poetry with 
painting. The quality of either of the arts at a given 
moment depends on the strength or the weakness of this 
inter-coloration. As regards their means of expression each 
of them passes into the other by imperceptible gradations. 

It is the same with music and poetry. We reckon Schiller 
among the poets. He himself held that he was really a 



12 XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

musician. On the 25th May 1792 he writes to Komer: 
"When I sit down to express an idea, I am more often 
possessed by the musical essence of it than by a clear con- 
ception of its contents, as to which I frequently can hardly 
make up my mind*." Behind his words, indeed, there is 
not pure intuition, as with Goethe, but sound and rh3rthm. 
His description is sonorous, but pictorially unreal, pre- 
senting no living scene to the reader's eye. His land- 
scapes are really all theatre decorations. Lamartine, again, 
is a musician, because he suggests rather than paints. 
Nietzsche's experience with music was like Goethe's with 
painting. He thought it a duty he owed to his talents to 
experiment in composition. His musical works, however, 
are of even less importance than Goethe's drawings. How 
can these awkward creations entitle him to the name of 
musician? Yet a musician he was. His works are sym- 
phonies. The musician does not read them ; he hears them, 
as if he were going through an orchestral score. What he 
sees are not words and letters, but themes developing and 
interlacing. In Jenseits von Gut und Bdse he even finds 
those little fugued intermezzi into which Beethoven often 
diverges. Wherein does this quality exist? Who can 
analyse it? In any case Nietzsche himself had a full con- 
sciousness of the musical essence of his poetic creations. 
This is why he used to get so angry with the modem man 
who 'leaves his ears in a drawer", and merely skims the 
pages of a book with this eyes. Moreover, it is evident 
from the clear connection of the ideas, throiagh all their 
apparent incoherence and disconnection, that the poet of 
Also sprach Zarathustra worked out his ideas not in word- 
logic but in tone-logic, as musical motives. After having 
brought an idea to its definite conclusion and apparently 
finished with it, he will suddenly bring it in once more 
without the least warning, just as the musician picks up 
a theme again. 

* See Schiller's Briefw$chs$i mii KdffUf (Veit, Leipzig, 2nd ed. 
1894) I, 453. 



Blending of the Arts in the Imagination. 13 

Wagner is one of the musical poets, only that he is 
master not only of word -speech but of tone -speech. 
Nietzsche's well-known formula for the artistic complexity 
of the man whom he revered and hated as no one else did 
runs thus: "As a musician Wagner's place is among the 
painters, as a poet his place is among the musicians, as 
artist in general his place is among the actors*." For 
Wagner, again, certain painters were musicians. The great 
masters of the Italian Renaissance, he says in one place, 
"were almost all musicians, and it is the spirit of music 
that makes us forget, when we are lost in contemplation 
of their saints and martyrs, that we are actually seeing 
with our eyes."** 

Every artistic idea is complex in quality imtil the moment 
when it finds definite expression. Neither in painting, 
nor in music, nor in poetry is there such a thing as an 
absolute art that can be regarded as the norm, enabling us 
to brand all others as false, for in every artist there dwells 
another, who wishes to have his own say in the matter, the 
difference being that in one his activity is obtrusive, and 
in another hardly noticeable. Herein resides the whole 
distinction. Art in itself is neither painting nor poetry 
nor music, but an act of creation in which all three 
cooperate. 

TTie close and tense relation in which the arts stand 
among each other gives each of them a desire for expansion, 
that allows the art no peace until it has attained its utmost 
possible limit. Then it is further impelled to appropriate 
a portion of the territory of another art. Not only does 
music try to paint and narrate like the two other arts; 
they in their turn do likewise. Poetry tries to paint pictures 
that really need to be taken in by the eye, and painting 
tries to seize not only the visible scene but the poetic 
feeling underlying it. Music, however, working in a medium 
so little fitted to depict concrete ideas, soon reaches its 

* Jenseits von Gut und Bose, p. 256. 
** Beethoven, (Gesammelte Schriften, IX, 146) 



14 XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

limits of clear representation of poetic and pictorial ideas. 
For this reason pictorial and poetic tendencies have in all 
epochs exercised a pernicious influence upon music, and 
have given birth to a false art, that imagined it could 
express objects and ideas which it is far beyond the powers 
of music to render. This false music lives by pretensions 
and self-deception. Its arrogant view of itself as the only 
perfect music has dlwoys brought it into discredit. 

It thus becomes comprehensible how some people could 
look with suspicion upon poetic and pictorial intentions 
in music, and in times of danger adopt the motto of "ab- 
solute music", this being the banner of pure art they 
hoisted over the works of Bach and Beethoven, — errone- 
ously and inappropriately as it happens. 

But not only is the creative art complex; our reception 
of it is not less so. In every true artistic perception there 
come into action all the feelings and ideas of which a man 
is capable. The process is multiform, though it is only 
in the rarest cases that the subject has any inkling of what 
is going on in his imagination, and what mental overtones 
complicate the ground tone which, as it seems to him» 
exclusively occupies his attention. 

Many a man erroneously thinks he sees a picture whereas 
he really hears it, his artistic emotions arising from the 
music — perhaps silent — that he perceives in the scene 
represented on the canvas. Anyone who does not hear 
the bees in Didier-Pouget's picture of the flowery heath 
does not see it with the eye of the artist. Again, anyone 
who is not fascinated by the most ordinary painting of a 
pine wood — hearing the infinite distant S3miphonies of 
the wind sweeping over the tree-tops, — sees only as half 
a man, i. e. not as an artist. 

So again in music. Musical sensibility is to some extent 
a capacity for tone-visions, of whatever kind it may be, — 
whether it deals with lines, ideas, forms, or events. Asso- 
ciations of ideas are always going on where we would not 
suspect them. 



Blending of the Arts in the Imagination. 15 

Let us ask the audience of a performance of a work by 
Palestrina to account for the solemn effect it has made 
on them. The majority would confess that they had felt 
themselves transported into the vast nave of a church, 
and saw the sunlight streaming through the windows of 
the choir into the twilight of the building. We all poetise 
more than we are apt to imagine. This can be shewn by 
a simple experiment. Try to look but not hear, and to 
hear but not let any visual associations step over the 
threshold of consciousness, and the other artist in us, 
whom we imagined to be uninterested, will at once spring 
up and demand his rights. 

Every artistic feeling is really an act. Artistic creation 
is only a special case of the artistic attitude towards the 
world. Some men have the faculty of reproducing in speech, 
colours, tones, or words the artistic impression made on 
them and many others by what goes on in the world around 
them. It is not so much that these are more fundamentally 
artists than the others, but only that they can speak and 
the others are dumb. When we see the passionate effect 
made by art on men who are only "receptive", and how 
much their mute imagination can add to the works of 
others, it no longer seems a paradox that it is only by 
accident that some of the great ones have received the gift 
of speech. 

Art is the translation of aesthetic associations of ideas. 
The more complexly and intensely the conscious and 
unconscious concepts and ideas of the artist conuniuiicate 
themselves to us through his art-work, the deeper is the 
impression. It is then that he succeeds in stimulating 
others to that vivacity of imaginative feeling which we call 
art, in contradistinction to what we hear and see and ex^ 
perience in our ordinary moments. 

The part of a work of art that is perceptible by the 
senses is in reality only the intermediator between two 
active efforts of the imagination. All art speaks in signs 
and symbols. No one can explain how it happens that the 



l6 XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

artist can waken to life in us the existence that he has seen 
and lived through. No artistic speech is the adequate 
expression of what it represents; its vital force comes 
from what is unspoken in it. 

In poetry and painting this is less noticeable, since the 
language of each of these arts is also the language of daily 
life. We need, however, only read a poem by Goethe, 
and test the words of which it consists by the wealth of 
suggestions that they arouse in us, to see at once that 
words in art become suggestive s}rmbols, by means of 
which the imaginations of two artists hold converse to- 
gether. "In truth", says Wagner, "the greatness of the poet 
can be best measured by what he refrains from saying, in 
order to let the inexpressible itself speak to us in secrecy."* 

In painting, the inadequacy of the thing said is still 
more striking. We cannot estimate how much the spectator 
must add of his own before a coloured canvas can become 
a landscape. An etching, indeed, makes extraordinary 
demands on the imagmation, for the representation in 
black and white is only a s}anbol of the landscape, and has 
no more reality than a s3anbol. And yet this s5mibolical 
delineation is, for anyone who can interpret it, perhaps the 
most potent means of conjuring up the faculty of complete 
vision. 

In this way there comes into painting, in the place of 
the naive "This is", the noteworthy "This signifies" of 
artistic speech. It will be learned and assimilated by 
familiarity. It even happens at times that the speech fails, 
the symbols not being dear to the spectator, and appearing 
merely as agglomerations of lines and colours, — either 
because the artist has put more into them than they can 
express, or because the spectator has not caught the secret 
of his speech. 

In music the expression is wholly symbolical. The 
translation of even the most general feelings and ideas 



* Zuhunfismusik, in his Gesatnmelte Schriften, VII, 172. 



Inajdequacy of Artistic Expression. ijp 

into tone is a mystery. The latest researches into the 
physiology of musical sensation do not help us in the 
least ; they merely conquer for musical aesthetic a wonderful 
colonial territory, which, however, to the end of time wiU 
yield it nothing. "The thing that is most imporatnt is, 
and will remain, unexplained," says Hanslick, — "the 
nervous process by which the sensation of tone becomes 
converted into feeling, a mental mood."* 

The more ambitious the musical expression is, the more 
noticeable is the symbolical element in it. Before long it 
addresses to the imagination of the hearer pretensions 
which, with the best will in the world, caimot be admitted, 
and comes violently into collision with the more suggestive 
element in artistic speech. It is wrong, however, to imagine 
that so-called pure music speaks a language that is not 
symbolical, and that it expresses something of which the 
meaning is unequivocal. It too appeals to the hearer's 
power of imagination, only that it is concerned more with 
abstract feeling and abstract beauty of line than with 
concrete expression. Only in this way does it become 
possible for the poetic imagination to make itself intel- 
ligible, so far as it can, to the musical imagination. 

As a rule we employ the criterion of immediate intel- 
ligibility, and, from the standpoint of absolute music, will 
only allow that art to be valid that appeab inmiediately 
to the unprepossessed and unprepared hearer. This would 
make perfect tone-speech an impossibility. It is like 
refusing to recognise a foreign language as a language 
unless it is immediately intelligible to every one at a first 
hearing. Evfery language subsists only by a convention, 
in virtue of which a certain sensation or idea is regarded 
as corresponding to a certain aggregation of sounds. It 
is the same in music. Anyone who understands the lan- 
guage of a composition, and knows the significance of 
certain combinations of tone, perceives ideas in the music 



* Vam Musihaiisch' Schonen, ist ed. 1857; loth ed. 1902. 

8chweitt«r, Bach. U. A 



l8 XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

that do not speak directly to the uninitiated, though they 
are there all the time. Few composers, however, have been 
great enough to fashion a language for themselves in which 
they could express intelligibly the concrete part of their 
ideas. The others, whenever they venture outside the 
limits of the generally accepted moods, begin to wander 
in their speech, though they still think themselves intel- 
ligible. Finally they add a progranmie to their music, 
that hangs out of its mouth like the strips on which the 
primitive painters used to indicate what their characters 
were saying. This naive descriptive music is to be found 
not only in the past. The average modem and even the 
most up-to-date symphonic poem is just as naive, no 
matter how great may be its inventive and technical power, 
since here also a concreteness of expression is claimed that 
in reality has not been long attained, and is, in general, 
unattainable by music. 

This is, in fact, the tragedy of music, that it can only 
express with limited intelligibility the concrete image from 
which it has sprung. From the indefiniteness of the tone- 
picture itself, however, we must not conclude a correspond- 
ing indefiniteness of the fancy that prompted it, and claim 
that music of this kind is the absolute music. We have a 
warning example in Weber's KonzertstUck. In 1821, on 
the morning of the day of the first performance of Der 
FreischiUz, Weber brought his wife the KonzertstUck which 
he had just completed, and played it to her and his favourite 
pupil Benedict, telling them at the same time what the 
music was meant to represent: 

^^LargheUo. On the terrace of the castle stands the 
ch&telaine, looking sadly into the distance. Her husband 
is with the Crusaders in the Holy Land. She has no news 
of him. Is he dead? Will she see him again? 

^* Allegro appassionato. Horror! She sees him lying on 
the battlefield, abandoned, wounded. The blood flows 
from his woimds and she cannot hasten to his side ! 

*' Adagio e tempo di marcia. Tumult and the glittering 



The Explanation of Music. xg 

of weapons in the distance, coming from the wood. They 
draw nearer. They are knights canning the cross. The 
banners wave, the people break out into cries of joy, 
and he is there! 

^*Pifi mossOf presto assai. She runs to meet him. He 
embraces her. Wood and field add their jubilant cries to 
the h3nnn of faithful love." 

The pupil inunediatdy wrote out the "explanation", 
but Weber would not allow it to be published with the 
music*. Had it not been preserved by accident, no one 
would have imagined the events depicted in the KonzerU 
siilck, and it would naturally be regarded as a piece of 
pure music. 

Beethoven's works were also written under the impression 
of definite scenes, in spite of the fact that they are claimed 
to be pure music. When asked for an explanation of the 
D minor sonata, he replied, ''Read Shakespeare's Tempest.^* 
In the adagio of the F major quartet (op. i8, No. i) he had 
in his mind the grave-scene from Romeo and Juliet. The 
E major sonata (op. 8i) even bears an authentic inscrip- 
tion; it depicts a farewell, a separation and a return. More 
particularly in his latest chamber music we have a strong 
f eeUng that the musical sequence of ideas is determined by 
a poetic mood of some kind; we have however, no hints 
by which we can definitely reconstruct from the music 
the situation the composer had in his mind. 

Liszt improvised best when his imagination had been 
set working by the perusal of poetry. 

Hanslick, in his Vom Musikalisch- Sch&nen, does indeed 
recognise facts of this kind, but considers this kind of 
composing "in leading strings" to poetry, as distinct from 
"pure" musical invention, to be merely exceptional. The 
knowledge of the concrete ideas from which the music 
arose is of no consequence for our imderstanding of it. 



* See Johannes VS^eber's interesting Les illusions musicales at 
la vifiU sur rexpressiony 2nd ed., Paris, 1900. 



1* 



20 XX. Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

"It is aesthetically a matter of indifference," he says, "if 
Beethoven worked upon definite subjects in every one of 
his compositions; we do not know these subjects; there- 
fore, so far as the work is concerned, they do not exist. 
It is the work alone that lies before us, without any com- 
mentary; and just as the jurist ignores everything that is 
not embodied in acts and deeds, so nothing exists for the 
aesthetic judgment that lies outside the work of art.'** 

This is untrue. Certainly only the pure music lies before 
us. But this is only the hieroglyph, in which are recorded 
the emotional qualities of the visions of the concrete im- 
agination. This hierogl5q)h appeals perpetually to the fancy 
of the hearer, requiring it to translate the drama of the emo- 
tions back again into concrete events, and to find a path 
along which he can see, as well as he can, the line that 
has been taken by the creative imagination of the com- 
poser. Notable musicians have confessed that they could 
not grasp the latest works of Beethoven. This derogates 
neither from them nor from Beethoven; it only implies 
that their imagination had no point of contact with his. 

The ordinary hearer is easily satisfied. The poorest 
little anecdote is enough to put him **in the mood of the 
work", and to find everything in it that he is expected to 
find. It is not so long since that the attempt was made 
to popularise Beethoven's sonatas and Mendelssohn's 
Lieder ohne Worte by giving them suggestive titles. We 
have become more imfeeling now, and will not tolerate 
attempts of this kind to place the creative fancy on its 
legs. We care for nothing that has not come from our 
knowledge of the tongue the composer speaks, or from our 
own poetic intuition, and that has this mark of truth in it, 
that it is inexpressible and so cannot be made intelligible 
to anyone else. Only the greatest artists have the right 
to show others the path their own imagination followed 
when listening to a piece of music. 



• Op, cit. p. 98 ff . 



The Poetical Element in Beethoven. 21 

Wagner daringly interprets Beethoven's great C sharp 
minor quartet as "an actual day of Beethoven's life". In 
the introductory adagio we have an expression of melan- 
choly on wakening at dawn. This is overcome. In the 
presto Beethoven turns his "unspeakably cheerful glance" 
on the outer world. He gazes reflectively upon life. After 
the short adagio, — "a sombre meditation" — he awakes, 
and in the final allegro "strikes the strings to a dance 
that the world had never heard before."* Perhaps Beet- 
hoven would have expressed the contents of his music 
in quite other words and images. Nevertheless Wagner's 
interpretation is not a "commentary" to be made merry 
over like the ordinary musical interpretation. Here it 
is a case of "the poet speaks". 

Just as there are painters and musicians among the 
poets, so there are poets and painters among the musicians. 
They become clearly distinguished from each other in pro- 
portion as the "other artist" is able to assert himself in 
their conceptions. Poetic music deals more with ideas, 
pictorial music with pictures; the one appeals more to 
the feeling, the other to our faculty of representation. The 
incoherency of the discussion upon tone-painting, pro- 
gramme music and representative music has been due in 
great part to the fact that no account has been taken of 
the two main currents in music that now flow parallel to 
each other, now cross each other, — it being assumed 
that every sin against pure music was of the same order. 

Beethoven and Wagner belong more to the poets, Bach, 
Schubert and Berlioz more to the painters. 

Beethoven is often called a poet by Wagner, who thinks 
that the awakening of "the other artist" in him was 
the crucial point of his career. The first period of free 
and careless musical invention was followed by another, 
in which Beethoven speaks a language that often seems 
arbitrary and capricious, the ideas being held together 



^ Wagner, Beethoven (in Ges, Schrifien, IX, ii8). 



22 XX. Pbetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

only by a poetic purpose, which, however, could not be 
expressed with poetic clearness in music. Then comes the 
period in which the deeply sensitive man suffered acutely, 
when he could no longer make himself intelligible to his 
hearers, who regarded him simply as a mad genius*. The 
successive symphonies relate the longing of music to trans- 
cend its own element and become universal art, until at 
last, in the ninth symphony, it seized upon speech, worked 
out its own salvation, and imited the severed arts in one. 

We may look at the introduction of the chorus at the 
end of the ninth symphony in another light, — regarding 
it as an error, the end of the S3miphony rather than the 
beginning of the genuine music-drama : but this does not 
affect the justice of Wagner's view of Beethoven's musical 
development. 

Perhaps Wagner has interpreted Beethoven too much 
in terms of himself. In reality Beethoven's fancy is much 
more pictorial than Wagner's. Compare their ways of 
expressing themselves verbally, which is always a clue to 
the process of formation of a man's ideas. Wagner has 
nothing of Beethoven's abrupt, drastic style. He hardly 
ever uses pictures, — differing here, again, from Berlioz, 
whose mind is crowded with them. For a musician, 
Wagner's writing, as a rule, is imusually rational. The pic- 
torial bias usually predominates among musicians, as their 
conversation shows. When they wish to explain an5rthing, 
they have recourse to pictures, heap one comparison upon 
another, mix the appropriate and inappropriate together, 
employ the strangest expressions, and then think they 
have made what is inexpressible in the idea comprehen- 
sible. Those who, like Wagner, aim only at expressing 
the emotional quintessence of the idea, are rather excep- 
tional. Even Schumann expresses himself more pictorially 
than Wagner. The latter is never purely realistic, either 
in his prose or his music. He will not even allow that the 



* Wagner, Oper und Drama (Ges. Scknften, III, 344). 



The Poetical Element in Wagner. 23 

representation of the purely characteristic is the province 
of painting itself, which, he holds, should express ideas. 
He maintains that the ideal creative quality of Renais- 
sance painting decayed in proportion as it got out of touch 
with religion. He seriously maintains that since that 
period it has continuously declined. 

He wishes his own pictorial music to appeal not to the 
imagination but to the emotions. Even when the music 
expresses something visual, the pictorialism is not an end 
in itself but symbolical of an idea. He would prefer to 
dispense altogether with the plastic imagination, and set 
bodily before the spectator's eye the action that is being 
emotionally represented in music. The best and most 
exalted tone-painting, he says in one place, is that in which 
the tone-painter addresses himself to the feeling instead 
of to the imagination,* that is to say, when the external 
object of the musical picture is simultaneously made visible 
to the hearer. According to him, the true tone-picture 
is the music of the drama. So that Wagner is opposed to 
what is generally looked upon as tone-painting, since this 
does not aim at the simultaneous bewitching of the senses 
by the music and the visible presentation of the object 
that the music describes. "All we can express in music," 
he says, "are feelings and sentiments." 

His themes are harmonic in quality. They get their 
characteristic quality from a basic chord that mounts up 
out of the ocean of harmony as the idea emerges from the 
depths of feeling. His modulations are not simply musical, 
but have a poetic significance. In the true sense they 
are only necessary when they correspond to something 
that happens in the domain of feeling. 

The art of a Schubert or a Berlioz is much more 
materialistic. Of course they express emotions ; but when 
they become wholly characteristic they hold to the picture 
for its own sake. Their painting appeals to our faculty of 



* Op0r und Drama {Ges. Schriften, IV, 234). 



24 ^^- Poetic Music and Pictorial Music. 

representation, and to a certain extent becomes an aim in 
itself, which is never the case in Wagner. In the accom- 
paniments to Schubert's songs there is more realistic tone- 
painting than in all Wagner's music dramas. 

Berlioz's pictorialism is even more apparent. His art 
has nothing whatever in common with Wagner's ; it follows 
quite a different path. For Berlioz the perfection of tone- 
painting is not the pure expression of feeling, but ex- 
travagant delineation. His music is directed to the ex- 
ternalities of the event. Even when he is writing for the 
stage he aims at the obtrusive clearness of programme 
music. We see the thing simultaneously in a double form — 
on the stage and in the music; Wagner gives it to us only 
once, but complete, the music not reproducing the visible 
action itself, but expressing the emotional correlative of 
the event, which would otherwise remain unexpressed. 

It was this attachment to the external that made Wagner 
unable to understand Berlioz's music. In the moving love- 
scene in the Romeo and Juliet s3miphony, he tells us, he 
was at first enchanted by the development of the main 
themes. During the course of the movement the enchant- 
ment evaporated, till he experienced absolute discomfort. 
"It is true that the motives", he says, "were present in 
the famous balcony-scene of Shakespeare; the great mis- 
take of the composer lay in retaining faithfully the drama- 
tist's disposition of them."* 

See, again, what Berlioz has selected from Goethe's 
Faust — a series of scenes for musical painting, taken 
arbitrarily, without much regard to the drama itself. 

The themes of Schubert and Berlioz are not so har- 
monic in essence as those of Wagner. They are not, like 
these, founded on a certain basic harmony. They have 
their origin in the pictorial imagination; they are like the 
characteristic lines of a draughtsman. The distinction is 



* Vber Franz Lisxts Symphonische DichUingen (Ges. SckKVy 
250). 



Structure of Bach's Musical Phrases. 25 

hard to define in detail, though it is clear enough to the 
imagination. None the less it reveals the essential difference 
in nature between the two kinds of music. 

The pictorial element in Schubert and Beriioz is not 
always sufficiently distinctive for us to contrast them 
decisively with Wagner. In spite of all the difference 
between them, they have this in common with them, and 
with post-Beethovenian music in general, that they express 
in tones a poetic sequence of ideas, whether in the form 
of a song or in that of a programme, and do not confine 
themselves, as in essentially pictorial music, to seizing a 
feeling or an event in one pregnant moment and painting 
it from its picturesque side, without any concern for the 
moment before or the moment after. They undertake to 
follow in detail the adventures of a poem, and are con- 
sequently poetic musicians. Bach does not do this. He 
is the most consistent representative of pictorial music, — 
the direct antipodes of Wagner. These two are the poles 
between which all "characteristic** music resolves. 



CHAPTER XXI. 

WORD AND TONE IN BACH. 

The relation of Bach's music to its text is the most 
intimate that can be imagined*. This is evident even in 
externalities. The structure of his musical phrase does 
not merely fit more or less the structure of the poetic 
phrase, but is identical with it. In this respect we may 
contrast Bach with Handel. In the latter, the musical 



* See also Arnold Schering's interesting essay Backs Text- 
behandlung (Kahnt, Leipzig, 1900), — in which the poetic element 
in Bach's music is described for the first time, and very finely and 
searchin^^y, — and Andr6 Pirro's monumental study L'EsthStique 
de /. 5. Bach (Fiachbacher, Paris, 1907), which confirms and com- 
pletes, in the most gratifying way, the conclusions arrived at in 
the present volume. 



26 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

period of a long verbal passage consists of separate frag- 
ments joined together in the most masterly way, the verbal 
phrase, however, having to surrender something of its own 
natural form in order to accommodate itself to that of the 
music. There always results a certain antagonism between 
the rhythm of the two factors. We get the impression 
that if we were to let a Handelian theme fall to the ground, 
the tone-melody and the word-melody would separate under 
the shock; whereas a Bach phrase would remain unbroken 
and inseparable, his musical phrase being only the verbal 
phrase re-cast in tone. His music is indeed not so much 
melodic as declamatory. He is what Guido Adler maintains 
Wagner is, a product of the great music of the Renaissance. 

The melodic impression his phrases make on us is due to 
his clear and consummate sense of form. Though he thought 
declamatorily, he could not help writing melodically. A 
vocal theme of Bach's is a declamatorily conceived phrase, 
that by accident, as if by a marvel perpetually repeated, 
assumes melodic form, whether it be a recitative, an arioso, 
an aria, or a chorus. His texts, regarded from the stand- 
point of form, were as unapt for music as any that could 
be imagined. A Biblical verse does not fall into any musical 
period, not even a verbal one, for it has its origin not in 
a rhythmical feeling but in the necessities of translation. 
It was no better with the original texts given him by 
his librettists. These again have no inner unity, being 
painfully pieced together out of reminiscences of the Bible 
and the hymn-books. But when we read the same sen- 
tences in Bach's music, they all at once fall into definite 
musical phrases. 

The declamatory unity of tone and word in Bach re- 
minds us of Wagner. While, however, it is self-evident 
in the latter, the verbal phrase itself being musically con- 
ceived, so that the music only adds the intervals, as it 
were, in Bach the phenomenon is more wonderful — the 
music seems to confer a higher vital power on the words, 
divests them of their lowly associations, and shows them 



structure of Bach's Musical Phrases. 27 

in their true form. This marvel is so perpetually repeated 
in the cantatas and Passions that we come to regard it 
as a matter of course. But the more deeply we penetrate 
into Bach» the more we are filled with the ever-renewed 
and ever-increasing astonishment that the thoughtful soul 
feels in presence of those daily occurrences of nature that 
are at the same time the greatest marvels. 

If we have once absorbed a Biblical verse in Bach's 
setting of it, we can never again conceive it in any other 
rhythm. It is impossible for an3^ne who knows the 
SL Matthew Passion to run over in his mind the sacramental 
words of the evening Communion without consciously or 
unconsciously giving the words the accents and duration 
that they have in Bach's declamation. No one who knows 
the cantata Nun komm der Heiden Heiland (No. 61) can 
ever again think of the "Siehe! Ich stehe vor der Tiir und 
klopfe an" ("Behold, I stand at the door and knock*')* 
apart from Bach's phrasing of it. Even if he has forgotten 
the actual intervals, the musical groimd-plan of the passage 
has become, after several hearings, so much the plan of 
the passage itself, that it is impossible to think of the one 
without the other. 

It would be incorrect to suppose that in every good musi- 
cal setting the music has the same power of persistence. It 
is not found in the same degree in anyone but Wagner — 
not even in Schubert. The extraordinary thing is that 
in Bach's music the reminiscence depends less on the 
intervals than on the accents and quantities of the declama- 
tion itself; although, of course, his themes are so charac- 
teristic and drastic in their intervals that they are mem- 
orable from this side as well. 

One of the most remarkable examples of his declamation 
is the aripso-like opening recitative of the cantata Gleichwie 
der Regen und Schnee vom Himmel fdllt (No. i8)**. The 
nearly equal divisions of the original passage are gathered 

♦ Rev. Ill, 30. 
** Isaiah LV, 10 and 11. 



28 



XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 



up by the music into one great unified phrase that resolves 
and obliterates, as if by magic, all the rigidities of the verbal 
passage, giving us the impression that the poetic thought 
has waited for centuries for this music in order to reveal 
itself in its true plastic outline. 

Even when Bach's music is more aria-like in structure, it 
still retains this purely declamatory quality. Recite, for 
example, the first aria of the cantata Selig ist der Mann 
(No. 57)*, strictly according to the quantities and the 
accents of the music, without for a moment considering 
the intervals, and you will get an idea of how veracious 
Bach's musical declamation is. 

If the verse he is setting has rhyme and a regular length 
of line, he passes over these and fastens upon the inner 
form of the passage. His musical phrase is never dominated 
by the recurrence of the rhyme. In the text of the aria 
in the St, Matthew Passion : 

"Gerne will ich mich bequemen 
Kreuz und Becher anzunehmen 
Trink ich doch dem Heiland nach", 

it seems almost impossible for music to rise superior to the 
rh3mie. Bach succeeds, however, by his distribution of the 
accents and the intervals, in so diverting our attention 
from it that we are unconscious of it when it is properly 
sung. The first "ich" must be accented as the music in- 
dicates, and as its relation to the previous arioso, "Der 
Heiland fallt", obviously demands. 
The phrase goes thus: 




Ger - ne will ich mich be - que-men, Kreuz und Be - cher 



Wiuf M^-^ C | r f. H! | i|! r. f\f!^^ 



an - zu - neh - men, trink ich 



doch dem Hei-land nach. 



* James I, i2* 



His Declamation in the Recitatives. 



29 



It is not Bach's fault if many of our singers bring out here 
the poet's line-divisions and rhymes instead of Bach's 
musical phrase. 

Any one who goes through the separate voices of Nun 
isi das Heil und die Kraft (No. 50)* will discover that 
Bach phrases declamatorily even when he seems to be 
merely writing fugal parts. 

Effective as his method is, it does not always seem 
natural at first sight. Often, indeed, Bach's way of turning 
a passage into music seems quite imnatural ; rhjdJim, struc- 
ture, accents, syllabic values, — all give at first the im- 
pression of being wrong. The syllable that would ordinarily 
receive the main accent is, if possible, merged and lost in 
the shadow of the unaccented part of the bar; another 
one, of no value at all, is thrown into high reUef by some 
striking interval; we find no pause just where we would 
expect one. Thus every stroke that Bach makes in order 
to bring out the musical form of the phrase is, considered 
by itself, incomprehensible. Nor would it be difficult to 
show that in some of his recitatives or arias Bach has 
sinned here and there against the natural accent. When, 
however, we look at the piece as a whole, singing the notes 
with freedom and at the same time with the quantities 
Bach has allotted to them, we see it in reUef , — as it were 
in a kind of acoustical perspective, — of which detailed 
analysis could convey no idea. This art defies narrow 
scrutiny. It rests on an intuitive appreciation of the 
cooperation of the details, the total effect of which is seen 
by the composer at a glance. It follows that there is no surer 
way of destrojdng Bach's effect than the false artistic freedom 
which many singers, perplexed by the many strangenesses 
of the music, permit themselves in order to remedy the 
"chance" quality of the notes that Bach has written ♦♦. 



• Rev. XII, 10. 
*^ See, on this point, Alfred Heuss's article Backs RezilaHv- 
hehandhmg mit besanderer BerUcksichHgung der Passionen, in the 
Bach-Jakrbuck for 1904, pp. 82 ff. The discussion that followed 



30 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

Bach converts into tone not only the body but the soul 
of the verbal passage. This is clearly seen in his bar- 
monisations of the chorales. The greatest masters of the 
chorale-piece, Eccard, Praetorius and others, harmonised 
the melody; Bach harmonised the words. For him the 
chorale-melody by itself is indefinite in character; it only 
acquires a personahty when allied with a definite text, 
the nature of which he will express in his harmonies. 

Webor long ago saw that the chorale-movements of the 
cantatas and Passions are not purely musical. Bach's 
son Phihpp Emmanuel had published them without the 
corresponding texts. He had no perception of his father's 
poetic intentions. His idea was simply to give the world 
a collection of examples of the chorale-movement at its 
best ♦. At the beginning of the nineteenth century, when 
Abt Vogler's mathematical-aesthetic system of harmony 
was exciting general admiration, Weber, his pupil, thought 
he owed it to the honour of his teacher to show that he 
had also surpassed old Bach in the chorale-movement, 
going more systematically to work than the cantor, — the 
astonishing thing being that the latter, without knowing 
Vogler's system, should have written such rich harmonies. 
With this end in view he compares twelve of Bach's 
harmonisations with twelve corresponding ones by Vogler, 
and demonstrates that the old master is inferior to the 
new one, many of his strange harmonic progressions having 
no raison (THre**. 



the article, especially the contribution of Moritz Wirth, was also 
interesting, though at the same time it showed how little the 
question has hitherto been studied. 

^ Johann Sebastian Backs viersHmmige Charalgesdnge, gesamtnelt 
von Philipp Emmanuel Bach. Part I, 1765, Part II, 1769. See 
B. G. XXXIX, pp. 177 ff. 

** Weber's AusgewdhlU Schfiften^ ed. Reclam, pp. 89—97: 
Zwdf Chordle van Seb, Bacfh umgearbeitet von Vogler, sergliedert 
von Karl Maria von Weber. Georg Joseph Vogler was bom at 
V^urzburg in 1749, studied music and theology in Italy, became 
a priest in Rome, and settled in 1775 in Mannheim, where he 
founded a school of music. Later he lived in Paris, Stockhohn, 



The Poetical Element in Bach's Chorale Movements. 31 

To put this down to Weber's lack of judgment would be 
wrong, as his views were quite just. From the standpoint 
of pure music Bach's harmonisations are wholly enigmatic, 
for he does not work upon a tonal succession that in itself 
forms an aesthetic whole, but follows the lead of the poetry 
and the verbal expression. How far he lets these take him 
from the natural principles of pure composition may be 
seen from his harmonisation of ''Soils ja so sein, dass Straf 
und Pein" ♦, in the cantata Ich elender Mensch, wet wird 
mich erlosen (No. 48), which as piure music is indeed in- 
tblerable, Bach's purpose being to express all the wild 
grief for sin that is suggested in the words. 

The fault lay with PhiUpp Emmanuel, who published 
the chorale-movements without their texts, thereby show- 
ing that he did not understand the nature of his father's 
art. A great service was therefore done to Bach by the 
Berlin choral conductor Ludwig Erk (1807 — 1883) when 
he published the preludes with the verses to which the 
composer had set the melodies ♦♦. 

If we take Erk's collection and examine the successive 
arrangement of the same melody, we see that they assume 
all kinds of characters according to the poetic harmonisa- 
tion. A broad, victorious mdody in the major is pursuing 
its course, when suddenly a theme of mourning enters and 
dominates it. What majesty the Passion melody "Herz- 
liebster Jesu, was hast du verbrochen", assumes in the 
St MaUhew Passion, when it expresses the words "Ach, 
grosser Konig, gross zu alien Zeiten" ! The quaver sequence 



and London. In 1807 he became Hoikapellmeister at Darmstadt, 
where he founded a music school that was attended by Weber and 
Meyerbeer. He died in 1814. 

• The melody is that of "Ach Gott und Herr". 
** Ludwig Erk, Johann Sebastian Backs Choralgesdnge und 
geistliche Arien; Leipzig, Peters: Part I, 1850, Part II, 1865. The 
work has been frequently reprinted. The chorales have lately 
been translated into French, with fine understanding, by Albert 
Mahaut, and published with an enthusiastic preface by Vincent 
d'Indy (Breitkopf and Hartel, 1905/6). 



32 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

in the bass, which is inexplicable from the standpoint of 
pure music, is the triumphal chariot that carries it. We 
may say that in Bach's chorales every line, every word is 
painted, and thrown into a kind of embossed relief. 

Wagner once remarked of one of his modulations, that 
at first sight seemed too daring and abrupt, that in reality 
it was not so, since it originated in the meeting of two 
motives that had already been heard frequently; and that 
the ear, knowing these, would take in the almost ex- 
travagant harmony as something quite natural. Bach, in 
his chorales, works on a similar principle. The melody is 
familiar; he can therefore permit himself the most auda- 
cious harmony, the ear being in no danger of missing the 
continuity of the melody. 

The poetic significance of Bach's chorale-pieces, how- 
ever, is only fully seen when the choir sings not the melody 
but the text, emphasising not the melodic accents but 
the words that Bach has so strongly — sometimes even 
too strongly, — underlined in his harmonies. The more 
we examine these chorales, the more we become conscious 
of the suppressed passion of expression there is in them, 
to which there is no parallel anywhere in literatxure. 

Only a few of Bach's chorale-pieces for the organ have 
come down to us*; but those we have suffice to show us 
his method of working. When the Amstadt consistory 



* Breitkopf's catalogue of 1764 mentions a VoUstdndiges Choral^ 
buck mit in Noten aufgesetxUn Generalbasse von 240 in LeipHg 
gewohnlichen Melodien by Johann Sebastian Bach, priced at 
10 thalers. ("Complete Chorale -Book of 240 familiar Leipzig 
melodies* with the thorough-bass written out in notes"). This 
book of chorales is lost. In Schemelli's Gesangbuch of 1736 some 
of Bach's figured basses are given; they may have been taken 
from his Leipzig chorale-book. See Spitta III, 109 ff. We further 
possess some harmonisations that have been preserved in copies 
made by Bach's pupils. They are included in the Peters edition 
of the chorale-preludes. (Peters ed. of Bach's Organ Works, V, 
PP* 39> S7f 102 No. I, 103 No. 2, 106, 107 ; VI, No. 26. See also 
B. G. XL, pp. 60 ff . ; and the harmonisations of the chorale-partitas 
in Peters V, pp. 60, 68, 102, 103.) 



The Poetical Element in Bach's Choxale Movements. 33 

remonstrated with him for exceeding his leave of absence, 
the opportunity was at the same time taken to rebuke him 
for his too temperamental chorale-accompaniments. *Toint 
out to him'\ so the report runs, ^^that in the chorales he 
has made many curious Variationes^ and mingled many 
strange tones with them, so that the congregation was con- 
fused thereby."* We can understand this censure when 
we look at the harmonisation of ''In dulci Jubilo" (Peters V, 
No. 103), that was intended to accompany the congrega- 
tional singing. It mattered nothing that Bach filled the 
breath-pauses between the lines of the melody with passage- 
work: that was the common practice of the time. But 
when the melody enters again it disappears in the har- 
monic flood. We must of course remember that as the 
congregational singing was led by the choir, Bach could 
permit himself a little freedom. 

In this Sturm und Drang the poetic tendency is already 
revealed. In the chorale ''Vom Himmel hoch, da komm 
ich her" (Peters V, 106), that Krebs has preserved for us, 
the interlacing and surrounding of the melody by joyous 
scale-passages is explained by the fact that Badi was 
depicting the angels of heaven referred to in the poetry. 
A characteristic feature of the chorale-movements of this 
youthful period is the piled-up masses of chords, with 
their comparative disregard of any strict leading of the 
voices. 

His style of accompaniment in his mature period may 
be seen in "Herr Gott! dich loben wir", (Peters VI, pp. 65 
— 69)**, where every verse is treated independently. The 
harmonies are clarified and the writing contrapuntal, 
but, compared with modem chorale-accompaniment, un- 
usually animated throughout and over-rich in passing 
notes. The poetic intention is perfectly evident. Any- 
thing characteristic in the text is immediately depicted 



♦ See Spitta I, 315, 316. 

** Te deum laudamus. In the old hymn-book it is referred to 
as Hymnus S, Anibrosii et Augustini, 

Schweiticr, Bach. II. ^ 



34 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

in the music. Observe the majestic crotchet-motion in 
all the voices from the moment when the words "Dein 
gottlich Macht und Herrlichkeif' enter (p. 66, bar 8ff.), 
and the chromatic motive of grief that enters with the 
words "Nmi hilf mis, Herr" (p. 67, bar 19 ff .), the reference 
being to the death-agonies of Jesus*. The line ''Hilf 
deinem Volk" p. 67, bars 39 ff .) is illustrated by means of 
a rhythm which, in the cantatas and chorale-preludes, 
expresses peace, — simply because the word "segnen" 
occurs here **. Immediately afterwards we have the Bach 
motive of joy (p. 68, bar 6 ff .), as the text refers to celestial 
delight *♦♦. Later (p. 69, bar 13 ff.), the sorrowful, yearn- 
ing prayer "Zeig' uns deine Barmherzigkeit" (**Show us 
Thy compassion") is expressed in trembling chromatics. 
Finally, at the words "Auf dich hoffen wir, heber Herr*' 
("In Thee, dear Lord, is our hope") (p. 69, bars 23 ff.), the 
rhythm of peace returns that was employed in the lines 
"Hilf deinem Volk, Herr Jesu Christ, and segne was dein 
Erbteil ist". Anyone who has the least acquaintance with 
the intentions of Bach's methods of expression will find 
that he has reproduced in his music, with speaking fidelity, 
the salient points of the text. A study of the text along 
with the chorale harmonisations will shew how closely 
interdependent tone and word are in Bach. The full in- 
fluence of the poetry upon the music, however, can be 
seen only in the chorale-preludes and the cantatas, where 
the musical painting is more self-dependent. 
It goes without saying that Bach seizes the poetic mood 



* "Nun hilf uns, Herr, den Dienem dein, 
Die init deinem teuren Blut erldset sein." 
("Help now thy servants, oh Lord, who are redeemed by Thy 
precious blood".) 

♦♦ "Hilf deinem Volk, Herr Jesu Christ, 

Und segne was dein Erbteil ist." 
("Help Thy people, and bless Thine inheritance.") 
*♦* "Wart und pflcg ihr zu aller Zeit 

Und heb sie hoch in Ewigkeit." 
("Tend and cherish them to all eternity.") 



His Exprettion of Emotioitt. 35 

in its finest nuances. We can fuUy apply to it Wagner's 
remark that music should express the inexpressible, the 
very root of the poetic idea, the expression of whidi is 
beyond the power of verbal speech, that is too intellectual 
for the purpose. 

His conception of the Bible words is not always the 
customary one; it comes from a profound and very per- 
sonal emotion. The music he has given to the sacramental 
words of the Last Supper in the St. Matthew Passion is 
astounding. There is not a trace of grief. The music 
breathes peace and majesty; the nearer it draws to the end, 
the more stately becomes the quaver -movement in the 
basses. Bach sees Jesus standing before the disciples with 
radiant face, prophesying of the day when He will again 
drink from the cup at the heavenly supper with them in 
His father's kingdom. Bach has thus emancipated him- 
self from the conventional idea of the scene, and, by means 
of his artistic intuition, has attained a juster sense of it 
than theology has ever done. 

The commencement of the recitative of the Passion, 
"Aber am ersten Tage der siissen Brote'*, ("Now the first 
day of the feast of unleavened bread") is notably bright, — 
almost joyous; so is the chorus of disciples, '*Wo willst du, 
dass wir dir bereiten das Osterlamm zu essen". ("Where 
wilt Thou that we prepare for Thee to eat the Passion"). 
Bach continues in this ingenuous and somewhat joyous 
mood until Jesus utters the "Wahrlich, ich sage euch, 
einer unter euch wird mich verraten" ("Verily I say unto 
you that one of you shall betray Me"). The "Wahrlich! 
du bist auch einer von denen, denn deine Sprache verrat 
dich", ("Surely thou also art one of them, for thy speech 
bewrayeth thee") in the Second Part of the work, is very 
briefly treated, without a suspicion of passion. It is simply 
a passing remark of the soldiers, — again a fine stroke of 
the imagination. 

£ver3nvhere, in fact, there is the same profound view 
and the same characteristic expression of the emotions 

3* 



36 XXI. Woid and Tone m Bach. 

and actions. Moreover, Bach now and then heightens the 
sentiment of his text m the most striking way; he turns 
contentment into exultant joy, and grief into violent 
despair. Not that he neglects the nuances of feeling even 
in thus intensifying it; his music expresses many degrees 
of joy and of sorrow. But all of them are surcharged with 
emotion. When he translates a feeling into tone, he voices 
it in its extreme form. 

In the first chorus of the cantata Ach, lieben Christen 
seid getrost (No. 114), he expresses the "getrost" in terms 
of such overflowing joy that the music goes far beyond 
the text. There is the same joyous excitement in the 
resignation expressed in the first chorus of the cantata 
Was tnetn GoU unll, das g^scheh aUzeit (No. iii). 

It is the same with the organ chorales. What the chorale* 
preludes "Mit Fried und Freud fahr ich dahin" (Peters V, 
No. 41) and "Wer nur den lieben Gott lasst walten'* (Peters 
V, 54) express is joy of an animated kind, not the peaceful 
confidence of which the text speaks. 

Bach is thus bent on making the music characteristically 
expressive at any cost. Before he decides simply to write 
beautiful music to a text, he searches the words through 
and through to find an emotion which, after it has been 
intensified, is suitable for musical representation. He re- 
models his text to suit the way he means to express it in 
music. The words are finally no more than a shadow- 
picture of the music. Bach's relation to his text is active, 
not passive ; it does not inspire him so much as he inspires 
it. His music lifts the words to a higher power, bringing 
out in transfigured form what seems struggling for ex- 
pression in the mediocrity or, — as often enough happens — 
the banality of the poem. 

For this reason there are hardly any tasteless Bach 
texts for anyone who reads through his works. He even 
becomes a little impatient at the constant complaints about 
the cantata poems, for he hears them with gJl the poetry 



Bach and his Teocts. yj 

Bach has added to them, — a poetry b^de which that of 
the original poet is only a clumsy Reflection*. 

We are appalled at the triteness of such words as those 
of the alto aria in the cantata Ach lieben Christen seid 
getrost (No. 114): "Du machst, o Tod, mir nun nicht femer 
bange, wenn ich durch dich die Freiheit nur erlange, es 
muss ja so einmal gestorben sein". When, however, we 
hear them with the music, they express most eloquently 
the blissful joy of the redeemed soul, in which the painful 
word "gestorben" (dead) only appears in order to be 
triumphed over. The addition of *'es muss ja so einmal 
gestorben sein" has given Bach a pretext for transforming 
the text into a poem of death and transfiguration. 

Hundreds of examples of the same kind could be given. 
We get the impression that the composer is even indifferent 
to the actual words of his text and their banalities, not 
merely because they have the same savour for him as for 
his contemporaries, but because he is conscious how little 
really remains of the words when he has poured his own 
poetic power upon them. It was a similar consciousness of 
strength that made him burden himself with the contemp- 
orary Italian form of the da capo aria; he was secretly 
aware that his musical declamation could vivify even 
a mere pattern of this kind. 

There is a great difference between the respective at- 
titudes of Bach and Mozart towards a poor text. Both 
of them make us forget it by their music, but for quite 
different reasons. Mozart's object is to distract our minds 



* It is, of course, not denied that a re-modelling of the text is 
imperatively called for now and then. To give without alteration 
the recitative "O Siinder trage mit Geduld", from the cantata 
Ach lieben Christen seid getrost (No. 114), which contains a dis* 
aertation on the "dropsy of sin", would be doing Bach a disservice. 
Translations into foreign languages should be quite free, aiming 
only at giving the text that Bach has expressed in his music, — 
i. e. the ideal text. This principle has been followed in the French 
versions published by Breitkopf and H&rtel. Gustave Bret's trans- 
lation of Sie werden aus Saba alle kommen is a masterpiece of this 
kind. 



38 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

from the text by means of music that is beautiful in itself. 
Bach gives it a new profundity and a new form in his music. 

How does he handle his music when the poem presents 
a series of points for expression? To what extent does 
he attempt to reproduce these successions of ideas in tone? 
He does not try to do so. Many cases can indeed be 
pointed to in his works where the music scrupulously 
follows every verbal detail of the poem. In the cantata 
Nun komm^ der Heiden Heiland (No. 6i), for example, 
the line '*Das sich wundert alle Welt" has an animation 
that makes it stand out sharply from the remainder. But 
in all these cases it is not so much a matter of an independent 
musical reproduction of the changing ideas of the text» 
as of underlining isolated and salient lines and words. 
Bach does not follow his text line by line, no matter how 
tempting the episodes it presents ; he expresses the charac- 
teristic emotional content, the word that seems to him 
vital for the mood of the whole, in an eloquent melodic 
motive. He is sure that in so doing he has expressed the 
poem itself. Whether we are reading a chorale-prelude 
from the OrgelbUchlein or a large chorus from one of the 
cantatas, it is all the same; almost invariably the motive 
that appears in the first bar is maintained to the last, as 
if the composer were indifferent to the details of the text. 

If the orchestra, for example, has broken into an ex- 
uberant motive of joy, it will not give it up, even though 
the poem should afterwards express feelings of another 
kind. If there comes some specially characteristic word, 
it is thrown into harmonic relief. The first chorus of the 
cantata Mache dtchy tnein Geist, bereit, wache, fleh Uf%d 
bete (No. 115) is dominated, like that of Wachei auf (No. 140), 
by a soaring, animated motive that s3rmbolises the *'wachen" 
(waking) ; the music will not be turned from its course by the 
concept of "beten" (to pray); all Bach does is to bring 
this home to us by a striking modulation. In the chorale- 
fantasias, again, the shadows of certain words seem to 
pass occasionally over the music. 



Baieh and PrograxnnM Muiic. 39 

On the whole we can say that Bach only takes into 
account in his music the most salient episodes of the text, 
confining himself mainly to expressing the basic mood 
of it. Often this seems to him to reside in some contrast, 
which he will suggest by a conflict of two characteristic 
motives. The classical example of this is the introductory 
chorus of the cantata Ihr werdet weinen und heulen, abet 
die Welt wird sick freuen (No. 103). His fondness for sharp 
contrasts makes him particularly delight in texts of this 
kind. Even when the antithesis suggested in the poem 
is purely incidental, he will fasten upon it and make it the 
fundamental idea of his music. 

In the Capriccio on the departure of his brother, Bach 
entered upon the path that leads to programme music. 
It was not, however, the naive programme music of a 
Kuhnau, who undertook to tell whole histories in music, 
but an art fully conscious of the limits of what can be 
intelligibly expressed in tone, and confining itself to a se- 
quence of a few plastic scenes, admirably characterised 
in the music. Bach's experience in this youthful experi- 
ment led him afterwards to aim at expression on other 
lines. His artistic greatness is shown in the fact that in 
an epoch of confident and pretentious programme music 
he rises superior to it from the beginning, and never aims 
at trjring to express in music what music is incapable of 
expressing. 

The naive programme musicians of the past and the 
present are Uke the BibUcal painters who, rel3mig on the 
fact that every detail of certain of the sacred stories is 
known, deluded themselves that they had really represented 
these scenes when they had accumulated the various ob- 
jects and persons concerned on their canvas, while all the 
time they had failed to make the real thing, the event 
itself, comprehensible. A man with a knife; a boy bound 
to a pile of wood; a ram's head in a bush; a bearded face 
looking down from the clouds, — this, they thought, was 
the sacrifice of Isaac. A man and a woman at a weU; in 



40 XXt. Wotd and Tone in Bach. 

the background a town; on the road leading to it twelve 
men scattered about here and there in pairs — this was 
supposed to tell the story of Jesus and the woman of 
Samaria. The real action is added by the spectator, out 
of the convention that resolves the simultaneous grouping 
of the figures on the canvas into a succession in time. As 
a rule very few of the Biblical stories are really "paintable", 
in the true sense of the word, for the event does not present 
a single pregnant situation which contains and elucidates 
the whole action. Thus the majority of Biblical painters, 
by having to presuppose so much knowledge of the sub- 
ject on the spectator's part, have given us not pictures 
but illustrations, that exceed the limits of true painting 
to the same extent that descriptive programme music 
exceeds those of true music. 

Bach, however, did not let the general knowledge of 
the chorales and Biblical texts mislead him into an attempt 
to depict in his music all the details and salient episodes 
of his text. He keeps within the real possibilities of musical 
expression, even in cases where another man would think 
it safe to rely on the general knowledge of the words to 
carry off his strokes of pictorialism. 

He thus makes no effort to represent all the episodes 
and evolutions of the text. He expresses the essential 
elements in the idea, not its vicissitudes. He underlines, 
indeed, any characteristic detail, brings out contrasts, 
emplo5^ the most powerful nuances; but the vicissitudes 
of the idea, its struggles, its combats, its despair, its entry 
into peace, all that Beethoven's music and that of the 
post-Beethoven epoch try to express — of this there is 
nothing in Bach. Nevertheless his emotional expression 
is not less perfect than Beethoven's. It is simply another 
kind of perfection. His emotional utterance has a power 
and an impressiveness such as we rarely meet with in 
other music. His capacity for characterising the various 
nuances of an emotion is quite unique. 

Thus Bach's music is also emotional music in the truest 



Bach's Tone-P&intiog. 41 

and deepest sense, though he pursues a path far remote 
from that of Wagner. Both composers aim at realising 
poetic ideas in music; both avoid programme music, i.e., a 
naive translation of the poem into sound; both remain 
strictly within the real possibilities of musical expression. 
But they are different in this respect, that Bach depicts 
the idea in its static, Wagner in its dynamic life. There 
is no art to which Wagner's definition of the nature of 
music is less applicable than that of Bach. According to 
Wagner, the harmonic changes must be inevitable in the 
sense that they are motived by the poetry, and express 
an emotion that demands the intensifjdng power of music. 
This is not the case with Bach's modulations. Generally 
speaking they are of a purely musical nature. They too 
are "inevitable", but in the sense that they are a logical 
unfolding of what was latent in the theme from the be- 
ginning. So far those are right who meet all modernisations 
of Bach, good and bad, with the objection that his art 
is "pure music". In this way they express, even if obscurely, 
the truth that, unlike Beethoven and Wagner, he does not 
represent an emotion as a series of dramatic incidents. 
The perception of this distinction is of the first import- 
ance for the performance of Bach's music. It makes us 
realise the error of imposing upon Bach the Beethovenian 
and Wagnerian dynamics, the purpose of which is to 
heighten the harmonic expression of the various poetic 
incidents. Bach's music is of a different order. 

Beethoven and Wagner poetise in music; Bach paints. 
And Bach is a dramatist, but just in the sense that the 
painter is. He does not paint successive events, but seizes 
upon the pregnant moment that contains the whole event 
for him, and depicts this in music. That is why the opera 
had so little attraction for him. He knew the Hamburg 
stage from his youth; he was intimate with the leading 
people at the Dresden theatre. If nevertheless he never 
wrote an opera, it was not because the external circiun- 
stances were unfavourable, but because, unlike Wagner, 



42 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

he did not conceive action and music in one. The musical 
drama is for him a succession of dramatic pictures; he 
realises it in his Passions and cantatas. 

In Bach the poetic idea is embedded in the theme. 
This is not, as in Wagner, a melodic determination of a 
certain harmony weUing up out of the depths of the ocean 
of tone ; it is more akin in origin to the thematic invention 
of BerUoz. It resembles the latter's themes in its emo- 
tional vehemence and a certain pictorial tendency, for it 
is the product of the same kind of plastic imagination. 
Bach's view of tone-painting is different from Wagner's. 
For the latter, self-existent tone-painting is only a make- 
shift. His ideal is that music shall address itself, as in 
drama, to feeling rather than imagination. Bach, on the 
other hand, appeals to the conceptual imagination. Tone- 
painting is an end in itself with him. The ideal before 
him is not the self-expression of this pictorialism, but 
the carrying of it to the extremest limits of realism. 

The first thing he looks for in a text is the image or 
idea that gives an opportunity for a definitely plastic 
musical expression. This image may lie at the very root 
of the thought, or it may be a mere incident in the text; 
in either case it is for Bach the essential element in the 
words, and he works it out without troubling whether, 
by so doing, he is really expressing or not the emotional 
content of the poem. 

His idea of a good poet is one who gives the maximum 
of images that are translateable into sound. We some- 
times wonder that he did not weary of the doggrel of 
Picander, his chief librettist. When, however, we con- 
sider the plastic variety of these libretti, we can see at 
once what attracted Bach to them time after time. Nor 
does he object to his librettist giving him the same pic- 
tures again and again; on the contrary, he reproduces 
them in tone with ever new delight. We really get the 
impression that he demanded pictorial opportunities of 
this kind. He even forgives his librettist when he adds 



Bach*8 Tone-Painting. 43 

extraneous pictures ot his own to the classical text of a 
chorale-strophe*. In the St. John Passion he cannot dis- 
pense with the rending of the curtain and the earthquake 
at the death of Jesus; he inserts these events in his text, 
although they do not occur in the fourth Gospel. 

The difference between Wagner and Bach becomes 
most evident in their conceptions of natural events. Wagner 
conceives nature through his emotions; Bach, — in this 
respect like Berlioz — through his imagination. Bach is 
not satisfied until he is sure that the hearer actually 
sees the dust of the whirlwind, the clouds scudding 
across the sky, the falling leaves, the raging waves. When 
his poets came to the end of their tether, all they had to 
do was to bring nature on the scene; they could be sure of 
satisfying him in this way. This is the explanation of the 
fact that the secular cantatas are veritable nature-poems**. 
The great thing, however, is that this nature-painting 
is always musical. Abt Vogler, the other great master 
whom Weber placed by the side of Bach, also aimed at 
tone-painting, but found that though it was very success- 
ful with the people, the musicians looked askance at him 
for it. 'They complained," he says***, "that I tried to 
represent on the all-powerful instrument, the organ, 
natural phenomena such as thunder, earthquakes, collaps- 
ing walls, &c." — and he tells us how he succeeded, in 
the village church at Upsala, not only with crying children 
and howling dogs, but in making a deaf mute "feel" the 
thunder. Bach certainly could not cite such testimonies 
for his painting. However realistic it is, it alwa)^ keeps 
within the limits of musical symbolism. Here again the 
whole expression lies in the theme ; it is this that stimulates 
the conceptual imagination of the hearer. 



* See, for example, the second verse of the chorale cantata 
leh hob' in Gottes Herz und Sinn (No. 92). 

** In the French translation the secular cantata Weicket nur, 
beWabie SchaUen has been justly called the "Spring Cantata". 
♦•• Charaisystent (1800), p, 102. 



44 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

His tone-painting is never obtrusive. It lasts as long 
as the occasion that called it forth, but not a moment 
longer. This perfect moderation, in spite of the great 
vivacity of the tone-painting, becomes all the more aston- 
ishing when we examine his recitative accompaniments. 
In the St. MaUhew Passion he gives the most drastic 
musical expression to every characteristic word in the 
account of the Passion. But it never delas^s the story 
for a moment. The tone-painting merely heightens the 
plastic impression of the words. 

A typical example of Bach's method may be seen in the 
first aria of the cantata Siehe^ ich will viel Fischer aus- 
smden (No. 88). The words are taken from Jeremiah 
XVI, i6: "Behold, I will send for many fishers, saith the 
Lord, and they shall fish them ; and after will I send for 
many hunters, and they shall hunt them." In the first part 
the strings paint the rolling waves of a lake; the second 
part is filled with clashing fanfares in the wind instruments. 

At times Bach wiU- paint, in a single passage, several 
characteristic words in succession. 

It is an interesting psychological observation that in 
the Bach family the gift for painting went along with that 
for music. Samuel Anton Bach, who came of the Meiningen 
stock, and who studied with Johann Sebastian at the 
beginning of the thirties, was not only a capable organist 
but an eminent portrait painter in pastel; and his double 
gift was inherited by his descendants*. Johann Sebastian's 
grandchild, the son of Philipp Emmanuel, gave up music 
and, to his father's horror, became a painter. 

The idea that prompted Bach to paint a musical picture 
is not alwa}^ equally clear to us. It often takes us some 
time to discover how he has realised his text in music. 
But when once we have grasped the sense of the music, 
it seems unthinkable that the poem could be depicted 
from any other standpoint. Daring as his painting often 

* For further information about these pastel painten of the 
Meiningen branch of the family, see Wolfrum,/. 5. Ba«A,pp. 13, 14. 



Bttch'f ToQe-Psainting. 45 

is, the final and enduring impression is one of absolute 
satisfaction; and this is the fundamental proof of the 
veracity of his art. 

Not only the avowed picture but every characteristic 
movement is regarded pictorially by Bach. Expressions 
like erwachen (awake), auffahren (ascend), aufersiehen 
(arise), sUigen (mount), emporschwingen (soar), eilen 
(hasten), strauchdn (stumble), wanken (stagger), sinken 
(fall), wherever they occur, furnish the germ-idea of the 
theme. It is noteworthy, however, that Bach's imagina- 
tion also conceives motion when it is not actually ex- 
pressed in the text but only imphed. A number of the 
most striking themes and motives, that otherwise would 
be quite incomprehensible, are explained in this way. 

What is the meaning, for example, of the accompani- 
ment of the arioso of the St. Matthew Passion, ^^J^l freilich 
will in uns das Fleisch und Blut zum Kreuz gezwungen 
sein" C'Aye, surely now can flesh and blood atone, if 
the Cross hold them bound"), with its curious flickering 
flute accompaniment, and its abstruse conclusion? — 




The preceding recitative has told us that Simon of Cyrene 
had been given the cross of Jesus to carry. Bach sees 
Jesus labouring under the cross, stumbling along, sinking 
on His knees, and breaking down ; he paints this picture 
of Him in the accompaniment, while the arioso comments 
upon the scene. 

The conductor who has grasped the meaning of this 
recitative will not let his flutists group their three notes 
in the usual sentimental diminuendo, but will make them 
give a heavy emphasis each time to the third note, and 



46 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

preserve this ax:centuation to the end. without a raUen- 
iando or diminuendo. In this way the simple motive, 
without the necessity for any further explanation, will 
conjure up before the imagination of the hearer the picture 
of Christ staggering under the burden of the cross. 

Another example of Bach's representation of movement 
is to be seen in the first chorus of the cantata Brich dem 
Hungrigen dein Brot (No. 39). The text* runs thus : — 
**Is it not to deal thy bread to the hungry, and that thou 
bring the poor that are cast out to thy house? When thou 
seest the naked, that thou cover him, and that thou hide 
not thyself from thine own flesh?'' The music seems at 
first curiously disjointed. Spitta** surmises that it is 
prompted by the conception of the breaking of bread. 
He feels bound, indeed, to add a saving clause; "how 
far", he says, **Bach is from mere triviality is seen in the 
sequel, where the same accompaniment continues to quite 
other words. It simply gives the passage a peculiarly 
delicate and pUant character; it was this that Bach was 
chiefly aiming at." 

Here both the explanation of the tone-painting and 
the excuse for it are wrong, — the excuse, because we 
could not reproach Badi with anjrthing worse than re- 
taining a picture in his music after the necessity for it' in 
the text had gone by; the explanation, because no one 
who listens to the music can take it to be a picture of the 
breaking of bread. What then is the meaning of it ? The 
monotonous instrumental accompaniment, with the regular 
crotchets in the bass, has more the character of a march. 
A certain unrest enters with the vocal parts; it is as if we 
heard uncertain, tottering steps defiling past us. One of 
the chief themes runs thus : — 



iji^^i <f TTirf^ ^ 




^ Iniah LVIII, 7. 
♦• /. 5. Bach, III, 82. 



Bach't Tone-Paintiiig. 47 

The music thus depicts the wretched ones who are being 
supported and led into the house. As soon as the words 
^^fuhre in das Haus'^ have been uttered, the picture ceases 
in the accompaniment, which is now constructed of other 
themes. 

In the cantata Es isi ein troizig und verzagtes Ding 
(No. 176) Spitta* is horror-struck at the gavotte-like cha- 
racter of the first aria. "As a piece of music", he says, **it 
is perfectly charming, but it does not agree at all with the 
text, which speaks of the timidity of the Christian before 
Jesus, the God-possessed and wonder-working." If the 
condition of the autograph did not forbid it, the worthy 
biographer of Bach would like to believe that the music 
has been taken from some other cantata, and has nothing 
whatever in common with this text, "All we can do", 
he concludes, "is simply to point out the discrepancy." 
. The discord between the text and the music disappears 
as soon as we realise that Bach had the idea of movement 
here. The words run thus: "When I enquire after the 
Master thy (i. e. the sun's) beloved light shall be douded, 
for I am afraid by day." The situation is explained by 
the preceding recitative, in which Nicodemus waits for 
the sun to set in order to go to Jesus. In the aria he is 
on his way to Him; in the following recitative he is with 
Him. The aria thus represents him soliloquising as he 
walks delicately and circumspectly but joyously in the 
twilight. The rhythm that runs through the movement — 

J J IJ J J U J J U J J I' J is reaUy the only char- 
acteristic thing in the text that music can fasten upon. 
Here the music in no way aims at expressing pure "feeling". 
Examples of this kind show that when we are studying 
Bach, the seemingly shortest and most direct way from the 
text to the music is not alwa)^ the right one. To discover 
his real thought we must very often follow him along 
the by-paths that surround his idea, which is strongly 



♦ /. S, Bach, III, 81. 



48 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

pictorial in essence. His music is very often a picture of 
a situation. 

Allied with this pictorial instinct is the plastic sym- 
bolism which Bach's music confers on abstract thoughts. 
In the first chorus of the cantata Du soUsi Gott deinen 
Herrn lieben von ganzem Herzen (No. 77), he ventures to 
elucidate the saying of Jesus that the whole law is con- 
tained in the coniunandment of love. He builds up the 
chorus on the cantus firmus of the chorale "Dies sind die 
heil'gen zehn Gebot", bringing it in in the basses in aug- 
mentation, and in the trumpets in diminution. Further, 
in order to add to the great and small commandments 
the very smallest, the **tittles" of the law, of which Jesus 
speaks in the sermon on the mount, the chorus and or- 
chestra have in addition a motive derived from the first 
notes of the melody. This movement is typical of very 
many other pieces of symbolism in his work, equally daring, 
and yet fundamentally musical in conception. 

He does not even shrink from finding a musical symbol 
for the abstract idea of "time". In the cantata on the 
chorale — 

"Wer weiss, wie nahe mir mein Ende, 
Hin geht die Zeit, her kommt der Tod." 

(No. 27) the flight of time is suggested in the orchestra 
by a mysterious pendulmn stroke, that never ceases through- 
out the opening chorus. There is a similar representation 
in the first chorus of the cantata A lies nur nach Gottes 
Willen (No. 72). 

Bach's music is thus pictorial to the extent that wher- 
ever possible his themes and motives are conditioned 
by a pictorial association of ideas, whether this can be 
fotmd directly or indirectly in the text, and whether it 
is a salient feature of it or not. There are motives the 
pictorial origin of which we should not recognise at first 
sight, if the key to them were not afforded by others of 
the same kind. If we arrange the themes and the motives 



STmbolical Tone-PaintiDg. 49 

of the chorale fantasias, cantatas, and Passions according 
to their forrrnl affinities and their congruence with the 
text, we see that whenever Bach has to find music for 
analogous ideas, a whole group of pictorial associations 
of ideas comes forward as if in obedience to an inner law. 

At the same time we discover that certain feelings are 
expressed in the same formulae as the pictorial ideas to 
which they correspond. Motives that proceed by sure, 
strong steps symbolise strength, authority, confident faith; 
those that stride along boldly symbolise pride and defi- 
ance; others, that are uncertain in their gait, S3nnbolise 
vacillation or the lassitude of death. In view of this 
r^ular return of definite musical formulae in Bach*s works 
we cannot but attribute to him a complete tonal language. 

Wagner maintained that Beethoven had a language 
of this kind. "In long, connected stretches of sound,*' 
he sa}^, "as in larger, smaller, or even the smallest frag- 
ments, it (i. e. instrumental music) became, in the poetic 
hands of Beethoven, vowels, syllables, words and phrases 
of a language in which something hitherto unheard, un- 
speakable and never yet spoken, could find voice. Every 
letter of this language was an infinitely soulful element, 
and the measure of the joining of these elements was un- 
limited freedom of judgment, {und das Mass der FUgung 
dieser Etemenie unbegrenzt freies Ermessen), as is possible 
only to the tone-poet who longs for immeasurable ex- 
pression of the most unfathomable longing."* 

Speaking of himself Wagner sa)^, with reference to the 
time when he was writing The Flying Dutchman: "I had 
had to acquire the capacity for musical expression in the 

same way as one learns a language But now 

I had thoroughly learned the language of music; I was at 
home in it now, as in a veritable mother-tongue; when I 
had an3rthing to say I had no longer to trouble about the 
formal side of expression; it was at my command just as 



* Das Kunstwerk der Zukunft, (Ges» SchrifUn III, no). 

Sehweitter, Bach. II. ^ 



50 XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 

I had need of it, to communicate a definite impression or 
feeling according to my inner impulse."* 

On the other hand he will not admit that Bach has 
a developed language. In Das JuderUhum in der Musik 
he almost makes it a reproach against Mendelssohn that 
he is influenced by Bach. "Bach's musical language", 
he says, "was formed in a period of our musical history 
in which the general musical language was striving after 
the faculty of surer individual expression; it was still so 
hampered by formalism and pedantry that its purely 
human expression only managed to find utterance in Bach 
by reason of the abnormal strength of his genius. Bach's 
language bears the same relation to that of Mozart and that 
of Beethoven as the Egyptian Sphinx to the Greek statues 
of human beings : as the Sphinx with its human face strives 
to come out of the body of the animal, so Bach's noble 
human head strives to come out of the periwig."** 

At the time when he pronounced this judgment (1852) 
Wagner could not have known many of Bach's works. 
But even later, when he had looked into the cantatas, 
he clung to his opinion. From his standpoint he could 
not admit Bach's musical language to be of equal value 
with that of Beethoven and his own, since it does not 
represent the play of successive emotional episodes but 
only a definite emotion. Its strong bias towards the 
pictorial only strengthened his view that Bach could not 
free himself of the naive materialistic conception of music. 

If, however, we recognise poetic music and pictorial 
music as two equally legitimate basic styles of the art, 
we must not regard Bach's simple language of feelings 
and pictures as a primitive form that was surpassed by 
Beethoven and Wagner, but as the utterance of one par- 
ticular kind of musical imagination. The nearest affinity 
to the musical language of Bach's cantatas is that of the 



♦ Eine Mitieilung an meine Freunde, {Ges. Schrifien IV, 387). 
♦♦ G$s, Schrifien V, 101, 102. 



Bach's Muaical Language. 51 

accompaniments to Schubert's songs; these also make 
large use of pictorial associations. 

The unique thing in Bach is the clearness and complete- 
ness of the language. Its elements, being mostly of the 
pictorial order, can be much more exactly shown than 
those of Beethoven and Wagner. We can really speak 
of the roots and derivations of his language. Almost 
all the characteristic expressions that impress us by their 
regular recurrence in the cantatas and Passions resolve 
themselves into about twenty to twenty-five root-themes, 
mostly pictorial in origin. These well-defined groups 
comprise, for example, the already mentioned "step'*- 
motives for the expression of firmness, indecision, or totter- 
ing; the S3mcopated themes of lassitude; the theme that 
depicts tumult ; the graceful wavy lines that depict peaceful 
rest; the serpentine lines that contort themselves at the 
mention of the word Satan ; the charming, flowing motives 
that enter when angels are mentioned; the motives of 
rapturous, naive, or passionate joy; the motives of distress- 
ful or noble grief. No attempt is here made to give a schem- 
atic catalogue of Bach's themes. It is only intended to 
point out, — what any musician can easily verify for him- 
self — that the wealth of Bach's musical language does 
not consist in any special multiplicity of themes and 
motives, but in the manifold shadings by means of which 
a few general formulae are made to express characteristic 
ideas and feelings. If it were not for this interesting variety 
in the individual forms and formulae, Bach's tone-language 
might almost be called monotonous. 

The establishment of a musical language in Bach is 
not a mere pastime for the aesthetician, but a necessity 
for the practical musician. It is often impossible to play 
a work of his in the right tempo, and with the right accent 
and the right phrasing, unless we know the meaning of 
the motive. The simple '^feeling" does not alwajrs suf- 
fice. The serious errors that even judicious commentators 
can commit when, without taking into consideration Bach's 

4* 



52 XXI. Word and Tone in Bttch. 

musical language as a whole, they try to explain pieces 
that call for elucidation, may be seen from Spitta's re- 
marks, cited above, upon the cantatas Brich dem Hun- 
grigen (No. 39) and Es ist ein trotzig und verzagt Ding 
(No. 176). There is only one way to avoid falling into 
the fantastic, -^ a comparative study of all the cantatas. 
They explain each other. No one can conduct one cantata 
properly unless he knows them all. 

Short explanations may be given to an audience if they 
are confined to simple hints as to Bach's method of musical 
characterisation. They are objectionable when they are 
meant to induce the audience to regard the cantata in 
question as ^'modern music". Unintelligent modernisa- 
tion of Bach is the greatest hindrance to the true under- 
standing of his works. 

To the plain man, indeed, many explanations will seem 
fantastic that are not really so. This however is due to 
Bach himself, whose music is frequently extraordinarily 
audacious. Apart from that, there are certain move- 
ments in his works the riddle of which will never be fully 
solved, and the elucidation of which will always be some- 
what arbitrary. Very often, however, a musical picture 
that has been regarded as undecipherable is suddenly 
explained by an analogous picture that we have come 
across by hazard in another cantata. 

The understanding of Bach's musical language is also 
valuable for the interpretation of the purely instrumental 
works. Many pieces in the Well-tempered Clavichord, in 
the violin sonatas, or in the Brandenburg concertos speak 
quite definitely to us, as it were, when the meaning of 
their themes is explained by the text that accompanies 
similar themes in the cantatas. 

Two objections may be raised to the assumption of a 
complete musical language in Bach — that he occasionally 
parodied his own works in a really thoughtless way, and 
that so far as we know he never said anything, either 
to his pupils or to his sons, with reference to his pictorial 



Origins and Development of Bach's Musical Language. 53 



purposes. Both objections are unanswerable from the 
historical standpoint. On the other hand they cannot 
invalidate the facts as revealed to us in the scores. They 
only make us ask to what degree Bach was conscious of 
his musical language being a means of expression peculiar 
to himself, and the result of profound artistic reflection. 
But to this question, again, no definite answer is possible, 
for it is even more difficult to fix upon the border*line 
between the conscious and the unconscious in the case 
of Bach than in that of any other genius. His musical 
language is so clear, and makes so deep an impression, 
that we cannot but regard it as deliberate. Unlike Wagner, 
Bach never felt the necessity of explaining his own mental 
processes either to himself or to others. A psychological 
common denominator between the two cases wiU probably 
never be found. 

Nor can much be said upon the origin and develop- 
ment of Bach's musical language. In the chorale-partitas 
of the Amstadt and Miihlhausen period certain poetic 
ideas are already thrown into high relief in the music. 
This is especially the case with the last strophes of GoU, 
du frommer GoU (Peters V, 68 ff.). The seventh verse 
speaks of death and burial. A wonderful melodic line, 
similar to one found in the cantata Ich steh^ mit einem Fuss 
im Grabe (No. 156) and elsewhere, depicts the descent 
into the kingdom of the dead : — 




^^fi^JV:i:ijn 



The eighth verse speaks of the sleeping souls' expectation 
of the resurrection. Bach conceives it as a painful longing, 
and so writes a number of variations upon the chromatic 



54 



XXI. Word and Tone in Bach. 



motive which he had akeady employed in the ^'Lamento** 
of the Capricdo^ and which is so often met with afterwards 
in his music — 



F9S!V*M-^ 




In the final variation the risen souls break out into a jubil- 
ant song of praise of the Trinity. In the course of it we 
have one of Bach's most characteristic rhythms — that 
of tranquil happiness—* 



^^ 




In other works of his youthful period we find poetic 
ideas expressed in a more or less definite way. In the 
first part of a chorale prelude upon Jesus meine Freude 
(Peters VI, No. 29), we first of all get a picture of the 
feverish unrest of the world, that leads the anxious soul 
to seek out Jesus; at the words Gottes Lamm, mein BrduH- 
gam, it has found Him; a wonderful dolce in Vs time de- 
picts its rapture. 

A fantasia on the Easter chorale Chnst lag in Todes- 
banden (VI, No. 15) begins with heavy descending semi- 
quavers, that seem to fetter the melody and draw it down 
into the depths — 




At the words Des sollen wit frdhlich sdn ("Let us be joy- 
ful'') the music brightens, flowing along in a delightful 
triplet movement (Peters VI, p. 41), and ending in an 
impetuous song of triumph. 

These experiments, however, are not pursued tentatively 
for any long period. The musical language appears com- 
plete and perfect at once. Its first document is the chorales 



Origins and Development of Bach's Musical Language. 55 

of the OrgelbUc/Uein (Peters V)*. This collection contains 
such improvisations of the Weimar period as he thought 
worth preserving. The title that Bach gave this work, 
(of which he afterwards made a clean copy at Cothen), 
is sufficient to show the treasures of musical poetry that 
it contains. The works themselves confirm this impression. 
They represent a particular t}^ of chorale prelude ; they 
originate in the simple melody itself, which is supported 
by a motive treated in thorough contrapuntal style. This 
motive contains the idea of the poem; it is, in a manner, 
the poetic, illustration of the melody. And here we can 
detect the motives Bach uses in order to express pictures 
and emotions in music. These forty-five chorales are 
the dictionary of his musical language, the key to the 
understanding of his music as a whole. 

When Bach planned this collection he would be about 
thirty years old. From this time until his death he does 
not swerve in the shghtest degree either from his poetic 
conception of music or from the musical language in which 
he had found expression for his ideas. The language of 
the cantatas is the same as that of the OrgelbUchlein. 

One change is indeed noticeable — as time goes on, the 
pictorial quality of his thinking becomes more and more 
evident. In the earlier works it is still kept under to 
some extent by the melodic interest. Later on it asserts 
itself irresistibly. In the end Bach writes themes that are 
strikingly characteristic in themselves but are not quite 
grateful to the ear. The great chorale fantasias Jesus 
Chrisius unser Heiland (Peters VI, No. 30) and ChriU 
unser Herr zum Jordan kam (Peters VI, No. 17), for ex- 
ample, almost overpass the border-line of music that is 
meant to appeal to the ear. Again, in the affecting cantata 
Ich glaube, lieber Hetty hilf meinem Unglauben (No. 109), 
in which Bach depicts wavering faith, we have the im- 
pression that the pictorial bias is too prominent in the music. 

• See p. 381 ff. 



^ 



56 



XXII. The Musical Language of the Chorales. 



Here we are bound to think Bach wrong. He has ventured 
beyond the natural limits of music. His mistake, how- 
ever, has nothing in common with that of the naive prac- 
titioners of tone-painting. They fail because they mis- 
take the nature of music; he fails because he cultivates 
to its final consequences the language in which he ex- 
presses himself so consummately, with the result that, 
for the ordinary intelligence, the melodic and the beautiful 
are almost wholly lost in the plastic. It is an error of which 
only genius is capable. 



CHAPTER XXII. 

THE MUSICAL LANGUAGE OF THE CHORALES- 

PICTORIAL AND SYMBOLICAL REPRESENTATION. 

Where a chorale text offers him a picture, however 
external it may be, Bach takes this as the basis of his 
music. The fall of Adam in Durch Adatns Fall ist ganx 
verderU ("Through Adam*s fall mankind fell too") (V, No. 13) 
is depicted by the following basso osHnalo — 



| yc',^^^^^i^h{]]^< 



In the Easter hymn Erstanden ist der heiUge Christ 
(••Christ is arisen") (V, No. 14), the bass has this motive — 




while in the other part we find progressions like this — 




I J J J J J ^ 




The appearance of the angels in the chorales Vom Himtnel 
hoch (V, No. 49) and Vom Himmel kam (V, No. 50) is 



Pietorlal and Symbolical Representation. 



57 



represented by a charming maze of ascending and descend- 
ing scales. Bach attempts similar pictures in the first 
canonic variation on Vom Himmd hoch, da komm ick her 
(V, p. 92), in a fughetta on the same chorale (VII, No. 54), 
and in a simple harmonisation of it (V, p. 106). 

When he is arranging the melody AUein Gott in der H6h* 
sei Ehf* ('To God alone on high be praise") he never for- 
gets that the melody is supposed to be the angels' song, 
and so he sets it in the form of light duets or trios of ravish- 
ing charm (VI, Nos. 3 — 11); in two of these fantasias (VI, 
Nos. 5 and 10), the upward and downward motion is almost 
too realistically painted; the ascension and disappearance 
of the angels are represented by ascending cadences (VI, 
Nos. 8, 10 and 11). 

The hjonn Ach wie flUchiig, ach wie nichUg (V, No. i), 
compares the transitoriness of life to the cloud 'Hhat soon 
arises and soon has passed away". Bach reproduces this 
image by an ingenious scale-passage. About twenty years 
later he writes, upon the same chorale, a chorus (cantata 
No. 26), that is simply an amplification of this little picture. 
The same design, only in rather more energetic strokes, 
is seen in the first chorus of the secular cantata Der xu^ 
friedengestdUe Aeolus, in which Bach represents the play 
of the unchained winds, driving the clouds over the sky 
in all directions. The three examples, showing the un- 
changeable nature of Bach's musical language, are here 
shewn together: 



Chorale prelude: "Ach wie fluchtig, ach wie nichtig (V, No. i ). 




58 



XXII. The Musical Language of the Chorales. 



Chorale cantata: "Ach wie fluchtig, ach wie nichtig" (No. 36.) 

IP 




"Der zufriedengestellte Aeolus" {Dramma per musica). 




LJJL 



7 T r 




The fantasia upon Christ unset Herr zum Jordan kam 
("Christ our Lord to Jordan came") (VI, No. 17), and the 
orchestral accompaniment to the first chorus of the can- 
tata (No. 7) on the same melody, represent the motion 
of waves. The quick semiquavers rustle along in beautiful 
wavy lines over the melody in the bass. A small fantasia 
on the same chorale (VI, No. 18) is indeed one of the most 
interesting miniatures to be found an)rwhere in music. 
It is based on four motives. — (i) the first line of the 
melody, (2) its inversion, (3) the melody in an accelerated 
form, (4) the inversion of this: 



Pictorial and Symbolical Repreflentation. 



59 



Fint line: 



Inversion of this: 



[JA p jU i \ f ? \ H'Mmff 




The fint line in accelerated fonn: 




Inversion of this: 




These four motives are worked into an extremely realistic 
picture of great and small waves rising and falling and over- 
whelming each other. It is a picture for the eye, however, 
rather than the ear. 

The s3anboIism of the chorale Dies sind die heiligen xehn 
Gebof ("These are the Ten Commandments'') (V, No. 12) 
is rather primitive. It consists in the tenfold recurrence 
in the pedal of the first melodic period. In a little fughetta 
upon the same chorale (VI, No. 20) the theme of the first 
notes of the melody again appears ten times. The sym- 
bolism of the great chorale prelude on this "catechism- 
h3rnm" (VI, No. 19) is more profound. It aims at repro- 
ducing the dogma of the text. In a lengthy fantasia each 
of the separate parts goes its own way, without rhsrthm* 
without plan, without theme, without regard for the others. 
This musical disorder depicts the moral state of the world 
before the law. Tlien the law is revealed. It is represented 
by a majestic canon upon the melody of the chorale, running 
through the whole movement. The idea in itself is grand ; 
but tlie effect of the chorale prelude does not come up to 
expectation. The abstract representation of the antithesis 
between order and disorder is not really a matter for music. 

The examples of this more external order of tone-painting 
are relatively few in number. The true greatness of Bach 
is not revealed in these, but in a kind of spiritualised tone- 



6o 



XXII. The Musical Lauiguage of the Chorales. 



painting, in which the pictures are only S3mibols for words 
and ideas. 

THE "STEP" MOTIVES. 

Tranquil and even melodic lines represent the idea of 
strength and confidence; uncertain and wavering steps 
indicate lassitude and weakness. 

The text of the last Christmas chorale but one in the Or gel- 
bUchlein, — Wir Chrisienleut^ han jetzund Freud^ ("Now are 
we Christians jo3rful") (V, No. 55) speaks of firm belief in 
the Christmas tidings*. This is symbolised by the continual 
repetition of the following widely-spaced figure in the bass — 




l ^>""lf M 



This interpretation of it might be' thought too][daring 
if Bach had not similarly expressed the idea cf confident 
faith in other chorales. 

The great prelude upon Wir glauben alP an einen GoU 
(VII, No. 60) is particularly interesting in this connection. 
It consists of a gentle, almost dreamy fantasia upon the 
motive of the first line of the chorale text. In order to 
understand to what extent this music reproduced the 
Credo for Bach, we must bear in mind the definition of 
faith in Luther's catechism, according to which its essence 
consists in child-like love and trust in the Father. The 
conception of faith as "absolute confidence'' is expressed 
in the "step" motive of the bass — 




In the chorale prelude upon the Communion hymn, 
Jesus Christus unser Heiland (VI, No. 30), (in the coUec- 

♦ "Wir Christenleut' han jetzimd Freud, 
Weil uns zum Trost ist Christus Mensch geboren. 
Hat uns erldst, wer sich dess tr5st 
Vnd glaubet fest, sol! nicht werden verloren." 



Th« '"St^" Motives. 



6l 



tion of chorales on the catechism hymns), Bach wishes 
to illustrate the Lutheran dogma of the communion. We 
know that Luther was opposed to the rationaUsm^of 
Zwingli, who regarded the sacramental words as s}mi- 
bolical and the whole celebration as a simple ceremony 
of remembrance. To Luther, the essence of the doctrine 
of the sacrament was faith in a real change in the elements, 
in virtue of which the communion gives remission of sins. 
This credo quia absurdum suggests to Bach a theme of 
extraordinarily wide spacing. It is as if some one were 
standing on a rolling ship and planting his feet wide apart 
in order to keep a firm footing — 




This theme is characteristic rather than musical, and 
Bach develops it at too great length; the cantus firmus of 
the melody, that should hold the whole together, is split 
up into fragments, with long interludes between them. 
The total effect of the work is thus not organic. 

This may also be said in general of almost all the larger 
arrangements of the catechism hymns in the third Part 
of the KlavierObung, They are constructed on the same 
plan as the chorales of the OrgdhUchlein^ the sentiment 
of the words finding expression in a characteristic motive 
that plays round the catUus firmus. In the OrgdhUchlein 
the effect is excellent, because the movements are short, 
and are held together by the melody that nms uninter- 
ruptedly through them. As soon, however, as the charac- 
teristic motive, instead of merely accompan3ang the melody 
contrapuntally, becomes an independent picture, in which 
the lines of the cantus firmus follow one another at long 
intervals, we get a piece of music that is neither intel- 
lectuaUy nor formally satisfactory, — not intellectually, 
because the characteristic motive now aims at being some- 
thing more than the poetical illustration of the melody; 



62 



XXII. The Musical Language of the Choralee. 



and not formally, because the work necessarily becomes 
formless. The chorales of the OrgelbUchlein were Diirer 
engravings in music ; the long chorale preludes in the Kla- 
vierHbung are like etchings done on the scale of big canvases. 
Wavering steps symbolise lassitude. In the chorale 
Herr GoU, nun schleuss den Himmel auf (V, No. 24) the text 
speaks of a man who has finished his course and now goes 
with weary steps to the gate of eternity*. In the rhythm 
of the bass we hear the imcertain steps of the pilgrim — 




Again in the chorale Hilf GoU, dass mir*s gelinge (V, No. 29), 
the text of which expresses the same idea as Herr GoU, nun 
schleuss den Himmel auf, the bass staggers wearily along. 
In the chorale Da Jesus an dem Kreuze stund (V, No. 9) 
the drooping of the exhausted body of Jesus on the cross 
is expressed in the following rhythm — 




Pictorial ideas are thus diiefly expressed by means 
of themes in the bass. Bohm's basso ostinaio plays a great 
part in Bach's chorales. In the Puer natus in Bethlehem 
(V, No. 46), the text of which describes the adoration of 
the wise men from the East, the bass depicts a constant 
succession of deep obeisances — 



i W!Hf i /rfrfr^T^rf | fypiy|i^#^api 



* "Herr Gott, nun schleuss den Himmel auf, mein'Zeit zu End 

sich neiget. 

Ich hab vollendet meinen Lauf, dess sich mein' Seel' B«hr 

f reuet ; 

Hab g'nug gelitten, mich mUd' gestritten, 

Schick' mich fein zu» sur ew'gen Ruh', 

Luss fahren was auf Erden: will lieber selig werden." 



The Motives of Beatific Peace. 



63 



The basso osHnaio of the Easter chorale Heuf iriufn- 
ptUeret GoUes Sohn (V, No. 28) is only intelligible when 
we remember that in the Old Testament the victory of the 
Messiah is described under the image of the treading of 
the wine-press. It is in this conception that the haughty 
steps of the bass in Bach*s prelude have originated — 



rwii If r riJ< J r fir [i^j ^ 



That this interpretation is correct is proved by the aria 
Er isfs, er isfs, from the cantata GoU fahret auf (No. 43), 
the text of which refers to this Old Testament image. Here 
again Bach's music suggests a haughty stamping move- 
ment ; he does not hesitate to use even intervab like these — 



r^'^'F Jlr J ^^f^ 



In the Easter chorale Christ lag in Todesbanden (V, No. 3) 
the bonds of death are S3mibolised by heavy basses that 
draw the melody down into the depths — 




=f ^— 



THE MOTIVES OF BEATIFIC PEACE. 

When Bach wishes to express a certain kind of intimate 
gladness or blissful adoration, he often employs a rhythm- 
ical motive that may be seen in its typical form in the 
chorale Hen GoU, nun sei gepreisei (V, No. 22)* — 



|r),^l..,M fjgj^. I [^ ! ^ ^ ^ p p^ 



* "Herr Gott, nun sei gepreiset, wir sagen frohen Dank* 
Dass du UBS Gnad' enviesen, gegeben Speis' und Trank, 
Dein mildes Herz zn merken, den Glauben uns zu st&rken» 

• Dass du seist unser Gott." 



64 XXII. The Musical Language of the Choxalee. 

It is seen again in the ninth variation upon GoU^ du 
tfommer GoU (V, pp, 74 ff.), where it illustrates the words 
in which the Father and the Son are praised — 

"Gott Vater, dir sei Preis, hier und im Himmel 'oben, 
Gott Sohn, Herr Jesu Christ, dich will ich allzeit loben." 

We find the same rhythm in the chorales Gehbei seist du 
Jesus Christ (V, No. 17) and Voter unser im Himmel- 
reich (V, No. 48). It seems a little strange, at first 
sight, that it should also dominate the hymn Alle Menschen 
mussen sterben (V, No. 2). Bach's music takes its character 
from the end of the first verse, that speaks of death as 
the "Genesen zu dergrossen HerrUchkeit, die den Frommen 
ist bereit" ("the recovery to the great glory that is pre- 
pared for those who love God"). The melody of the hymn 
that speaks of the inevitability of death is thus enveloped 
in a motive that is lit up by the coming glory. 

The rhythm ^ ^^ H !f PJJ J^ often appears so veiled 
and disguised that we are hardly conscious of it at first. 
In these cases it represents this particular emotion in its 
deepest and most intimate form. It is by means of a 
rhsrthm of this kind that Bach expresses, for example, 
the mjrstic adoration in the chorale Jesu meine Freude 
(V, No. 31) - 




In the bass figure of the Christmas chorale Lob sei dem 
aUerhdchsten Gott (V, No. 38), it assumes a still more in- 
definite form. 

THE MOTIVES OF GRIEF. 

Bach has a dual expression for grief. To depict lamenta- 
tion of a noble kind he employs a sequence of notes tied 
in pairs; torturing grief is represented by a chromatic 
motive of five or six notes. 



The Motives of Joy. 65 

The typical form of the motive of noble lamentation 
is seen in the small chorale upon Lamm Gottes ( V, N0.44) 




The second of the two tied notes must alwa)^ be lightly 
breathed, making the motive seem like a series of sighs 
from the depth of the soul. 
The chromatic motive for grief is something of this kind — 



j,r f ^[jfS 



It appears even in the youthful works, e. g. the '^Lamento'* 
from the Capriccio. It will be seen again in the eighth 
variation upon Gott^ du frommer GoU (V, p, 73), where 
Bach wishes to depict the painful longing with which 
the dead in their graves await the resurrection. In the 
chorales of the OrgelbUchlein the chromatic motive fre- 
quently appears. It runs through the melancholy musical 
meditation upon Das aUe Jahr vergangen ist (V, No. 10), 
and determines the affecting harmonisation of the Passion 
chorale Chnstus, der uns sdig machi (V, No. 8). Towards 
the end of the chorale prelude Mensch, heweitC dein* 
SUnde gross (V, No. 45) it is used to paint the agonies of 
Jesus on the cross. 

THE MOTIVES OF JOY. 

For joy, again. Bach had two formulae of expression. 
At times he represents it by a long and animated series 
of quaver or semiquaver scale passages; at others by the 

rhythm /73 j^g rp5 JJJ 

The first formula, that represents more particularly 
direct and naive joy, is seen in the chorales ErsUmden ist 
der heiPge Christ (V, No. 14), E$ ist das Heil wns kommen 
her (V, No. 16), Gottes Sohn ist kommen (V, No. 19), In 
dir ist Freude (V, No. 34), In didci jubilo (V, No. 35), 

Schweitser, Bach. II. e 



66 XXII. The Musical Language of the Chorales. 

Lobt GoUy ihr Christen, aJlzugUich (V, No. 40), and Puer 
fuUus in Bethlehem (V, No. 46). 

The second motive is used to express the joy of the aged 
Simeon in the chorale Mit Frieda und Frend* ich fahr dahin 

(V, No. 41) - 




It expresses both lively and radiant joy. In the chorale 
Wer nut den lieben GoU Idsst walten (V» No. 54), Bach even 
employs it to express the joyful feeling of confidence in 
God's goodness. The significance of it always changes 
according to the rhjrthmical variations it assumes. The 
more lively the joy to be expressed, the more lively is the 
motive. Examples may be seen in the two Easter chorales 
Der Tagf der ist so freudenreich (V, No. 11) and Erschienen 
ist der herrlich* Tag (V , No. 15) ; it is seen in a more drastic 
form in the chorales In dich hab* ich gehoffet^ Herr (V, 
No. 33), Van GoU ^wiU ich nicht lassen (VII, No. 56), and the 
Passion hymn Wir danken dir, Herrjesu Christ (V, No. 56). 

Bach is very fond of this motive of joy, because the 
multiplicity of which the rhythm of it is capable allows 
him to depict joy in all possible nuances — the quiet and 
mystical as well as the most imrestrained. One of the most 
animated themes of rejoicing in the chorale preludes is 
the basso ostinato of In dir ist Freude (V, No. 34) — 




For joyous ecstacy Bach does not employ a motive, but 
an exuberant musical arabesque, coursing above placid 
harmonies. For this kind of expression there is naturally 
much more scope in the cantatas than in the choraies^ 
for Bach knew that the flexibility and variety of modula- 
tion that passages of this kind require, and that only a 
solo instrument can give, are hardly possible with the 



The "Speaking" Motives. 67 

finest organ registration. Runs like those of the violin 
solo in the Laudamus U of the B minor Mass cannot be 
attempted upon the organ. On the other hand, the simple 
arabesque that entwines the melody of the Christmas 
chorale Christum wit sotten loben schon (Adagio, V, No. 6) 
is consummately effective. It embraces a whole world 
of unutterable joy. In the great arrangement of Voter 
unset im Himmdreich (VII, No. 52), again, where he aims 
at reproducing the wonderful exegesis of the Lord's Prayer 
in the Lutheran catechism, Bach employs a free and 
flexible melodic line. Unfortunately this noble work, Uke 
most of the other large versions of the chorales in the 
KlavierHbung, is worked out at such excessive length that 
as a whole it does not produce the anticipated impression^* 

THE "SPEAKING" MOTIVES, 

Bach*s predecessors had employed in their chorales the 
motives derived from the lines of the melody wherever 
they seemed to be musically effective ; but they had given 
no thought to the poetic sigoificance of the repeated 
chorale-motive. Bach, however, saw that the motive 
should bring the corresponding words to mind. In the 
OrgdbicUein, therefore, the motive derived from the chorale 
is employed only where there is a meaning in the repetition 
of the words. 

In the chorale Dies sind die heir gen zehn Gebot (V, No. 12) 
he introduces the motive of the commencement of the 
melody ten times, as if the ''Dies sind die heil'gen zehn 
Gebot" (^These are the ten conmiandments") were being 
announced ten times. In the prelude upon Helft mir 
G(4tes GUte preisen (*'Help me to praise God*s goodness") 
(V, No. 21) the voices reiterate this invitation to each 
other in the melodic notes belonging to it. In the same 



^ This, however, does not apply to the three Kyries and th« 
GhonOe Aus Uefer Net sckrei ich su dir (VI, No. 13) in this col- 
leetkML These are woftod out less as free fantasias than in the 
style of tiie Pachelbel chorales. Their tonal effect is magnificent. 

5* 



68 XXIX. The Musical Language of the Choralei. 

way, in the chorale Hen Jesu Christ, dich zu ftns wmtP 
(V, No, 25) Bach brings out the "Herr Jesu Christ" in his 
music, and in Wenn wit in hdchsUn NSten sind (V, No. 51) 
the voices repeat the "Wenn wir in hochsten Ndten sind'* 
(^*In our hour of deepest need"). The chorales upon AlMn 
GoU in der Hdh* sd Ehr* (VI, Nos. 3 — 11), all make use of 
the motive formed from the opening notes of the melody; 
the chorale upon the Kyrie (VII, No. 39 a, b, c) are based 
on the same procedure. In the great chorale upon Voter 
unser im Himmelreich (VII, No. 52), it is the word "Father" 
that keeps recurring in the music; in the prelude upon 
Wit glauben all (VI, No. 60) the voices repeat this credo. 
The frequent employment of canon in the chorales of the 
Orgelbiichlein* has no poetic significance. 

THE "EXPRESSIVE" CHORALES. 

By the term "expressive" chorales is here meant those 
in which the succession of words, phrases, or ideas is dupli- 
cated in the music. Bach employs this method of repro* 
ducing the text with much reluctance; he only does so 
when the texts are quite short and extremely characteristic. 

As a rule he is content to lay particular stress on this 
or that word; the striking major cadence, for example, 
to the profoundly sorrowful arrangement of Das alte Jahr 
vergangen ist (V, No. 10) is occasioned by the consolatory 
conclusion of the first verse and of the poem in general^^. 



♦ V, Noe. 3, 8, 15, 19, 35, 37, 44. 
** i8t Ver8e:"Das alte Jahr vergangen iat; 

Wir danken dir, Herr Jesu Christ. 
Dass dn in Not und in Gefahr, 
So treu gefuhrt uns dieses Jahr." 
("The old year is dead; we thank thee. Lord Jesus Christ* for 
having led us safely through it.") 

5th Verse: "Hilf uns in jeder Erdennot; 

Bring uns einst selig uher'n Tod» 
Dass wir mit Freuden auferstehn 
Und mit dir in den Himmel gehn.^ 
(Help us in all our need; and after a happy death may vre na^ 
again in joy to dwell with Thee in heaven.") 



ExpivasioiL of the Details of the Text. 69 

The trills towards the end of In iir ist Freuds (V, No. 34) 
correspond to the "alleluia" of the text. In the mystical 
ch<»^e upon Komm heiTgcr Geist (VII, No. 37) the alleluia 
is expressed by a joyous sequence of semiquavers. The 
ascending final cadence of Valet will ich dir gebert (VII, 
No. 50) is explained by the text, — 

"Valet will ich dir geben, du arge falsche Welt; 
Dein siindlich boses Leben durchaus mtr nicht gefiUt. 
Im Himmd ist gut wobneo; hinauf steht mein Begier; 
Da wird Gott ewig lohnen dem, der ihm dient allhier." 

("Farewell, thou false and wicked world; thy sinful life 
pleases me not. I long for the better Ufe of heaven; there 
will he who has served God win his eternal reward"). 

Towards the end of the chorale Mmsch, bevein' dein' 
Siinde gross (V, No. 45), several of the poetic ideas are 
brought out clearly in the music. The chromatic motive 
in bars 19 and 20 emphasises the words "dass er ftir uns 
geopfert wiird" ("that He was sacrificed for us"); the 
ascending semiquaver sequence, that is tike a series of 
sighs and groans — 




corresponds to the line "Trug uns*rer Siinde schwere Biird" 
("He bore the heavy burden of our sins"); the adagio- 
nssimo of the final bar is motived by the words "Wotil 
an dem Kreuze lange"^ ("long He hung on the cross"). 
At the commencement of this chorale prelude Bach has 
not attempted to bring out any particular words in tlie 



yo XXIL The Musical Language of the Chorales. 

musiCi since the text offered him none that seemed striking 
enough for the purpose*. 

A long and tender adagio at the end of a chorale prelude 
upon AUein Gott in ier HOh* sei Ehr* (VI, No. 8) b meant 
to express the *'Nim ist gross Fried' ohn* Unterlass, all* 
Fehd* hat nun ein Ende" (''now is there great and endless 
peace, now all strife is over''), with which the first verse 
of the h3rmn concludes. 

Towards the end of the powerful fugal chorale Au$ 
Hefer Not schrei^ ich zu dir (VI, No. 13) the "joy" rhsrthm 

n J n J n J enters and finally carries everything 

triumphantly before it. There is apparently nothing in the 

* The first two strophes of the hymn run thus: — 

"O Mensch bewein deia S&nde gross, 
Darum Christus sein's Vaters Schoss 
Aussert und kam auf Erden; 
Von einer Jungfrau rein und zart 
Ffir uns er hier geboren ward; 
£r wollt der Mittler werden. 

Den Toten er das Leben gab 
Und legt dabd all' Krankheit ab. 
Bis sich die Zeit herdrange, 
Dass er fOr uns geopfert wihrd, 
Trug unsrer Sunden schwere Burd 
Wohl an dem Kreuxe lange." 

(The following English version is that of Mr. Claude Aveling, ia 
Breitkopf and Hartel's edition of the St Matthew Passion i — 

"O man» for thy transgression moan. 
For thee Christ left His Father's thronet 
Came down on earth from heaven; 
Of Virgin bom. He was made man, 
Thy soul to free from sorrow's ban. 
Has His dear life been given. 

He turned darkness into light. 

He healed the sick, to blind gave sight. 

Until that hour of anguish 

When He, whose ransom made thee free. 

Bowed down with sin long borne for thee. 

Upon the Cross did languish.") 

The poem, as it goes on, treats of the whole of the sorrows of 
the Passion at some length. 



Expression of the Details of the Text. 71 

text to justify this. Bach, however, is tr3ang to represent 
the Lutheran doctrine of repentance, according to which 
all true repentance leads of itself to the joyful certainty of 
salvation ; and so the motive of joy, that struggles against 
the gloom of the music and eventually gains the upper 
hand, has a profound significance. It represents the same 
idea as the splendid major cadence previously mentioned. 

Bach frequently expresses the idea of a poem by two 
or more simultaneous motives. In the Easter chorale Er- 
sianden ist der heiPge Christ (V, No. 14) the bass gives out 
the motive of resurrection, while the quavers in the middle 
part express joy. In the Puer natus in Beihlehcm (V, No. 46) 
the middle parts give voice to the joy of the wise men 
from the East, while the bass depicts their obeisances. 

In the little chorale prelude on Wenn wit in hochsUn 
Ndten sind (V, No. 51) the text is translated into music 
in a particularly intimate way. The motive derived from 
the commencement of the melody is of such a kind that 
the three lower voices repeat continually the words "Wenn 
wir in hochsten Noten sind" ("when we are in our greatest 
need**). Over this lanient the melody flows along in semi- 
quavers like a divine song of consolation, and in a wonderful 
final cadence seems to silence and compose the other parts. 

Only in two chorale preludes has Bach reproduced all 
the changing details of the text, — in the third verse of 
Lamm Gottes (VII, No. 48) and in an arrangement of 
Jesus Christus unset Heiland (VII, No. 31). 

The chorale Lamm GoUes, as is well known, consists 
of tluree similar strophes, that are only distinguished from 
each other by the fact that the first two end with "Erbarm 
dich imser, o Jesu" ("Have compassion on us, Jesu"), 
and the third with "Gib uns deinen Frieden, o Jesu" ("Give 
us thy peace, oh Jesu**). Bach, in his fantasia, reproduces 
only the ground-mood of the first two verses. In the third 
also he begins quite simply, keeping up a tranquil quaver 
motion over the canius firmus, which is in the bass. But 
at the words "All' Siind hast du getragen" ("Thou hast 



72 



XXtl. The Musical Language of the Chorales. 



borne all our sins") it suddenly appears as if the full depth 
of this confession of guilt had all at once become manifest 
to the voices. They take possession of the motive — 




^ . ,tr r r r r f ^ir 




and repeat along with it, time after time, '^All' Siind hast 

du getragen All' Siind' hast du getragen*'. At 

the words "Sonst miissten wir verzagen'* ("Or else must we 
despair") the chromatic motive expresses their desperation. 
After a passionate outcry the harmonies descend deeper and 
deeper, as if a sense of dread were creeping over the voices, 
and they dared no more than whisper the horror they feel — 




But as soon as we come to the line "Gib uns deinen Frieden, 
o Jesu'\ all anxiety is banished. An expressible felicity 
wells forth from the rising and falling quaver-sequences. 
One is inclined to think that this motion, as in certain of 
the Christmas chorales, represents the heavenly host calling 
out its "Peace on earth" from the clouds to mankind 
below. Like some preludes upon the angelic song "AUein 
Gott in der Hoh' sd Ehr" (**Glory to God m the highest"), 
the last verse of Lamm GoUes concludes with an ascending 
cadence, as if the heavenly messengers, after bringing the 
prayed-for peace, were returning to their own kingdom — 



^n-^^ 




The Chorale Fantasia upon "Jesus Chiistus unser Heiland". 73 



In the KlavierHbuHg Bach had treated the melody Jesus 
Christus unser Heiland as a oommunion chorale. Without 
troubling further about the text belonging to it, he had 
worked it into a fantasia, in which steadfast faith in the 
remission of sins in the sacrament was represented by a 
characteristic ''step" motive. In a prelude on the chorale, 
probably written at a later date (VI, No. 31), Bach illus- 
trates in his music the four lines of the first verse — 

'^Jesxis Christus unser Heiland, 
Der von uns den Zom Gottes wand; 
Durch das bitter Leiden sein. 
Half er uns aus der Hollenpein". 

("Jesus Christ our Saviour, Who turned from us the 
wrath of God, and by His bitter sorrow rescued us from 
the pains of hell.'') 

The fantasia on the first line is wonderfully fervent, 
as if penetrated by the magic of the word "Heiland'' 
("Redeemer"). It is followed immediately by a representa- 
tion of the strokes of God's wrath, in a motive that resembles 
somewhat in its rhjrthm the accompaniment of the arioso 
"Erbarm' es Gott", that is sung in the St. Matthew Passion 
when Christ is being scourged — 



B kJ IjJ ' i^ Btf r = 



In the third section Bach depicts the "bittere Leiden" (**bitter 
pain") by means of a fantasia based on the chromatic motive 
of grief in similar and contrary motion, and ending thus — 




74 XXIII. The Mnmcal Language of the Cantatas. 

The last line, ^*Half er uns aus der Hdllenpein** (**He saved 
us from the pains of hell') is reproduced by the short but 
expressive motive of resurrection — 




We fancy we can see in this affecting ending the strong 
arm of the Saviour drawing mankind upward to rescue 
it from hell. The motive is overpowering even at its first 
enunciation — 




In the cadence the triumphant ascension is depicted in a 
melodic line extending over three bars. We do not know 
which to admire most, — the simplicity of this nnisical 
language or the clarity of it. 



CHAPTER XXIII. 

THE MUSICAL LANGUAGE OF THE CANTATAS. 

PICTORIAL THEMES. 

Bach was particularly fond of representing in music the 
motion of waves. Hb librettist Picander knew this, so 
in the secular cantata in honour of the royal house he 
brings in all the rivers of Saxony and Poland and makes 
them sing the praises of the sovereigns. The best piece 
of painting of this kind is perhaps the delightful one of 
the waves in the cantata SchUiclU^ sfnelende Wellen (B. G. 
XX*), written for the birthday of Augustus III. The resem- 
blance between the chief theme of the first chorus of this 



Pictorial Themea. 



75 



w<n'k and the accompaniment to Schubert's weD-known 
B^cofoUe is very interesting — 

Bach. 




Schubert. 




In the church cantata Jesus schldft^ was soil ich hoffen 
(No. 8i), the subject of which is the stilling of the storm 
(Mark IV, 35 — ^41), Bach first of all paints the restless 
heaving of the waves and then the bursting of the storm. 
The orchestral accompaniment of the first chorus of Christ 
unser Hen zum Jordan kam (No. 7) is a representation 
of the waves of the Jordan. It is worth noticing in what 
very different ways he depicts the motion of flowing water 
and the glassy surface of a lake. 

Very often a single word suffices to conjure up the 
'Svave'' motive in his music. "Mein Wandel auf der Welt 
ist einer Schiffahrt gkich'' ("'My course through the world 
is like a V03rage''), sings the bass in an arioso in the cantata 
Ich will den Kreuzstab gerne tragen (No. 56). Bach finds 
in this a sufficient pretext for giving the cellos the following 
figure throughout the whole movement — 




The bass figure of the aria '*Sich iiben im Lieben^', in the 
cantata Weichet nur, beMlbte Schatten (B. G. XI>) — 




is explained by the fact of the occurrence in the text of 
the words "Hier queHen die Wellen" ("Here flow the 
waters"). 



76 XXin. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 

A recitative in Preiu iem GUtcks^ gesegnetes Sachsm 
(B. G, XXXIV) is accompanied by the wave-like motion — 

M il. /Tn / itfSi / 



merely because the word" Ostsee" (''Eastern sea") occurs 
m it. 

In the cantata Siehc, ich will viel Fischer aussemUn 
(No. 88) Bach sees before him the Lake of Gennesareth, 
on the banks of which Jesus, in fulfilment of a certain 
passage in the Old Testament, calls His disciples to be 
fishers of men. This vision prompts the use of the wave 
motive — 




In an aria in the cantata Von der VcrgnUgsamkeit (B. G. 
XP), a similar motion is evoked by the incidental occur- 
rence of the word "Weltmeer" ("ocean"). In the cantata 
Meine SeeP crhebt den Herren (No. lo) a recitative speaks 
of God's promise to make the posterity of Abraham as 
numerous as the sand on the sea-shore. Bach at once feels 
bound to transport the hearer to the shore by means of 
this accompaniment — 




He is equally fond of describing the motion of the clouds. 
He generally does this by means of scale figures merging 
into each other in similar and contrary motion. Typical 
examples may be seen in the chorus "Ach wie fliichtig, 
ach wie nichtig" (No. 26), the great piece of tone-painting 
at the beginning of the cantata Der zufriedengestelUe Aeolus 



Pictorial Themes. 



77 



(B. G. XI*)*, and the bass aria 'Die Welt ist wie ein Ranch 
und Schatten** in the cantata Was frag* ich fMch ief WsU 
(No. 94). 

At the opening of the Spring cantata, Weichet nur, b^ 
trUbte Schatten (B. G. XI*)» vaporous arpeggios floating 
upward s}mibolise the rising mist. The dark clouds of our 
sins, to which reference is made in an aria of the cantata 
Mein liebster Jesu ist verhren (No. 154), are represented 
by a precipitant and imeasy motive — 

Viol. I, II and Viola. 







We often hear the pealing of the funeral bells in Bach*s 
music* It does not even need any definite word to call 
up a musical picture of this kind; the mere mention of death 
and the end of things is enough. Sometimes it is only bells 
sounding vaguely from afar, that we hear in the pixxicoH 
of the strings; very frequently, however, the peal is close 
and loud. Bach employing the whole of his instrumental 
forces. Among the most interesting orchestral passages 
of this kind are the symphonic accompaniments to the 
first movement of the cantata Liebster Gott, wann wenP 
ieh sterben (No. 8) and to the recitative *'Der Glocken 
bebendes Getan'*, from the Trauerode (B. G. XIII*)**. 
Bach, in these pictures, aims at an extraordinary realism 
of soimd and rhythm. In the aria '^Schlage doch bald, 
sd'ge Stunde'', from the cantata Christus der ist mein 
Leben (No. 95) the bass runs thus — 




juifjMfj<ir^^^ 



^ Cited on p. 58. 

*^ See also the cantatas Kom$9h du HUss Todesstunde (Na x6i)* 
iiein^n Jemm lass ich nicki (No. 1 24), Herr Jesu Christ, wahr'r Mensch 
und GoU (No. 127), Herr, gehe nicht ins Gerichi (No. 105). 



78 



XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantataa 



In the recitative *'Siehe, ich stehe vor der Tiir und Idopfe 
an", from the cantata Nun komm der Heiden HeiUmd 
(No. 6i; first version). Bach writes an accompaniment 
descriptive of the knocking of the Lord — 




He is fond, again, of representing laughter in music, 
as we may see in the first chorus of the cantata Unser 
Mund set voU Lachcns (No. no), and the aria "Wie will 
ich histig lachenl" in the cantata D&r xufriedengesteltte 
Aeolus (B. G. XI*). Note also the basso osHnato of the 
recitative *'J^^h dein heilsames Wort macht, dass mir 
das Herze lacht", from the cantata Hen Jesu Christy du 
kdchsUs Gut (No. 113). In the cantata Wo gehest du hiu 
(No. 166) the theme of the aria ^^Man nehme sich in acht, 
wenn das Gliicke lacht" (''Let us beware when fortune 
laughs") runs thus — 



m 




The devil appeals strongly to the musician in Bach. As 
he is represented in the opening chapters of the Bible as 
a serpent. Bach always delineates him by means of a am* 
torted motive. According to his theology, Satan is identical 
mth the devil; therefore whenever the ''evil one" is spoken 
of as Satan he introduces the twistings of the serpent. 

In the first chorus of the Michaelmas cantata Es erhub 
sich ein Sireit (No. 19), and in the verse "Und wenn die 
Welt voU Teufel war" from the cantata Ein' feste Purg 
(No. 80), Badi launches a whole army of devils against 
the divine power. A very characteristic Satan motive is 



Pictorial Themes. 



79 



found in the cantata Daxu ist erschicnen der Sokn Gott$s 
(No. 40). The text of the bass aria runs thus, — ^'Holliscbe 
Schlange! wird dir nicht bange? Der dir den Kopf als 
ein Sieger zerknickt, ist nun geboren" ('^Hellish serpent, 
are thou not afraid? The victor who shall crush thy head 
is bom'*). In the music we not only see the contortions 
of the serpent, but hear the angry stamping of the heel 
which, according to the old prophecy, is to crush its head — 



pi>flVJJ^Ji4Jj^^JiJiJJ i''ii JiJi^^ ii 




At the words "Der dir den Kopf als ein Sieger zerknickt" 
the serpent motive touches its lowest point in the bass. 
The next recitative of the cantata speaks of the serpent 
in paradise. It is represented by a gently rocking phrase — 




Bach visualises it hanging down from the tree before the 
woman, and deluding her with its crafty speech. There- 
fore the accompaniment too is suspended in the air; only 
here and there does a supporting bass note enter. 

In the cantata heiVges Geist- und Wasserbad (No. 165) 
the librettist speaks of Jesus as the ''Heilschlanglein'* 
(**little serpent of healing'*), referring to the passage in 
St. John's Gospel where the crucifixion of Jesus is com- 
pared to the raising of the brazen serpent by Moses in the 
wilderness*. Any other composer would have passed 
over this tasteless word; Bach, however, is grateful for 

* John III, 14 and 15. "And as Moses lifted up the serpent in 
the wilderness, even so must the Son of man be lifted up; that 
whosoever believeth in him should not perish, but have etamal 
life." 



8o 



XXIIL The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 



it, since it gives him the opportunity to depict the move- 
ments of the "little serpent of healing" — 




To the angels also Bach gives a motive. It is fomided 
on the light, floating rhythm that is given out by the 
strings and flutes in the sinfonia of the Christmas Oratorio^ 
while the oboes represent the music of the shepherds — 



rfi Jfi jil ff3 




The same motive recurs in the bass and in the interludes 
of the chorale "Wir singen dir in deinem Heer" at the 
end of this part of the Christtnas Oratorio, this hynm — 
as the previous recitative attests, — being sung by the 
men who join in with the music of the angels. 

The music of the aria "Bleibt, ihr Engel, bleibt bei mir", 
from the cantata E$ crhub sick ein Streit (No. 19) might 
have been copied from the sinfonia of the Christmas Oror 
toriOf but for the fact that it dates from at least ten years 
earlier — 




^@p 



Pictorial Themes. 



8t 



^The same motive appears in the trio '^O woM una!*' 
from the cantata Das neMgeborene KindeUin (No. 122) — 




As there is no mention of angels in the text, it may be 
thought that the resemblance of this bass figure to the 
angel motive is purely accidental. If, however, we refer 
to the previous recitative, it at once becomes clear why 
Bach introduces the angel motive here. It runs thus: 
"Die Engel, welche sich zuvor vor euch, als vor Verfluchten 
scheuten, erfiillen nun die Luft im hohem Chor** (**The 
angels, which formerly avoided you, as though you were 
accursed, now fill the air in a lofty choir''). Thus here, 
as in the chorale in the Chfisifnas OraioriOy Bach imagines 
angels and men singing together. 

Everything that suggests a motion that can be reproduced 
in a musical line is represented by Bach in music. He 
never allows words like "ascend'* and **uplift" to escape 
him. Every one knows how he expresses the "Et exspecto 
resurrectionem" (in the B minor Mass) in the first trumpet — 



[j^r ;j| J< i ^i=^=f=^i r- \ f <<CJ 1^. 



The accompaniment to the duet "Ich lebe mein Herze", 
from the Easter cantata So du mii deinem Munde bekennesi 
(No. 145), is based on a similar ascending figure — 




The aria "Mein Jesus ist erstanden", from the cantata 
Hali im GeddcJUnis Jesum Christ (No. 67), is dominated 
by the following motive — 



Schweittar, Bach. 11. 



82 



XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas 




It appears again in the g^eat choroses of the cantatas 
Wachet auf^ tuft uns die Stimme (No. 140) and Macke Hch 
mein Geisi bereU^ wache fUK und bete (No. 115), where 
it represents the act of rising to which the text refers. 

There is a very characteristic theme in the cantata 
Schwingi freudig euch empor (No. 96), resembling the beat- 
ing of wings — 




We have the same oscillations in the accompaniment to 
the aria "Der Glaube schafft der Seele FliigeF', from the 
cantata Wer da glaubei und getauft wird (No. 37). 

The recitative **Auf sperren sie den Rachen weit" ("They 
open wide their mouths"), from the cantata Wo der Herr 
nichi bei uns hdU (No. 178) is illustrated in music in this 
way — 



?'» ^g;/^/J3^ l ^^ ^yf3f|,^J^^ 



An inverse motion s}rmbolises» in the SL MaUhew Passion^ 
the passage "Der Heiland fallt vor seinem Vater nieder" 
(*The Saviour sinks before |iis Father"); and in the cantata 
Ich haV in GoUes Herx und Sinn (No. 92) the words ^'Seht, 
wie bricht, wie reisst, wie fallt I" ("See, how breaks, how 
bursts, how falls !") ; it appears again at the words *^enn 
aUes bricht, wenn alles fallt" ("When all things break, 
when all things fall"), in the opening aria of the cantata 
Ich habe meine Zuversickt (No. 188). 



Pictorial Thames. 



83 



A ^^foll*' motive, again, accompanies the chorale "Es 
woll* uns Gott gen^g sein'' ("God be gracious to us"), 
in the cantata Die Himnul erzMen die Ehre Gottes (No. 76). 
Its intervals of the seventh remind us of the bass figure 
in the chorale prelude Durch Adams Fall (V, No. 13). It 
runs thus — 




The text of the chorale gives no pretext for this motive, 
but the previous recitative does. This ends with the 
words "Drum sei dir dies Gebet demiitigst zugeschickt** 
("Be this prayer most humbly sent to Thee*'). The accom- 
paniment is thus meant to indicate the chorale as the humble 
prayer, and to evoke the vision of it being sung by a great 
kneeling host. 

Bach does not even shrink from a complicated representa- 
tion of motion, if he thinks this will enable him to suggest 
it more realistically. In the aria "Stiirze zu Boden, schwul- 
stige Stolze" ("Fall to the ground, thou swollen pride'*), 
from the cantata ErhaW uns Hen bei deinem Wort (N0.126), 
he is not content merely to depict the fall, but shows us 
repeated efforts to rise again, until there comes the final 
plunge — 




The fall and the effort to rise again are depicted also 
in the aria "Wir waren schon zu tief gesunken" ("We 
had fallen too low"), from the cantata Es i^ das Heil uns 
kommen her (No. 9) — 

6» 



$4 XXIII. Th€ Musical Language of the Cantatas. 






Most musicians know how Bach, in the first chorus of 
the cantata Wet sich selbs^ erhdhd (No. 47), expresses the 
words of Jesus» **Wer sich selbst erhohet, der soil emiedrigt 
werden, und wer sich selbst emiedriget, der soil erhdhet 
werden" ("Whoever shall exalt himself shall be abased, 
and whoever shall abase himself shall be exalted") — 




Wer sich selbst er-hd- 




hO 



hetf der soU er • nie^- dri - get 



Wf r\i f ^ =^> ft rlr ^ ^ 



wer • den» und war 'sich selbst er «- nie- 



vj- >r J ^ f+r- ^ iJ T I r fjr 




'dri - get, der 



sou 




bet WW -den 



Pictorial Themes. 



85 



Bach's consistency in the representation of movement 
may be seen from a recitative in the cantata GoU fdhret 
auf mU Jauckxen (No. 43), in which he renders the word 
"xerstreuen" (**scatter") in exactly the same way as in 
the accompanimentTto Jesus' words in the St. Matthew 
Passion^ *'Ich werd^den Hirten schlagen, und die Schafe 
werden sich zerstreuen'* ("I will smite the shepherds, 
and the sheep shall be scattered'') — 




\^^ 



In the alto aria of the cantata Ach GoU vom Himmel 
sieh darein (No. 2) he expresses the words ^Tilg o Gott 
die Lehren, die dein Wort verkehren" (**Blot out, oh Lord, 
those who pervert Thy word") by a picture of musical 
perversity of such a kind that throughout the movement 
we have the impression that the voice and the accompani- 
ment are not together. This movement is very like the 
little chorale prelude upon the angek' song AUein Gott 
in ier HdV sei Ehr (VI, No. 5) in which Bach tries to depict 
the charming disorder of the heavenly host in the clouds. 

He also represents in his music attempts at movement. 
A characteristic example is the theme of the aria '^Herz, zer- 
reiss des Mammons Ketten" (''Burst the bonds of Manmion, 
oh heart"), in the cantata Ti4e Rechnung^ Donnerwort 
(No. 168), which is a veritable Laokoon-design in music — 




^ i ftg[f i nJf ^ 



86 



XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 



How far he will venture to go in music is shewn in the 
Christmas cantata Christum wit sotten loben schon (No. xaz). 
The text of the aria "J^hannis freudenvoUes Springen 
erkannte dich mein Jesu schon'* ('^ohn leaped for joy 
in the womb when he recognised Jesus'' ) r^ers to the 
passage from the Gospel of St. Luke, **And it came to pass 
that when Elisabeth heard the salutation of Mary, the 
babe leaped in the womb". Bach's music is simply a long 
series of violent convulsions — 



Violino I. 



Contiinio. 




THE "STEP'* MOTIVES- 

Bach never lets slip words that express running or walk* 
ing. In the opening arioso of the cantata Sehet wif geken 
hinauf nach Jerusalem (No. 159) he seems to paint Jesus 
going before the disciples, then turning round to them, 
and standing still to repeat once more the sorrowful words 
that they cannot comprehend — 



•f A " l iu [f 




In the cantata £5 ist euch gui, dass ich hingehe (No. 108), 
in tlie verse "Es ist euch gut, dass ich hingehe; denn so 



The "Step" Motives. 



87 



ich nicht hingehe, so kommt der Troster nicht zu euch*' 
(''It is expedient for you that I go away. For if I go not 
away, the Comforter will not come unto you")* Bach 
gives to the basses the 'talking" motive, while the noble 
arabesque of the oboe above it expresses sublime consola- 
tion — 

staecato sempre 




In the cantata Wo gehest du kin (''Where goest thou'*) 
(No. 166), the "walking^* motive is again used to illustrate 
the text. Another characteristic example is the theme 
of the fugal prelude to the cantata Tritt auf die Glaubens- 
!mkn ("Tread the path of faith") (No. 152) — 




In the recitative "Geh' Welt! behalte nur das Deine" 
("CjO, world 1 keep thou thine own alone"), from the cantata 
Sehet welch eine Liebe (No. 64), Bach represents the words 
"Geh Welt", by the same bass figure that he uses, in 
the SL Matthew Passion, to depict the setting-out of Jesus 
and the disciples towards Gethsemane — 




In the cantata Ach Hen, mich afmen SUnder (No. 135) 
the music that companies the word "Weicht all', ihr t)bel- 
titer, weicht" ("Away, all ye evil-doers") suggests a hurry- 
ing away in terror — 



♦ John XVI, 7. 



88 



XXIII. The Musical Langaage of the Cantatas. 




^^ il L:j; 



^ 



The act of hastening away is charmingly suggested 
again in the bass of the aria Wir dlen mil schwachen^ dock 
emsigen SchriUen (*'We hasten with weak, yet diligent 
steps''), in the cantata Jesu, der du meine Seele (No. 78) — 




In the cantata ErfreuU ZeU im neuen Bunde (No. 83)9 
the words 'Tile, Herz, vol! Freudigkeit" ('^Hasten, heart, 
foil of jojrfolness") is expressed by a similar movement. 
Bach has marked all these quaver passages that represent 
movement stacaUo, — of course a heavy staccato. 

He S3rmbolises someone hurrying after or by the side 
of another by imitative passages for the voices, often al- 
most in canon^. 

The wide range of symbolism that he makes the "step^ 
motive cover cannot be correctly estimated from the chorale 
preludes. Measured, tranquil steps indicate resolution and 
confident faith, — as, for example, in the bass ac<x>m- 
paiimient to the Credo in the B minor Mass — 



•Mutii \ r r f-^iJ i J | |j j^ p 



■ Ml J J J r-^-p^ ^ 



* The following examples may be cited among many: the duet 
with chorus "Kommt, eilet und laafef ' from the Easter oratorio, 
the arias "Ich folge dir gleichfalls" and "Eilt, ihr angefochtnen 
Seelen" from the St. John Passion, the aria "Entzi^e dicb eilenda, 
mein Herze, der Welt'^ from the cantata Meinen Jesum lass ick 
nickt (No. 124), and the aria "So schnell ein rauschend Wasser 
schiesset, so dlen unsres Lebens Tage", from the cantata Aeh wis 
(No. 36). 



The "Step" Motives. 



89 



There is the same tranquil motion in the basses in the 
Confitear: 

When the intervals are more widely-spread they S3rm- 
bolise strength, pride, and defiance. T}rpical examples are 
the themes of the chorus **Herr, wenn die stolzen Feinde 
toben*' ("Lord, when the proud enemy rages'') in the 
Christmas OraUmo — 




af'lr MJ f' l J' 



This pictorial idea is carried to still further lengths in 
the themes of the cantata Nun ist das Heil und die Kraft 
(No. 50) — 



'■^Xffrlff r i r^^ 



f i f frfe ^FR 




ff | f f firff|fff|^^E; i r 



From the same root is derived the Fecit fotentiam of 
the Magnificat — 




and the theme of the basses in the Deposuit paienies, 
especially the end of it — 




This represents the word potentes" (*^he mighty*'), 
while the violins render the idea of *'deposuit" ("He hath 
cast down") — 




go 



XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 



ft 



In the aria ^'Gewaltige stosst Gott vom Stuhl hinunter 
(''God hath cast down the mighty from his seat*'), in the 
cantata Meine SeeF erhebt den Herren (No. xo), — the 
German Magnificat, — the two motives are united in one 
theme — 




These motives illuminate for us the gigantic idea that 
Bach wished to express in the theme of the organ fugue 
in E minor — 




THE "TUMULP* MOTIVE. 

Bach employs a particular group among these "stamping'* 
motives wherever he has to represent the tumult of combat, 
as if he desired to suggest to the hearer the hoof-beats of 
the horses and the rumbling of the inarching columns. 

The typical example of these motives is to be seen in the 
cantata £iV feste Burg (No. 80), where Bach forms from 
it the music that accompanies the second verse, "Mit 
unsrer Macht ist nichts getan . . . es streit fflr uns der rechte 
Mann**, (''With our own might we can do nothing . . . 
there fights for us the right one**) — 




The '^tumult** motive appears in a slightly different form in 
the aria "Streite, siege, starker Held** ("Strive and conquer, 
hardy hero**), in the cantata Ntm komm ier Heiden HMand 
(No. 62 ; second composition) — 



The "Tumult** Motive. 



91 




In still another form it accompanies, in the cantata 
GoU ier Herr isi Sonn^ und Schild (No. 79) the supplication 
of the believer, **Gott, ach Gott, verlass die Deinen nimmer- 
mehr .... obgleich sehr wider uns die Feinde toben'' 

("God, oh God, forsake not Thine own though the 

enemy rage against us") — 



jnTi""[^ i r J r jTH fEP 




The "tumult" motive appears again in the^ final aria 
of the cantata Wachet, betet (No. 70) — 




where it represents the uproar at the end of all things. 
In the concluding aria of the cantata for Low Sunday, 
HaU im Geddchtnis (No. 67) Bach employs it for the great 
tone-picture in which he portrays the appearance of Jesus 
to the eleven disciples. The music paints the turmoil 
made by the world round these terrified men ; at the sight 
of Jesus they sing "Wohl uns, Jesus hilft uns kampfen" 
("Oh joy, Jesus helps us in the fight"); and as soon as 
the Saviour utters his "Friede sei mit euch" ("Peace be 
unto you") the **tumult" motive is silenced. 

In the aria "Gute Nacht, du Weltgetiimmel", ("Good 
night, oh tumult of the world"), in the cantata Wsr weiss, 
wie nah0 mir tnein Ende (No. 27) there is another motive 
of the same kind. 



92 



XXm. The Musical Language of the Ca&tataa. 



The clear-cut quality of Bach's musical language may be 
seen from the fact that in the SL John Passion the words 
of Jesus **Ware mein Reich von dieser Welt, meine Diener 
wiirden darum kampfen, dass ich den Juden nicht ttber- 
antwortet wfirde'' C*Ii my kingdom were of this world, 
then would my servants fight, that I should not be de- 
livered to the Jews*') are accompanied by a figure — 




derived from the ^tumult*' motive. 



THE MOTIVES OF EXHAUSTION. 

Bach expresses exhaustion and weakness by means of 
syncopated "step" motives. 

A weary, dragging walk is depicted in the cantata leh 
steh mit eimm Fuss im Grabe (No. 156), where Bach lays 
the earthly pilgrim in the grave, at the end of his pilgrim- 
age, in this fashion — 



' ^-f^Ffrf 




In the cantata MU FrietP^und FremT ich fahr dahin 
(No. 125) the weary motion is represented more as a land 
of falling forward — 




The first part of the opening chorus of the cantata 
Brich dem Hungrigen ddn Brot (No. 39) is dominated by 
a similar representation of a man wearily dragging himself 
along, for Bach, fastening on the words "Und die so im 
Elend sind, fiihre ins Haus'' (**And those who are in misery, 



The Motives of Exhaustion. 



93 



take them into thy house"), paints a procession of tottering 

figures being conducted under the sheltering roof*. 

In the cantata In alien mdnm Taten (No. 97) occurs this 

passage: 

*^Leg ich mich spate nieder^ 

Erwache friih' idi wieder, 

Lieg Oder ziehe fort. 

In Schwachheit und in Banden " 

("If I go to rest late, awake early, lie down or go forth, 
in weakness and in bonds"). The theme with which Bach 
expresses the l3dng down and rising again is almost too 
characteristic — 



P 



BEE 




^=$=^ 





Jaded and uncertain steps also represent vacillating 
faith. Elaborate pictures of this kind are found in the 
cantata Ich glaube^ lieber Herr^ hilf meinem Unglauben 
(No. 109). The theme of the aria ^^Wie sweifelhaftig ist mein 
Hoffen'^ ("How uncertain is my hope") may be especially 
mentioned** — 




* On the problem of this choms see p. 46. 
** See also the aria "Bald zur Rechten, hald zur Linken ienkt 
aich mein verirrter Schritt" ("My wandering steps go now to the 
right, now to the left") from the cantata Herr Christ, der Hn'ge 
GotUssohn (No. 96), and the aria "Wir zittem und wanken" ("We 
tremble and reel") from the cantata Hirr, gehe nichi ins Gmekt 
(No. 105). 



94 



XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 



Syncopated "step" motives, in an idealised form, express 
the weariness that has found rest in Christ. Of this order 
are the themes of the beautiful sacred lullabies in which 
Bach describes the blissful weariness of death. Thus in 
the first chorus of the cantata Christus, der ist mein Leben, 
Sterben isi mein Gemnn (No. 95), the orchestra works 
out the motive — 




A well-known example is the noble theme of the aria 
"Schlummert ein, ihr matten Augen" ('^Close in sleep, 
ye weary eyes*'), from the cantata Ich habe genug (No. 82) — 




THE RHYTHM J.3 j.3' J j. 

The rh}rthm j^j j j /JT? ^ mostly associated by musical 
people with the idea of dignity or solemnity. It is used 
in the grave section of the old French overture with the 
same signification as in the Graal scene in Parsifal. The 
E flat prelude for organ at the beginning of the collection 
of the greater catechism chorales illustrating the Lutheran 
doctrine is worked out in this rhythm, as it needs to be 
unusually majestic. Bach employs it again in the Easter 
cantata Christ lag in Todesbanden (No. 4), to express the 
sixth verse, **So feiem wir das hohe Fest" (**So we celebrate 
the high feast''). In the cantata for Palm Sunday, Himmds- 
kSnig, sei willkommen (No. 182) it is prompted by the 
word "Himmelskonig" ("King of heaven") — 

Craw, VioUno concertanU. 



The Rhythm JJTJTS' 



95 



The sam# rh}^hin occurs in several arias in which mention 
is made of the godhood of Jesus. In the Christmas cantata 
Gehbet seist du^ Jesus Christ (No. 91), it ehicidates the text 
'Die Armut, so Gott auf sich nimmt" ('*God takes poverty 
upon Himself*) — 




It is found again in the first chorus of the cantata Herr 
Jesu Christ, wahf^ Mensch und Gott (No. 127). Even the 
phrase "Fiirst des Lebens" ("Prince of Kfe") in an aria 
in the cantata Der Himmd lacht, die Erde jubilieret (No. 31) 
is Plough to make Bach feel justified in introducing the 
rhythm of majesty — 

MoUo Adagio, 




This solemn rhythm must not be confused with another, 
that resembles it externally in that it also divides each 
bar-beat into two notes, one of which has the value of three 
quarters, the other of a quarter only. This latter is mainly 
distinguished from the other motive by the fact that it 
almost invariably appears in animated triple time, while 
the rhjrthm of solemnity is used in slow */* time; more- 
over it generally begins on the up-beat, and is interspersed 
with notes of other values or with pauses, while the rhythm 
of solemnity begins with the down-beat and continues 
without interruption. 

This other rh}rthm, which may be represented by a formula 
of this kind — 

/33 1 JJTI3 1 JiJTS I J 

expresses violent, passions, sometimes of a joyful, but 
generally of a grievous kind. Bach especially empk>ys it to 
represent terror, horror and despair. 



96 XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 

Its t3rpical form may be seen in Peter's aria of remorse. 
**Ach mein Sinn" in the St. John Passion. Another 
example occurs in the opening duet of the cantata Ach 
Gott, wie munches Htrxdeii (*'0 God, what grief of heart") 
(No. 58) — 




j, r'^C-I^^^^tt^ l ^'^ | t•f ^"r I 



Bach also expresses in this way the words "Mein letztes 
Lager will midti schrecken" ('*My last state will dismay 
me"), in the cantata Ewigheit, du Donnerwart (No 60) — 




^^The rhythm J 1 J 3 J J ^ ^^ employed whenever 
he wishes to suggest dow and heavy movement, as in the 
aria ^%omm, siisses Kreuz" ("Come! dear Cross") in the 
Si. Matthew Passion, where the music accompanies the 
steps of Joseph of Arimathaea as he carries the cross. It 
can also represent the falling of the scourge — as in the 
arioso "Erbarm es Gott" ("Thy mercy show, oh God") 
in the St. Matthew Passion — or the convulsive move- 
ments of the head of an angry serpent, as in the aria "Ge- 
duld, wenn mich falsche Zimgen stechen" ("Patience, 
though false tongues should sting me"). 

The ambiguity of this rh}rthm comes from the fact that 
there are a ntunber of cases of the representation of move- 
ment that may be interpreted in more than one way. 
Still it is never doubtful what Bach means to express in 
this or that case by the rh)rthm. By means of the metre 



The Rhythm J.J J.j J,^ 97 

and the build of the phrase he can give it each time so 
individual a character that its bearing on the text is dear 
without further explanation. 

A common feature of all the forms of the rh5rthm rjTJTJ 
so far cited is that the short note is not to be accented 
lightly, but heavily, so that it has the effect not of a final 
aspiration of the previous note, but of a preliminary tone 
and accent to the note that follows it. Written out exactly, 
the rhythm of solenmity and that of passion would appear 
thus — 




This opinion is not refuted by the fact that Bach, where 
he marks ties in these rhythms, always groups the notes 
belonging to the same beat imder a tie, in this manner — 




By this he only means to indicate that the passage as a 
whole is to be played legato. The solution of the question 
does not turn upon the ties that Bach has marked, but 
on whether the short note is to be played heavily or lightly. 
If heavily, then the ear necessarily accepts it in each case 
as the fore-accent to the succeeding note. The opening 
duet in Ach GoU, wie tnanches HerxeUid (No. 58) may be 
dted in proof of this. In spite of the fact that Bach has 

marked the tempo adagio^ and written the ties thus J,3 J.3L 

the movement is dominated by the ^'passion'* rhjrthm. 
It does not make its proper effect until we play the short 
notes not Ughtly, but with a certain degree of heaviness. 
Observe the inward unrest that makes itself felt in this 
music, and in that of the aria ''Mein letztes Lager will mich 
schrecken*', in Ewigkeii, du Dannerwart (No. 60). It 

Schwoitier, B«cb. II. 7 



98 XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 

comes from the sequence of violent intervals that Bach 
uses. 

These two arias present the problem in such an interest- 
ing form because the texts allow of both a passionate 
and a peaceful interpretation. Both are in dialogue form. 
The lament ''Ach Gott» wie manches Herzeleid begegnet 
mir zu dieser Zeit" (*'Ah God! what grief of heart is mine") 
is answered by the other vdce with **Geduld! Geduld'* 
("Patience! Patience'*); to the terrified cry "Mein letztes 
Lager wiU mich schrecken'\ the other rejoins "Mich wird 
des Heilands Hand bedecken" ("The hand of the Lord will 
cover me"). The right way of rendering the music there- 
fore depends upon our knowing which of the two feelings 
Bach is expressing. If the passionate rh}rthm were not 
o^erwise vouched for, we might conceive the music in 
both these arias as expressing the quiet consolation of the 
text. Nor must we forget the general observation that^ 
where a text gives Bach the choice between two feelings, 
he very often decides for the more passionate one, without 
considering whether in this way he best reproduces the 
sense of the text as a whole. 

As a matter of fact, he also employs a J?"^^^ 

••• #•• #•• 

rh}rthm in which the short note must be regarded as supple^ 
mental to the previous one, and is to be as lightly breathed 
as possible. Precisely noted, it would run thus — 




This rh)rthm belongs to the large category of those that 
represent light and diarming movement, and express sym- 
bolical ideas like peace and happiness. Its affinity with 
the rh)rthm of solenmity and passion exists only on paper 
and for the eye; in p^ormance, and for the ear^ it has 
nothing whatever in conmion with the other. Externally 
it is distinguished from the "solemnity*' rhythm by tb^ 
fact that it is usually met with only in triple time, and 



The Rhythms of Felicity. 99 

from the ''passionate*' rh)rthm by the fact that it never 
begins on the up-beaf^. 

The question of the various 1 j j j f j rh3^ms in 

Bach is of the greatest practical importance. The average 
conductor is not clear about the matter, and so renders 
them all in the same way, thus negating the characterisa- 
tion that Bach intended them to have. The occurrence, 
meaning, and proper way of rendering this rh}rthm in Bach 
should be made the object of a special and searching 
enquiry. 

THE RHYTHMS OF FELICITY. 

Motivesconstructedontherhythml J^ J J I *^ JT3 J Jl 
express, both in the cantatas and the diorales, the feeling 
of charm and happiness. In the cantata EtschaUet^ ihr 
Lieder (No. 172), the duet "Konun, lass mich nicht langer 
warten, komm, du sanfter Hinmielswind" ("Come, thou 
gentle breeze from heaven, keep me not waiting longer''), 
is accompanied by the following progression in tlie bass — 



%r.^ \ d^^iS(U^ij \ f! 



This Thyibm, however, for the most part does not appear 
in its pure form, but in sundry variants. In the accom« 

paniment to the aria "Sei getreu nach dem Regen 

Ufifat der Segen" ("Be faithful after the rain will 

come the ble^ing"), in the cantata Weinen^ Klagen (No. 12), 
it assumes the following shape — 




It is suggested also in the duet "Beruft Gott selbst, so 
muss der Segen auf allem unsem Tun im Ubermasse ruh'n" 



* The cJawical escamplo of this rhythm of charm is quoted 
on p. 103. 

7* 



100 XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 



(Xall upon God Himself, and blessing will rest in abund- 
ance upon all our doings"), in the cantata Siehe, ich mil 
viel Fischer aussenden (No. 88). In the cantata Auf ChrisU 
Himmelfahrt allein (No. 128), it appears in combination 
with the **jo)r'* motive — 



9'^ tf y Ef : ^ 




It sometimes receives further animation from the addition 
of semiquaver runs, when it takes the form in which we 
meet with it, for example, in the cantata Lobe den Herm 
meine Seele (No. 143) — 



vM Ufjin^ 





Even in the accompaniment figure of the recitative 
"Ach, Herr Gott, durch die Treue dein, wird unser Land 
in Fried* und Ruhe sein" ("Ah, Lord God, by Thy faithful- 
ness our land shall find peace and quiet''), in the cantata 
Nimm van uns, Herr^ du treuer Gott (No. loi) we 'may 
detect the essential movement of the **felicity" rhythm — 



%i i y[JJln^^ 




It is recognisable, again, in the music to the words 
"Bin geheiligtes Gemiite sieht imd schmecket Gottes Giite" 
("A sanctified soul sees and tastes the goodness of the 
Lord"), in the cantata Erhdhtes Fleisch und Blut (No. 173)— 



Th« Rhyihms of Felicity. 



lOZ 



Another motive of felicity is prompted by the idea of 
quiet, gently-flowing waves. In a recitative in the cantata 
Ihr Menschen, rUhmet GotUs Liebe (No. 167), the following 
accompaniment appears in the bass at the words '*Mit 
Gnad' und Liebe zu erfreuen" ("To rejoice with the grace 
and love of God") — 



SS 




The recitative in the Trauerode, that speaks of the happy 
death of the princess, has the following bass to it — 




Compare with this the accompaniment to the aria "Ver* 
gieb, o Vater, vergieb unsre Schuld** (*Torgive, oh Father, 
forgive our sin"), in the cantata Bisher habt ihr nicfits 
gebeten (No. 87) — 




The theme of the aria "Sanfte soil mein Todeskummer" 
(**My death shall be sweet") in the Easter oratorio runs 
thus — 




In the middle section of the first chorus of the cantata 
Es ist nichts Gesundes an meinem Leibe (No. 25) the motive 
of calmly-moving water is used to express the words 



"peace" — 




102 XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 

In all these cases the motion of the waves is meant to 
convey a spiritual symbolism, as is seen when we compare 
with them the bass accompaniment to the recitative *Tyie 
stille Pleisse spielt mit ihren kleinen Wellen" (**The tranquil 
Pleisse plays with its little waves*'), in the secular cantata 
Auf schtneUernde Tdne — 




Bach expresses a warmer tinge of peaceful"] oy by a motive 

in this rhythm fjl fjj TTlf usually in ^'/g and 

•/s> l>^t occasionally also in Vs and •/* time. Rhjrthms 
of this kind are not often met with in other composers. 
Bach, however, is very^fond of them, forming out of them 
the loveliest and most flexible of his great phrases. The 
affinity of these themes with the angel motives is obvious. 
Both are meant to represent graceful motion of an almost 
superterrestial kind, by means of which Bach wishes to 
express the transfigured joy that has vanquished grief. 
One of the finest themes of this order is that of the aria 
"Ich will leiden, ich will schweigen" ("I will suffer, I will 
be silent") in the cantata Bisher habi ihr nichis gebeUn 
(No. 87) — 



I^^MMf-^ ^z:^ ^^ 



We may cite also the theme of the aria ^^Gedenk' an 
uns mit deiner Liebe, sclileuss uns in dein Erbarmen ein" 
(**Think of us with Thy love, and enfold us in Thy pity*') 
in the cantata Wit dankm dir Gott (No. 29) — 




The 



of Tmvot. 



103 



In the first chorus of the cantata Also hatGcttiU WM 
gdiM (No. 68), a similar theme expresses the idea of the 
eternal, compassionate love of God — 




From this rhythm, again, is derived a heavier form, 
in wbidi the third quaver must be played with a certain 
amount of accent. Bach employs it for the representation 
of sorrowful pathos. Typical examples of it are the Sidliano 
of the fourth sonata for violin and clavier, and the violin 
accompaniment to the aria "^Erbarme dich'' in the St Mat- 
(hew Passion. 

Besides these three main forms of expression for the 
emotions signified by such words as **peace'' and ^'happi- 
ness*', there is a fourth motive, that externally resembles 
the "solemnit)r'* rh3rthm*. An example may be cited 
from the theme of "Friede sei mit euch!" ("Peace be unto 
you") in the final aria of the cantata Halt im Geddchtnis 
fssum Christ (No. 67) — 




THE MOTIVE OF TERROR. 

To express terror, Bach employs a series of reiterated 
quavers or semiquavers on the same note; he represents 
it, that is, as trembling or shuddering. The method in itself 
is rather primitive, but Bach achieves great effects with 
it, as we can see from the first movement of the cantata 
Emgkeit, du Donnerwort (No. 60), through which there 

♦ See p. 99. 



104 XXIII. The Maftical Laaguage of the Cantatas. 



nms an unbroken series of shndders. Another example 
may be seen in the recitative with chorus **0 Schmerzl 
Hier zittert das gequalte Herz*' (**0h grief! His tortured 
heart at last doth ^quail'') in the 5/. Matthew Passion. 
The phrase ^'Erschrecket! ihr verstockten Sunder 
('Terror seize you, unrepentant sinners"), in the cantata 
Wachett betet (No. 70), is accompanied by whole chords 
in reiterated semiquavers — 




In the recitative **Ach, soil nicht dieser grosse Tag" 
(**Ah! shall not this great day"), in the same cantata, 
Bach emplo}^ a trembling bass in order to depict the terror 
at the Last Judgment; and in a recitative in the cantata 
Schauet dock und sehet (No. 46), where reference is again 
made to the end of the world, the horror of the trembling 
bass is intensified by the addition of the chromatic motive — 




To paint the anxiety of the disciples after the death 
of Christ, in the cantata Am Abend aber desseJbigen Sabbats 
(No. 42), Bach gives out in recitative, after the prelude, 
the following verse from St. John's Gospel, "Then the same 
day at evening, being the first day of the week, when the 
doors were shut where the disciples were assembled, for 



The Motives of Grief. 



»5 



fear of the Jews» came Jesus and stood in the midst*', 
with the trembling bass as sole accompanimait — 



CoBtiaiio. 



Oifuo 

Fagotto. 




I fe 



-^- 



^ 





^^ 



THE MOTIVES OF GRIEF. 

To express grief. Bach employs the two motives that 
have already appeared in the OrgdbUchUin — a chromatic 
progression of five or six notes, typif3mig torturing grief, 
and a miiform sequence of notes in pairs, that is like a 
series of sighs. 

The chromatic motive is frequently used to throw a 
particular word into high relief — for example in the final 
chorus of the Christmas cantata Christen^ Mzet diesen Tag 
(No. 63), at the words **Aber niemals lass geschehen, dass 
uns Satan moge qualen'' ("But never let Satan molest 
us»*) — 




In a recitative in the cantata G^bel seist du Jssu 
Christ (No. 91), the word "Jammertal" (**Valley of distress**) 
is brought out in the same way. 

He often uses the chromatic progression as a basso 
ostinato. The first chorus of the cantata Jesii, der du 
mdne Seek hast dutch deinen bittern Tod (No. 78) is founded 
on the following bass — 



I06 XXni. The Musical Laagaage of the Cantatas. 



aa^ 




The basso osUnaio of the first chorus of the cantata on 
Hans Sachs's song, Warum betrilbsi du dich, mein Herz 
(No. 138), runs thus — 




A well-known example is the bass figure, repeated 
thirteen times, of the Crucifixus in the B minor Mass — 




The sighing motive appears in two forms — one realistic, 
the other more idealistic. The former is meant to represent 
actual sighs; in the latter the sighing is more spiritual, 
and the motive serves for the expression of noble lamenta* 
tion. 

The words "Achzen \md erbarmlich Weinen" (''Sighs 
and piteous weeping"), in the cantata Meine Seufxer^ 
tneine Trdnen (No. 13), are rendered in music that suggests 
veritable sobbing — 




In the first chorus of Schauet dock und sehet, ob irgmi 
$in Schmerz sei me mein Schmerz (' 'Behold and^see if 
there be any sorrow like unto my sorrow") (No. 46) the 
violas never cease their sighing — 



The Motives of Grief. 



107 




The words "Seufzer, Tranen, Kiunmer, Not" ("'Sighs, 
Tears, Grief, Distress''), in the cantata Ich haUe vid B0- 
knmmemis (No. 21) are translated into music in this way — 



|i ' 'ii' ^ h- r r^^^r I r l ffJ" %7; 1^"^ 



It cannot be denied that in many cases Bach has greatly 
intensified the sorrowful mood of the words, simply in 
order that his^orchestra may have a pretext for lamenta- 
tion. But never do we become satiated with his painting 
of clamorous grief, although he is always making use of 
the same motives. This is due not only to the fine quality 
of his art and to the perpetually new forms in which the 
motive appears, but sdso to the fact that the method of 
representation he adopts is wholly natural. It is this 
constant naturalness that makes Bach's musical language 
so consummate. 

The motive of noble grief is chiefly distinguished from 
the other by its closer intervals and smoother motion, 
the harmony thus transfiguring the grief. 

In a recitative in the Trauerode this "grief" motive ap- 
pears in the following form — 




A typical example may be seen in the melodic line of 
the accompaniment to the great chorale chorus **0 Mensch, 
bewein' dein' Sunde gross" ("Oh man, bewail thy grievous 
sin") at the end of the first part of the St Matthew Pas- 



sion — 




X08 XXin. The Muslad Language of the Cantata. 

That Bach was folly conscious of the meaning this 
motive had for him may be seen from the fact that for 
the opening chorus of the cantata Wir mUssen dutch vid 
TrUbsal in das Reich Gottes eingehtn (No. 146) he makes 
use of a clavier concerto andanie that is based on the rhythm 
of two tied notes, simply adding the chorale parts to it. 
The movement is the well-known one commencing thus — 




Lfl;jj'l^lPJ^^ 



*' Here the periodic interruption of the natural motion 
by wider intervals is very interesting. The same peculiarity 
characterises a large number of Bach's themes of grief. 
It is seen in its most striking form in the accompaniment 
to the words ''Ich wiinschte mir den Tod, wenn du, mein 
Jesus, mich nicht liebtest'' ('1 would desire to die, if thou, 
my Jesus, didst not love me"), in the cantata Selig ist der 
Mann (No. 57) — 




w^ 




Further examples of Bach's way of depicting elevated 
grief may be seen in the opening of the cantata Ich will 
den Kreuzstab gerne tragen (No. 56), and the sinfonia of 
the cantata for the third Simday after Easter — Weinen^ 
Klagen (No. 12). In the cantata Himmelskdnig, sei will- 
kommen (No. 182), with its wonderful Passion atmosphere, 
the bass of the aria **J^^» ^^^^s durch Wohl tmd Weh' mich 
auch mit dir Ziehen" (**J^^» ^^^ ™^ follow Thee through 
weal and woe") runs thus — 



The Motivet of Joy. 



109 




The mourning chorale "Der Gott, der mir hat ver- 
sprochen'^ (*The God who has promised me") in the cantata 
Mein0 Seufzer, tneine Trdnen (No. 13) is also accompanied 
by the rhythm of noble grief. 

Bach employs it, again, whenever he wishes to express 
melancholy longing, as in the accompaniment to the first 
aria of the cantata Ach ich sehe, jetxt da ich xur HockxeU 
gehe (No. 162), and in the first aria of LiebsUr Jesu^ mein 
Verlangen (No. 32). 

The motive of noble grief, in an idealised form, depicts 
the longing for death. The death-lullaby, ^^Letzte Stunde 
brich herein, mir die Augen zuzudriicken" (**Come, oh 
last hour, and close my eyes''), in the cantata Der Himmd 
lacht, die Erde jubiUeret (No. 31), begins thus — 




THE MOTIVES OF JOY. 

To express joy. Bach uses in the cantatas the same two 
motives that he had employed in the chorales. The first 
consists of a succession of rapid notes, and expresses joy 
of a more direct and naive kind; the other is based on the 

rhythmjj] ^ ^ ^oronthisJTJ fR 17^13 
and more particularly typifies joyous agitation. 

An example of the first kind may be seen in the runs 
of the solo violin in the opening aria of the cantata Erfreute 
Zeii im neuen Bunde (No. 83) — 



no XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 




It is more especially the joyous mood of Christmas that 
Bach expresses in this way, as is shewn by a number of 
choruses for that season, — for instance the cantata for 
the third day of Christmas, Ich freus mich in dir (No. 133). 
The final chorale ^'SeiLob imdPreis" ("Glory and Praise") 
in the cantata Ihr Menschen ruhmet Gottes Liebe (No. 167) 
is accompanied in this way — 




!■* ffp J^ |S 



The second of these two motives is the one most fre- 
quently used in the cantatas, as it is in the chorales. It 
can assume manifold shapes, and so can express many 
varieties and shades of joy. In Bach's works there are at 
least two hundred motives constructed upon this rh)rthm of 
joy, while it is scarcely met with in Handel and Beethoven. 
It is seen in its typical form in the violin solo of the Litud^ 
amus te in the B minor Mass, — 




The Motives Of Joy* 



XII 



The bass in the opening chorus of the Gennan Magnificat, 
— the cantata Meine SeeP erhebt den Herr&n (No. lo) — 
moves about in this way — 



Vivact. 




The bass in the first chorus of the cantata Hen GoU. 
dich loben wir (No. i6) has the same motion — 




The main motive of the orchestral accompaniment to 
the first chorus of the cantata Nun komnC der Hdden 
Heiland (No. 62; second composition) belongs to the same 
category — 




The chorus ^^JsLVLchzet^ ihr erfreuten Stimmen" ("Rejoice, 
ye gladsome voices'') in the cantata GoU man lobt dich 
in der SHUe (No. 120), is also wholly dominated by the 
motive of joy. 

An example of the employment of this rhythm in the 
accompaniment of recitatives may be seen in Preise dein 
GlUcke, gesegnetes Sachsen (B.G. XXXIV), where Bach 
uses it to express in music the fidelity and love of the sub* 
jects who joyfully throw themselves at the feet of their 
sovereign. 



112 XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 

Bach is particularly fond of constructing bass figures 
out of this motive of joy. Three typical examples may 
be cited from among many: — 

The duet "£r kennt die rechten Freudenstunden** (**He 
knows the hours of real joy''), from the cantata Wet nur 
d0n Ueben Gott Idsst waUen (No. 93) — 




The opening chorus of the cantata Lobe dm He^m, 
meine Seele (No. 69; first composition) — 




The aria ^'Wohl mir, Jesus ist gefunden, nun bin ich 
nicht mehr betriibt'' ('*0h joy, Jesus is found again; now 
am I no more sorrowful") in the cantata Mein 
Jesu ist verloren (No. 154) — 




These motives symbolise a joy that is still to some 
extent restrained. The more audacious the theme, the 
more unfettered is the joy. 

When Jesus took Peter away from his nets, bade him 
have no fear, and promised to make him a fisher of men, 
the disciples, judging from the motive with which Bach 
accompanies these words, must have been transported 
with joy — 



The Motives of Joy^. 



"3 



But even this motive seems temperate in comparison 
with the more exuberant ones. One of these is the bass 
of the aria **ErhoIet euch, betriibte Stimmen . . . Mein 
Jesus lasst sich wiedersehn, o Freude der nichts gleichen 
kann!" ("Recover yourselves, oh afflicted voices . . . My 
Jesus returns; oh joy without compare") in the cantata 
for the third Sunday after Easter, Ihr werdet weinen und 
heulen {No. 103) — 



i^'^r, I f V ^ rjtTfr^ [f \ ^^ ; 




The most extravagantof all the extravagant motives of joy 
is seen in the bass figures in the aria "Gelobet sei der 
Herr** ("Praised be the Lord") in the chorale cantata 
Gdohet sei der Herr^ mein Gott (No. 129) — 




Ecstatic joy is not expressed by a definite motive, but 
by dreamy arabesques in a solo instrument. An example 
may be seen in the violin accompaniment to the duet 
*Wann kommst du mein Heil" ("When comest thou, my 
salvation"), in Wachet auf (No. 140). In the first aria of 
the cantata Weichet nut, betriibte Schatten, the oboe sings 
a Spring Song of extraordinary loveliness, while the ar- 
peggios in the strings depict the mists floating upward — 



Schw«it(er, Biich. 11. 



8 



XX4 XXin. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 



jUkigi^. 




Rapturous joy is expressed again in the accompaniment 
to the aria ^'Ich will doch wohl Rosen brechen, wenn mich 
gleich die Domen stechen" (^Tet I will gather roses, even 
though the thorns prick me")» in the cantata WahrUch 
ich sage each (No. 86) — 





Other examples may be seen in the violin solo in the 
aria "Ich traue seiner Giite" ("I trust in His goodness'*) 
in the chorale cantata In alien meinen Taten (No. 97); the 
flute solo in the soprano aria in the chorale cantata Wa$ 
Gott tut, das ist wohlgetan (No. 100); the oboe soli in the 
two cantatas that express the longing for death, — Liebster 
Jesu^ mein Verlangen (No. 32), and Ich habe genug (No. 82). 

In the aria "Die Seele ruht in Jesu Handen" ("The soul 
is at rest in Jesus' hands"), in the cantata Hen Jesu Christt 
wahf^r Mensch und Gott (No. 127), the oboe weaves celestial 
garlands of sound round the tolling of the funeral bells. 



THE CO-OPERATION OF THE MOTIVES. 

Since so many of Bach's motives have their definite 
meanings, we can understand him sometimes using two 



The Co-operation of the Motives. 



"5 



or more together or in succession in order to give full ex- 
pression to his text. A cursory perusal of any volume of 
the cantatas will afford examples of this. In the Christ^ 
mas Oraiofio Herod is terrific when the mages teU him 
of the birth of the Messiah; but he reflects **Warum wollt 
ihr erschrecken? ... soUtet ihr euch nicht vielmehr 
daiiiber freuen?" ("Why should you fear? Should you 
not rather rejoice?"), and Bach underlines this thought 
by giving us the motive of terror and that of joy in suc- 
cession — 




In the first chorus of the cantata Ihr werdet weinen und 
heulen, aber die Welt wird sich freuen (No. 103) the motive 
of joy and the chromatic motive of sorrow are used anti- 
thetically. 

In the opening chorus of Jesu^ der du meine Seele (No. 78), 
the thought of Christ's suffering and that of joy in the salva- 
tion it brings are expressed by opposing the motive of joy 
to that of grief — 




In the arias "Friede sei mit euch" ("Peace be unto you") 
from- Halt im Geddchtnis Jesum Christ (No. 67), and "Gute 
Nacht, du Weltgetiimmel" ("Farewell, thou turmoil of 
the world"), from Wer weiss wie nahe mir mein Ende 
(No. 27), the motive of joy and that of tumult are played 
off against each other. 

8" 



Il6 XXin. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 

In the cantata Ihr Menschen, rUhmet Gottes Liebe (N0.167) 
occur the words "Gottes Wort, das triiget nicht; es ge- 
schieht, was er verspricht. Was er im Paradies den Vatem 
schon verhiess, haben wir, Gott lob, erfahren" ("God's 
word does not deceive; it has happened as He promised. 
What he promised in Paradise to our forefathers, has, 
God be praised, now come to pass"). This is expressed 
in the bass by a "step" motive that symbolises the stead- 
fastness of God's pledge, and by a "joy" motive that 
answers to the "God be praised" for the fulfilling of the 
promise — 




This interpretation is confirmed by the Easter cantata 
So du mit deinem Munde bekennest (No. 145). ^The words 
of the opening chorus, "So du mit deinem Munde bekennest 
Jesum, dass er der Herr sei, und glaubest in deinem Herzen, 
dass ihn Gott von den Toten auferweckt hat, so wirst du 
selig" ("If with thy mouth thou dost acknowledge that 
Jesus is God, and dost believe in thy heart that God hath 
raised Him from the dead, thou shalt be blest"), are ex- 
pressed in two themes, corresponding respectively to the 
words "glauben" (*T>elieve") and "selig" ("blest") — 




In the first chorus of the cantata Ach lieben Christen^ 
seid getrost (No. 114) we have the trembling motive of fear 
and the ascending motive of joy side by side — 



The Cooperation of the Motives. 
• •••• "••••• " 



117 




Wt jU 



When the picture painted in the text requires it, Bach 
will even employ three themes together. In the cantata 
Wohl ietHy der sich aufl$einen Gott (No. 139) he has to ex* 
press the words "Das Ungliick schlagt auf alien Seiten um 
mich ein zentnerschweres Band; doch plotzlich erscheinet 
die helfende Hand; mir scheint des Trostes Licht von 
weitem" ("Misfortune overwhelms me on every side as 
with heavy bonds; but suddenly appears the helping hand, 
and the light of comfort shines on me from afar"). In the 
music we have three themes. The first symbolises the "over- 
whelming with heavy bonds" by means of a characteristic 
motive expressive of twining — 




A mounting theme depicts the rescuing hand, rising up 
out of the ruin; the third paints a fli(±ering light, in a 
style made familiar to us in many other cantatas. 

In an aria in the cantata Herty me du wiUst (No. 73) 
Bach first of all represents sighing, then the swoon of 
death, then the toUmg of the funeral bells. The accom- 
paniment to the first chorus of the cantata Was soil ich 
aus dir machen, Ephraim (No. 89) is made up of three 
themes, one expressing God's anger, the second the sorrow- 
ful question, and the third, sighs and lamentation. 

Frequently the same idea is represented by several re- 
lated motives. In the great choruses of the Christmas 
Oratorio we usually find two or three different motives of 



Il8 XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 



joy; similarly in the expression of grief we find various 
kinds of sighing motives. 

Bach goes a step further. He not only places motives 
of different signification in conjunction or in succession, 
but tries to express composite feelings by welding two 
motives into one theme. Here we see how fully conscious 
he was of his own musical language, and how daring it is; 
examples of combined themes of this kind can hardly be 
found in other composers. 

A t3^ical specimen is the theme of Nun ist das HeU 
und die Kraft (No. 50), which consists of a combination 
of the motive of strength and the motive of joy — 




■/irrfrrrri^Ti M 




In this way Bach expresses thematically the whole sub- 
stance of the text, the subject of which is the triumph 
of God and the rejoicing over Satan's fall (Rev. XII, 10). 
In the cantata Meine Seufxer, meine Trdnen (No. 13) 
the words of an aria run thus — "Achzen und erbarmlich 
Weinen hilft der Sorgen Krankheit nicht; aber wer gen 
Himmel schauet . r. dem kann leicht ein Freudenlicht 
in der Trauerbrust erscheinen'' (**Our sighs and tears 
cannot help us in our sickness and sorrow; but he who 
looks towards heaven will find his mourning lit up by a 
ray of joy"). Bach's theme is the sighing motive dissolving 
into the motive of joy — 




The Co-operalipii of the 



119 




In the St. Matthew Passion we have a large number 
of themes composed of two motives*. That of the aria 
and chorus at the beginning of the Second Part expresses 
at the same time the hurried steps and the laments of the 
Daughter of Zion, seeking her friend in the gard^i of Geth- 
semane. In the aria '*Sehet, Jesus hat die Hand uns zu 
fassen ausgespannt" ('See, Jesus has stretched out His 
hand to grasp us"), we hear the pealing of the bells of 
salvation, and see the movement with which the Lord 
lifts up redeemed humanity to Him on the cross. In the 
setting of the text *'GeduId, Geduld, wenn mich falsche 
Zungen stechen" ('Tatience, patience, when false tongues 
wound me") we first of all have the word ''Geduld" ex- 
pressed in quiet quavers, and then the stinging of the f^Jse 
tongues is depicted in a precipitate motion to and fro — 




The theme of the aria '*Kflnnen Tranen mether Wangen 
nichts erlangen, o so nehmt mein Herz hinein** ('Though 
in vain be all my wailing, naught availing, oh receive this 
heart of mine") runs thus — 



* See the chapter on the St Matthew Passion. 



120 XXIII. The Musical Language of the Cantatas. 




We are supposed to be witnessing the scourging of Jesus. 
In the first two bars are depicted the blows falling on His 
back; this motive is derived from the accompaniment to 
the previous arioso, '^Erbarm* es Gott". What follows 
is only a musical form of the cry — 



^ 



^ 



22 



m 



with which the Daughter of Zion, who is looking on, breaks 
in upon the torture. 



CONCLUSION. 

This enumeration of the principal sources of Baches 
tonal language, and the chief uses to which he puts it, 
cannot possibly give a complete idea of his method of 
musical expression. It is meant only to stimulate reflect- 
ion and research, and to show that the key to the per- 
formance of many of Bach's works is to be looked for in 
the significance that the composer attaches to certain 
definite motives. 

It goes without sajdng that the foregoing analysis in- 
dicates only the meanings the themes most commonly 
bear. In the "Kreuzige" of the St. John Passion, for ex- 
ample, the rh)rthm f^ rW HH has nothing to do 

with the motive of joy, but serves here, as in other cases, 
only to make the motion more animated. Bach employs 
it for the same purpose in the aria "So loschet im Eifer 
der rachende Richter'', in the cantata Es reifet euch ein 
schrecklich Ende (No. 90). It would be equally false to 
see the '^sighing motive" in every theme composed of 



Ccmdusion. I2I 

successions of two tied notes. Bach*s musical language 
is simply based on the fact that for the representation 
of certain feelings he prefers certain definite rh}rthms, 
and that this association is so natural that it at once tells 
its own story to anyone with a musical mind. This does 
not at all exclude the employment of these rh3rthms in 
other ways, especially when the object is the representa- 
tion of motion of some kind. Nor must we forget that 
many rh}rthms that look the same on paper were conceived 
by Bach in wholly different ways. His works are peculiarly 
fitted to convince us of the imperfection of our methods 
of noting music, so far as the reproduction of the organic 
life of the tones is concerned. We can therefore maintain 
with some confidence that the same rh)rthm in Bach's 
music does not represent two distinct feelings, and that 
the expressive elements of his tonal language are more 
clearly cut than those of any other composer. It would 
hardly be possible to show so many verbal symbols in 
anyone else's work. It has been said that in music 
the rhythms correspond roughly to the consonants, and 
the intervals and harmonies to the vowels, since they 
give sonority to the rh3rthms. If this comparison is broadly 
correct, it tallies very closely with what we find in Bach's 
musical language. The tonal tissue that the intervals 
give to the rhjrthm defines the quality of the emotion. Bach's 
intervals have also a specisd significance of their own, 
though the discovery of general formulas is incomparably 
more difficult here than in the case of the rhythms. We 
can say with certainty, however, that skips of sixths are 
generally plentiful when he has to express joy, while un- 
easiness and something like loathing are often expressed 
by means of the diminished third. Strange and widely- 
separated dissonances are employed to represent pain and 
horror. 

The more we study the cantatas, the more it becomes 
evident that only the coarsest elements of Bach's tonal 
language can be reduced to formulae. At the same time, 



122 XXIV. The Amstadt, Mftblhausen etc. Cantatas. 

however, we become conscious how little of what can be 
observed has really been noted thus far, and how much 
is still to be revealed by comparative research into the 
whole of Bach's work, until the individuality and the per- 
fection of the expression in his music are made clear enough 
to executants to influence their performances of the works. 



CHAPTER XXIV. 

THE ARNSTADT, MOHLHAUSEN, WEIMAR, AND 

cOthen cantatas. 

Forkel n:iaintains that in Bach's earliest compositions 
the marks of genius are indeed evident, but that **they 
also contain so much that is unnecessary, so much that is 
inmiature, extravagant, and tasteless, that they are not 
worth preserving, at any rate for the general public.*' ♦ 
Only in his thirty-fifth year, — i. e. 1720, — did Bach* 
according to his first biographer, attain perfect mastery 
of polyphony ♦♦. 

This is purely fantastic. Only the three or four very 
earliest of Bach's cantatas have the air of being experi- 
ments; in those that follow, the style is ahready sure and 
finished. If ever a composer's period of probation was 
short, it was his. 

The Easter cantata Denn du wirst meine Sede nicht 
in der HoUe lassen (No. 15), belongs to the Amstadt epoch. 
Bach appears to have performed it also at some lata: date. 
Like the cantatas of the Northern composers, it is pomp- 
ously orchestrated. The final chorale *^eil du vom Tod 
erstanden bist", with its fanfare-Uke interludes in the wind, 
is very impressive. Bach would be eighteen or nineteen 
3rears old when this cantata was written. 



* Forkel, p. 49. 
•♦ Forkel, pp. 33 — 35. 



GoU ist msin Kdnig. 123 

The cantata G<M isi tnein KSnig (No. 71) was produced 
at Mtihlhausen on 4th February 1708, on the occasion 
of the election of a new Town Council. On that day in 
each year one third of the Council of forty-eight undertook 
the conduct of the business of the town until the same 
date in the following year. The election began with a 
ceremony in the church. The cantata performed on the 
occasion was generally printed. This was the case with 
Bach's cantata; it was the only one issued during his 
lifetime. The printing, however, was regarded not as 
a publication for the benefit of Bach» but as an act in 
honour of the Miihlhausen Council*. 

For this festive occasion there was a brilliant orchestra — * 
three trumpets, two flutes, two oboes, bassoon, first and 
second violins, viola, 'Sdolone", kettle-drum and organ. 
Each instrument has an obbligato part, not separately, 
however, but as part of a particular orchestral and choral 
ensemble. There are three of these, — the first formed 
by the trumpets, the second by the flutes, oboes, and 
bassoon, and the third by the strings. The chorale por- 
tions are divided between a iutti, which Bach calls caro 
fleno, and a smaller group, that only sings when senza 
ripieni is indicated. The charm of the work comes from the 
co-operation and contrast of the three instrumental and two 
choral masses. The setting for choir and orchestra of the 
pcayer firom the 74th Psalm — "Du woUest dem Feinde nicht 
geben die Seele deina: Turteltaube" — is full of feeling **. 



* The parts alone were printed, not the score. In the text- 
book the cantata is called a GlUckwiinschends Kirchen-Motette 
("Congratulatory Church -Motet"). The two officiating burgo- 
masters were Adolf Strecker and Georg Adam Steinbach. Both 
the autograph score and the autograph parts have survived. 

** Spitta found a fragment of a Bach cantata belonging to the 
Mtthlhausen epoch in the cantor's house at the village of Langula 
(Spitta I, 343). The Wedding Cantata Der Herr denket an uns 
(B. G. XIII, 75 ff) must also belong to this time. It was probably 
composed for the second marriage of the pastor Stauber (Spitta I, 
370 ff.). Bach was compelled to write the orchestral part for 
strings alone. 



124 XXrv. The Amstadt, M^hlhaufldn 6tc. Cantatas. 

The score of the cantata Ausder Tiefe rufe ich (No. 131 ; 
Psahn 130) has at the ead the note "Auff Begehren Tit. 
Herm. D. Georg. Christ. Eihnar's in die Musik gebracht 
von Joh. Seb. Bach, Org. Molhusino'* (^'Set to music by 
Joh. Seb. Bach, organist at Miihlhausen, by request of 
Herr D. G. G. Eihnar"). Eihnar, — Pastor primarius at 
the church of the Blessed Virgin — was a great admirer 
of church music, and a personal friend of Bach's. 

The only instruments employed in this cantata are 
strings, oboe and bassoon. On every page we can see that 
Bach is beginning to emancipate himself from the Northern 
composers. The orchestral interruptions are not so lengthy 
as in the two previous cantatas. The young man still 
follows Buxtehude, however, in the employment of the 
chorale. In the arioso ^'So du willst, Herr, Siinde zurechnen" 
the soprano sings ^'Erbarm dich mein" to the melody of 
**Herr Jesu Christ du hochstes Gut'' ; and the same melody 
is used in the arioso '*Meine Seele wartet". The whole 
work is so deeply felt and so natural in effect that the 
modem hearer enjoys it as much as the Miihlhausen audience 
of 1707. 

From the first years of the Weimar period we have two 
cantatas — Nach dir, Herr, verlangd mich (No. 150), and 
Gottes Zeit i$t die aUerbeste Zeii (the Actus tragicus, No. io6). 

The first of these gives a characteristic example of Bach's 
method of expressing grief and joy. In order to express 
the anguish of the cry **Nach dir, Herr, verlanget mich" 
(*Tor thee, oh Lord, I long") he employs the chromatic 
sequence so often met with in the later cantatas — 



».ij| r. J r ij' ^ ^' p c 



Nach dir Herr Ter - Ian - get mich. 

In the aria "Doch bin und bleibe ich vergniigt" (**Yet 
I am and shall be content"), the bass is dominated by the 
motive of joy — 



Goii0$ ZHi i$t dU aikrb$$t$ ZHi. %%$ 




The conclusion, however, is in the form of a chaconne 
upon a hasso ostinato^ in which we have an anticipation 
of the master of the Crudfixus in the B minor Mass. 

We do not know for whose death the mourning cantiita 
GcUes Zeit ist die allerbesie ZeU (No. xo6) was written. 
Spitta's researches shew that there was no death in the 
ducal family at that time. It seems to have been an old 
man, to whom the *'Mit Fried' und Freud' fahr ich dahin" 
(from Simeon's song of praise) would be appropriate. 

The text is as perfect as the music. It is composed of ^| 
verses from the Bible, in which the antithesis is worked 
out between the Old Testament fear of death and the New \ 
Testament joy in death. "Put thy house in order, for 
thou must die" says the prophet Isaiah, whereupon the 
chorus joins in with "It is the old decree". But at once 
a soprano strikes in, as if hastening hither from another 
world, with the final call of the Apocalypse, "Yes, come 
Lord Jesu, come", to which the orchestra adds the chorale 
"Ich hab' mein Sach' Gott heimgestellt" ("I have cast 
my care on CJod"). We can see the Cross on Golgotjia. 
The soul repeats the words of Jesus, "Into Thy hands 
I commend my spirit", and is answered with the words 
spoken to the thief, ^This day shalt thou be with me in 
paradise". The comforted soul sings "In joy and peace 
I pass away". Finally the chorale "Glorie, Lob, Ehr' 
tmd Herrlichkeit" ("Glory, Praise, Honour, and Jojr") is 
sung to the melody "In dich hab' ich gehoffet, Herr" ("In 
thee, oh Lord, is my hope"). The last line, ^Through Jesus 
Christ, Amen", widens out into a brilliant fantasia, which 
terminates with the theme in augmentation in the orchestra. - 

Bach probably compiled the text of this cantata him- 
self. It was certainly not done by any Weimar poet, for 
none of the poets of that time would have been so self- 
denying as to have refrained from introducing verses of 



\ 



136 XXIV. The Amttadt, MIUilhauBen etc. Cantatas. 

his own. In any case it is one of the most perfect texts, 
from the musical point of view, to be foimd an3rwhere. 

The work commences with a sonatina for two flutes, 
two gambas, continuo and organ. It is based on a mo- | 
tive in £ flat, expressive of transfigured grief; this runs 
through the whole work. To grasp these harmonies is 
to be transported far from all earthly pain; the words / 
from the Apocal3rpse come into one's mind that Bach prob- ; 
ably had in his — '^And God shall wipe away all tears 
from their eyes, and there shall be no more death, neither / 
sorrow, nor crying, neither shall there be anymore pain;, 
for the former things are passed away.*' 4- 

No other instruments are used in the cantata besides 
the two flutes and the two gambas. Their veiled timbre 
belongs to the very essence of the music. We seem to see 
an autiunn landscape with bhie mists floating across it. 

The dramatic life and the intimate union of words and 
music in the AcU$s tragicus specially endeared it to the 
early admirers of Bach, among them Zelter. The cantata 
was first publicly revived by tiie Cecilia Society of Frank- 
fort-on-the-Main, under Schelble, in May 1833*. It had 
to be repeated in December. It was still called for, and 
was given again in each of the two following years. It was 
first published in 1830, by Sinurock. If it was the SL Mai- 
thew Passion that rescued Bach's music from its Babylonian 
captivity, it was the Actus tragicus that prepared the path 
for its return and levelled the ground for it. Even when 
vre know all the cantatas we alwa3rs go back with pleasure 
to this work, written by Bach at the end of his twentieth 
year. The Actus tragicus was the favourite cantata of Julius 
Stockhausen. 

On the whole it is hard to tear ourselves away from 
these early works, which are the only ones that Bach wrote 
in the pure form of the old cantata. When he began to 
supply the regulation cantata for the church service at 

♦ Sec p. 346. 



Bach and tht older Cantata. 127 

the Weimar Court, he decided in favour of the new style* 
and wrote hia music to the free texts supplied him by 
Salomo Franck and Erdmann Neumeister. Franck Uved 
at Weimar; Neumeister at that time was at Sorau, whidi 
town he kft for Hamburg shortly afterwards, in 1715. 
Bach's conversion to the modem cantata may be dated 
about 1712*. When he was made Konzertmdster, in 17x4, 
it became his duty to supply each year a definite number 
of compositions for the church. In place of dramatic texts, 
compiled from Biblical verses and stanzas from h)rmns, 
we now get wretched poems, that are always cut out to 
the same pattern. The arioso is supplanted by the da caf>o 
aha and the secco recitative. The plan is still further im-* 
poverished by the fact that the choir now recedes wholly 
into the background; it figures only at the beginning and 
at the end. There is none of the animated alternation 
between solo and chorus that we find in the AcH$s ffogicus 
and the cantata Aus ier Tiefe, Nor does the composer 
now try to cast the whole work into one mould; the cantata 
henceforth divides into separate numbers. 

How was it possible for Bach to renounce in a moment 
an the artistic riches that he had been able to use with 
such masterly effect in his first cantatas? How can we 
account for the fact that henceforth he never returned, 
even in one exceptional case, to the form of the old cantata? 
As we read the Bible we regret more than an}rthing that he, 
a Bible student, should have refrained from setting so many 
splendid passages that would certainly have been attract- 
ive to him as a musician, merely because there were no 
continuous Biblical passages in the cantata-form that he 
had adopted. There is hardly an admirer of his who has 
not felt that he would give the two hundred church cantatas 
for one htmdred works in the style of the Actus iragicus**. 



* On the subject of the old and new cantata see p. 80 ft 
t* It is a curious fact that one of the Bach pioneers, Moritz 
Hanptmann, though admiring the A c$i$s iragicus, thought its musical 
structure *'a monstrosity of movements that jostle and hang on 



128 XXIV. The Arnstadt, Mtkblhauaen etc. Cantatas. 

The chronology of these earliest cantatas presents no 
difficulties, for the whole style of the works shows that 
they must have been composed before any of the others. 
Moreover, in the case of GoU ist mein Kdnig the date of 
the first performance is noted on the score, and in the 
case oi Aus der Tiefe a note of Bach's own indicates that 
it was written in Miihlhausen. 

The chronclogical arrangement of the majority of the 
succeeding cantatas is not so easy to determine. Only 
a few of them have the year noted on the cover; the ap- 
proximate dates of the others have to be deduced from 
external and internal evidence. Spitta and Rust undertook 
this task independently, and the results obtained by each 
agree in the main with those of the other*. The external 
evidences are those of the handwriting, the style of the 
notes, and the paper. Bach's writing changed with the 
years, as may be seen from the specimens given in volume 
XLIV of the Bachgesellschaft edition. Cantatas, there- 
fore, in the same handwriting belong to the same period. 
Much more exact clues, however, are given by certain 
characteristics of the notation. Bach first adopted the 
double cross in 1732. It is therefore practically certain 
that cantatas in which this sign is used belong to a later 
date than that. There is further the evidence afforded by 
his way of writing the oboe d'amore part. This instru- 



to each other''. See Hauptmaxin's letters to Otto Jahn and Hauser, 
in Spitta I, 466. Spitta explains Bach's adoption of the da capo 
aria in this way: "When Bach had made himself familiar with the 
Italian da capo aria, he became conscious of a waste of power, 
since in this form he could say many things in a simpler and there- 
fore better way, without foregoing any of his originality." (1, 465.) 
It is hard to see what "waste of power" there is in composition 
in the style of the Actus tragicus ; nor is it any easier to understand 
how anything can be better or more simply expressed in the da 
capo aria than in the old arioso. Spitta is trying to explain the 
inexplicable, without falling back on the only possible solution — 
that Bach followed the fashion. 

» See Spitta's remarks and Rust's prefaces. The following chap- 
ters are based on Spitta's chronology, the value of which only the 
professional historian can fully appreciate. 



The Chronology of the Cantatas. 129 

ment, — which, according to Walther's MusikUxikon^ 
was invented in 1720 — stood a third lower than the 
ordinary oboe. Badi first uses it in the score of the can* 
tata Die Himmel erzMen die Ehre GoUes (No. 76), which 
bears the date 1723. The new instrument naturally offered 
some difficulties in the way of notation. Bach experiments. 
In the B minor Mass (1733) he writes for it in a new way; 
in the secular cantatas Angenehmes Wiederau and SchleicfU^ 
spielende Wetten, that certainly belong to 1737, he adopts 
another method. These facts enable us to decide whether 
a cantata was written between 1723 and 1733, between 
1733 and 1737, or after 1737. But the most weighty 
evidence is afforded by the water-marks on the paper 
he used. The manuscripts exhibit about half-a-dozen 
distinct marks, showing that Bach bought large quantities 
at a time. Cantatas written on paper with the same water- 
mark thus belong to the same period. If we can decide 
the date of one cantata, it often enables us to settle the 
chronology of more than a dozen others. 

Sometimes a valuable clue is given by the writing of 
those who helped to copy out the parts. If it is that of 
Emmanuel or Friedemann, we know the latest year in which 
the cantata could have been composed, for we know when 
these two sons left the paternal house. Interesting data, 
again, are supplied by the use of the material of secular 
cantatas for sacred works. In almost every case we know 
the date of origin of the former; and as we may suppose 
that the rearrangement was usually made not long after 
the original, we can fix the date of the new version with 
some certainty. 

The problem would be very simple so far as the Lripzig 
cantatas are concerned if we had the printed version of 
the texts that were given out for the church music on 
Sundays and Feast da}^. We possess, however, only three 
of these, — one for the Easter Feast days and the two 
following Sundays of the year 1731, one for the Whitsun- 
tide Feast da}^ and the Feast of the Trinity of the same 

Schweirser, Bach, IL O 



130 XXIV. The Arastadt, Mahlhausen etc. Cantatas. 

year, and one for the Christmas of 1734 (the Christtnas 
Oratorio)*. 

To some extent we are compensated for the absence of 
these programmes by the published poems of Picander, 
who wrote most of the texts for the Leipzig cantatas. 
Bach composed his cantatas for immediate use. The date 
of the publication of the text thus gives us also the year 
when the music was written. 

Besides these external evidences there are the internal 
ones. Bach usually produced within a short space of time 
a series of works having an inner relationship to each 
other, as if he wished to embody simultaneously, in several 
examples, a certain type that engrossed him for the moment. 
Thus it frequently happens that four or five cantatas that 
follow each other according to the order of the ecclesiastical 
year exhibit a striking similarity among themselves, which 
is most noticeable, as a rule, in the structure of the opening 
choruses. These works, of course, belong to the same 
period. 

The problem is therefore not to settle the chronology 
of isolated cantatas, but that of definite groups that are 
clearly distinguishable from each other by certain external 
and internal characteristics, and that can be assigned to 
a definite period by means of one or two of the works, 
the date of which can be proved in other ways. Perhaps 
Spitta has occasionally drawn too sweeping conclusions 
from external evidences such as that of the cantatas being 
written on the same paper. This, however, does not affect 
the general result of his acute inquiry into the chronology 
of the works. 

Questions of detail have in this case little practical 
interest. What does it signify if we cannot be sure whether 
a given cantata was written a year earlier or a year later? 
There is no such consistent artistic evolution observable 
in the succession of Bach's cantatas as there is, for ex-^ 



• See B. G. XLVi (1895), preface, p. 76 f£. 



Ich hatU viel BekUmmernis, 131 

ample, in that of Beethoven's symphonies. The distance 
that Beethoven travels between two symphonies is greater 
ahnost than that which Bach traversed in a hundred 
cantatas*. He is one of those rare personalities that do 
not become, but alwa3rs are. We could almost say that his 
cantatas form a closed circle. The last resemble the first, — 
if by the first we understand those in which he adopts 
the new style of cantata. 

In his Weimar period he set about a dozen of Franck's 
texts to music. He was fond of this poet, being attracted 
by his mysticism and his deep feeling for nature. He may 
also have liked Franck for his habit of making more use 
of verses from the Bible than Neumeister and the others 
did ; he was, on the whole, the most conservative of the 
new school. 

One of the best known of the Bach cantatas to a text 
by Franck has always been Ich haUe viel BekUmmernis 
(No. 21). The cover of the score is inscribed: "Per ogni 
Tempo. Concerto a 13: 3 Trombe, Tamburi, i Oboe, 
2 Violini e Viola, Fagotto and Violoncello, 4 Vod con Con- 
tinuo di J. S. Bach. Den 3<« post Trinitas 1714.'* Diligent 
research has failed to discover the part for the drums; 
a knowledge of Bach's style, however, makes it easy to 
supply it. In any case it is absolutely essential in per- 
formance. 

The cantata is in two parts; the first was given before 
the sermon, the second after it. One result of this division 
is that the work has no real culminating point; it is not 
quite clear at which moment grief gives way to consolation. 

Like the Actus tragicus^ which it resembles also in many 
other ways, this cantata is prefaced by a sinfonia, founded 
on an affecting dialogue between the oboe and the first 
violins, the other instruments supplying the harmonies. 
In the choruses the alternation between the voice parts 



* This, of course, applies only to the cantatas of his period 
ol maturity. In the few youthful cantatas that we possess we caa 
a very rapid development. 

9* 



13a XXIV. The Amstadt, M^lklhausen etc. Cantatas. 

and the instrumental ensemble ceases ; the orchestra strives 
to be independent, though with only occasional success; 
very frequently it merely doubles the vocal parts, or ceases 
altogether. 
The theme of the first chorus runs thus — 




It is identical with that of an organ fugue, with the ex- 
ception that the latter is in the major (Peters II, p. 7). 
The chorus "Sei nun wieder zufrieden", — with which are 
inwoven two verses of the chorale "Wer nur den lieben 
Gott laBt walten" — is extraordinarily sonorous. 

The plaintive theme of the aria '^Seufzer, Tranen, Rum- 
mer, Not", woven, as it were, out of sighs — 




is very characteristic. 

The painting of the storm at the words ''Sturm und 
Wellen", in the aria ''Bache von gesalznen Tranen" is 
precise and expressive; we do not know how it could be 
improved upon. The declamation is not faultless, as 
Mattheson pointed out with a certain malicious joy*. 
We must agree with him that the fourfold repetition 
of the word ''Ich'* at the commencement of the first chorus 
is somewhat ill-considered. We have here a reminiscence 
of the old motet*style. Mattheson's censure of the declama- 
tion in the duet "Komm, Herr Jesu, und erquicke" is, 
however, imjustifiable. 

Even Bach's great biographer Spitta does not find 
this duet to his liking. 'The duet", he ssLys, "is what 
church music should never be — dramatic . . • Bach's 
delight in polsrphonic working has made him, — uninten- 

• See p. 178. 



Komm, du sUsss Todessiunds; Ach ich sehe. 133 

tkmally, no doubt, — accentuate the dramatic element 
to an almost painful point when the voices bandy to and 
fro incessantly the words *Ach nein! ach jal du hassest 
mich! ich liebe dich!' . . . The only mitigating circum« 
stance is that the soprano part would be sung in those 
days by a boy, which would partly prevent the duet from 
having the appearance of a charming love-duet, as it 
always has now."* 

His fears were groundless. Anyone who is free from 
prudery in matters of church music must delight in this 
ardent dramatic piece, and be deeply affected by the 
dialogue of the soul with its Comforter. If anything can 
be objected to, it is the da capo form in which Bach has 
cast the duet, with the result that the entreaty ^^Komm, 
mein Jesu, und erquicke mich" is repeated at the end, 
after the Saviour, in the middle section, ^^Ach Jesu, durch- 
siifie mir Seele und Herze", has banished care and sorrow. 
But the m3^tical love-glow that finds such eloquent ex- 
pression in Bach's worl^ cannot be objected to from any 
standpoint of church music. So long as the Song of Solomon 
remains in the Bible, its allegorical language cannot be for- 
bidden in religious music. Bach, a Lutiieran and a mystic, 
delights in the Song of Solomon, as does his librettist Franck. 

This can be seen in the two cantatas Kamrn, du sUsse 
Todesshmde (No. 161)** and Ach ich sehe, jeixt da ich xur 
Hochxeit gehe (No. 162)***, in which the ideas of the Song 
of Solomon and the Apocalypse are blended. There is 
ardent longing in the song of the two flutes that accom- 
panies the words: 

^Komm du siisse Todesstunde, 
Da mein Geist Honig speist, 
Aus des Ldwen Munde. 
Mache meinen Abschied susse, 
S&ume nicht, letztes Licht, 
Dass ich meinen Heiland k^sse!'' 

♦ Spitta I, 537, 538. 
** For the sixteenth Snnday after Trinity, 17x5. 
••• For the twentieth Sunday after Trinity, 1715. 



154 XXIV. The Amstadt, Muhlhausen etc. Cantatas. 

("Come, thou sweet hour of death, for my soul is fed 
with honey from the mouth of the lion. Make my farewell 
sweet; delay not, oh my last light, the moment when 
I shall kiss my Saviour**). 

The organ accompanies this with the chorale "Herxlich 
tut mich verlangen*'. 

The aria "Mein Verlangen ist, den Heiland zxt umfangen** 
grows out of the sigh of yearning — 




In the recitative the soul pictures death to itself as a 
"soft sleep**; and at once the instruments sink downwards 
in blissful lassitude — 




/IN 



g 



'' fi^ J^ 'fi 



At the idea of the resurrection, joy breaks forth 
and continues in clear tones, while the alto sings ^*So 
schlage doch, du letzter Stundenschlag t" ("Strike then, 
last hourl'*). The chorus concludes with the chorale 
strophe — 

"Wenn es meines Gottes Wille, 
Wiinsch' ich, dass des Leibes Last 
Heute noch die Erde fiille". 

("If it is the Lord*s will, let the earth take today the 
burden of my body**). This funeral song is surrounded 
by the orchestra with exultant demisemiquavers. 

The cantata Ach, ich sehe^ jetxt da ich zur Hochxeit gehe 
(No. 162) is, as a rule, of a severer beauty. In the aria 
"In meinem Gott bin ich erfreut** ("I rejoice in my God**) 
the bass leaps jo3^usly in a veritable dance. The chorus 
contributes only the final chorale. 



Mein GoU, wie lang\ ach lange. 



135 



The cantata Mein Goti, me lang\ ach lange (No. 155)* 
is also without an opening chorus. It begins with a twelve- 
bar repetition of the same note in quavers, creating an 
effect of anxiety**. Then the soprano sings — 

'^Mein Gott, wie lang\ ach lange? 

Des Jammers ist zu viel, 

Ich sehe gar kein Ziel 

Der Schmcrzen und der Soigen . . . ." 

("My God, how long, oh, how long? Too great is my dis- 
tress. No end do I see to sorrow and care.") "Du must 
glauben, du muBt hoffen** ('Thou must believe, thou must 
hope''), say the alto and tenor consolingly, while the bassoon 
and the cello maintain uninterruptedly one of those curious* 
ly extended figures with which Bach S3mibolises steadfast 
faith. A motive in demisemiquavers, that forms the middle 
part of the theme, then enters at the words "Jesus weiB 
die rechte Stunde, dich mit Hilfe zu erfreuen" ("Jesus 
knows the right hour at which to gladden thee with His 
help''), and its meaning, becomes apparent. The theme 
in which Bach symbolises the combination of firm faith 
stnd joyful hope runs thus — 




The soprano aria "Wirf mein Herze, wirf dich noch 
in des Hochsten Liebesarme" (*Throw th3^elf, my heart, 
into the loving arms of the Most High") breathes a quite 
sensuous passion. The wild rh3rthm of the strings — 

• For the second Sunday after Epiphany, 1716. 
♦♦ See p. 103 ff. 



136 XXIV. The Amstadt, Muhihausen etc. Cantatas. 




merges sharply into a long chord, which however, does not 
express rest, but trembling and shuddering, while the bass 
now takes over the passionate theme. This procedure is 
repeated five times. The picture given in the text could 
not be represented more realistically in music. 

The solo cantata for bass, Der Friede sei mit dir (No. 158) 
is simple and unassuming. As the title of the copy that 
has come down to us shows, Bach used it twice, — for the 
Purification of Mary and for Easter Tuesday. The text 
is probably by Franck. In this work Bach emplo3rs no 
orchestra, but merely contrabass, organ and solo violin. 

The Spring sunshine fills the two works that Bach wrote 
for Palm Simday and Easter of the year 1715. For the 
first of them, HitHrndskdnig sei wiUkommen (No. 182), 
he had to make shift with the limited orchestra that was 
all that was permitted during th£ period of the Passion. 
He employs only one flute and the strings. None the less 
is he able to represent musically the word "Himmelskonig" 
(^^King of Heaven") in the orchestral introduction, by means 
of the rh3^hm of solemnity"*. With the declamation of 
the words ^'Himmelskdnig sei wiUkommen" even Mattheson 
would not have been able to find fault. The arrangement 
of the voices, which Bach repeats twice in the same form* 
is very interesting; all four voices, from the soprano to the 
bass, repeat the '^Willkommen" in turns. In the further 
course of the cantata the Passion mood becomes more and 
more prominent. The tenor aria ^7^^» I^^^ durch Wohl 
und Weh" is accompanied by the "grief* motive — 




* The theme is quoted on p. 94. 



Dtr Himmel iachf. 



137 



This is followed by a chorale chorus, in the style of Pacfaelbel, 
on *^Jesji^ deine Passion ist mir lauter Freude''. The final 
choruSr ^*So lasset uns gehen in Salem der Freuden", has 
a striking resemblance, both thematically and structurally» 
to the opening chorus of the cantata Sie werden aus Saba 
aUe kommen (No. 65). 



r 




Sic werden ans Saba al - le kom 



men 




So lasset una gehen in 



Salem der 



Freuden. 



This is one of tlie most impressive illustrations of the fact 
that Bach's greatness consists not in the capacity for rnani* 
fold expression, but in the fact that he always tries to 
express the same idea perfectly in the same vein. It is 
therefore impossible for him to write two different pieces 
of music to depict a procession at once jo}rous and solemn. 
The Easter cantata Der Himmel lacfU, die Erde jubi-' 
lieret (No. 31) requires an orchestra that in those days 
would have been thought quite monstrous — three trum« 
pets, kettledrum, three oboes, iaille (tenor), first and second 
violins, first and second violas, bassoon, first and second 
violoncellos, and continuo. Words can give no idea of 
the splendid way in which, in the orchestral introduction — 
a separate movement worked out on large lines — Bach 
makes the heavens laugh and the earth rejoice. The 
opening chorus is gigantic. The bass aria ^Tiiist des Lebens, 
starker Streiter, hochgelobter Gottessohn" ('^Prince of hie, 
puissant Fighter, blessed Son of God"), is naturally dom* 
inated by the motive of solemnity — 




138 XXIV. The Arnstadt, Muhlhausen etc. Cantatas. 

To prevent anyone spoiling the grave effect hy too fast 
a tempo, Bach expressly marks the movement tnolto adagio. 

At the end, poet and musician unite in mystic reveries 
upon death: 



''Letzte Stunde brich herein, mir die Augen zuzudriicken* 
Lass mich Jesu Freudenschein und sein helles Licht erblicken. 



19 



("G>me, last hoiu:, and close my eyes, that Jesus may 
show me the light of His joy"), sings Franck. To this 
Bach writes a glorified cradle song — 




piano 



forte 



piauo 




Over the final chorale, again, there hovers a ^'glorified 
voice'', in the violins and trumpet unisono. 

We do not know why, in the other Easter cantata written 
at Weimar, Ich weiss, doss tnein Erldser lebt (No. 160; 
text by Neumeister), Bach employed only violins and the 
cofUinuo^ the latter strengthened by the bassoon. Ex- 
ternal considerations may have imposed these drastic 
limitations upon him. In any case, this cantata is one or 
two years older than Der Himmel lacht, die Erde jubilieret. 

Of the Whitsuntide cantatas belonging to the Weimar 
period we have only one, Wer mich liebet, der mrd tnein 
Wart haUen (No. 59 ; text by Neumeister), and that only 
in a later arrangement. The instrumentation of the opening 
duet is curious — two trumpets, kettledrum and strings. 
In the final aria we meet with one of Bach's most ex- 
travagant "joy" figures — 



Nun komvit der Heiden Heiland. ' 139 

The text runs — "Die Welt mit alien Konigreichen . . . 
kann dieser Herrlichkeit nicht gleichen, womit uns unser 
Gott erfreut" ("The world with all its kingdoms cannot 
compare with this glory wherewith God rejoices us"). 
The final chorale has not come down to us. 

The Weimar period was very rich in Advent and Christ- 
mas cantatas. Ntm kamnC der Heiden Heiland (No. 61 ; 
text by Neumeister) w^ written for the first Sunday in 
Advent in 1714*. In the first chorus Bach undertakes 
to build up the old Advent hymn into a French overture; 
he actually gives it tl.e title of "Overture". During the 
solemn first part {grave) the voices sing in succession the 
supplicatory line of the chorale, "Nun konun' der Heiden 
Heiland"; then all together they sing "Der Jungfrauen 
Kind erkannt". The allegro section, which Bach has 
marked gai, begins with "Des wundert sich alle Welt"; 
at the words "Gott solch Geburt ihm bestellt" the grave 
returns. Think what we will of the experiment of uniting 
a French overture and a mediaeval chorale, the tonal effect 
of the chorus is wonderful. So also with the final Amen, 
that tsLkes the form of a chorale fantasia upon the melody 
"Wie schon leuchtet der Morgenstern". The whole work 
seems to be filled with a sweet and magical youthfulness, 
that even lends a charm to the primitive harmonic struc- 
ture. 

The aria "Offtie dich mein gauzes Herze, Jesus konmit 
und ziehet eih" is thematically interesting; it is developed 
from the motive — 



^ 




' CXbke dich! 

This aria is introduced by the recitative **Siehe, ich stehe 
vor der Tiir und klopfe an" (Rev. Ill, 20), in which Bach 



* This was the first version. There is a second cantata (No. 62) 
founded on the old Advent hymn. 



140 XXIV. The Amstadtt Muhlhaosen etc. Cantatas. 

gives a declamatory watchman's-call to the bass» and ac- 
companies it by rigid fizxiaUi chords, representing the 
knoddng of the expected One*. For the sake of this re* 
citative the cantata should be one of the first to be per- 
formed with the object of making Bach popular. 

On the cover of Ntm komnC der Heiden Heikmd, as is 
well known, Bach has written a note upon the ^^Order of 
the morning service in Leipzig on the first Sunday in Ad* 
vent'\ As it bears also the date 1714, Spitta concluded 
that Bach had been invited by Kuhnau, on the first Sunday 
in Advent in that year, to perform one of his cantatas in 
Leipzig. A later theory is more probable — that Bach pro- 
duced the cantata at St. Thomas's at a later date, perhaps 
during the vacation, on the first Sunday in Advent 1722, 
after he had applied for the Leipzig cantorate**. 

The fine solo cantata for tenor, Meine Seek rUhnU und 
preisi (No. 189; for the fourth Sunday after Easter), pro- 
bably belongs to the later Weimar period. It consists of 
two exquisitely beautiful arias; the accompaniment is for 
flute, oboe and violin. 

The beauty of the solo cantata Barmkerxiges Herze dtr 
ewigen Liebe (No. 185, for soprano, alto, tenor and bass; 
for the fourth Sunday after Trinity) is somewhat impaired 
by the dry, didactic text. 

The cantata Wacha, betet, seid bereit aUexeit (No. 70; 
text by Franck); was written in 1716, two years after 
Nun komm^ der Heiden Heiland. A comparison of the 
two will show the progress Bach had made in this sh(Mt 
time; he has now acquired a means of expression and sug- 
gestion so perfect that though in after years he may indeed 
vary it, he never surpasses it. In Wachet^ beUt he does not 
merely set the text to music, but paints a picture of the 
Last Judgment. In the opening chorus the trumpet 
gives its dire summons to humanity to justify itself — 



♦ See p. 78. 
** On this question see Richter, Bachfahrbuch, 1905, p. 57 ff. 



IVachet, hetei. 



141 




In the recitative '*Erscfarecket, ihr verstockten Sunder** 
he depicts the trembling of the dammed who are consdous 
of their guilt; this immediately ceases when mention is 
made of the saved whom the Redeemer takes home with 
Him to bliss. The recitative "Ach soil nicht dieser grosse 
Tag**, with its animated bass, reminds us of the beginning 
of the cantata Ewigkeit^ du Donnerwort (No. 60) ; in the 
following aria, at the words ^"Schalle, knalle, letzter Schlag'\ 
Bach paints a picture of the end of the world, in which 
he emplojrs his familiar **tumult*' motive — 




In striking contrast to this pictorial music are the pas- 
sages that voice the mystic longing of the elect for the end 
of things. In the aria 

**La£& der SpStter Zungen schmahen, 
£s wird doch und muss gescheben» 
Dass wir Jesum werden seben 
Auf den Wolken in den HOhen". 

('^Though the tongues of mockers revile us, we shall yet 
see Jesus in the skies'*), the first violin part reminds us 
strongly of the Laudamus U in the B minor Mass. Could 
Bach have had in his mind the passage from the first 
Epistle of Peter (I, 7 — 8), ''Jesus Christ, whom having not 
seen ye love; in whom, though now ye see Him not, yet 
believing, ye rejoice with joy unspeakable and full of glory?" 
Even more superterrestrial is the music of the adagio 
that begins and ends the last aria, 'Seligster Erquickungs- 
tag . . . Jesus f&hret mich cur Stille . . ."* 



* According to Spitta (I, 57 1» 645, II» 362) the cantata in its 
present form is a Leipzig revision of 1723. This may also be the 
case with the cantata Der Himmel lacht, die Erde juhiliefet (No. 31). 



142 XXIV. The Arnstadt, MiOilhausen etc. Cantatas. 

The cantatas Bereitet die Wege^ bereitet die Bahn (No. 132) 
and Herz und Mund und Tat und Lehen (No. 147) were 
intended for the fourth Sunday in Advent. Both texts 
are derived from Franck*s poems. 

Bereitet die Wege was written in 1715. The passage from 
the fortieth chapter of Isaiah ("In the wilderness prepare 
ye the way of the Lord") is given out in the bright and 
joyous tones of a boy soprano, the orchestra playing round 
it as if with rays of sunlight. In the aria "Ach bedenket 
was geschenket", exuberant arabesques in the violin 
entwine round the vocal part. The text is founded on a 
verse in the Apocalypse, "These . i . have washed their robes 
and made them white in the blood of the Lamb*\ Bach 
takes it in a m3^tical sense. The final chorale that appears 
in Franck's poem is omitted. When Bach produced the 
work in Leipzig he probably substituted for this another 
chorale, which would be distributed to the choir on de- 
tached sheets, and so has been lost. In St. Thomas's, 
figurate music was only given on the first of the Sundays 
in Advent. If Bach desired to perform his Weimar Advent 
cantatas there, he would have to alter them slightly so 
as to adapt them for other Sunda}^. In this case he did 
it by cutting out the final chorale and substituting another. 
He produced the other cantata for the fourth Sunday in 
Advent, Herz und Mund und Tat und Leben (No. 147), in 
Leipzig on the Feast of the Visitation of the Virgin Mary, 
altering the title on the cover accordingly. He probably 
revised the music also, as appears from the division of it 
into a prima and a seconda parte, for during the early 
Leipzig years he mostly adopted the two-part cantata form. 
In the opening chorus and in the aria "Ich will von Jesu 
Wunden singen'' the trumpet is used with magnificent 
effect. The other numbers are notably delicate and in- 
timate in treatment; they are carried through in flowing 
triplet rh)rthms, that are especially effective in the two 
chorale fantasias for chorus and orchestra, **Wohl niir, 
dass ich Jesum habe" and "J^^s bleibet meine Freude". 



Bereitet die Wege; Hetz und Mund; Uns ist ein Kind gehoren. 143 

We are involuntarily reininded of the opening chorus of 
the cantata Liebster Immanuel (No. 123), which follows 
the same procedure. 

In spite, however, of the intimacy of his mood here, 
Bach never lets pass any opportunity for tone-painting 
that Franck*s text may offer him. The alto recitative 
Der hochsten AUmacht Wunderhand" speaks of the 
skipping and springing" of the child in Elisabeth's womb 
at the greeting of Mary. Bach iUustrates this in his music 
by a sequence of convulsive movements, repeated through* 
out the whole number by the oboes in short disconnected 
groups — 



<c 



<c. 




He troubles little about the musical sense of the other 
words of the number. Again in the aria '7<^^^^i^^ freuden- 
voiles Springen erkannte dich mein Heiland schon'\ in the 
cajitzisi'f Christum wit soUen hben schon (No. 121), he 
depicts^the quivering of the body of the mother who is 
about to bear the Baptist, only here the painting is still 
more realistic*. 

The whole character of the Christmas cantata Uns ist 
ein Kind gehoren (No. 142 ; text by Neumeister), seems to 
indicate that it was written three or four years before 
the two cantatas for the fourth Sunday in Advent. It 
perhaps dates from between 1712 and 1714. This is prob- 
able, among other things, from the somewhat dry declama* 
tion and the undeveloped form of the chorale fantasia 
that forms the final number. 



♦ See p. 86. 



144 XXIV. The Arnstadt, Mahlhausen etc. Ciantatas. 

The cantata TriU auf die GlaiAeHsbahn, again, (No. 152 ; 
for the Sunday after Christmas), has a succession of declam- 
atory passages that are not free from faults, which is rather 
surprising, as it belongs, according to Spitta, to the year 
1715. Bach's determination to be characteristic makes 
him give the following passage to the bass at the words 
"In Israel zum Fall" — 



P^IT J &" 6 S 



p 



The inharmoniousness and rhythmic emptiness of Franck's 
text are answerable for the defects of the music. That Bach 
was embarrassed by them is evident from the improve- 
ments he tried to make in the teixt. He turns ^^seinen 
Glaubensbau griindet*' into ^^seinen Glaubensgnind leget'*; 
**in dieser Zeit" into "zu aller Zeit'*; "nach Leiden und 
Schmach" into "nach Tnibsal und Schmach". But he 
assuredly forgave his poet everything in consideration 
of the dialogue between Jesus and the soul at the end: 
'•Wie soil ich dich, Liebster der Seelen, umfassen . . ." "Du 
musst dich verleugnen und alles verlassen . . ." (**How 
shall I comprehend thee. Beloved of souls? . . .** 'Thou 
must deny thyself and forsake everything"). Jesus takes 
the soul with Him to the strains of a wondrous gigue — 

Andante, 




Here Bach's music begins to reveal itself as the art of 
"charm" that he afterwards claims it to be in Phoebus 
andPan, Spitta, indeed, protests again here that the colour 
of the duet is contrary to the true church style*. 

The cantata opens with a delightful instrumental prelude 
foimded on the "step" motive — 



• Spitta I, 560 — 562. 



Gieichwie der Rfigen und Schnee, ^45 




out of which Bach afterwards made an organ fugue*. The 
choir is not used. 

llie declamatory effects that Bach employed even at 
that time when the text permitted them may be seen in 
the cantata GUichms der Regen und Schnee vom Himmd 
fdSt (No. 18), which dates from 1713 or 1714. iThe recita- 
tive upon the long opening passage from Isaiah LV, 10 is 
an incomparable masterpiece. The declamation is astound- 
ingly effective, again, in the litany "Herr Gott, hier wird 
mein Herze sein", in which the choir joins four times with 
"Erhor' uns, lieber Herr Gott". It is a pity that Neu- 
meister, who had a better sense of verbal rhythm than 
Franck, is so often banal in his ideas. 

The aria "Mein Seelenschatz ist Gottes Wort*' is accom- 
panied throughout by a delightful **wave" motion, that 
impressed even Spitta. There seems no justification for 
it in the text, unless we assiune that the oft-repeated word 
**net*' aroused in Bach one of those musical visions that 
some quite subordinate association would evoke in hitn 
when the text he was setting was rather dry and empty. 

For prelude the cantata has a powerful Sinfonia in cha« 
conne form, built upon the theme — 



'A' P f f -I f f 1 1. r r . r r ^ 



If we remember that in the cantata TriU auf die Glaubens- 
hahn (No. 152) the instrumental introduction is inspired 
by the opening words of the text, and that the theme of 
the Sinfonia of the cantata for Sexagesima Sunday shows 
the siaune structure as the motives Bach employs to express 
steadfast and confident faith, it will not seem an improbable 



• See I, 275. 

SchweUier, Bach. II. lO 



146 XXIV. The Arnstadt, Mfihlhausen etc. Cantatas. 

assumption that here he is s}mibolising the steadfastness 
and inviolability of the word of God that is uttered later. 

He probably did not compose music with any particular 
joy to Franck's text for the twenty-third Sunday after 
Trinity, Nur jedem das Seine (No. 163). It contains 
neither poetic ideas nor pictorial images. This, to be sure, 
is less the fault of the poet than of the Gospel for the day 
(Matthew XXII, 15 — 22), that deals wiOi the subject 
of the tribute money. The religious valuation of tax- 
paying is not a grateful theme for a cantata text. Bach, 
evidently in despair, sets the final aria "Nimm mich mir 
und gib mich dir" in dialogue form, so as at least to work 
in a duet. The orchestra gives out at the same time the 
melody "Meinen Jesimi lass ich nicht**. The final chorale, 
taken from Heermann's h3niin "Wo soil ich fliehen hin?" 
has only a figured bass*. 

In Cothen there was no church music, the Court having 
adopted the Reformed faith. From 1717 to 1723, i. e., 
from his thirty-second to his thirty-eighth year, Bach wrote 
cantatas, if at aU, only occasionally and for special pur- 
poses. The only two that can be attributed to this period 
are Wer sich selbst erhoheiy der soil emiedriget werden (N0.47) 
and Das ist je gewisslich wahr (No. 141). Their texts are 
found in a yearly cycle of cantata poems issued by the 
State Secretary Helbig in 1720. 

The two themes by which Bach expresses the idea of 
the fallen being exalted and the exalted falling have al- 
ready been cited as typical of his method of representation**. 
The pictorial purpose is visible also in the orchestral intro- 
duction ; see, for example, the fall in the basses in the fifth 
to the seventh bars. The wonderful feature of this chorus. 



* The cantata for the third Sunday in Lent, 17 16, AiUs was 
von Goti geboren, also belongs to the Weimar period. We do not 
possess it now, however, as an independent work. Bach having 
at a later date incorporated it almost whoUy in the cantata Ein* 
feste Burg, 

•♦ See pp. 83, 84 



Nurjed, das Seine; Wer tick selbst erhohet; Das istgewisslich wakr, 14^ 

howev^y is not its pictorial effects, but Bach's success in 
making such natural and agreeable music of them. 

This pictorialism is continued in the two arias. In the 
first, *'Wer ein wahrer Christ will heissen, muss der Demut 
sich befleissen", the first violin gives the picture of the 
necessary exercises in Demui (humility), — the figures 
being persistently forced downwards in spite of their efforts 
to ascend — 




The theme of the oboe and violin in the aria "Jesu beuge 
doch mein Herze" is founded on the same idea. We seem 
to see the wavy lines of a twig which some one is testing 
by bending it. 

Spitta believes that Bach wrote this work for Hamburg, 
In that year, 1720, the seventeenth Sunday after Trinity — 
the Gospel for which day is embodied in the cantata — 
fell on the 22nd September. Bach, however, did not go 
to Hamburg until November, his journey having been 
delayed by the death of his wife. It is thus doubtful 
whether he produced the cantata then. It is one of the 
few that he has carefully supplied with phrasing and ex* 
pression marks. In the B. G. edition the solo instrument in 
the first aria is wrongly given as Organo obbligato ; it should 
be the violin. If the cantata is to be performed nowadays, 
the text of the recitative *T>er Mensch ist Kot, Staub, 
Asch* und Erde" will certainly have to be altered. 

The cantata Das isi je gewisslich wahr (No. 141), for the 
third Sunday in Advent, is a little obscure. In the first 
chorus one is tempted to assume that the declamation 
is deliberately naive, Bach*s object being to express by 
the uniform length of the notes the child-like quaUty of the. 



10' 



148 XXV. The Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 1724. 

conies8i<m that is bdng made. It is extremely effettive. 
The succeeding arias, hoVirever, ratiier rouse tli^ su^>icioa 
that Bach has adapted HellMg*s text to some music already 
existihg. It is incredible that he should hav^ d^berately 
declaimed the words "'J^^* Trost der geistlich Armen" 
in the way he does. Spitta thinks that the opening <^orus 
is an arrangement of some earlier duet. 

Indirectly associated with the Cothen period is the can* 
tata for the third day of Easter, Ein Herz, das seinen 
Je&tm Mfend weits (No. 134). It is founded on a Cdthen 
''Gratttlation" cantata, the title of which we do not know, 
the cover of the first sheet of the score being lost. We 
needs must lament that such beautiful music should have 
been made impossible by the poor tekt with whidi it is 
associated; a typical case is afforded by the commence* 
ment of the first aria — 




Auf, tiif, anf, auf GUn*bi • ge! 

In later 3rears Bach twice took up this cantata with a view 
to improving it, as may be seen from the various pa^ts that 
are extant. He could not, howeva:, alter the chief numbers. 
Altogether, th«i, there are about twenty-five cantatas 
that we can atMbute with certainty to the pre-Leipcig 
period. 



CHAPTER XXV. 

THE LEIPZIG CANTATAS OF 1723 AND 1724w 

According to the Necrology, Bach wrote five complete 
yearly series of church cantatas. In Leipzig this land of 
church music was performed on fifty-nine Sundays and 
Feast days* ; so that Bach must have written two hundred 

* See 1, 126 ff. 



j0su$ nmkm su sich die ZvMf0, X49 

and ninety-five cantatas. A hundred and ninety of these 
have survived; of these about a hundred and sixty-five 
belong to the Leipzig period. Bach was cantor at 
St. Thomases for twenty-seven years. This gives six can- 
tatas per annum — - not a large figure when we think, for 
example, of the productivity of a Telemann. 

The works, however, were spread unequally over all 
these years. In the later Leipzig period Bach did not 
write much church music; so that in the earlier years 
he must sometimes have written as many as twenty cantatas 
per annum. 

The first cantata of his to be perf(»rmed in Leipzig is 
thus referred to in Joh. Seb. Riemer's Jahrbmh: ''On the 
7th February Dam. Estomihi Herr Sebastian Bach, Kapell- 
m«ster in Cothen, underwent his probation for the post 
of cantor, rendered vacant by the death oi Herr Kuhnau" *« 
The title of the cantata is not given; it was J$sus nahm mu 
sich di$ Zwdlfe (No. 22). 

The unknown poet has taken from the Gospel for this 
last Sunday before the Passion (Luke XVIII, 31—43) 
only the first and fourth verses — Christ's announcement 
to the disciples of His coming Passion; he unfortunately 
passes over the expressive series of pictures in the second 
and third verses. Following tradition, the bass gives out 
the words of Jesus in an arioso; the orchestra — strings 
and oboes — adds a symphonic accompaniment that is 
wooderfully expressive of the sorrow of Jesus and His 
inaer firmness. The whole movement has a s(»newhat 
march-like character. The succeeding chorus, ''Sie aber 
vemahmen der keines'', reproduces very effectively the 
mutual questionings of the disciples. 

The charming syncopated theme of the aria *^Mein 
Jesu, zi^e mich nach dir" ("Jesus, draw me near to thee") 
paints the picture suggested in the words — 



* See Richter, Die Wakl J. 5. BacHs mm Kaniar der Thomas- 
schuie, in the Bachjahrbuch for 1905, p. 58. The year referred to 
i« 1723- 



150 XXV. The Leipeig Cantatas of 1723 and 1724. 




The aria "Mein alles in allem, ttiein ewiges Gut" ("My all 
in all, my endless treasure), which is based on the **joy" 
motive, is overpowering in the energy of its flight. The 
final chorale has a ravishing orchestral accompaniment. 

We do not know whether this cantata pleased the Leip- 
zigers or not. It sounds enchantingly throughout. Spitta 
thinks that Bach laid it out so simply in order not to depart 
too far from the style of Kuhnau. 

On the 30th May 1723, the first Sunday after Trinity, 
the new cantor introduced himself to the Leiptigers with 
the cantata Die Elenden soUen essen (No. 75); we learn 
from the Acta Lipsiensium academica that it was received 
"with good applausu?^^. It is in two parts, but is other- 
wise as simply constructed as the probation cantata. The 
first chorus, as in Nun komnC der Heiden Heiland (No. 61), 
is cast in the French overture form. The stately grave 
section comprises the words "Die Elenden soUen essen, 
dass sie satt werden, und die nach dem Herm fragen, werden 
ihn preisen", and the allegro the words "Euer Herz soil 
ewiglich leben". Here again the chorale, "Was Gott tut, das 
ist wohl getan'', has a charming orchestral accompaniment, 
that is developed out of the first motive of the melody. 
The "sinfonia" that opens the second part is a fantasia on 
the same melody. This is the only occasion on which Bach 
has treated a chorale in purely orchestral style. Of the 
solos the most striking is the bass aria "Mein Herze glaiubt 
und liebt", with its wonderful trumpet accompaniment — 




♦ See Spitta II, 355 ff. 



Die Elenden; Die Himmel ersdkUn. 151 

Another trumpet cantata par excellence is the one performed 
on the second Sunday after Trinity, Die Himtnel erxdUen 
die Ehre Gottes (No. 76). No one who has once heard 
them can forget the marvellous theme to which Bach has 
set the two verses from the Psalms that compose the open- 
ing chorus. The movement is one of the most effective of 
his inventions ; it is literally intoxicating. 

Even if Bach had not noted on the cover of this cantata 
that he. wrote it for the second Sunday after Trinity, 1723, 
we would be sure that it originated at the same time as 
the one last mentioned. In its bipartite form, in the 
symphonic introduction to the Seconda Parte, in the in- 
strumental accompaniment to the chorale, in the use of 
the same melody to end the first and second part, in the 
character of the solos, it is plainly the twin-sister of the 
other. 

The falling bass figure — 




in the accompaniment to the chorale "Es woll' uns Gott 
genadig sein'* is motived by the conclusion of the previous 
arioso, *'Drum sei dir dies Gebet iemiUigst zugeschickt*' 
("Be this prayer most humbly offered to Thee"). We can 
see a crowd of people kneeling and bowing their heads. 
In the tenor aria, the haughty and defiant motive — 



i 



i I rrfftr i<f ! 




symbolises the words "Hasse nur, basse mich recht, feind- 
lich's Geschlecht" ("Hate me well, oh my enemies*'). In 
the middle section, where mention is made of "embracing 
Jesus by faith", the nestling melodic line of the voice 
suggests the persecuted soul seeking refuge in its Redeemer. 
The aria "Hort ihr V51ker Gottes Stimme", in which 



152 XXV. The Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 1724. 

the soprano voke addresaes its aUuring cry to aU the world, 
is generally taken so slowly that the brightness and charm 
of it are lost. In the arioso-like recitative **So lasst sieh 
Gott ntcht imbefletigt'* the orchestra depicts most ex- 
pressively the words *^e heavens are stirred, and the soul 
and body are moved**. 

In these first months in Leipzig Bach did not keep 
to the same poet. He did not collaborate with Picander 
until X734. We can rarely discover the names oi his previous 
librettists. S<mietimes he harked back to Franck and 
Neumeistar. From the latter he took the text of the can- 
tata Bin %mf9fifht GemUe (No. 24), which he jKoduced 
on the fourth Sunday after Trinity. This also ends with 
a chorale with a bewitching ordiestral accompanimoAt. 
In the chorus ^'Alles nun, das ihr woUet, dass euch die Men- 
schen tun", Christ's words are given out rather too dis- 
connectedly. At the commencement '^Alles*' is repeated 
four times and '^AUes nun'' twice; the allegro before the 
fugato iMreaks off with the words "AUes nun, das ihr woUet". 
It was fortunate that Mattheson did not see this cantata. 

The declamation is more expressive in the opening 
chorus of the cantata for the seventh Sunday after Trinity, 
Afp'e dich, Sede nicht (No. 186; text by Franck), the 
cover of which bears the date 1723. Here the final chorale 
of the first part, with its orchestral accompaniment, al- 
most becomes a chorale fantasia ; it was probably repeated 
after the second part. In the tenor aria **Mein Heiland 
lasst sich merken in seinen Gnadenwerken'' the oboe gives 
ont the *']oy'' motive. In the soprano aria ^^Die Armen 
will der Herr umarmen" the bass and the violin figures 
that twine round the melody are of transcendent tender- 
ness; and the final duet in gigue-form, "Lass, Seele, kein 
Leiden von Jesu dich scheiden'' (for soprano and atto) 
exhales a Dionysiac joy. 

The score is one of the most perfect of Bach's clean 
copies; perhaps it represents a drastic revision and ex- 
pansion of a Weimar cantata. The happy improvements 



ung^fdrbt Gemmi^; Argrs dich; Ikr, die ihr §uch, 153 

nade ia Fraack's text may be the work of Bach's UVretti^t 
of that time. On the other hand, the score of the solo 
cantata Ux the thirteenth Sunday after Trinity, lh»y did 
ik$ 0Hch von Christo nemnei (No. 164) has been so hastily 
written that it is hardly decipherable. Bach has tried his 
best to compose warm music to Franck's remarkably dry 
effusions on the subject of Christian love. In the final 
duet, /'Handen, die sich nicht verschliessen, wird der Him- 
mel auigetan*' (*To hands that are not closed will Heaven 
be opened*') he cannot refrain from representing in his 
music the antithetical motions described in the words. — 
the unison theme of the flutes, oboes and ^olins is given 
out in inversion by the orchestral basses. 

For the first Simday in Advent he probably performed 
one of his Weimar cantatas; and as in the Leipzig churches 
there was no music givai on the foUowing Sundays, he had 
ample time to prepare for the three Christmas Feast Days, 
On the first of these he produced Ckrishn^ dhet Ussdn T^g 
(No. 63), — a noble and animated piece of festival music. 
In the opening and final chorus the orchestra inchuks, 
besides the strings, four trumpets^ three oboes and bassoon, 
— and of course kettledrums. In the first chorus a charm* 
ing effect is made at the words ^'Kommt und eilt mit 
mir aur Krippen" ("Hasten with me to the mang^''), the 
soprano alwa}^ being three beats ahead of the other voices. 
In the final chorus we have the chromatic **grief ' motive 
at the words "dass uns Satan moge qualen'* (*Hhat Satan 
may torment us"). Anyone who thinks that Bach cannot 
write in an agreeable popular style should read the duet 
**Ruft und fleht den Himmel an, kommt ihr Christen, 
kommt zum Reihen". 

In the cantata for the second day, Dazu ist erschienen 
itr SohH Golies (No. 40) the music is of the "'characteristic*' 
order. In the first chorus the words "dass er die Werke 
des Teufeb zerstdre" (**that he may destroy the works 

of the devil") are always scanned thus ^ ^ ^\^ ^ }^ ^ 



154 XXV. The Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 1724. 

fe fe h J^, giving the effect of something monstrous and 

horrid. In the bass aria ''Hollische Schlangel wird dir 
nicht bange? Der dir den Kopf als em Sieger zerknickt, 
ist nun geboren" ("Hellish serpent, are you not in fear? 
He who shall bruise thy head is now bom"), the first 
violins have the twisting "serpent" motive, while the 
rhythm of J[J^ I Jl *^ I JjT} | /] •? | in the remainder of 
the orchestra represents the heavy trampling of the con- 
queror. At the words "der dir den Kopf als ein Sieger 
aserknickt" the "serpent" theme descends to the bass. The 
recitative "Die Schlange, so im Paradies" ("The serpent, 
as in Paradise") is accompanied by rocking figures, suggest- 
ive of the seductive reptile swa}dng to and fro on the tree 
before the eyes of Eve*, 

It is inconceivable how Zelter could arrange the first 
chorus to the words "Ihr seid Gottes Kinder, und wisset 
es nicht" ("Ye are God's children, but know it not"). 
We cannot blame him very severely, however, for Bach 
himself treated this chorus badly, using it for the Cum 
sancto spirUu in the F major Mass. 

The cantata Sehe^^ welch* eine Liebe hat uns der Voter 
erzeiget (No. 64) was probably intended for the third day 
of Christmas. The first chorus consists* of a splendid 
strict fugue, the instnmients not having an independent 
part, but merely reinforcing the voices. It is like an 
idealised old motet, and makes us regret that Bach did not 
write more choruses of this kind. 

The recitative "Geh*, Welt" ("Go, world") is accom- 
panied by the "hastening" motive in the bass — 




From this there afterwards grows the motive with which 
the violin, in the aria "Was die Welt in sich halt" ("What 
the world contains"), suggests that the things of this world 



^ For these motives see p. 79. 



Sehetf welch' eins Lieb§; Singet dem Herrn; Schau, lieher GoH. 155 

are equally transitory. Only two soloists — soprano and 
alto — are needed in the cantata if the short and unessential 
bass recitative be sacrificed. The three chorales are extra- 
ordinarily impressive. 

Thus from May to December 1723 Bach wrote at least 
eight cantatas. For the other Sunda}^ he made use either 
of his Weimar cantatas or of the works of other composers, — 
though he could not have adopted the latter procedure 
often in the early part of his Leipzig period, since every 
cantor made it a point of honour to produce as much 
church music as possible. Bach probably gave few of 
Kuhnau's cantatas, the heirs of the former cantor having 
left the shelves at St. Thomas's as empty as Bach's own 
heirs were to do at his death. 

The cantata Singet dem Herrn ein netses Lied (No. 190), 
probably written for the New Year 1724, is unfortunately 
in such an imperfect state that no performance of it is 
possible. Of the first chorus we have only the parts for 
the voices and the first and second violins. The parts 
of the cantata were probably separated owing to Bach 
having re-set the music to the text ^^Lobe Zion deinen Gott" 
for the jubilee celebration of the delivery of the Augsburg 
Confession, on 25th June 1730. The portions we have 
are merely those not used for this purpose. The solemn 
final chorale, however, is complete, and is admirably 
suited, even as regards the text, to musical festivities at 
the New Year. The text of the cantata is perhaps by K- 
cander, for we find the new version of 1730 in his works. 

On the Sunday after New Year, Bach probably per- 
formed the cantata SchaUy lieher GoU, me meine Feind^ 
(No. 153). Here he gives the choir only chorales to sing, 
probably because it was impossible to prepare so much 
figurate music at once with the St. Thomas scholars, espec- 
ially as they were wanted for the New Year singing in 
the streets. The musical characterisation in the tenor 
aria "Stiirmt nur, hr Triibsalswetter*' is very fine. The 
alto aria "'Soil ich imeinen Lebenslauf unter Kreu2 und 



156 XXV. The Leipng Cantatas of 1793 aad 1734. 

Triibsal fiihren" is one of Bach's most beautiful lyiieal 
pieces. This cantata also is (me that would become popular 
in the churches. 

At Epiphany — the day of Jesus's baptism — the 
revelation of the glory of the Saviour to the whole world 
is celeteated. The cantata (No. 65) written for Ej^hany 
in iyz4 accordingly opeuas with the prophecy of Isaiah 
LX» 6, '*Sie werden aus Saba alle k<»nmen" (* -AU they 
from Sheba shall come'*). As we listen to this chorus 
we see a processicxi of the \^e Men from the East and their 
followers, of the kind the early Italian artists used to 
paint. The horns, flutes and oboes give out a stately 
{»rocessional music. The harmonic sequa^es are intw- 
tionally of striking simplicity; even the mnisona is used 
to obtain the effect of naivet^*. 

The procession halts, aad to the accompaniment of flutes 
and oboes we hear the medieval chorale -^ 

'^Die Kon'ge aus Saba kamen dar, 

Gold, Weihrauch und Myrrhen brachten sie dar. 

Allduja, Alkluja." 

(*^e kings came from Sheba, bringing gold, frankincense* 
and myrrh"). The poetic situation requires that it should 
be sung by the fresh voices of children, not by the mixed 
choir, and above all not with sentimental nuances. It 
is a pity that the two upper parts of the chorales are every- 
where sung by women's voices, that have not the right 
Htnbre and ingenuousness for chorale singing. 

The two arias are meditations upon the picture. In 
the first, "Gold und Ophir ist zu schlecht • . . Jesus will 
das Herze haben" ("Gold and Ophfr are too poor . . . 
Jesus desires the heart**), Bach emplo)^ the same motive 
of intimacy — 




* For a counterpart to this choms s«e p. 137. 



Sie nntfikn am Saba; Mein iMster Jbsus; Jesus schtdft i^y 



«p6hlfhich th^ chorate l»relocte /n ikh *•>* ich ge^ffet, Hinf, 
(Peters V, No. 33) is built. On the other hand the following 
"Nimm mich dir 2u eigen hin, nimm mein Herze zu Ge« 
scheake" ('*Take me for thy own, take my heart as a gift'*) 
glows with passion. The movement reminds us of the paint* 
ing f^ the "Wiedcrsehen" in Beethoven's well-known 
somtta, so full is it of tears and cries of }oy. The theoie, 
which is most efifectivdy orchestrated, runs thas*^ — 





S ff i ftTirtitf^ 



Other caatatas in which ''effect'* predominates are the 
two remaining ones written for the Epiphany of 1724, — 
Mein Hebster Jesus ia verhren (No. 154) and Jesus schldft^ 
was soil ich hoffen <No. 81), for the first and fourth Sundays 
after Epiphany respectively. Both have dramatic texts, 
and the choir sings nothing but chorales. 

In the former, the expression of grief and longing in the 
tenor aria, at the words "Mein Jesus ist verloren, o Wort, 
das T9k Verzweiflung bringti" ("My Jesus have I lost; 
oh word that brings me to despair*') is most touching. 
At the word "Donnerwort" (**word of thunder") Hie 
instruments break out into a tremolando in semiquavers, 
as in the cantata Ewigkeit, du Donnerwort/ (No. 60). 
In its rhythm the passage reminds us of the aria expressive 
of Peter's despair, "Ach mein Sinn", in the St, John Passion. 

In the alto aria Jesu, lass dich finden ("Jei^us, let me 
find Thee") we hear this delightful and alluring cry — 




ii.*, iti-ji 



* This is oae of the cantatas with which the Pads Bach Society 
achieved its vittt>ty. 



X58 XXV. The Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 1724. 



over a monotonous but uneasy bass, which is repeated 
higher up by. the violins and violas — 




m 






These figures symbolise the dark clouds of sin, which, 
according to the text, conceal the soul of the Redeemer. 
The duet **Wohl mir, Jesus ist gefunden*' ("Happy am I; 
Jesus is foimd") is the }X)sitive of the foregoing negative, 
inasmuch as its two joyous motives are simply transforma- 
tions of those already quoted — 




and 



The answer of the boy Jesus, "Wisset ihr nicht, dass ich 
seih muss, in dem das meines Vaters ist*' ("Wist ye not that 
I must be about my Father's business"), being a quotation 
from the Bible, is set in arioso form; only alto, tenor and 
bass are employed. 

The cantata Jesus schldft, was soil ich hoffen (No. 81) 
deals with the episode of the stilling of the tempest (Matthew 
VIII, 23 — 28). The accompaniment to the first aria 
paints the preliminary motion of the waves, that heralds 
the coming storm — 




Owing to the lame way in which the aria is usually per- 
formed, the hearer is seldom made conscious of the mean- 
ing of this accompaniment. Any conductor who wants 
to render it properly will have a hard struggle with his 
strings before he gets them to give the needful emphasis 



Jesus schldft; Erfreutt Zeit. 159 

to the second of the tied quavers, in order to bring out 
the countcr-rhjrthm in the second and fourth beats, by 
means of whidi Bach suggests restlessness. 

The approach of the storm is painted in the tenor aria 
**Die schaumenden Wellen" ("the foaming waves"). It 
is not yet the big waves that we see, but the white crests, 
suggested in the demisemiquaver gallop of the violins. 
Jesus then rises. "0 ye of little faith, why are ye so afraid", 
He says in a beautiful arioso. The storm is now let loose. 
The moimting octaves in the strings show the waves piling 
up one on the other, and then collapsing — 




In the midst of aU this we hear the cry of Jesus, "Peace, 
troubled sea". It is characteristic of Bach's habit of 
seizing upon only one moment for his tone-painting that 
he does not depict the stilling of the waters. 

It is not known who provided him with the text for 
these sister cantatas, but he was a true poet. It is a pity 
Bach did not keep to him. No one has arranged the Gospel 
stories so simply and delicately as he. 

In this latter cantata, again, only alto, tenor and bass 
are employed. Perhaps Bach at that time had no capable 
soprano, or the boy's voice may have been spoiled by the 
New Year singing. We may almost believe that Bach's 
experience of the choir in the Festival cantatas had so 
undeceived him that he did not expect much from it. This 
seems indicated by the fact that the cantata for the Puri- 
fication of the Virgin, Erfreuie Zeit itn neuen Bunde (No. 83) 
is also written as a solo cantata for alto, tenor and bass. 
Midway comes the intonation of "Lord, now lettest thou 
thy servant depart in peace" {Nunc dimittis, Luke II, 
29 — ^31), which is interrupted by meditative recitatives. 
The text is perhaps by Picander. The joyous opening 
aria for alto and the final aria for tenor, "Eile, Herz, voll 



l6o XXV. Tl>e Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 1734. 



it", contain some fine passages for a solo violin. 

The text of the cantata for Quinqoagesima Simday, 
Du wahrer Gatt %mi Davids Sokn (No. 23), is from the 
hand of the poet who had so haf^y a gift for casting the 
Gospel stories into concise pictures. The two blind men 
sit by the roadside near Jericho and saj^Ucate expectantly 
tiie coming prophet*. The oboes voice their lament. Th^ 
bass import into the duet a peculiar march*like rhythm; 
it is as if the Mind men heard in the distance the Easter 
caravan that is Ininging Jesus. Then comes the contem- 
plative recitative '^Ach gdhe nicht voriiber, du aller Men* 
schen Heil!" ('^Ah, pass not by, thou healer of all man- 
kind'*), to which the violins and oboes add the principal 
chorale of the cantata ,'*Christe, du Lamm Gottes'' (^^Christ, 
thou Lamb of God"). 

The following chorus, '*Aller Augen wartoi, Herr, du 
aUmiichtiger Gott, auf dich" ('*A11 eyes wait upon Thee, 
Almighty God"), gives the impression of a crowd moving 
about with hurried and imrhythmic st^)s — 




Jesus is not yet there. Then come a funeral march and the 
di<»:ale "Christ, du Lamm Gottes". It is He! The funeral 
march dies away. The two healed men follow the pro* 
cession, singing again, as they go, the ''Christ, du Lamm 
Gottes". 

If these cantatas are to make the deep impression they 
diottld, no pauses between the numbers must be aUowed 
to break up the unity of the pictuie. Spitta thinks they 
were written in Cdthen, and that Bach originally wanted 
to perform them at Leipdg as probation works mstead 
of Jesus nakm m sick He Zwdife (No. a^). If Om be s6. 



* The poet does not base his work on the prescibed Gofl^ 
(passage (Luke XVIII, 31 — 34), but on the version in Matthew xX 
2<p^«->34, which alone speaks of the two blind men. 



Du wakrer QoU; Christ lag; Weinen, Klagen. 



i6i 



the sympathetic poet must be sought in C6then. It is not 
improbable; and it would explain why Bach did not con- 
tinue to work with him. 

For Easter Bach wrote the chorale cantata Christ lag 
in Todesbanden (No. 4), the consummate expressiveness 
of which has always been marvelled at. Each verse is as if 
chiselled in music. The words "Zwingen" ("force") and 
"Gewalt" ("power") in the second strophe are represented 
by a proud bass figure that runs through it all — 




Exuberant joy is expressed by the semiquavers with which 
the violins accompany the verse "Jesus Christus, Gottes 
Sohn, an unsrer Statt ist kommen" ("Jesus Christ, the Son 
of God, is come in our stead"). In the chorus **Es war ein 
wunderbarer Krieg, da Tod und Leben rungen" ("It was 
a marvellous struggle between life and death") we seem 
to see a knot of bodies in conflict, as in a picture of Michel- 
angelo. The bass in the sixth verse, "So feiem wir das 
hohe Fest" ("So we celebrate the high feast") is founded 
on the rhythm of solemnity — 




These cantatas are among the most powerful but at 
the same time the most difficult of all. A choir not used 
to Bach should postpone the performance of them for 
some years; they need not weeks, but months of study. 

The first chorus of the cantata for the third Sunday 
after Easter, Weinen^ Klagen, Sargen, Zagen (No. 12; text 
by Franck), is a sketch for the Crucifixus of the B minor 
Mass, with which it has the chromatic basso ostifMlo in 
common — 

Schweitxer, iSach. IL 



IK 



l62 XXV. The Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 1724. 



mi J f nrrnr^r f i -^ I iij 



The aria "Sei getreu" ("Be faithful") is accompanied by 
the chorale melody "Jesu meine Freude". 

If the Whitsuntide cantata ErschaUet ikr Lieder (No. 172) 
belongs to the year 1724, Bach has probably altered it 
somewhat for a later performance. The voice parts, written 
on large paper, can indeed only date from after 1727, as they 
bear the water-mark M A. The emplosmient of the obb- 
ligato organ in the duet points to a still later date; Bach 
does not use the organ in this way until after 1730. The 
text is certainly by Franck. 

The opening chorus with the three trumpets is splendid 
in its flow. In the aria to the Holy Trinity only the three 
trumpets and kettledrum are used. The violin figure in 
the aria "O Seelenparadies, das Gottes Geist durchweht" 
("O paradise of the soul, filled by the spirit of God") is 
easily explained; it s3rmbolises the mysterious motion of 
the wind of heaven. Anyone who has heard the song of fir- 
woods rustling in the distance will recognise it again here. 

In the instrumental bass of the duet "Komm, du sanfter 
Himmelswind" ("Come thou gentle wind of heaven") 
we hear the same motive of transfigured bliss as in the 
chorale prelude upon AUe Menschen mUssen sterben (Peters 
V, No. 2) — 




The luxuriant arabesques in the organ bring with them 
the fragrance of the Whitsun melody "Komm, heil'ger 
Geist, Herre Gott" ("Come, Holy Ghost, Lord God"). It 
is better, however, to substitute the oboe for the organ. 
The parts of the Whit Tuesday cantata ErwUnschU^ 
Freudenlicht (No. 184) have the water-mark I M K. Bach 
used this paper between 1724 and 1727. It is most prob- 



ErschalUt; ErwUnschUs Freud$niicht: O heiL Geist- u. Wasserbad, 163 

able that the cantata was composed for the year 1724. 
It begins with the recitative — 

"Erwjinschtes Freudenlicht, 

Das mit dem neuen Bund anbrichtt 

Wir, die wir sonst in Todestalem irrten, 

Empfinden reichlich nun, 

Wie Gott zu uns den langstersehnten Hirten sendet . . /' 

('^O longed-for light of joy that breaks forth with the new 
covenant! We who had wandered in the valley of the 
shadow of death now know that God has sent the long- 
desired shepherd to us.") Bach would not have been 
himself had he not given us, during this recitative, the 
flute-<:all of the shepherd. It is sounded brokenly, as if 
the shepherd were walking on distant heights, and his 
melody floated down only in fragments — 




Another pastoral melody in the flutes dominates the charm- 
ing duet, wonderfully accompanied by the orchestra, "Ge- 
segnete Christen, gliickselige Herde", of the length of 
which even the ordinary hearer is unconscious. The flutes 
have another delightful and alluring melody in the final 
chorus, "Guter Hirt** ("Good Shepherd") — 




Hardly any other cantata is so suitable as this for becoming 
acquainted with the lyrical side of Bach*. 

In the Trinity cantata heiliges Geist- und Wasserbad 
(No. 165) the first aria is in fugal form**. In this way 

* Spitta wrongly holds that the cheerful character of this can- 
tata shews it to be an arrangement of a secular cantata. See 
Spitta, II. 399 ff. 

** It is a solo cantata for soprano, alto, tenor and bass. The text 
— not a specially grateful one — is by Franck. 

II* 



164 XXV. The Leipzig Cantatas of 1723 and 1724. 

the dogmatist Bach means to express the surety of grace 
by baptism. The aria "Jesu, meines Todes Tod'* ("Jesus, 
death of my death") is based on the striking theme that 
depicts the contortions of the "Heilschlanglein** ("little 
serpent of healing*') referred to in the text*. 

The cantata for the eleventh Sunday after Trinity, 
Siehe xu, doss deine GoUesfurcht nicht Heuchdei sei (No. 179) 
also begins with a fugue, this time for chorus. The music 
is clever and interesting, — which is as much as even a 
Bach could do with such a text. 

On the following Sunday he probably gave the cantata 
Lobe den Herm, tneine Seele (No. 69; first composition), 
with its monumental opening chorus. For the accom- 
paniment he uses the Festival orchestra — strings, three 
trumpets, three oboes, and bassoon. 

We do not know what the Christmas cantatas were in 
the year 1724. 

Altogether we have more than twenty Sunday cantatas 
written by Bach during his first eighteen months in Leipzig. 
In addition there are two sacred occasional cantatas. 

On the 24th August each year, St. Bartholomew's day, 
the new Council was elected. The church ceremony that 
preceded the entry into office took place on one of the 
following week-days, usually the Monday or the Friday. 
In 1723 it was on Monday, the 30th August ♦♦. Bach had 
composed for the occasion the cantata Preise, Jerusalem^ 
den Herrn (No. 119), the text of which is probably by Pi- 
cander. The pompous work consists of the two choruses 
•Treise, Jerusalem" and "Der Herr hat Guts an uns getan". 
The first is in the French overture form; the voice parts 
do not enter until the allegro. The grave section is a posi- 
tively overwhelming picture of solemnity. The score is 
written for strings, three oboes, two flutes, four trumpets 
and kettledrum. The trumpets, however, are only used for 



* The theme is quoted on p. 80. 
♦• Spitta, II, 362. 



Sithe zu; Lobe den Herrn; Preise; HdcksterwUnschtes Freudeniickt 165 

feniare-like interludes, — a method of emplojmient that 
increases their effect. The recitative '^ herrlich stehst 
du, Kebe Stadt" ("So splendid art thou, beloved town'*) 
is introduced and ended by the following signal in the wind — 




In the aria "Wohl dir, du Volk der linden'* we hear the 
rhythm of solenmity. The soli, — the words are rather 
poor dithyrambs upon magistracy in general and the 
Leipzig magistracy in particular — are naturally somewhat 
overweighted by the choruses. 

The first performance of the cantata after Bach's death 
was given in the Gewandhaus at Leipzig under Mendels* 
sohn on the 23rd April 1843, on the occasion of the unveiling 
of the Bach monument at the St. Thomas school. 

The other sacred occasional cantata, Hdchst erwUnschtes 
Freudenfest (B. G. XXIX) was composed for the dedication 
of the organ at Stormthal, near Leipzig. It was given there 
on Tuesday, the 2nd November 1723, under Bach himself*. 
It is especially interesting from the fact that it is cast in 
the form of an orchestral suite. The first chorus exhibits 
the tripartite scheme of the overture; the second aria, 
"Hilf Gott, dass es uns gelingt", is a gavotte; the third, 
Des Hochsten Gegenwart allein", is a gigue; the last, 
O wie wohl ist uns geschehen", is a minuet. The declama- 
tion in the gavotte aria and in the minuet aria, however, 
is so strange and imperfect that one is incUned to think 
Bach must have taken these movements from an orchestral 
suite or a secular cantata**. 






* The date has been discovered from the church ordinances. 
The new organ was built by Zacharias Hildebrand, a pupil of 
Silbermann. See Spitta II, 365. 

** The banal declamation did not strike Spitta. If the hypothesis 
of borrowing be correct, all his reflections upon the fact that Bach 
has here employed the form of the orchestral suite for a cantata 
fall to the ground. 



1 66 XXVI. the Magnificat and the 5/. John Passion, 



CHAPTER XXVI. 

THE MAGNIFICAT AND THE ST. yOHN PASSION. 

B. G. XII. Magnificat. 

B. G. XIII. The St. John Passion. 

On the great Feast dajrs the Magnificat was given in 
fignrate music at the evening service in Leipzig. It fol- 
lowed the sermon. 

Bach twice set this poem (Luke I, 46—55). One of these 
compositions, for solo soprano, has been lost. Rust, in the 
preface to B. G. XI 1, says he saw the score in Dehn's 
possession about 1855 ; so that a work of Bach's has been 
lost before the very eyes of the editors of the great Bach- 
gesellschaft edition. Of the other Magnificat we have 
two scores, an older one in E flat major, and a later one in 
D major, representing the definitive form of the work. The 
first edition, published by Simrock in 1811, was based 
on the E flat score, Polchau, the editor, not becoming 
acquainted with the other until a later date. The clean 
copy of the D major score, which was made about 1730, 
surpasses in beauty even the autographs of the 5/. Matthew 
Passion and the Christinas Oratorio. 

Bach probably wrote the Magnificat for the evening 
service of Christmas 1723, — so at least we may assume 
from several movements, not forming part of the text, 
which, according to the older of the two scores, were in- 
serted between the verses of the Magnificat. After the 
Et exuUavity "Vom Himmel hoch, da komm ich her" was 
sung; after the Quia fecit came *Treut euch und jubilieret" ; 
after the Fecit fotentiam came the Gloria in excelsis; after 
the Esurientes implevit came the h3nnn Virga Jesse floruit. 
These hymns were not rendered by the choir that stood 
beside the great organ, but by some choristers in the small 



The Bdagnificat. 167 

gallery opposite, accompanied by a smaller organ. It 
seems that these hsntnns were part of the Leipzig evening 
service. Kuhnau had written a cantata upon them. Spitta 
conjectures that in Baches time the mediaeval rocking of 
the child was still customary at St. Thomas's, although 
the council, as early as 1702, had insisted upon the abroga- 
tion of the old custom*. Bach's Magnificat, according to 
this view, would really be stage music accompanying the 
representation of the scene in the manger at Bethlehem. 

If the Magnificat were sung on other Feast days the 
extraneous numbers would naturally be omitted, which 
accounts for Bach not including them in the D major 
score. This became the property of Emmanuel; we know 
from a text-book that has survived that he gave the work 
in this form in Hamburg in 1779. 

As the time allotted to the Magnificat in the evening 
service was fairly short, Bach had to adjust his music ac- 
cordingly. It has not suffered by this; its admirable con- 
cision-exhibits the beauty of the music under the best 
possible circumstances. 

The first chorus is dominated by the *^oy" motive in 
uninterrupted semiquavers. Although three trumpets are 
used here, the instrumentation is not at all thick, for Bach 
emplo}^ the wind with extreme care. This holds good also 
of the Fecit potetUiam and the Gloria. Perhaps in the 
Gloria the vocal triplets ascending and massing above 
each other are too orchestral in style for them to give 
the effect we anticipate. 



* Sec Rust's preface to B. G. XJi, and Spitta II, 372. The 
texts of these additional movements were taken by Bach direct 
from Kuhnau, whom he follows in using in the Gloria^ instead of 
the accepted but wrong Vulgate version — ''et in terra pax ho* 
minibus bonae voluntatis'' — the more correct translation of the 
Greek original — "et in terra pax, hominibus bona voluntas". 
Instead, however, of declaiming the last three words together, 
as the sense demands, he makes nonsense of them by separating 
'iMna voluntas" from "hominibus". The added movements will 
be fotmd in B. G. XI, p. loi ff. 



l68 XXVI. The Magnificat and the St. John Passion. 

The fugue upon Sicui loctOus est was one of the pieces 
in which 2^ter found many things to censure. He would 
have liked the Comes "more uniform in^shape, and the 
fifth voice more correctly introduced". Although this 
chorus is marked a capella by Emmanuel, it must be accom- 
panied by the harmonies of the organ. Even in the tender 
trio Suscepit Israel Bach would not have dispensed with 
the organ accompaniment. The silence of the contrabass 
and bassoon only signifies that the instnmiental bass is to 
be given out by soft eight-feet stops. It is advisable to have 
iom or five voices to a part in this movement, so as to get 
the right fulness without doing any violence to the canius 
firtnus of "meine Seel' erhebt den Herren'* in the oboes. 
Perhaps Bach's organist assisted in this melody with some 
light registers. 

In the bass and in the cadences to the soprano air Et 
exsuUavit we hear the characteristic Bach motive of joy, 
as though a blinding ray of sunlight suddenly vibrated 
through the gentle Advent twilight — 




This motive is usually not heard by the audience, — it 
disappears in the excessive diminuendo that is usually 
foisted on the cadence. The bass that accompanies the 
additional chorale "Freuet euch und jubilieret" (added 
in the Christmas performance), is merely a rhjrthmical 
transformation of this motive — 




In the soprano aria Quia respexit humilitatem the "low- 
liness'' of the chosen maiden is expressed by figures descend- 
ing and bowing, as it were, that give rise to an accom- 



The Magnificat. 



169 



panixnent of indescribable charm,*-* a veritable musical 
picture of the Madomia — 




Even in the Ecce enim ex hoc beaiam, where the voice sings 
the fame of her who shall be called blessed to all time, 
the accompaniment retains this motive of humility. 

The Ei misericordia^ in which the muted strings and 
the flutes give out ritomeUi that seem to come from a 
superterrestrial world, should be sung, wherever prac- 
ticable, not by one but by three or four voices. 

The chorus Fecit potenHam is built upon a broad theme 
that proceeds by haughty intervals, S3rmbolising the word 
"strength'* — 



^k r, 1 J' f. J' r; [a 




Fe - cit po- ten - ti - am , fe - eit po • ten - ti 



In the accompaniment to the tenor aria Deposuit p<h 
UfUes de sede, et exdUavit humiles Bach employs three 
motives. One in descending motion represents the words 
He hath put down , . . from their seats'\ 



C4 




Another, — one of the powerful "step" motives, that ap- 
pears in various forms now in the bass, now in the violins, 
— indicates that it is "the mighty" who are thus treated — 




mJCm ImJE 




A thfrd motive, that ascends gently, expresses the words, 
"and exalted them of low degree" — 



170 XXVI. The liCagnificat and the St. John Passion. 




The meaning of the motives is confirmed by the fact that 
they reflect the declamation of the various sentences. 
It must be borne in mind that the fine ascending line of 
the theme of exaUavit humiles only makes its proper effect 
when the violins phrase it not thus — 




but thus 




The accompaniment to the Esurientes is made out of 
two motives. The first, a species of the **joy" motive, 
is like a sunny smile — 




It belongs to the words "He hath filled the hungry with 
good things". The other is a softened version of the motive 
of the DeposuU — 




It symbolises the motion in terms of which Badi conceives 
the words "the rich he hath sent empty away". 

In performance, of. course, the two motives must stand 
out clearly from each other. The "joy" motive must be 



The St. Luke Passion, 171 

played piano; the other must enter forte, and the tempo 
must quicken slightly.* If the two motives are thus con- 
trasted throughout the movement the hearer will at once 
recognise their meaning. 

We unfortunately do not possess the figured continuo 
part to the Magnificat, so that the difficult task is thrown 
on the organist of selecting the harmonies from the mass 
of the voices and completing them according to his own 
feeling. In many of the solo numbers, especially in the 
Quia fecit mihi magna, where there are no instruments 
playing, very few will succeed in rendering the part to their 
own satisfaction and that of the hearers. 

The St. John Passion y^zs probably the first that Bach 
wrote. If the St Luke Passion be really his. this would 
be the first. Spitta, however, scarcely makes out his case 
for its authenticity**. It is indisputable that the score 
is in Bach's writing ; but as soon as we try to date the work 
we run against insurmoimtable difficulties. Spitta attributes 
it to the first Weimar years. This is inadmissible, for the 
cantatas of that period are incomparably more mature 
than this Passion. Nor does the autograph belong to this 
epoch; it dates from the middle Leipzig period, and so 
would force us to suppose that Bach, in the years of his 
greatest mastery, made a fresh copy of an unimportant 
work of his }^uth, just as it stood. This is impossible. 
He never took up an earUer composition without funda- 
mentally improving it. We know, on the other hand, 



* The more spiritedly and heavily these semiquaver sequences 
are played the better. They must give the impression of lively 
resentment. In the cadence of the prelude, — bar 7 — there is a 
transition to the "joy" motive — 




■lEjrar i n 



This bar must of course be played in a piano subito. One is 
almost tempted to add the strings each time to the flutes in the 
spirited semiquaver passages. 
♦♦ Spitta II, 508—518, 708. 



172 XXVI. The Magnificat and the St. John Paswhn. 

that he applied a much lower critical standard to the works 
of other men. 

The most natural supposition therefore is that he copied 
some one else's Passion about 1730 with a view to per- 
forming it. Perhaps in doing so he touched it up here and 
there, which would account for the fact that there are 
occasional traces of his own genius in the insignificant 
work. No importance is to be attached to the inclusion 
of this Passion in Breitkopf s catalogue of 1761. For that 
uncritical time, ever3rthing found among Bach's papers 
in his handwriting was his own work. 

To the practical musician it is a matter of pure indif- 
ference whether the St. Luke Passion is proved to be au- 
thentic or not, since he will hardly ever be tempted to 
perform it. 

As Agricola and Emmanuel, in the Necrology, give the 
number of the Passions as five, — without detailing them — 
it is quite possible that they too regarded the St. Luke 
Passion as an original work. How summary their enumera- 
tion is may be estimated from the fact that in the preceding 
rubric they lump together *^many oratorios, Masses, 
Magnificat ....'' 

There were really, then, only four Bach Passions. Of 
these only two have come down to us*. The two lost 
ones came after the St. John Passion, — one of them 
probably a year or two after this. In 1725 Picander 
published his Erbauliche Gedanken auf den Grilnen Donners* 
fag and Charfreitag aber den leidenden Jesum^ in einem 
Oratorio eniworfen. As it was for Bach that he wrote 
almost all his remaining church texts, it is practically 
certain that the composer commissioned this Passion 
oratorio from him and set it to music. 

The text is as wretched as it well could be**. For the 
Gospel version Picander substitutes a short versified 



* On the subject of the five Passions see Spitta II, 504 ff. 
** It is given in Spitta II, 873 (Gennan edition). 



The St. John Passion. 173 

narrative of the Passion. In the aria he attains the climax 
of tastelessnesSf as the following examples will shew: 

Evangelist Und endlich kam die Mdrder-Schaar 

Mit SpieBen und mit Stangen, 
Und Judas, der ihr Fiihrer war. 
Gab Jesum, nach gemachtem SchluB. 
Der Feinde Raserei gefangen. 
Da wollt es Petrus wagen, 
Mit seinem Schwerdte drein m schlagen. 

Peter: Aria. Verdammter Verrither, wo hast du dein Hertse? 

Haben es Ldwen und Tiger verwahrt! 
Ich will es zerfleischen. Ich will es zerhauen, 
DaB Ottem und Nattem die StUcke zerkauen, 
Denn du bist von verfluchter Art. 

In the third part of Picander's poems is the text of 
a *Tassions-Musik nach dem Evangelisten Marco am 
Charfreitag 1731". Bach not only commissioned this 
poem, but even prescribed the form of the verses. Being 
unwilling that the music of the Trauerode he had vrritten 
in 1727 at the death of Queen Christiane Eberhardine 
should lie unused, he wanted to convert it into a Passion. 
Picander did his work satisfactorily; Bach had simply 
to write the text of the opening and final choruses and 
three arias of the new poem under the old music*. Thus 
we probably possess the finest parts of the St. Mark 
Passion. We need no longer look for any new discoveries 
in connection with Bach*s Passions, as was at one time 
hoped. 

When Spitta undertook to date the St. John Passion 
he did not take into consideration the possibility that Bach 
might have produced it in Leipzig in 1723, some weeks 
before his appointment to the cantorship. He took it for 
granted that it was composed in C6then, on the ground of 
the paper on which some of the parts are written ; he also 



* Rust was the first to point out the relation of the Trauerode 
to the lost Passion of 173 1 , — in his famous essay on Bach's frequent 
employment of the same music for new purposes (B. G. XX*, p. 9 ff.). 



174 XXVI. The Magnificat and the St. John Passion. 

assumed that the text was compiled and the music composed 
in some haste. He afterwards shows, however, that the 
haste was to no purpose, Bach not being nominated until 
after Easter. But it is hardly probable that the Council 
would allow the Passion music, which in 1723 it was the 
turn of St. Thomas's to give, to be suspended on account 
of the vacancy in the cantorship*. It would be more likely 
to look out for a substitute, as in the case of the cantatas. 
We know that though there was no cantor at the New 
Church in 1729 the Passion music was not omitted, but was 
undertaken by one of the candidates. We may assmne the 
same procedure to have been adopted during the vacancy 
at St. Thomas's. Of all the candidates Bach hved nearest; 
he could easily come at that time, as there was no church 
mus^c in Cothen; we know that after the New Year he 
began to work at a Passion and wrote out the parts; it is 
therefore practically certain that the Council had com- 
missioned him to undertake the Passion music for 1723, 
and that he complied by producing the St. John Passion. 

This was the third Passion music in the "modem" style 
that the Leipzigers had heard at the Good Friday evening 
service. In 1721 Kuhnau had been compelled to vrrite 
a Passion in the operatic style he hated so cordially**. 

The text of the St. John Passion is founded on the 
celebrated poem of the Hamburg councillor Brockes, — 
a poem which Mattheson, Handel, and Keiser had set to 
music***. Bach, however, makes use of it only for certain 
arias. For the bombastic versified narrative of the Passion, 
which the other composers thought such a fine poetical 
achievement, he substitutes the text of the fourth GospeL 

From Brockes' arias he only takes isolated ideas, which 



* The following argument is based on the acute observations 
of B. F. Richter in the Bachjahrbuch for 1905, p. 63 ft 

** On the subject of the old and the new Passion see I, 80 ff. ; 
on Kuhnau's position in the struggle see I, 90. 

*** On the quality and the significance of Brookes' Passion 
sec I, 93 ff . 



Text of the Si. John Passion. 



175 



he Umsi works up freely in his own way *. Here he must 
have had the assistance of some one with a sensitive poetic 
&tculty. The new version is noticeably better than the 
original. It avoids the insipidities of this, and turns its 
dramatic ideas to better purpose. Compare, for example, 
these two extracts: — 



Brookes. 
"Bei Jesa Tod and Leiden leidet 
Dcs Hiauiiels Kreis, die gtnze Welt; 
Dcr Mond, der sich ia Traaer kleidet, 
Gibt Zengnis, dal^ sein Schdpfer ftllt; 
Es seheint, als losch' in Jesu Blut 
Das Fcuer, der Sonae Strahl ttnd GlaL 
Man spaltet ihm die Bmst — die 

kalten Felsen spalten, 
Zom Zeichen, dali anch sie den 

Sch6pfer sehn erkalten. 
Was tust denn du, mein Hers? 
Ersticke Gott za Ehren, 
In einer SUndaut bittier Zihrenf* 



Back. 
^*Mein Hers, in dem die ganze Welt 
Bei Jesn Leiden gldehfalls leidat, 
Die Sonne sich in Traner kleidet, 
Der Vorhang relict, der Fels serftllt, 
Die Erde bebt, die Griber spalten, 
Weil sie dea Sehdpftr sehn eikaltem: 
Was wiilst da deines Ortes ton? 

Soprano. 
Zerfliefie, mein Herse, ia Flaten der 

Zihren, 
Dem Hochsten sa Ehren, 
Erzihle der Welt and dem Himmel 

die Not, 
Dein Jesas ist tot/' 



We are tempted to assmne that the delicate miknown 
poet who assisted in the St. John Passion was the same 
who suj^lied the text of the cantatas Sie werd&n aus Saba 
dU$ kommen (No. 65), Mein liebsterjesu ist verloren (N0.154), 
and Dm wahrer Gott und Davidssohn (No. 23)**. 

At its first performance the St. John Passion had not 
its present form. It began with the chorale chorus ''O 
Mensch bewein' dein' Siinde gross*', which now comes at the 
end of the first Part of the St. Matthew Passion. It con- 
tained three arias — "Himmel reisse, Welt erbebe !", "Zer- 



* The following derive from Brockes' text: 

X. Alto aria: "Von den Stricken meiner Sunden"; 

2. Bass arioso: "Betrachte meine Seel"; 
) 3. Tenor aria: "Erwage wie sein blutgefarbter Rucken"; 

4. Bass aria: "Eilt, ihr aogefochtnen Seelen"; 
I 5. Tenor arioso: "Mein Herz, in dem die ganze Welt" ; 
^ 6. Soprano aria: "Zerfliesse, mein Herze"; 

7. Final chorus: "Ruhet wohl". 
♦♦ See p. 159 ff. 



176 XXVI. The Magnificat and the 5/. John Passion. 

schmettert mich, ihr Felsen und ihr Hiigel", and **Windet 
euch nicht so, geplagte Seelen*' — which Bach replaced 
by others at some later performance of the work. It 
ended with the chorale Xhriste, du Lamm Gottes'*, which 
was afterwards transferred to the cantata Du wakrer 
GqU und Davidssohn (No. 23). These alterations were 
probably made for a new performance of the St. John 
Passion in 1727. In place of the deleted nmnbers Bach 
wrote the great introductory chorus ^^Herr, unser Herr- 
scher'\ the arias "Ach mein Sinn** and ^'Erwage wie sein 
blutgefarbter Riicken", the arioso ^^Betrachte meine SeeP*. 
and the final chorale "Ach Herr, lass dein lieb Engelein"* 

For a still later performance he went through the parts 
and improved certain details*. To this revision belongs, 
for example, the instruction that in certain parts of the 
first chorus only the violoncellos and bassoons are to take 
the quavers, while the contrabass and the organ take each 
time the second crotchet. At the same time he marked 
the phrasing and the dynamic indications in the parts. 
These successive redactions are deducible from the state 
of the various parts. 

The score of the St. John Passion is not autograph 
throughout, but Bach has given the whole a most careful 
^ supervision. Here again the original conUnuo part is 
lost. Fortunately it lay before Hering when he made 
a copy of the Passion at the request of Emmanuel, and he 
inserted it in the copy. The figuring in the B. G. edition 
is based on this. 

The musical character of the St. John Passion is con* 
ditioned by the nature of the Passion narrative in the 
fourth Gospel. This lacks the simplicity and naturalness 
of the story in St. Matthew. The latter gives a series of 
short scenes, to which lyrical meditations can be attached; 
in St. John the events are more spun out and dramatic 



* Altogether we can deduce from the parts four perfonnancet 
of the St John Passion under Bach himself. 



The Choruses of the People, 177 

in form, so that the text has no points of repose. The 
arias had to be inserted ahnost by force. 
. The St. John text is also poorer in musical quality 
than that of St. Matthew. It lacks the institution of the 
communion, Gethsemane, the episodes of the arrest, — 
everj^hing that fills out the first Part of the 5^. Matthew 
Passion — and many other animated strokes. Bach 
himself was conscious of this, so he supplemented the nar- 
rative of the fourth Gospel by several episodes from St. Mat- 
thew, — the weeping of Peter, the rending of the ctulain, 
and the earthquake at the death of Jesus. 

St^ John's version of the Passion is in the main only 
a picture of the great scenes of the trials before the high 
priest and Pilate. It has an air of excitement and passion. 
Bach was aware of this characteristic, and he reproduces 
it m his music. He carries on the action by means of the 
choruses of the priests and the people. 

It is remarkable that apart from the "Crucify him" he 
has employed three choruses each twice, and one three 
times*. We may explain this identity by the supposition 
that he hoped to make the wild cry of the people more im- 
pressive by setting it to several small themes and repeating 
these frequently. It is doubtful, indeed, what prompted 
him to render the dignified setting of the scribes' words 
**Write not the king of the Jews" in the light, mocking 
music of the song of the soldiers, **We greet thee. King of 
the Jews". Perhaps the accidental similarity of the verse- 
structure of certain stanzas of the Passion narrative had more 
influence on Bach*s resolve to give them the same musical 
setting than modem commentators would care to admit. 

In these choruses of the people Bach does not try to 
intensify the dramatic element. He depicts the crowd 



* "W&re dieser nicht ein Ubelt&ter" - "Wir durfen niemand 
t(^ten"» "Sei gegrusset, lieber Judenkdnig" a* "Schreibe nicht: der 
Judenkdnig". "Wir haben ein Gesetz" » "ULssest du diesen los". 
"J^um von Nazareth" » "Nicht diesen, sondem Barrabam" 
— "Wir haben keinen K5nig". 

Schwcittor, Bach. U. 13 



178 XXVI. The Magnificat and the St John Passion, 



as uniformly fanatical. When he comes to the passages 
"This was no evildoer'' and ^*We onght to put no man 
to death", — which, considered by themselves, should be 
set more calmly and reflectively — he gives them an ex- 
tended chromatic theme that is unsurpassably dreadful 
in its effect — 




^ 




rkiTk 



Wi - re die • ser nicht ein - bel • ti - - « ter. 

And in the ''Crucify him" the idea of the long-drawn 
howls of an excited crowd has certainly determined the 
character of the theme — 





>nf f r i rr f ii ^ 



Kren 



»i.ge! 



Kren - • si * fe! 



At intervals the "Crucify him" b repeated in furious 
ascending semiquavers, as if the maddened crowd were 
raising a thousand arms towards heaven. 

Even in the theme of "Wir haben ein Gesetz" ('*We have 
a law") and "Lassest du diesen los" ("If thou lettest this 
man go") there is something wild, in spite of the attempt 
to slow the movement down; the passage is dominated 
by the dreadful intervals of a fourth that are characteristic 
of the "Crucify Mm" — 




C p f t 



Wir ha - ben ein Ge - setz 



uad naeh dem Ge- 




setz soil er ster 



ben. 



In the theme of "Sei gegriisset" ("Hail, King of the 
Jews") we have a representation of the mocking genu* 
flexions of the soldiers — 



The Choruses of the People. X79 




Sei ge - gra • Act lie - ber Ju - den - kd - nig. 



accompanied by obtrusive repetitions of a motive of 
obeisance in semiquavers in the flutes and oboes — 




The modem hearer has little perception of the nature of 
this accompaniment, as the flutes and oboes are generally 
inaudible. If the choir is at all large, it is advisable to 
strengthen the instruments with a piccolo in the higher 
octave. The same doubling of the wood wind in a higher 
octave is equally necessary in certain parts of the "Crucify 
him''; and the furious semiquavers that accompany the 
"Nicht diesen, sondem Barrabam" ('*Not this man, but 
Barrabas") and the "Wir dtirfen niemand toten" ("We 
should put no man to death") can hardly be given out 
too strongly. On the whole the orchestra in the St. John 
Passion cannot be too large if it is to do justice to the 
demoniacal quality of the music. 

In the chorus "Lasset uns den nicht zerteilen" ("Let 
us not divide it") it is very difficult to bring out properly 
the semiquaver phrases in the instrumental basses that 
are meant to depict the rattling of the dice in the bowl. 
It is as well not to employ the full chorus here, but only 
three or four voices to each part, — which, indeed, is 
more in keeping with the scene. The organist can greatly 
assist in making the semiquavers effective by pla3dng them 
with appropriately clear eight or four-feet stops. If he does 
this skilfully, no one will know that he is playing; every 
one will be pleased with what he takes to be the fulness 
of the tone of the violoncellos. 

In the SLjohn Passion the accompaniment of the re- 
citatives falls to the organ alone ; the string quartet is not 



12* 



l8o XXVI. The Magnificat and the St. John Passion. 

used, as in the Si. Matthew Passian, to throw the words 
of Jesus into higher relief. Bach, however, has prescribed 
to the organist a particular tone-colour for these passages. 

In the recitatives, again, Bach has preserved in the most 
admirable way the special tint of the narrative as it is in 
St. John. His setting of the words of Jesus reproduces 
the superterrestrial, almost abstract elevation that charac- 
terises the Christ of the fourth Gospel from the beginning. 
The Jesus of St. Matthew is much more human. The 
greatest mistake that can be made in the rendering of the 
part of Jesus in the St. John Passion is to infuse even the 
slightest trace of sentimentality into it. It must be sung 
with simple, elevated pathos. 

The pictures of the rending of the curtain and of the 
earthquake are like sketches for the corresponding episodes 
in the 5/. Matthew Passion. In the accompaniment to 
the words ''Da nahm Pilatus Jesum imd geisselte ihn" 
('Then Pilate took Jesus and scourged Him") we have, 
in the bass, the same rhj^hm, suggestive of the falling 
of the blows, that we have in the arioso "Erbarm es Gott, 
hier steht der Heiland angebundeni O Geisselungi" 
("Have mercy, God! Lo, hand and foot their chains have 
bound Him") in the St. Matthew Passion. A stringendo to 
the end is effective here. The melisma at "and wept 
bitterly" is much more extended here than in the St. Mat- 
thew Passion, where it is continued in the aria "Erbarme 
dich". 

The arias exhibit all the extraordinary youthful fresh* 
ness that constitutes the charm of the solo movements 
in the cantatas of the first Leipzig period. The sense of 
hastening in the soprano aria "Ich folge dir gleichfalls 
mit freudigen Schritten" ("I follow thee also with joyous 
steps") and the bass aria "Eilt, ihr angefochtnen Seelen" 
("Hasten, ye troubled souls") is conveyed in Bach's usual 
manner — by quick passages in imitation. In the latter 
aria the interjections of the chorus "Wohin? Wohin?" 
("Whither?") must be given without any raUenianio or 



The Arias. 



l8l 



The answers "Nach Go]gatha" ("To Gol- 
gotha") and "Zum Kreuzeshiigel" ('To the hiU of the 
Cross") should be given out pianissimo and m a tranquil 
tempo, and be separated by as long a pause as possible 
from the last **Wohin?" It is interesting to compare this 
movement with the opening duet of the Easter oratorio 
Komtnt, eilet uni laufet (B. G. XXP), that is laid out on the 
same large lines, but expresses a more tranquil hastening. If 
the direction Basso in ripieno iacet were not expressly given, 
we should be tempted to try the effect in this movement 
of the St John Passion of giving the bass part to three 
or four voices, since the single voice, owing to its low posi- 
tion, cannot come through the orchestra properly. 

It is hard to render the bass aria with chorale, "Mein 
teurer Heiland", in such a way that it shall answer to the 
ideal one has formed of it in reading it. For the chorale, 
two or three voices to a part are enough. 

An indescribable feUcity breathes from the arioso "Be- 
trachte meine Seele" and the succeeding aria "Erwage 
doch". The harmonies fluctuate between major and minor; 
and the veiled timbre of the two viole d*amore is very 
appropriate. It is like a smile through tears ; we seem to be 
transported to the fields where the "Himmelsschliissel- 
blmnen" ("primroses of heaven") bloom. In the lovely 
arching curves of the instrumental melodic lines of the aria 
we seem to see the rainbow of which the text speaks, 
stretching over the world redeemed — 




The movement should pass before the hearer like a vision. 
As a rule, however> the singer drags it out too much and 



l82 XXVI. The Magnificat and the St. John Passion. 

makes it too heavy. It is a pity that the part for the viola 
d'amore has usually to be played on the muted violas, 
which do not take the upper parts of it easily. It is an open 
question, too, whether, in the arioso, the lute part is best 
rendered by the piixicati of the strings. The cembalo 
would make the best effect here. It is also an unsettled 
question whether we should employ the piano or the harp. 

The sombre beauty of the alto aria "Von den Stricken 
meiner Siinden mich zu entbinden, wird mein Heil gebun-^ 
den" is seldom made apparent, owing to the way the tempo 
is dragged. The expressive syncopated theme — 




and that in the bass, that seems to strive upwards with 
difficulty — 



^'t i /£; Efer+MT^ 




should co-operate to suggest Jesus writhing in His bonds. 
If the movement be taken twice too slowly, and overdone 
with raUentandi, it loses its meaning and merely gives the 
feeling of wearisome protraction. 

The theme of the aria '^Zerfliesse, mein Herze, in Fluten 
der Zahren" ("Let my heart dissolve in floods of tears") 
is woven out of spiritualised sighs, while the bass of the 
motive of terrified trembling in the preceding arioso, "Mein 
Herz, in dem die ganze Welt bei Jesu Leiden gldchfalls 
leidet" ("My heart, in which the whole world suffers with 
Jesus") is retained. If the hearer is to perceive the signif- 
icance of the sighing motive, the wind instruments should 
not accent the strong beat of the bar, but the last note of 
the slur, — which Bach has here written out in full — in 
this way — 



The Arias. 



183 




In the aria **Ach mein Sinn, wo wiUst du endlich hin" 
Bach depicts wild and passionate grief. We seem to see 
a man rushing hither and thither in despair. At the finish 
Bach does not repeat the ritameUo, but breaks off in a 
sudden shriek. He expressly marks these last two bars 
forte; but in spite of this conductors sometimes play them 
with a rattentando and diminuendo. 

The aria *TEs ist vollbracht" ("It is finished") is devel- 
oped out of the falling sequence in which Jesus, as His 
head sinks in death, breathes forth His last words — 




.. 1^ TT Cf I \ff 



Es ist Toll • bracht. 



In the vivace interlude "Der Held aus Juda siegt mit 
Macht" it is advisable to employ a few bright children's 
voices instead of the solo alto. 

The final chorus is also based on a descending motive — 




In accordance with the previous passage of the text, 
"There laid they Jesus therefore, because of the Jews' 
preparation day; for the sepulchre was nigh at hand", Bach 
of course depicts the interment of Christ. Motives such 
as these — 



wnf^i 




aad 




O: 



/ 



184 XXVI. The Magnificat and the 5/. John Passion. 

must be played with particular care, without, however, 
doing any violence to the tenderness that fiDs the whole 
movement. 

We may suppose that Bach was not satisfied with the 
chorus "O Mensch, bewein dein' Siinde gross" ("O man, 
bewail thy grevious sin**) as an introduction to the Si. John 
Passion, because the words of the chorale did not seem to 
him sufficiently characteristic of the fourth Gospel; the 
quality of this is exactly expressed by the words *Herr 
unser Herrscher, dessen Ruhm in alien Landen herrlich 
isti Zeig uns durch deine Passion, dass du, der wahre 
Gottessohn, zu aller 2^it, auch in der grossten Niedrigkeit, 
verherrlicht worden bist** ("Lord our Redeemer, whose 
name in all the world is glorious, show us by Thy Passion 
that Thou, the true Son of God for evermore, art glorified 
even in the deepest humiliation"). The music tries to 
convey this dual idea of suffering and glory. The flutes 
and oboes express the thoughts connected with the Passion ; 
throughout the movement they sigh and wail incessantly — 



Flanto traverso I. 
Oboe I. 



( 



FUato tniYerso n. 
Oboe II. 



[ p'r,- f irMj.nrr-n^~rn 



fe= 



li^^'rAr ji" ifyr ^urnrrH 



Bach's figured bass indicates that the organ is to accom- 
pany, in a higher octave, the sustained dissonances of the 
flutes and oboes. This gives the music a curiously bitter 
and gloomy character, which at first distresses the hearer, 
as he cannot reconcile it with the words "Lord our Re- 
deemer, whose name in all the world is glorious*'. 

The strings, in grave and tranquil semiquavers, symbolise 
the majesty of the glorified Son of God — 




The Opening and Final Choruses. 185 

The lofty expression of this is reinforced by the soft organ- 
point, repeated in quavers, in the bass — 



It is in this way that Bach's music, like the narrative 
in the fourth Gospel, convej^ simultaneously the ideas 
of majesty and suffer ing. The abasement of the Saviour 
is symbolised by the passage of the grave semiquaver 
sequence from the violins to the bass. This happens at the 
second return of the words "Lord our Redeemer" and at 
the second repetition of the words "Show us by Thy Passion" . 
Note also the descent of the voices at the words "even 
in the deepest humiliation", and the upward striving 
of the semiquaver figure at "art glorified". 

Verbal explanation necessarily gives a certain disfiguring 
coarseness to this musical s}anbolism. But even Spitta 
admitted that this chorus needs interpretation, and that 
from the purely musical standpoint it is incomprehensible. 

Large dsmamic outlines are hardly possible in this move- 
ment if we are not to diminish the effect of the piano that 
Bach has marked for the words "even in the greatest 
humiliation". Repeated experiences will show us how 
wrong it is to introduce the piano in the chorus at the words 
"Show us by Thy Passion", however desirable this piano — 
which is prescribed for the whole orchestra, except the 
basses — may seem to be. On the other hand the declama- 
tion of the chorus can hardly be too full of dynamic light 
and shade. It rests with the organist to assist in the render- 
ing of the semiquaver figure, where it occurs three times 
in the bass, in such a way that it is clear to every hearer 
without being at all obtrusive. 



l86 XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years 1725—1727. 



CHAPTER XXVII. 

THE CANTATAS OF THE YEARS 1725-1727. 

The cantatas of 1725, 1726 and 1727 are mostly recog- 
nisable from the fact that the paper on which they are 
written bears the water mark I M K. For the Trauer^ 
ode, composed in September 1727 on the death of Queen 
Christiane Eberhardine, Bach used a paper with the water 
mark M. A. ; this paper he then continued to use for several 
years. 

At the death of the Queen, public mourning was com- 
manded for four months. From September 1727 to January 
1728, therefore, no cantatas were given; even the organ 
was silenced. Bach thus had a period of rest. This could 
not have been wholly agreeable to him, since the national 
mourning meant a considerable diminution of the musicians* 
perquisites. 

The majority of the cantata texts of this period are by 
Picander. His first cycle of cantata poems extended 
from the first Sunday in Advent 1724 to the corresponding 
Sunday in 1725. Bach may have gone to him because 
he wrote rapidly and with facility, and, as he himself 
boasts, he had some musical knowledge. The bad points 
in his work, however, far outweigh the good. He has no 
idea of working up poetically the situation given him in 
a Gospel. For the most part he writes at random, drifting 
along in commonplace. His texts are usually so little 
characteristic that with very slight alterations they could 
be adopted to the Gospel for any other Sunday. Here is 
a tj^ical specimen of his banality, — a recitative from 
the cantata Siehe du, dass deine Gottesfurchi nicht Heuchdei 
set (No. 179) : 



Wo gehest du kin?; Wahrlich, ich sage euch. 187 

^'Das heut'ge Christentum ist leider schlecht besteUt: 

Die meisten Christen in der Welt sind laulichte Laodicaer 

Und aufgeblas'ne Pharisaer, die sich von auBen fromm bezeigen, 

Und wie ein Schilf den Kopf zur Erde betigen. 

Im Herzen aber steht ein stolzer Eigennihm; 

Sie gehen zwar ins Gotteshaus und tun dasdbst die aufier* 

lichen Pflichten, 
Macht aber dies wohl einen Christen aus? 
NeinI Heuchler kdnnens audi verrichtenT' 

Among the cantatas of this period are some that have 
so many similar internal characteristics that we may regard 
them as intimately allied, — e. g. the two solo cantatas 
Wo gehest du kin (No. 166; for the fourth Simday after 
Easter) and Wahrlich, ich sage euch (No. 86; for the fifth 
Sunday after Easter). As these two Sundays come together, 
the works must have originated at the same time. 

In the opening aria of Wo gehest du kin the accompani- 
ment aims at depicting the supematurally elastic steps 
of Jesus after His resurrection — 



^^ ^ ^ J^ 




The same means are employed, in the St. Matthew Passion^ 
to illustrate Christ's prophecy that after His resurrection 
he would go before them into Galilee. The quavers are 
of course not to be played legato. In the exuberant aria 
*lch will an den Himmel denken und der Welt mein Herz 
nicht schenken" (*'I will think of Heaven and not give 
my heart to the world") there is a "step" rhythm in the 
bass, — prompted by the words "Wenn idi gche oder stehe" 
("If I go or stay"). The accompaniment to the aria "Man 
nehme sich in acht, wenn das Glucke lacht" ("Man, beware 
when fortune smiles") is accompanied by captivating, 
silvery laughter*. 

One feature that these sister cantatas have in common 
18 the making of an aria out of a chorale by giving the 



* The theme of this aria is quoted on p. 78. 



l88 XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years 1725—1727. 

canius firmus to solo voices, with a free orchestral accom- 
paniment. In the first cantata it is the melody **Ich 
bitte dich, Herr Jesu Christ", to which the strings add 
a melancholy motive; in the second cantata the chorale 
verse: 

^'Und was der ewig' giit'ge Gott 

In seinem Wort gesprochen hat, 

Geschwor'n bd seinem Namen 

Das halt tind gibt er g'wifi fiirwahr « . . ." 

is sung, the orchestra adding a remarkably full and tense 
accompaniment in three parts, that excellently expresses 
the steadfastness of God's word*. 

The same impression is given by the opening arioso 
'*Wahrlich, ich sage euch! So ihr den Vater etwas bitten 
werdet in meinem Namen, so wird ers euch geben'\ which 
is worked out as a five-part fugue. As surely as the vocal 
melody takes its place as the fifth voice in the orchestral 
fugue, so surely will the prayer in the name of Jesus be 
fulfilled. 

This cantata, with its two cheerful and delightful arias 
"Ich will doch wohl Rosen brechen" and "Gott hilft ge- 
wiss", is one of the most popular cantatas of Bach. 

It is evident, again, that the two monumental music- 
dramas Herr, gehe nicM ins Gericht (No. Z05) and Schauet 
doch und sehet (No. 46), written for the ninth and tenth 
Sundays zit&c Trinity, originated at the same time. Their 
opening choruses are especially alike in this respect, that 
the tone-painting is relegated to the instrumental accom- 
paniment, while the vocal part is noticeably simple. Here 
we have a quite new cantata type. 

In the opening chorus of Herr, gehe nictU ins 



* The melody of the chorale should not be sung by a soprano 
soloist, but by half a dozen fine boys' voices. In the accompani* 
ment to "Und was der ewig' gut'ge Gott" the strings must reinforce 
the two oboes so as to give the figures the needful firmness. The 
bass should be strengthened by a bassoon, so as to make the Hmbre 
of the trio homogeneous. 



HetTt geks nicht ins Gericht; Schauet dock. 



189 



the means employed are as simple as they are effective. 
In the bass we have a figm*e depicting anxious trembling — 




The theme with which the two oboes accompany this is 
composed of two motives — 




The second of these motives is a modification of the familiar 
motive of sighing. To explain the first motive we must 
look at other themes in the same s3mcopated style, when 
we shall see that they always embody the idea of something 
being drawn or dragged along*. If these s}mcopations 
and sighs are rightly accented, we can see the groaning 
and reluctant man being dragged before the judgment seat. 
In the aria '*Wie zittem und wanken der Stinden Ge- 
danken" ("How thoughts of sin tremble and falter**) the 
oboe reels about above the quavering figures in the strings — 




During the recitative-arioso "Wohl aber dem, der seinen 
Biirgen weiss . . . wenn seine Sterbestunde schlagt" ("But 
well for him who knows his surety . . . when his last hour 
strikes*') we hear the funeral bells, — not soimding sadlyi 
however, but joyously. In the aria "Kann ich nur Jesum 
mir £um Freimde machen, so gilt der Mammon nicht bei 
mir** ("If Jesus be my friend, Mammon is nothing to me**) 



* Compare, for example, the theme of the aria "My Jesus, 
take me to Thee", cited on p. 1 50, from the cantata Jesus nahm 
xu sick dis Zwdlfs (No. 22). 



xgo XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years 1725—1727. 



the note of gladsomeness becomes one of unrestrained 
gaiety. It is as if a man were nmning Mrildly from cap- 
tivity; the antagonism between the upper voice and the 
instrumental bass gives a sensation of precipitancy that 
is ahnost unbearable — 




'?'^' r, j^ air j;^ 





In the final chorale, "Nun ich weiss, du wirst mich stillen** 
("Now I know that Thou wilt calm me") we can observe 
the transition in the orchestra from terrified trembling 
to peace — 





-f f. n r ft r i; 




The first part of the finely declaimed opening chorus of 
Schauei dock und sehei, ob irgend ein Schmerz set (No. 46) 
seems like a sketch for the Qui ioUis of the B minor Mass — 




Sehaoet doch und se-het, ob ir-gendelnScbmensei wiememScluiien! 

In the orchestra we have the violins sighing continually — 



Sehausi dock und sekst 



191 



The flutes have the same motive, but in doubled motion — 




The total effect is of a vast lamentation ascending to heaven. 
In the recitative '^o klage, du zerstorte Gottesstadt'* 
(^*Then lament, thou ruined dty of God") the strings have 
long-drawn cries of woe, above which the flutes depict 
the "des Eifers Wasserwogen" (•'waves of anger") that 
shall sweep over Jerusalem. An idea of the dreadful nature 
of the aria "Dein Wetter zog sich auf von weitem" (**Thy 
tempest gathered from afar") may be obtained from the 
figures in the bass — 




The theme of the flute in the last aria — 




illustrates the words "Doch Jesus will auch bei der Strafe 
der Frommen Schild und Beistand sein ; er sammelt sie als 
seine Schafe, als seine Kuchlein liebreich ein" ('*But 
Jesus, even when suffering, will be the shield and succour 
of the godly. He will gather them lovingly as His sheep".)* 
This pastoral accompaniment, in which the oboe forms the 
bass, is extraordinarily beautiful; Bach has rarely written 
more heartfelt music. It forms the happiest contrast with 
the gloomy character of the preceding numbers. The fine 



* The quavers in the aria should be played with a light staccato 
in order to get the proper effect. 



192 XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years 1725 — 1727. 

painting at the words "Wenn Wetter der Rache" ("If 
tempests of vengeance") should be particularly noted. 
Another of the dramatic cantatas is that for the first 
Sunday after Easter, Halt im GeddcMnis Jesum Cknsi 
(No. 67). The powerful opening chorus, — in which we 
may object to the threefold repetition of the "Halt" — is 
followed by the aria "Mein Jesus ist erstanden", — a 
movement of unusual charm, in which the boldly ascending 
figures speak eloquently of the resurrection. The finest 
part of the cantata, however, is the bass aria "Friede 
sei mit euch" ("Peace be unto you"). It begins with the 
"tumult" motive — 




Then suddenly the uproar ceases, and the motive of trans- 
figuration enters in tranquil majesty — 




fj C y ^i* I tf fj r I 



The world and all its woes sink out of sight. The risen 
Lord is with His disciples, consoling them with His "Peace 
be unto you". In vain does the world rage round them 
again; they sing through it all "Wohl ims, Jesus hilft 
uns kampfen . . . Jesus holet uns zum Frieden . . . O Herr 
hilf und lass gelingen" ("It is well with us; Jesus fights 
for us . . . Jesus takes us to His peace . . . Help us, Lord, to 
victory"). And each time that He addresses them with 
His "Peace be unto you" the tumult is silenced. 

It is less an aria than a symphonic tone-picture. The 
German Bach is trying to break through the mould of the 
decadent Italian art. His dramatic spirit leads him to 
seek the way back to the larger and simpler kind of art 
from which he started, and to create free forms for himself. 



H^rr, urie du wUiL 



193 



He is on the same path in the cantata for the third Sun- 
day after Epiphany, Herr, wie du wilU (No. 73), as may 
be seen in the freely-written aria ^'Herr, so dn willf \ The 
itit of this is composed of three lines: 

''Herr, so du willt, so prefit ihr Todesschmerzen die Seuf^r 

aus dem Hersen ....'' 
'^Herr, so du willt, so lege meine Glieder in Staub und Asche 

nieder . . . ." 
'^err» so du willt, so schlagt ihr Leichenglocken « . • «" 
("Lord, if Thou mlt» the pangs of death will wring sighs 
from my heart". 
Lord, if Thou wilt, my limbs will fall in dust and ashes". 
Lord, if Thou wilt, the funeral bdls will toll".) 

In the first line we hear the sigh — 



41 



j/3Hf /f 




Then the voices descend as it were into the grave — 



^s 




Finally the funeral bells are heard — 






K^^mmmm^m 




J4-^4-^4 ' UUy ^^ 



The opening diorus also is very impressive. The orchestra 
and (mgan have the following troubled motive — 



^ 




^ 



Herr wie da willt! 

that is formed from the commencement of the chorale 
melody; it bears a striking resemblance to the "Fate** 
motive in Beethoven's fifth s3miphony. The instruments 
try to force it upon the chorus, which is singing the chorale 



Schweitzer, Booh. H. 



«3 



194 XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years 1725— 1727. 

(intennpted by recitatives). The choir resbts. Finally, 
as the motive returns with greater and greater urgency^ 
the choir 3rields and repeats it three times, whereupon 
the movement ends. These dramatic beauties almost 
blind us to the charm of the tenor aria "Ach senke doch 
den Geist der Freuden dem Kerzen ein*^ with its gentle 
semiquavers floating down. 

But the fight of tiie giant for freedom was in vain. In 
the Michaelmas cantata Es erhub sich ein Strait (No. 19) 
he is beaten. The first chorus paints the struggle of Satan 
and his host against the archangel Michael*. The serpent- 
forms fling themselves upward in mighty contortions — 



oiK,ngr|rrriT 




nt rrmt rr i r 



At the words 

'^Aber Michael bezwingt, 

Und die Schar, die ihn umringt, 

StOrzt des Satans Grausamkeit/' 

(''But Michael conquers, and the cruel host of Satan en- 
circling him is cast down"), the motive is inverted, and 
the agitated and distorted mass falls precipitantly into 
the depths — 







I ^^^JJJVJJfr'i i 



Then with one broad stroke of the pen Bach completely spoils 
the striking picture. At the finish, when Satan*s host has 

♦ Jude, verse 9. 



Es 0rhub sich; Emghsit. 195 

fallen, the composer writes Dal segno, repeats the first part, 
"Es erhub sich ein Streit" ("Now there was war'*) and 
so Gondndes*. This da capo that he has inserted out of 
mere habit is of course a sin against both the text and the 
music: it shows how helpless this unique genius is against 
the formulae and ordinances of his epoch. In this one 
Dal segno we have the whole tragic fate of Bach's art. 
There must be something in the nature of the pictorial 
conception of music to account for the fact that its two 
greatest representatives. Bach and Berlioz, are insensible 
to many things of which a quite mediocre talent would 
be conscious. 

The music of the aria "Bleibt, ihr Engel, bleibt bei 
mir" (**Stay, ye angels, stay with me") is of course derived 
from the graceful "angel" theme — 




The trumpet adds the chorale "Ach Gbtt, lass dein lieb' 
Engelein". This causes the movement to be unusually long, 
even for Bach. The marking of adagio therefore ought 
not to be taken too literally. The final chorale, "Lass 
dein Engel mit mir fahren", with its free orchestral ac- 
companiment, is extraordinarily solemn in its effect. 

Among the other dramatic cantatas of this period there 
are none that outwardly form so complete a whole as 
Herr^ gehe nichi ins GericfU (No. 105) and Schauet dock 
und sehel (No. 46). They are composed of separate num- 
bers; but these are often so powerful in effect that we are 
not conscious of the lack of an inner cohesion* 

The first chorus of the two-part chorale cantata for the 
first Sunday after Trinity, Ewigkeit, du DonnerwoH 
(No. 20; first composition) is laid out in the French overture 



* The succeeding recitative, ''Gottlobt der Drache liegt" ("God 
be prftisedl the dzmgonis defeated") ought. to have been snfficieiit 
to deter hun from repeating the undecided battle ! 

13* 



1^6 XXVII. Th)e Cftatatas of ^le Youft 1725— 1727. 

form. The vivace commences with '^ Ewigkdt, Zeit ohne 
Zeit"; it is rather short relatively to the grave*. The effect 
of the dionas comes from the animation of the orchestral 
accompaniment and the extreme simplicity of the chorales- 
figuration. 

The aria "O Ewigkeit, du machst mir bange" ("O eternity, 
thou fillest me with fear") is dominated by the **sigh" 
motive. In the aria ^'Wacht auf ! Wacht auf ! ... eh die 
Posaune schallt** (**Awake, awake, ere the trumpet sounds") 
Bach of course employs that instrument. The fine trumpet 
part that he gives to it will exculpate him even in the 
eyes of the strictest musical sesthetician. In the alto aria 
**0 Menseh, errette deine Seek, entfliehe Satans Sklaverei'* 
(**0 man, save thy soul, fly from Satan's bonds**) the mu- 
sical illustration of the text is quite excessive — 




Nowhere else in music has the painful writhing of a body 
been so realistically depicted ♦♦. 

The opening aria of the cantata for the ninth Sunday 
after Trinity, Tue Rechnungf Donnerwort, das die Felsen 
seibst zerspaUet (No. 168; text by Franck) is rather enig- 
matic. It is not clear what is signified by the agitated 
figure in the strings — 




* The final words of the verse do not suit the return to the 
grave. In any caae the employment of the overture form to the 
chorak chorus here is not very happy. 

** The texts of the arias axe pMHy taken from the remalninf 
strophes of Rist's chorale. 



Tue RechHung; Sie werdtn euch in den Bai:n lun. X97 

It su^ests most strongly the aria of the scourging in the 
5/. MattJuw Passion, ^'Erbarm es Gott'\ As ^ matter 
of fact the figm% here also symbolises a succession of blows. 
Bach remembers the text that has been in the mind of 
his librettist, "1st mein Wort nicht ein Hanmier, der Felsen 
zerschmeisst" (''Is not my word like a hanmier that break- 
eth the rock in pieces?")*, and accordingly depicts the 
hammer-blows in his music. When played with sufficient 
animation the movement is very impressive. If the music 
to the aria ''Kapital und Interessen meiner Schulden 
gross und klein, mtissen einst verrechnet sein" ("Capital 
and interest of my sins, great and small, must some day 
be reckoned up") does not affect us very deeply^ that is 
not to be wondered at. On the other hand a fascinating 
effect is made by the titanic efforts expressed in the bass 
accompaniment to the aria "Herr, zerreiss des Mammons 
Ketten" ("Lord, break the chains of Mammon") — 




In the opening duet of the cantata for the sixth Sunday 
after Easter, Sie werden euch in den Bann tun (No. 44) — 
(*They will put you under the ban") — the word "Bann" 
is expressed with dreadful force. The impression of horror 
isjntensified by progressions of fifths in the instrumental 
basses — 



'^nt\i j i ^ J ju jj i Jiij i i 



which are made still more prominent by the figures in the 
second oboe. The choir enters with the words "Es kommt 
aber die Zeit, dass, wer euch toten wird". 

The theme of the aria "Es ist und bleibt der Christen 
Trost" is a little confusing at first — 



* Jeremiah XXIII, 29. 






Z98 XXVII. The Caatatas of the Yean i;2j~if27. 



J If 





The jubilant triplets are explained, however, by the sequel, 
where mention is made of the "Lachen der Freudcnsonne" 
("Laughter of the sun of joy"). Bach fastens upon these 
words because he sees the opportunity they give him for 
characteristic music. 

In the opening chorus of the cantata for the third Sunday 
after Epiphany, A lies nut nach GoUes Willen (No. 72; 
text by Franck), the main musical theme is prompted by 
a word of quite subordinate importance. It is the word 
"Zeit" ("Time"), — "Alles nur nach Gottes WiUen . . . 
so bei gut als boser Zeit" ("God's will be done . . . both 
in good and evil time"). Bach expresses it by the stroke 
of the pendulum, as in the cantata Wer weiss wie nahe 
mir mein Ende, hin gefU die Zeit, her komnU der Tod ("Who 
knows how near my ending is; time flies, death is coming"). 
The monotonous rhythm in the bass, in which the rest 
of the orchestra also joins — 



T 1 f I H f I H f J n f J n r jjj 



is accordingly maintained from beginning to end of the 
chorus. It is to this impressive tick-tack that the choir 
sings the moving text. 

In the almost dance-like prelude to the aria "Mem 
Jesus will es tun" ("This will my Jesus do"), the upper 
voices several times pause suddenly on a chord, while the 
bass of the theme — 



A lies nur; LeUhtgesitmU FlatUrgeister ; Du soUsi GoU, i^ 

continues. The only other aria in which this occurs is 
''Wirf mein Herze, wirf dich noch in des Hochsten Liebes* 
arme'' (*Xast thyself, oh my heart, into the loving arms 
of God"), in the cantata Mein Gott, me lang, ach lange 
(No. 155), in which passionate movement it depicts the 
heart at rest in God's arms. Bearing this musical identity 
in mind, let us look again at the text of the aria **Mein 
Jesus will es tun". The passage is at once seen to mean 
'^Although thy heart is overwhelmed with heaviness, it 
shall rest gently in His arms". This is one of the cases 
where the meaning of Bach's music becomes clear by the 
comparison of two quite unconnected passages. 

The theme of the opening aria of the cantata for Sexa- 
gesima, LeichtgesimUe Flattergeisler (No. 181) runs thus — 




It is never developed, but simply repeated. One is tempted 
to believe that Bach is painting the 'Tlattergeister" (**light- 
minded people") — the fowls of the air, that pick up the 
seeds — who are referred to in the Gospel for the day 
(Luke VIII, 4 — 15). We instinctively see a swarm of 
crows descending upon a field with beating wings and 
wide-stretched feet. 

In the following aria, the "schadlichen Domen" (**in- 
jurious thorns") are symbolised by the staccaii in the bass. 
A final chorus of much beauty, ^'Lass Hochster uns zu alien 
Zeiten" compensates the hearer for the almost too drastic 
character of the other music. 

The opening chorus of the cantata for the thirteenth 
Sunday after Trinity, Du soUst Gott deinen Herrn lieben 
(No. 77) — 'Thou shalt love the Lord thy God" — is treated 
sjrmbolically. Bach's knowledge of the Bible reminds 



200 XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years lyzi-^iytf, 

him that Christ's answer to the question as to the greatest 
commandment in the law was that the whole of the law 
and the prophets was summed up in the commandment 
to love*. He expresses this in his music by surrounding 
the chorus that announces the new commandment with the 
eantus firmus of the chorale "Dies sind die heil'gen zehn 
Gebot'* ("These are the sacred ten commandments'*) 
in the orchestra. The lesser commandments are represented 
by the theme in crotchets in the trumpet; the bass trom- 
bone of the organ gives it out in minims, signifying the 
greater commandments. The rest of the orchestra, with 
the opening motive of the melody, symbolises the least 
of the commandments, the jots and tittles of the law. 
Just as Jesus derived his new commandment of love from 
the old law, so Bach forms the theme of his chorus out of 
the first intervals of the old chorale. Unfortunately the 
further course of the text gave him no opportunity to write 
particularly striking music. 

The poems of the two cantatas Erfarsche mich GoU 
(No. 136; for the eighth Sunday after Trinity) and Nimm 
was dein ist (No. 144; for Septuagesima), seem to have 
stimulated him so little that he made them up almost 
entirely of old music, as we can see from the faulty declama* 
tion**. The only original portion that has any interest 
is the motet-like chorus "Nimm was dein ist imd gehe 



* Matthew XXII, 34 — 40. In the version in Luke X, 23-37, — 
which is the Gospel for the day, and on which the text of the cantata 
is founded — this concluding passage is lacking. Here we clearly 
see how far afield Bach sometimes goes in order to find character- 
istic ideas for his music, and how he does not hesitate to go past 
his real text if he sees what he wants outside it. 

** The chorus "Erfoxsche mioh Gott" is certainly not original 
In the In Gioria Dei Patris of the A major Mass the effect is better, 
though even here he seems to have made use of some borrowed 
material. The strong proud theme of the duet "Uns treffen zwar 
der Sunden Flecken", again, is wholly alien to this text. Of the 
two arias of the cantata Nimm was dein ist we Can say with con* 
fidence that Bach could not deliberately have declaimed them in 
this way, but that they are fully explained by another text having 
been fitted to the music at a later date. 



Erfanckemich: Ntmmwasdeinisi; DuHirte; IhrM^ntohen, 301 

hin'' ('Take what is thine own and depart"), in which 
the instrumental basses dwell upon the representation 
of the "depart" — 




The cantata for the second Sunday after Easter, Du 
Hifte Israel, hdre (No. 104) takes us into a new world. Is 
the composer who here revels in the most delicate l3nicism 
the same who elsewhere makes his music almost excessively 
diaracteristic? A charming triplet movement runs through 
the first chorus and the final aria, "Begliickte Herde". 
In the aria "Verbirgt mein Hirte sich zu lange . . . mein 
schwacher Schritt eilt dennoch fort" ("My Shepherd 
bides Himself too long, . . . yet I hasten with feeble steps") 
the oboes give a delightful picture of haste. The ravishing 
euphony and the perfect grace of this work ensure its 
immediate effect upon any audience; it is one of the most 
suitable for overcoming the common fear of Bach. 

The cantata of Midsummer day, Ihr Menschen rUkrMt 
Gottes Liebe (No. 167) and that for the seventeenth Sunday 
after Trinity, Btinget dem Herrn Ehre seines Namen (No. 148) 
are also full of simple charm. The final chorale of the 
former, "Sei Lob und Preis", with its joyous orchestral 
accompaniment, is particularly effective. 

The fine text of the cantata for the Sunday after Christ- 
mas, GoUlob, ni0i geht das Jahr zu Ende (No. a6) is by 
Neumeister. The music shows that Bach worked at the 
text with pleasure. He accompanies the words that speak 
of the departure of the old year and the "glorious ap- 
proach" of the new with a merry ballett in the minor — 




Then comes a simple motet-chorus on "Nun lob' meine Seel' 
den Herren", in which the instruments merely reinforce 



202 XXVII. The Cantatas of the Years 172S — 1727. 

the voices. At the end of this movement Bach has written 
"174 bars"! 

The two choruses of the New Year cantata Herr GoU, 
itch loben wit (No. 16) are in a more popularly effective 
style. In the first, the orchestral basses keep up the rhythm 
of the "joy" motive — 




In the second the ifMi is broken by interludes for the solo 
bass. 

The small amount of mjrsticism in the works of this 
epoch is due to the texts. Two cantatas glorify the longing 
for death. The first, Ich lasse dich nicM, du segnesi mich 
denn (No. 157) — a solo cantata for tenor and bass — 
was written for the Feast of the Purification of Mary. The 
S3anphonic accompaniment to the opening duet reminds 
us of the first aria oi Jesus nahm zu sick die Zwdlfe (No. 22). 
Afterwards a joyous light streams with increasing bright- 
ness over the expectation of death. The aria "Ich halte 
meinen Jesum feste" is like a heavenly roundelay. The 
final aria, "Ja, ja, ich halte Jesum feste", is of almost 
extravagant cheerfulness. 

From Picander's poems we learn that this fine cantata 
was produced on the 2nd February 1727, on the Feast of 
the Purification of Mary, and that Bach made use of it 
four dajrs later at the funeral ceremony for the old cham- 
berlain Johann Christian von Ponickau*. 

Death and youth are the subjects of the cantata for the 
sixteenth Sunday after Trinity, Liebskr GoU, wann werd 
ich sterben (No. 8), founded on the Gospel story of the 
widow*s son of Nain (Luke VII, 11— 17). The sun shines 
brightly on the fields as they bear the boy to the gate; 
the flowers of the meadow join in with the bell that peals 



* See Spitta II, 411 If. 



Herr GoU; Ich lasse dich nicki; Liehsiet GoU, 2O3 

from the tower; chirping and humming is heard from near 
and far. Spitta ssys of this orchestral tone-picture that 
it is woven out of the sounds of bells and the scent of flowers, 
and is filled with the spirit of a grave-yard in the spring. 

In the aria ''Was willst du dich, mein Geist, entsetzen, 
wenn meine letzte Stunde schlagt" ("Why wilt thou be 
afraid, my soul, when my last hour strikes'' ), the bdls 
of death are heard in the minor, as if dark clouds were 
casting their shadows over the smiling meadow. These 
are driven away again in the aria "Doch weichet ihr tollen, 
vergeblichen Sorgen . . . mich rufet mein Jesus, wer soUte 
nicht gehn?" ("Away, ye mad, vain cares , . . My Jesus 
calls mie; who would not go?"), in which the jubilant flute 
carries the strings and the voice along with it in a rapid 
gigue. 

This splendid work should not be attempted except 
with a really good orchestra, that is familiar with Bach. 
It is one of the rather few cantatas in which the com- 
poser has most csarefully marked the phrasing and the 
dynamic signs, — which indicates that he wanted special 
care in the performance of it. 



CHAPTER XXVIII. 

THE TRAUERODE 
AND THE ST. MATTHEW PASSION. 

B. G. XIIIS: The Trau&rode. 

B. G. IV: The St Matthew Passion. 

When Queen Ghristiane Eberhardine died, on the 7th Sep* 
tember 1727, all Saxony mourned for her, not merely in 
the four months' public mourning ordered by the Court, 
but with sincere personal grief. After her husband had 

* On Qaeen Christiane Eberhardine see Spttta II, 613-- 615. 



204 XXVIIL The Trauerode and the St. MMhew Passion, 

become a Roman Catholic in 1697, in order to gain the 
crown of Poland, she had lived far from him in quiet sedu- 
xen. The people had venerated the sufferer almost like 
a saint.* 

The memorial ceremony, which took place on the 17th 
October in St. PauFs Church, was not arranged by the 
town council or even the consistory, but had its origin in 
a private impulse. A certain Hans Carl von Kirchbach, 
assessor to the upper court of mines at Freiberg, had asked 
permission of the Court to hold an **ovati<m*' for the 
deceased. As St. Paul's Church, in which the ceremony 
was to take place, was the University church, the invita- 
tions came from the rector. The organiser of the cere- 
mony had commissioned the text for the Trauerode from 
Gottsched. For the music he should really have gone 
to Gdmer, the director of the service at the University 
church. When the senate heard that he had ordered it 
of the St. Thomas cantor, it tried to force him to cancel 
the order. The end of the matter was that Bach received 
permission to write the composition, but it was expressly 
laid down that the permission was granted for that occasion 
only, and that he was not to deduce from it the right 
to compose the music for academic festivals, — and Herr 
von Kirchbach was to give Gomer twelve thalers in com- 
pensation*. 

The title of Bach*s score runs thus: 

"Trauer-Musik, so bey der Lob- und Traaer-Rede, welche auff 
das Absterben Ihro KdnigL Maj. und Churf. Durchl. zu Sachsen* 
Ftauea Chskitianen, Eberhardinen, K5nigin in Pohlexi .... und 
Churforstin zu Sachsen . . . geb. Markgr&fin zu Brandenburg Bay- 
reuth, von dem Hochwohlgeb. Herm von Kirchbach in der Pftu- 
Uner Kirche zu Leipzig gehalten wurde, aufgeliihret worden von 
Joh. Seb. Bach ao 1727 d. iS Oct" ("Funeral music, given on the 
occasion Of Herr von Kirchbach's address of praise and mourning 
for her royal majesty Christiane £berhardine» Queen of Poland . . . 
and Electoral Princess of Saxony . . . n6e Margravine of Branden- 
burg Bayreuth, in St. Paul's Church at Leipzig, — performed by 
Joh. Seb. Bach, 18th Oct. 1727"). 

■■^' ^— W^^il— ^M^— ^»^^.^ 

♦ Sec L 121. 



Tfa» TrM$9rode. ao5 

This date is wrong; it should be the 17th October*. 
At the end of the score there is the date 15th October; 
so that Bach finished his work only two dajrs before the 
performance. It could therefore not have had much 
rehearsal. 

Gottsched's ode is correct, but without poetry or depth. 
It is noteworthy that it does not voice the grief of the 
husband of the dead queen. The poet could not enlarge 
upon this/ for everyone knew how unhappy the marriage 
had been> and how grievously the queen had been wronged 
by her husband. 

Although the text was in strophic form, Bach resolved 
to handle it in a ''modem" fashion, and compose the 
strophes in the form of Italian recitatives and arias. He 
very dexterously surmounted the technical difficulties 
thus placed in his way. 

Forkel was enchanted with the music of the Trauerode. 
"The choruses of this work", he says, "are so attractive 
that no one who has begun to play through them can 
stop till he has gone to the end."** 

The rhythm of solenmity runs through the first chorus, 
"Lass, Fiirstin, lass noch einen Strahl", from b^inniog 
to end. The hearer is so affected by the majestic and 
sombre harmonies that he is unc<mscious of the length of 
the movement. 

The two following movements are dominated by the 
motive of noble grief. In the aria "Verstummt, ihr holden 
Saiten" the violins maintain a continual sobbing and 
sighing — 




* There is an account of the ceremony in Sicnrs Das ihrSnefiiU 
Uitmf {1727). See Spitta II, 616. 

** Forkel, p. 36. (The earlier part of the above citation is avp* 
plied from the context). 



206 XXVIII. The Trauerode and the St MaUh$w Passion^ 

The recitative that speaks of the tolling of the funeral 

bells — 

''Der Glocken bebendes Get5n 

Son uns'rer trQben Seelen Schrecken 

Durch ihr geschwtingnes Erse wecken, 

Und uns durch Mark und Adem gehn. 

O9 kdnnte nur dies bange Klingen, 

Davon das Ohr uns tSgUch gellt, 

Der ganzen Europ&erwdt 

Ein Zeugnis uns'res Jammers bringen" 

is exceedinigly affecting. While the alto sings these words, 
the bells are heard in the orchestra, — first of all the very 
smaU ones, then the larger ones, descending through the 
registers to the bass. Then the peals cease, the flutes 
and oboes being silenced in turn, then the violins and 
violas, until just the two gambas give out the tones, and 
finally the bass alone — 




This representation of the beginning and the ending of a 
peal of bells is as realistic as that of the rapid waves of a 
river in the cantata Christ unset Herr zum Jordan kam 
(No. 7). On the other hand the tolling of the funeral bells 
in the cantata Liebster GoU, wann werd^ ich sUrben (No. 8) 
is a more idealised pictxu'e, which allows Bach to expand 
it into a large movement. In the Traueroie the brevity 
is an essential part of the effect of the picture, which com- 
prises only eleven bars. 

At the moment when "the bells' quivering tones" die 
away, death and its pangs are conquered; and hence- 
forth the music is, as it were, transfigured. The theme of 
the gambas in the aria "Wie starb die Heldin so vergniigt" 
(''How happy was she in her death"), is like a smile of 
celestial serenity — 



The Trauerode, 



ao7 



The succeeding recitative ends with the words '^Ach selig. 
wessen groBer Geist sich iiber die Natur erhebet, vor Gnift 
und Sargen nicht erbebet, wenn ihn sein SchSpfer scheiden 
heifif' (^'Happy he whose great spirit is raised above nature, 
and is not terrified by the tomb, when his Maker bids him 
depart"). The peace that faUs upon these victorious 
ones when they reach the shore of eternity is described 
by Bach in a wonderful tranquil figure in the bass, that 
persists from the beginning to the end of the movement — 




The figures in the two oboi d'amore above these tranquil 
waves look like a transfiguration of the "joy" motive — 




In the aria "Der Ewigkeit saphimes Haus zieht, Fiirstin, 
deine heitem Blicke von unsrer Niedrigkeit zuriicke" 
("From the sapphire house of eternity turn, oh princess, 
thy serene glance on our lowliness") Bach's mysticism 
finds exuberant expression. Over a simple accompaniment 
the flute has an arabesque that is like a saintly dance — 




Besides these soli the work contains two splendid choruses, 
the one — "An dir, du Vorbild groBer Fraiien" — is in 
fugal form; the other, — the final chorus "O Konigin, du 
stirbest nicht" — is in simple song-^form, flowing along 
in gentle triplets. 

In the orchestration of the Trauerode Bach endeavours, 
by the use of the oboe d'amore, gambas and lutes, to 



ao8 XXVIII. The Ttauerodt luul the SU Matthew Passion. 

clbtaln a peculiar colour, which however is rarely realised 
in pres^it^day performances, since gamba and lute players 
are scarce, and the parts have to be given to the ordiniauy 
strings. It is very interesting to note that having the 
lutes there. Bach emplo3rs them, when they are not playing 
obbhgato parts, in strengthening the orchestral basses. 
This shows how much imp<H*tance he attached to the prom- 
inence of these fundamental figures. Had he always had 
the lutes at his disposal, he would often have used them in 
the cantatas to reinforce the cantinuo. 

The figured organ part has unfortunately been lost 
with the original parts of the score. The autograph score 
is almost illegible, and has evidently been written in great 
haste, as was to be expected in the case of so large a work 
composed in two or three weeks. 

Rust did this splendid work the great serWce of adding 
to it, in the Bachgesellschaft edition, a new poetical version 
of his own for All Souls' Day, which is now generally 
used, — for every performance of the Trauerode cannot 
be given in memory of Christiane Eberhardine! 

When Bach began the composition of the 5/. Matthew 
Passion^ in the autunm of 1728, he received, in the middle 
of November, the news of the death of his friend Prince 
Leopold of Cothen, and a commission for some music for 
the funeral ceremonies. These apparently took place 
some three months after the death of the Prince; the exact 
date is not known. Bach of course could not compose 
a new work so quickly at a time when he had the 5/. Mat- 
thew Passion on hand; so he asked Picander to write the 
text for the mourning ode in such a way that it could be 
adapted to the movements already written of the Passion. 
The work performed in honour of the Prince was thus made 
up of eight arias and the final chorus of the St. Matthew 
Passion. For the text of the opening chorus, "'Klaget, 
Kinder, klagt es aller Welt", Bach used the first chorus 
of the Trauerode, which indicates that the opening chorus 
of the Passion was not finished at that time. 



The Text of the St, MaUhew Passion. 20g 

This was the mourning music for double chorus the 
score of which Forkel possessed. It is noteworthy that 
he does not seem to have observed the identity of this 
music with that of the St. Matthew Passion, for otherwise 
he would sxu'ely have remarked upon it. Spitta con- 
j^tures that Forkel had only a very superficial knowledge 
of the Passion. When an inventory was made of his musical 
manuscripts after his death in i8i8» the autograph of the 
CSthen mourning music was missing ; nor has it since been 
found. The loss of one of Bach's finest works was long 
deplored, until Rust, in the preface to B. G. XX« (1870), 
proved from the nature of the text that we have the music 
in the St. Matthew Passion. 

If we compare the two texts, we are astbtmded to find 
with what superficial agreement Bach was satisfied. 
Imagine, for example, the words '^Geh', Leopold, zu deiner 
Ruhe" ("Go, Leopold, to thy rest") simg to the melody 
of the tenor aria "Ich will bei meinem Jesu wachen" ("I 
will watch by my Jesus**) from the Passion! With the 
declamation treated in this way, we can easily understand 
that the new poem took not the least account of the poetic 
and pictorial intentions of the music. It is almost in- 
credible that the Bach who had written the 5/. Matthew 
Passion is the same Bach who took this music, with all it 
expresses, and parodied it so grievously: 

The text of the St. Matthew Passion has been put to- 
gether with the greatest care. Bach may have had too poor 
an opinion of the Passion poeto that Picander wrote for 
him in 1725* to give him a free hand on this occasioh. We 
get the impression that he sketched the plan of the work 
in all its details, and that Picander worked literally under 
his observation. 

From Brockes* Passion he took the "Daughter of Zion****. 
For the texts of the arias Picander was allowed to employ 



* See p. 173. 

** Upon Brookes' Pdesion and its sigoificftace in eonnection 
with Bach see 1. 93 ff. 

Schwetttcr Bach. 11. I^ 



210 XXVIII, The Trauerodc and the St. Matthew Passion, 

certain poetic ideas from the poems of Bach's Weimar 
librettist, Franck. Some ideas from the Passion of 1725 
were also taken up again and improved. 

The dramatic plan is at once simple and ingenious. 
The story of the Passion is cast into the form of a series 
of pictures. At the characteristic points the narrative 
breaks off, and the scene that has just passed is made the 
subject of a pious meditation. This is effected in arias 
that are usually led up to by an arioso-like recitative. 
At minor resting-points the feelings of the Christian specta- 
tors are expressed in chorale verses. The choice of these 
fell to Bach, since no poet of that epoch who had any 
respect for himself would be troubled with a secondary 
task of that kind. It is just in the insertion of these chorale 
strophes that the full depth of Bach's poetic sense is re- 
vealed. It would be impossible to find, in the whole of 
the hymns of the German church, a verse better fitted 
to its particular purpose than the one Bach has selected. 

Altogether the St. Matthew Passion falls into about 
twenty-four scenes, — twelve smaller ones, indicated by 
chorales, and twelve larger ones, marked by arias. The 
problem of representing the action of the Passion and at 
the same time of giving due weight to the devotional 
element is solved in the most perfect way imaginable. The 
more we realise the dramatic plan of the 5/. Matthew 
Passion the more we are convinced that it is a masterpiece. 

Bach's cooperation was an excellent stimulus to Pi- 
cander. In the 5/. Matthew Passion he has produced his 
best poem; the diction is animated and extremely rich in 
pictures ; and there are few of those insipidities of his that 
annoy us in his other works. The situations are concisely 
described, and the reflections are simple but often really 
profound. The texts of the arioso-recitatives are indeed 
the best he ever wrote; they have a musical effect even 
when we merely read them. 

Experience of the St. Matthew Passion makes us regret 
that Bach and Picander did not write a year's set of can- 



&). Af'Sj.-.'S, 



Bach's Handwriting (Fair Copy) 

Reduced racsimile of l page of the "St. Matthevr Passion" 



The Choruses. axx 

tatas in collaboration, the one contributing the depth of 
his devotion, the other the dexterity and the wealth of 
his diction. 

Even when the text was completed Bach made altera-^ 
tions in it. Picander had cast the opening in the form of 
an aria with chorus, like the first movement in the Second 
Part. He thought the words "Kommt, ihr Tochter, helft 
mir klagen" (**Come, ye daughters, help me to mourn") 
and *^het . . . den Brautigam ! seht ihn . . « als wie ein 
Lamm'* C^See, the bridegroom . . . like a lamb") should 
be sung by the daughter of Zion, while the chorus should 
<Mily mterject the **Whom? . . . How? . . . What?" Bach's 
musical sense made him think otherwise. He saw Jesus 
being led through the town to the cross ; his eye caught 
sight of the crowd surging through the streets; he 
heard them calling to and answering each other. It 
was this vision that prompted him to cast the introduction 
to the Passion in the form of a great double chorus. The 
singular pronoun remains, — "Kommt, ihr Tochter, helft 
mir klagen" — as if to testify to the violence done to the 
text. 

It is thus a mistake to conceive this double chorus as 
an expression of ideal grief, and to render it delicately and 
slowly. It is realistic in intention, and depicts a crowd 
moving excitedly about, crying aloud, roaring. The vocal 
parts are not coloratura, but a reproduction of the con- 
flicting voices of a large crowd. This is evident from the 
nature of the first phrase for the sopranos — 




Kommt - - • ihr Ttfeh-ter helft ndr kU • • gen! 

If this conception be the right one, the orchestral prelude 
also should be played with heavy accents and a certain 
inward unrest, so that an impression of uneasiness may 
come from the pauses of the bass on the same notes and the 
dreadful inexorability of the harmonies. In any case the 

14* 



212 XXVIII. Th« TfoiufcdB and the St MtUthew Passion. 

tempo here is usually too dragging; and the mote we study 
the chorus the more we are convinced that the effect 
should come mainly from the drastic quality of the decktna* 
tion rather than from factitious dynamic shading. 

We have the same experience with the chorale-chortis 
**0 Mensch bewein* dein Siinde giross** ("0 Man, thy grievous 
sin lament**) at the end of the First Part. The orchestral 
accompaniment is based on the motive of noble grief — 




If we look at the instrumental part alone we are tenipted 
to take the movement in a somewhat solemn tempo; but 
if we have regard to the chorus, we shall accelerate the 
tempo considerably. On closer examination we discover 
that the figuration of the separate lines of the chorale is 
most moving, and the effect of it is quite lost if it is not 
taken with some animation. So we are led to choose 
a tempo that perhaps appears too fast for the orchestral 
part, but at once justifies itself on the entry of the chorus. 
As the problem throughout is to reconcile two different 
tempi, the utmost possible flexibility is needed. It is 
therefore advisable to dispense with the usual folUfUandi 
and diminuendi in order to avoid breaking up the text 
unnecessarily and preventing the hearer from perceiving 
the logical unity of the movement. The tempo should be 
slackened only where the words and the musical phrase 
demand it — e. g. at the words *%nserer Siinde schwere 
BClrd" ("the heavy burden of our sins"). How the .«id 
of the movement should be rendered is doubtfuL The 
adagiosissimo that Bach has noted in the last bar of the 
chorale prelude Mensch beweifC dein Siinde grois (Peters 
V, No. 45) leads us to think that chonis and ordiestra 
should here also die away softly in a slow tatterOa^. 

The final chorus of the Secotid Part, like that Of the 
St. John Passion, is conceived as a piece of burial music. 



Tb9 CberoBos. 



aX3 



I{«re alio the peculiar falling motives determine the cfa^r- 
acter of the movement; the eye seems to follow the body 
into the grave. To bring out the full magic of the move* 
ment, the bass figures of this type — 




shoul4 be brought out softly but clearly. 

In the choruses of the people we see the great difference 
between the narratives of the Passion in John and Matthew, 
a difference which Bach has reproduced in his music. In the 
St, J ohm Passicm their predominant feeling is one of dra- 
miitic excitement ; in the St. MaUhew Passion the choruaes 
have a certain epic tranquillity. They are shorter, and 
in some respects more musical, their objects not being, 
as in parts of the other Passions, to create the effect of 
lo|ig*drawn and conflicting cries. In the S/. John Passion 
the people's choruses are the bearer of the action; in the 
St MaUk$w Passion they are only a part of the narrative. 
Compare the '"Crucify Him*' in the two works, and note 
that Qach has not written any chorus upon the "^Barabbas** 
passage. 

In the choruses round the cross — "Der du den Tempel 
Gottes zerbrichst" ("Thou who destroyest the temple of 
God") and "Andem hat er geholfen" ("He helped others")— 
there is more of the daemonic quality of the choruses of 
the St John Passion. The words "So steig herab vom 
Kreuz" (*Then descend from the cross") are very effectively 
illustrated in the music. The bass figure runs thus — 



^'" ^ ^ D 




Unfortunately much of the fine instrumental detail of these 
choruses of the people is generally lost in performance, 
our orchestras being much too weak in comparison with 



214 XXVIIt. The Ttmuefede and th« St, Maiikew Pamon* 

our choruses. Who can hear the arrogant laughter in the 
flutes at the words "Wahrlich, du bist auch einer von denen'* 
("Truly thou also art one of them")? Who can hear them 
in the "Crucify Him'*, m the "Prophesy unto us'\ in "What 
is that unto us", in "His blood be upon us"? Whereas 
the other instruments more or less agree with the voice 
parts, Bach, in these choruses, assigns a quite independent 
part to the united flutes. A good effect would often be 
made here, as in many of the choruses of the St. John 
Passion, by adding a piccolo. 

It is strange how little thought is taken for the dramatic 
situation in our present-day arrangement of the choir. 
We actually hear four hundred singers giving out such 
passages as "Where wilt thou that we prepare the Pas- 
sover", "Lord, is it I" (spoken by the twelve disciples), 
the "Truly thou also art one of them" (spoken by the two 
soldiers and the maid), and "Truly this man was the Son 
of God" (spoken by the centurion and the guard at the 
cross). Bach had three, or at most four, voices to each 
part. For the whole of the St. Matthew Passion, with 
its double choruses, he had to copy out only eight voice 
parts. None was doubled, though the violin parts were, 
in both choruses. Thus for Bach the question never arose 
of whether he should employ the whole or only a part of 
the choir; but it is decidedly a question for us, in view 
of the enormous choirs of today. Perhaps it will become 
the general practice to allot the above-mentioned choruses 
to a small choir of five or six voices to a part, for the sake 
not only of the dramatic situation but of the musical effect. 
We must get rid of the erroneous notion that only a large 
choir is effective in a church. 

No analysis could do justice to the beauty and the 
consummate expressiveness of the recitatives of Christ 
and the Evangelist in the narrative of the Passion. It will 
be noticed that the words of Christ are set in a more arioso- 
like recitative than those of the Evangelist. Tliey are also 
accompanied by the strings alone. At the entry of the 



The Recitatives. 



215 



soft and luminous harmonies of the violins we seem to see 
the halo round the head of the Saviour. 

The declamation of the Evangelist is, as a rule, quite 
plain in character and objective in its painting. This gives 
all the greater effect to certain words that are underlined 
in the accompaniment or delivered in a melisma, such as 
the "and began to be sorrowful and very heavy", the "and 
feU on His face and prayed", in the Gethsemane scene, 
and the "wept bitterly" after the denial of Peter. The 
words of Jesus are set more elaborately; yet here again we 
wonder at the simplicity of the means employed. As a 
rule Bach needs only a simple cadence in order to throw 
a particular word into strong relief. Only rarely does 
the orchestral picture attract attention on its own account. 
The words of the crowd as it is dispersing are reproduced 
in a few diverging harmonies. In the verse "And when they 
had sung a hymn, they went out into the mount of olives", 
some heavy steps in the bass — 




s}rmbolise the Saviour setting out upon His path of sorrow. 
His gait is quite different later, when He has put off earthly 
form and appears transfigured. The orchestra suggests this 
buoyant tread in the moment when the Arisen One promises 
His disciples that He will go before them into Galilee — 




UttP tf Tpl^j^ p 



If these pictorial details are not clearly and expressively 
brought out in the orchestra, the hearer cannot be conscious 
of them, e. g. in the accompaniment to the words of Jesus 
to the sleeping disciples at Gethsemane. In the motive — 




2X6 XXVIII. Thci Trauwoie and the Si. MaUhem Pat$Um. 

we sbould be made to see the Lord, His heart faU of anguish, 
shaking His disciples to rouse them from their sleep. As 
a rule, however, the violins take the passage and. the trill 
so softly that none of the proper excitement is communi- 
cated to the audience. Again in the passage in which Jesus 
prophesies to the judge, ''Ye shall see the Son of man 
fitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the cloudy 
of h^veq'', the semiquaver figure that depicts the clouds 
that are to be His throne accumulating on the horizon 
hardly ever makes its proper effect. 

The accompaniment to Christ*s words at the supper 
does not ejq>ress grief, but the triumphant confidence of 
the Lord, who, at this mournful last supper, promises His 
disciples that He will again drink of the fruit of the vine 
with them in heaven*. 

For the performance of 1829 Mendelssohn orchestrated 
the accompaniment to ''And behold, the veil of the temple 
was rent". This is contrary to Bach's intentions. All he 
is concerned with are the scale figures that represent the 
tearing. The organist should co-operate in these, as they 
never come out de^urly enough in the violoncellos and basses 
alone; the chords should be played on another manual, 
with stops of an intense but not too strong quality. The 
widespread opinion that the organist here must indulge 
in a fortissimo fantasia has neither historical nor artistic 
foundation. In this place, as in the whole of the Evangelist's 
part, the chief thing is and must be the declamation of 
the narrative of the Passion ; the accompaniment must 
only co-operate by means of suggestion. In the arias, on 
the other hand, the music is self-subsistent. It expresses 
ideas and represents events. Here we may almost say 
that the instnunental part is not an accompaniment to 
the voice part, but vice versd. 

On closer consideration of these movements, two things 
strike us; in the first place, the pictorial intention of the 



^ On this passage see also pp. 37 and 3$. 



The Arlaa. 



217 



themes is unmistakeable ; in the seeoad place* there jis a 
thematic connection between the arias and the arioso* 
like recitatives. In jnai^y cases the theme of the aria is 
derived frp^x the same musical idea as the accompaniment 
to the preceding arioso-recitative. 

It goes without saying that these peculiarities of the 
"reflective** music in the St Matthew Passion are not 
alwa}^ equally evident. Where the text and the situation 
offer nothing that is specially pictorial, the music of pure 
feeling enters into its rights. This is particularly the case 
in the first and last solo pieces. In the arioso "Am Abend, 
da es kuhle war" ("When evening brought the cooling 
shade**) Bach expresses the tranquil peace of the falling 
twilight; the aria "Mache dich, mein Herze, rein** ("Oh, 
my heart, now make thee pure*') expresses a joy that is 
exuberant and cafan by timis. These two movements are 
unique of their kind. Again and again we ask ourselves what 
it is in these tones that makes them so perfectly suggest all 
that is mysterious and inexpressible in the holy mood that 
descends upon us when we think of the descent from the cross. 

There is a thematic affinity between the earlier solo 
movements of the St. Matthew Passion^ — the arioso "Du 
lieber Heiland**, the aria "Buss und Reu'*, and the aria 
"Blute nur, du liebes Herz". In all three the text speaks 
of tears, sighs, laments; the music is therefore dominated 
by the "sighing** motive that is so characteristic of Bach -•- 

Ariooo-Recit^tive. '*Da lieber Heiland, du". 




Aria. "Busa und Reu". 

m 




2X8 XXVIII. The Trauefode and the St, Matthew Passion. 



Aria. "Blute nur, dn liebes Herz". 




The music here should really sob! To achieve this, how- 
ever, the instrumentalists should bring out the tied notes 
and make them soxmd like veritable sighs, and generally 
realise all that Bach meant by his phrasing here. The 
singers, indeed, must bear their share of the guilt for the 
wrongful rendering of these movements ; as a rule they take 
the tempo so slowly and make the rhythm so uncertain 
with their raUentandi that it is impossible to give the or- 
chestral part its proper meaning. 

In the aria ^'Blute nur'* the tempo should be moderately 
fast. Particular care must be taken that the orchestra 
does not accent the theme on the strong beats, but brings 
out in the first bar the second quaver and the last crotchet, 
in the second bar the second and last crotchets, in the 
sixth bar the second and sixth quavers, and this in such 
a way that the other notes are almost lost by the side of 
them. 

This music, in virtue of its fundamental motive and 
its affecting quality, stands on the borderline between the 
art of pure feeling and the art of representation. How 
quick Bach's imagination is, even here, to seize upon the 
slightest pretext for tone-painting may be seen from the 
fact that in the aria "Buss und Reu" he employs a motive 
characteristic of the dropping of tears at the words "Dass 
die Tropfen meiner Zahren" ("that my tear-drops") — 




In the accompaniment to the arioso "Wiewohl mein Herz 
in Tranen schwinunt" ("Although my heart with tears 
overflow") the orchestra depicts the floods of tears — 



The Arias. 2x9 




The accents should fall not on the strong beats, but on 
the second, fourth, sixth and last quavers each time. 

In the bright aria in G major, *'Ich will dir mein Herze 
schenken" ("Lord, to Thee my heart I offer"), the laments 
for Jesus, that fill the earlier contemplative scenes of the 
SL Matthew Passion^ terminate in a joyous confession. 

In Gethsemane there are three scenes mainly charac- 
terised by devotional meditation, — Jesus' arrival with 
His disciples; His prayer; His capture. 

The contemplative element enters in the verse "Meine 
Seele ist betriibt bis in den Tod; bldbet hier und wachet 
mit mir'' ("My soul is exceeding sorrowful, even unto death; 
tarry ye here and watch with me'*). The first half of the 
text, dealing with the agony of Jesus' soul, is expressed 
in the recitative "O Schmerz, hier zittert das gequalte 
Hcrz!" ("O grief I His tortured heart at last doth quail"); 
the second half, the prayer that they will stay and watch 
with Him, is devoted to the aria "Ich will bei meinem Jesu 
wachen" ("I stand beside my Saviour watching"). 

The first aria is accompanied by the anguished sighs 
of the flutes and oboes — 




This is accompanied by a persistent semiquaver tlirobbing 
of the basses on the one tone. That these semiquavers 
express terror and trembling is shewn by their employ- 
ment in the cantata Ewigkeii, du Donnerwort (No. 60); 
moreover, they merely continue the throbbing of the qua- 
vers that, a moment before, accompanied the words of 
Jesus, "My soul is exceeding sorrowful imto death". The 
sense of the passage will only be properly conveyed in 



220 XXVIIL The Trautroii and the Si. MaUhew Pasiion. 

performance when the wood«wind have learned th^t the qua* 
vers are not to be played evenfy, hut with accents on two 
quavers only in each bar, — the third and the seventh — 
all the, rest, even those coming on a strong beat of the baf*, 
being taken merely as preliminary or supplementary 
to these. Then not only shall we hear the sighs, but the 
accompaniment will become so transparent that the voice 
part can make itself heard without straining, instead of 
being buried under the flutes and oboes, as it generally 
is. If the bass is to be effective, it must be phrased thus — 




It is the antagonism between the accentuation of the bass 
and that of the flutes that gives the music the pained unrest 
that Bach intended to suggest. 

In the fine interjectory chorale, again, ''Was ist die 
Ursach aller solcher Plagen" ("Why does He suffer aU 
these bitter pains?") we must be conscious of the anguish 
and grief in the words of the faithful. It should be sung 
pianissimo, with a certain urgency of movement, the words 
being given out, as it were, in excited whispers. 

The chorus **So schlafen unsre Siinden ein" ("Then laid 
to rest our sins will be") in the following aria must be 
breathed softly, as if in a dream; but care must be taken 
that the tempo is not too slow; it is determined not by the 
chorus but by th<i lyatchnian^s signal — 




The significance of this motive will of course only be dear 
to the hearer when the wind emphasise not the semiquavers 
but the four constituent notes of the signal — 




tht Arias. 



221 



the last note taking the chief accent — the semiquavers 
being nlerely the filling-in of the pause. 

The player in Gethsemane is treated in a recitative- 
arioso and aria. In the arioso *'Der Heibnd fallt vor seinem 
Vater nicder'* (*The Saviour low before His Father falleth**) 
the orchestra has an accompaniment of falling settiiqua- 
vers — 




Only after the words ^^dadurch erhebt er mich und alle 
von xmserm Falle hinauf zu Gottes Gnade wieder" ("And 
thtis by His own tribulation, for our salvation, our souls 
to God's great mercy calleth") is there a momentary 
reveraion to ascending figures. 

The theme of the aria "Geme will ich mich bequemea 
Kreuz imd Becher anzvmehmen" ("Gladly will I leave 
him never. Cross and Cup be mine for ever'') runs thus — 




It sj^bo^es humble obeisance; first thete is a dtocetit» 
then an attempt to rise, ending in a final descent. Sitnilar 
motives with the same s3m:ibolical purpose fi^uently 
appear in the cantatas. The whole nature of the structure 
of the theme indicates that it is to be rendered — espe- 
cially in the final descending passage — with a certain 
heaviness; then the hearer will really see before Mfn a 
human body descending 16wer and loiwer. 

In the duet **So ist mein J6sus nun gefangen" ('"Betrayed 
it Jjifds n6w, my Saviour**) we must start out frotai the 
conception that Bach's music is before everjrthiilig dse 



222 XXVIII. The Trauerode and the St MaUkew p08si4m. 

the painting of a situation. His musical picture is decided 
by the words "Sie fuhren ihn, er ist gefangen** ("In bondage 
held, away they bear Him"). He sees the crowd moving 
about among the gloomy trees of Gethsemane, driving 
before it Jesus in bonds; and he imagines a number of 
the faithful following Him with their laments and cries of 
"Lasst ihn, haltet, bindet nicht" ("Leave Him, leave 
Him, bind Him not''). The music thus depicts a scene 
full of motion. Its two chief motives are so constructed 
that their co-operation gives a tense four-four rhythm — 

Wind instruxnents. Strings. 



j,»rHl , Vr. | IJ.J' l 'J^ 




The almost march-like character of the whole piece is 
accentuated by the regular quaver-movement that relieves 
the syncopated motive and dominates the long-drawn 
unisano of the strings. Most decisive, however, are the 
crotchets, also in unison in the strings, that suggest the 
sound of footsteps. If we hear, at the words "Sie fiihren 
ihn, er ist gefangen", this progression — 



clearly brought out, the meaning of the music is at once 
evident. As it is usually performed, however, we do not 
hear these steps, and are not made aware of the peculiar 
march-like movement of the piece. The excessive rallef^ 
tandi that the singers spread over it deprive it of all rhythm *, 
it has a merely vacillating effect, and the separate instru- 
ments tumble over each other, till everyone longs for the 
grateful moment when the chorus "Sind Blitze, sind Donner'* 
("Are lightnings and thunder") puts an end to the in- 
tolerable sound. The intended effect comes at once, how- 
ever, if a firm and somewhat urgent rh)rthm be adopted, 
that carries the voices along with it. On closer examina- 



The Arias. 223 

tion one is even tempted to believe that the coloratwa 
is meant to imitate the cries and laments upon the way. 

To achieve a proper performance, again, we must restore 
to its rights the directions in the autograph score, "Vio- 
loncelli concordant violis'*. Rietz most inexcusably 
suppressed this indication in the edition of the SL Mat- 
thew Passion he brought out for the Bachgesellschaft, 
only mentioning it in a note in the preface, where he could 
be sure that it would not be seen. He omitted it from the 
score because he could not find a violoncello part for this 
chorus among the original orchestral parts. He never con- 
sidered that Bach's cellists could play the part an octave 
lower, from the viola copies. The violoncellos must 
therefore be added to the unisono of the other strings in 
this duet if it is to have its proper foundation. 

The aria "Ach windct euch nicht so, geplagte Seelen" 
('*Ah, writhe not so, tormented souls"), that was at one 
time in the St, John Passion* y gives us a remarkable com- 
mentary upon this duet in the St. Matthew Passion. It 
has an exact parallel to the syncopated motive of the 
latter, in this form — 




Here there can be no doubt that the motive is meant to 
symbolise the "Winden" (**writhing"). We may therefore 
assume that when Bach used it in the St. Matthew Passion 
he saw before him the captive Saviour writhing in His 
fetters. 

The disappointment we so frequently experience in the 
chorus "Sind Blitze, sind Donner" ("Are lightnings and 
thunders") is generally the fault of the organist, who over- 
whelms everything with his continual fortissimo chords, 
and makes the strongest choir seem impotent. Of course 
the rolling semiquavers that suggest distant thunder — 



♦ It will be found in B. G. XIIS pp. 148—151 



224 XXVin. The Ttauerode and the St Matthew Pmssian. 




that are the foundation of the movement, are completely 
lost. The chief duty of the organist, — Bach's own score 
prescribes it to him — is to bring out these semiquaver 
runs; long-held chords should be played strongly on the 
third manual, and short chords, that are effective in hold- 
ing the whole together, on the first. If the bass figure 
comes out clearly the effect of the chorus is assured. 

The Second Part of the Si. Matthew Passion opens again 
in Gethsemane. The tumult has died away. Night has 
fallen. The Daughter of Zion wanders through the lonely 
garden, seeking her Lord. '*Ach! nun ist mein Jesu hin** 
she wails ("Ah, now is my Saviour gone"). The chorus of 
the faithful follow her and strive to console her. Bach re* 
produces this situation in his theme. It consists of two 
motives. The first — 




depicts the steps of the Daughter of Zioii as she rushes 
hither and thither, pauses, turns in another direction, 
again rushes forward, and again stands still and looks 
around. The meaning of the motive is assured by its af- 
finity with many "step" motives in the cantatas. A con- 
clusive proof may be had by comparing it with the bass 
theme of the aria "Ach, wo hoi* ich Armer Rat" ("Ah, 
where shall I, wretched one, take counsel") in the cantata 
Es ist nictUs Gesundes an mdnem Leibe (No. 25), in which 
Bach is again depicting some one rushing about distract- 
edly — 




The Arias. 



235 



Notice also the "steps" in the accompaniment, e. g., — 




The second motive, which is attached to the first, re- 
produces the laments and cries of the Daughter of Zion. 
In its first part we have the chromatic "grief* motive, 



ft 






• 




V 1 




:" 1 ] 


1 


ML 1. 1 


J 


i 


m 


-^ 


fm iU* 


*• 


^v fr 




1 


~_1i 1 1 


\r ^ 








— r 



intensified and made more dreadful by the insertion here 
and there of intervals of the seventh, and sighs that cul- 
minate in wild shrieks. The passage runs thus — 



lA M I Liffr f r r 1 1?- i -sJ^ffffftrfH 



|i*» LLf I flj" I ^ 1 



The explanation of the theme gives the clue — other- 
wise missing — to the way in which it should be per- 
formed. At the commencement the first two quavers, 
as Bach himself indicates in his phrasing — must be de- 
tached from each other, the second receiving the main 
accent. Only in this way, and played heavily, will it 
suggest the steps. Later on, the trills are to be played 
vehemently; the penultimate note of the ascending run 
cannot be emphasised too strongly, so that the audience 
may really hear the awful sequences 




The end should not be played languishingly, but harshly^ 
with a crescendo and a forward impulse. The tempo should 
be restless and urgent. Wherever the voice is silent. Bach 



Sckweitter, B«ch. U. 



»5 



226 XXVIII. The Trauerode and the St. Matthew Piston. 

has indicated forte. In the introductory bars the hearer 
should be horror-struck ; he should see the distracted woman 
rushing about and wringing her hands in the gloomy 
wood. Nor should the characteristic rh3rthms and inter- 
vals be obscured even in the piano accompaniment to the 
voice. Conceived in this way, not only is the instrumental 
accompaniment made more effective, but the solo and the 
chorus make a finer effect if they are sung with some 
animation and a sense of anguish, instead of sentimental 
rallentandi and accelerandi. 

The theme of the aria "Geduld, Geduld! wenn mich 
falsche Zimgen stechen" ("Endure, endure! though lying 
tongues upbraid me") is also composed of two motives. 
The tranquil quavers s3anbolise the word "Geduld"; in 
the following bars we see the sharp tongues shooting forth — 




The theme of the aria "Erbarme dich'* ("Thy mercy 
show, oh God") is derived from the melisma of the preceding 
recitative "and wept bitterly" — 



Recitative. 




und wei 



ne - te bit - ter - lich. 



Aria: "Erbarme dich". 




The contemplative words are thus sung to music in which 
we can recognise the weeping of Peter. 



The Arias. 



aa7 



The aria "Gcbt mir meinen Jesum wieder** ("Give me 
back my Lord beloved*') affords us almost the best proof 
of how bent Bach is on reproducing in his music whatever 
the eye sees and the ear hears. The joyous music 
(G major) has apparently nothing to do with the reflec- 
tions upon Judas' betrayal. Bach» however, has really 
derived it from his text. He fastens on the words "Seht 
das Geld, den Morderlohn, wirft euch der verlome Sohn 
2u den FiiBen nieder!" ("Lo, the price for murder paid, 
now in guilty tribute laid"). In accordance with this 
he first of all writes a rapid ascending figure that suggests 
the entry of Judas and the motion of the hand with which 
he throws away the money, and then the rolling and clinking 
of the silver on the stone floor of the temple. Thus this 
theme also is a bipartite one. In estimating the first 
motive we must not forget that in the aria "Kein* Frucht 
das WeizenkSmlein bringt, es fall denn in die Erde" ("The 
wheat brings forth no fruit, let it fall then to the earth'*) 
in the cantata Ach liebcn Christen seid getrost (No. 114), 
Bach represents the motion of the sower's arm. In per- 
formance Bach's own phrasing should be noted and the 
music accented in accordance with it. 

\ria: "Gebt znir meinen Jesum wieder"; first motive. 

tr 



^,».;J'j^,j^JJ|J:^^ 



Ditto: second motive. 




m 



When once the meaning of the music has been grasped, 
performers will not attempt to give the orchestral 

15* 



afl8 XXVIII. The Tramrode and the Si, MaUhsw Paision. 

accompaniment an elegiac tinge by plashing it tenderly and 
sentimentally; they will play it with the freshness and 
naturalness that belong to it, bringing oat the staccaH 
and the intermediary scale passages. 

The recitative-arioso **Er hat uns alien wohlgetan** 
(^The Lord for all men good hath done*') and the aria 
"Aus Liebe will mein Heiland sterben** ("Through loving 
my dear Saviour dieth*') form a point of repose in this 
succession of very animated and pictorial movements. 
How Bach wished the aria to be performed is doubtful. 
Should it be sung tranquilly and radiantly, or more like 
a rhapsody, with a certain pathos in the declamation? 
The three following contemplative movements relate to 
the scourging of Jesus, His falling under the weight of the 
cross, and the hour of death on Golgotha. All are pictorial 
in conception. The motives of the recitative-ariosos and 
those of the arias depict the same situation. 

First Scene, "Then released he Barabbas unto them; 
and when he had scourged Jesus, he delivered Him to be 
crucified." 

During the arioso "Erbarm' es GottI hier steht der Hei- 
land angebunden. O Geisselung! O Schlag*, o Wundenf* 
("Have mercy, Godl Lo, hand and foot their chains have 
bound Him ! with cruel lash and scourge they wound Him") 
we hear, in the orchestra, the falling of the scourge — 




As the aria "Konnen Tranen meiner Wangen nichts er- 
langen, o so nehmt mein Herz hinein" (^Though in \'ain 
be all my waiUng, naught availing, oh receive this heart of 
mine*') is also sung during the scourging, its theme con^- 
tains a motive that likewise depicts the blows. Mingled 
with it now, however, are the imploring cries of the faith- 
f ul soul ; to the motive of scourging is appended a sequence 



The Arias. 

of semiquavers that embody a shriek, 
peculiar form of the th^ne — 



229 
This explains the 




The significance resides in the final intervals. The two last 
notes cannot be thrown into too high relief, so that the cries 




£ 



^ 



m 



m 



rij' i ^nrn 



may literally pierce the hearer's soul. The meaning of the 
second motive is indicated in the fact that the vocal part 
is founded on it. The tempo should be as animated as 
possible; even when the accompaniment is toned down 
at the entry of the voice, the proper force must be given 
to the characteristic rhythms and intervals; the singer 
must let the orchestra carry her with it; then the move- 
ment will be most impressive in its effect. 

Second Seme. "And as they came out, they found a 
man of Cyrene, Simon by name; him they compelled to 
bear His cross." 

The accompaniment to the recitative-arioso "Ja freilich 
will in uns das Fleisch und Blut zum Kreuz gezwungen 
sein" ("Aye, surely now can flesh and blood atone, if the 
CroK hold them bound"), depicts the last tottering steps 
of Jesus under the cross. We see Him stumbling forward 
and at last falling — 



fXr t* ,7 " 7 7 y; i — 





For the motive to express what it is intended to, the quavers 
that follow the two semiquavers must of course be strongly 
accented. 



230 XXVIII. The Trauerode and the Si. Matthew Pasiion, 



In the aria ^'Komm, siisses Kreuz, so will ich zagen, 
mein Jesu gib es immer her" ("Oh blessed Cross, be mine 
to share it, my Saviour, grant this evermore"), the motive 
of falling notes is transformed into one of strength. Simon 
of C3rrene has taken the burden on himself, and strides 
out energetically imder it, — 




The continue accompaniment gives the music a march- 
like character* That tempo is right that suggests a heavy, 
measured walk. The gamba solo should be played with a 
certain vigour, and the demisemiquavers properly accented. 

Third Scene. "And sitting down they watched Him 
there » . . The thieves also which were crucified with Him 
cast the same in His teeth''. 

The mocking crowd has disappeared; the jeering thieves 
are silent. All is still around the cross. A great darkness 
rises towards heaven. The hour of death draws nigh. And 
just as on other occasions Bach represents the end by means 
of funeral bells, so here, in the recitative-arioso "Ach 
Golgatha, unsel'ges Golgathal" ('^Ah, Golgotha! unholy 
Golgotha!") the death of the Saviour is announced by 
the gloomy tolling of bells — 




I j ij,, ,, ,rr f .f f-f i /Lj ^tL^ 



Then a ray of sunlight breaks through the clouds. A ra* 
diance of love and pity streams from the dying Redeemer. 
"Sehet, Jesus hat die Hand, uns zu fassen ausgespannt I" 
("Behold, Jesus doth put forth His hand, giving strength 
whereby we stand"), sings the believing soul. The funeral 



The Arias. 



231 



bells are silenced, and the clear glad sound of the bells of 
salvation spreads over the earth. At the same time we see 
— in the figures mounting from the depths to the heights — 
the motion with which the Saviour draws mankind to Him 
on His Cross — 




bvii^dJ l o 




From the fact that the text of the St. Matthew Passion 
appears in the second part of Picander's Ernst-scherz- 
haften und satyrischen Gedichten^ which was published 
at Easter 1729, we may conclude that Bach's work was 
produced on Good Friday — 15th April — in that year. 
The autograph score gives us no chronological clue; it was 
made for a later performance, about the beginning of the 
seventeen-forties. 

We also possess the original parts, in which Bach has 
marked the dynamics and the plirasing. The parts include 
two complete sets for the organ; so that each choir had 
its own organist. The accompaniments could not have 
been given in this way, however, until after the positive 
of the St. Thomas's organ had been adapted for separate 
playing. At the first performance of the Passion the same 
organ accompanied both choirs. 

If Bach placed the choirs with their respective or- 
chestras on the two sides of the organ, we should have to 



232 XXIX. The Cantatas ol the Years 17^8 — 1734. 

assume that he placed the seccmd choir in the little gallery 
oi^>06ite the great organ, the accompaniment being under- 
taken by the small oigan that was situated there. This, 
however, is not very likely; the great distance between 
the two choirs would have put insurmountable difficulties 
in the way of their ensemble. 

As the 5^. Matthew Passion cannot well be given entire 
at one performance, an afternoon should be devoted to it, 
with an interval of an hour or two between the two Parts. 
A method that is strongly recommended is to give the 
First Part on the Saturday evening and the Second Part 
on the Sunday afternoon, a Sunday during the Passion 
being selected if possible. The most appropriate way of 
all is to give the First Part on the evening of Holy Thurs- 
day, and the Second Part on Good Friday aftemocm. If 
the work must be performed in one piece, none of the con- 
templative recitative-ariosos and none of the chorales 
should be cut out. 

We do not know what impression the St Matthew 
Passion made at its first performance; in all probabiEty 
the work attracted no notice. On the same Good Friday, 
at the same hour, there was performed at the New Church 
a Passion by a certain Gottlieb Frober, a candidate for 
the vacant post of cantor there. For the Leipzig public 
this was probably the event of the day, not the Passi<m 
of the cantor of St. Thomas's. 



CHAPTER XXIX. 

THE CANTATAS OF THE YEARS 1728-1734. 

We have not many cantatas belonging to the years 
1728 and 1729. This may partly be because a particularly 
large number belonging to those years have been lost; 
on the other hand it is possible that Bach had not much 



GoU, wis dein Name; Ich sUk* mit einsm Fu^. 233 

tune for new cantatas while he was at work on the St. MaU 
thew Passion. In any case he composed music to only a 
part of the cycle that Picander wrote for the church year 
1728 — 1729. Of the nine cantatas belonging to this series 
that we possess, five, according to Spitta, fall into the 
period 1729 — 1730, and four in 1731. 

The cantata for Christmas, Ehre sei Gott^ has not come 
down to us in that form, Bach having incorporated the 
greater part of it in the Wedding Cantata, GoU ist unsre 
Zuversicht (B. G. XIII, No. 3). One wishes that at any 
rate the bass aria ^'O du angenehmes Paar" might be re- 
stored to Christmas music, for there is no cradle song any- 
where else like this. It is scored for bassoon, oboe and two 
muted violins*. 

For the New Year Feast of 1730 Bach wrote the cantata 
GoU^ wie dein Name (No. 171). Its vigorous opening 
chorus pleased him so greatly that he afterwards turned 
it into the Pair em omnipotentem of the B tDinor Mass. 
The figures in the two violins in the aria ^*Henr, so weit die 
Wolken gehen, gehet deines Namens Ruhm'' ("Lord, the 
glory of Thy name goes as far as the clouds") interlock so 
charmingly that we seem to see the "white strips of doud 
trailing across the heavens. The final chorale, "'Dein ist 
allein die £hre*\ with the interludes for the wind instru- 
ments, ought to figure in every New Year service**. 

The cantata for the third Sunday after Epiphany, Ich 



* The aria might be inserted in some other Christmas cantata. 
Its original text rans thus: 

"O! du angenehmer Schatz, 
Hebe dich aus deinen Krippen* 
Nimm davor auf metne Lippen 
Und in meinem Herzen Platz." 

The aria "Vergnugen und Lust" likewise comes iram tkm Christmas 
cantata. The first part of the Wedding Cantata also seems to have 
been derived from some other source. 

** The soprano aria "Fort und fort" is an adaptation of a number, 
"Angenehmer Zephyrus", from the secular cantata Der eufnetUn* 
gesMte Aeolus (B. G. XI«, p. 189 ff.)- 



234 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Veara 1728 — 1734. 



sUlC fnU einem Fuss im Grabe (No. 156) *, gives a charac- 
teristic example of Bach's method of representing motion. 
In the introductory sinfonia the strings suggest the steps 
of a man going to the grave; the bass has continual variants 
of the motive — 



Adagio/ 




In the aria the descent into the tomb is depicted by a syn- 
copated form of this motive — 




The ^xpper strings repeat it constantly with all possible 
rh3rthmical nuances — 





■l^/^T^L j ^ 



so as to express quite clearly the picture suggested in the 
words ^1 stand with one foot in the grave; soon will my 
sick body descend into it'\ We could imagine that Bach 
had before his eyes Pigalle's celebrated memorial to the 
Martehale de Saxe at St. Thomas's, Strassburg, where the 
motion of the hero stepping into the sarcophagus is so won- 
derfully portrayed. In order to mitigate the rh3rthmical 
unrest, Bach accompanies the song with the chorale "Machs 
mit mir, Gott, nach deiner Giit'*'. 

The introductory duet-arioso of the cantata for Quin- 
quagesima, Sehei, wit gehcn hinauf nach JerusaUm (No. 
159)** is also founded on a "step" motive — 



^ 




* Solo cantata for alto, tenor, and baas. 
** Solo cantata for alto^ tenor and bass. 



Sekett wir wif g^htn; So du; Ich bin vergniigi; Ich Hebe, 235 

The interruption after the interval of the seventh is very 
impressive: Jesus pauses in His walk, turns to the disciples, 
and tells them of His approaching death. In the interludes 
for the alto the reflective soul accompanies the Saviour 
on the way to the cross. A splendid bass aria ends the 
work, which has a finely conceived text. 

The first chorus of the Easter cantata So du tnit deinem 
Munde bekennest Jesunty doss er der Herr set (No. 145) is 
one of the most interesting specimens of Bach's declama- 
tion. See, for example, how he brings out the word "Herr**. 
We may assume that the tuHi of the chorus enters at the 
final passage "so wirst du selig*\ where the orchestra 
breaks out into the "joy" motive*. 

The cantata for Septuagesima, Ich bin vergnUgt (No. 84) 
certainly belongs to the year i73i**. It consists of two 
magnificent arias, one of them founded on the same 
rhythm of felicity j i j h j j that expresses, in the 

cantata Hali itn Geddchtnis Jestim Christ (No. 67), the 
words "Peace be unto you". In the second aria, "Ich 
esse mit Freuden mein wenig Brot" ("I eat my scanty 
bread with joy") the sentiment of cheerful carelessness 
is expressed in a merry dialogue between the oboe and 
the violin. The text of this fine cantata is an adaptation 
of Picander*s "Ich bin vergniigt mit meinem Stande". 
Spitta thinks that it was originally composed as a piece of 
domestic religious music for Anna Magdalena. 

The cantata for the second day in Whit, Ich liebe den 
Hdchsten von ganzem GemiUe (No. 174) is also written for 
solo voices only. To compensate the hearers for the ab- 
sence of the chorus, Bach uses the first movement of the 
third Brandenburg concerto (B. G. XIX, p. 59 ff.) as an 
introduction to the work. As the movement was originally 
written for strings only, he adds two obbligati horns and 

* Spitta cites this cantata by its opening chorale, "Auf, mein 
Herz! des Herren Tag". The powerful "resurrection" theme of 
the duet "Ich lebe, mein Herze", is quoted on p. 81. 
** Solo cantata for soprano. 



236 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Yean 173S— 1734. 

three oboes, in the most effective way. The theme of the 
aria ^^Greift das Heil, ihr Glaubenshande" (''Seize upcm 
salvation, ye hands of faith'*) is of deliberate rigidity^ 
as it is meant to symbolise the steadfastness of faith *^ 




J r r|j r r^f 



The basses move along in steady quavers. The movement 
is animated by the interposition of the **jo3r*' motive, 
the music thus really expressing the joyous confidence 
of faith of which the poem speaks. 

We have a thematic sketch for the first chorus of the 
Michaelmas cantata Man singet mit Freuden vom Sieg 
(No. 149) on a leaf of the score of Phoebus und Pan (1731). 
As there was hardly time, however, to work out an original 
composition, Bach had recourse to the music of the last 
chorus of the Weimar secular cantata Was mit behagt^ 
ist nut die munire Jagd (B. G. XXIX, p. 29 ff.), to which 
he added the new text*. The duet *^id wachsam, ihr 
heiligen Wachter, die Nacht ist schier dahin" is accom* 
panied only by an obbligato bassoon. We seem to see 
strips of light flickering about in a deep twitig^t. The 
aria *X}ottes Engel weichen nie" is a masterpiece of mn« 
sical charm. 

According to a note on the score, the introduction to 
the cantata for the twenty-first Sunday after Trinity, 
Ich habe mdne ZuversicfU (No. 188)** is to be an oigan 
arrangement of the concerto for clavier and orchestat ki 
D minor — 



The organ has an obbligato part also in the final chorus. 

* For a performance of the secular cantata the figured ban 
can be played as in the later arraagement. 

*^ Solo cantata for soprano, alto, ttaor and bais. 



Man singsf; Ich hab^ meine Zuv$rsichi. zyj 

What prompted Bach to use the organ in this way? 
It was formerly supposed that it was just at this time 
that the RUckpositiv of the organ at St. Thomas's was 
fitted with a separate manual that allowed it to be played 
independently ol the great organ. It was thought that 
Bach seized the opportunity to accompany on this manual 
the more difficult numbers in his cantatas and to add extra 
parts to them. This was Spitta's conjecture; he founded 
it on an account that showed that in 1730 fifty thalers 
were expended in repairing the organ, and he imagined that 
this money was devoted to providing the new manual. In 
the Backjahrbuch for 1908, however, B. F. Richtcr shews 
that thb view is wrong. The archives of the Town Council 
shew that the fifty thalers were expended merely on the 
cteanii^ and better voicing of the instrument. Moreover, 
if Richter*s chronology is correct, the cantatas with the 
obbligato organ part were not performed at St. Thomas's, 
but at St. Nicholas's. Bach therefore wrote them to give 
the organist of that church, Johann Schneider, whom he 
esteemed highly, an opportunity to display his art. 

Besides the cantata Ich habe meine Zuversicht (No. 188) 
he wrote, about the same time, seven other cantatas for 
obbligato organ.*^ ' 

If we come to these works with special expectations 
we are to some extent disappointed. In the first place 
they contain many movements that have been taken from 

* EftehaUet, ihr Liedew (No. 173; Whitsuntide): this is an 
anaogcment of an earlier work (see p. 162); Gnsi und SeeU wkd 
verwifret (No. 35; twelfth Sunday after Trinity; solo cantata for 
atto); GiM sott ailein mein Herze hahen (No. 169; eighteenth Sunday 
after Trinity; solo cantata for alto); Ich geW und suche mit F#r- 
Imogen (No. 49; twentieth Sunday after Trinity; solo cantata for 
soprano and bass); Wir danhen dir, GoU (No. 29; Ratswahl cantata 
for the 27th August 1731); Wer weiss wis nahe mir mein Bnde 
(No. 27 ; sixteenth Sunday after Trinity) ; VergnUgte Ruh, behebie 
Seeienfme$ (No. 170; ^xth Sunday after Trinity; solo cantata for 
alto). See B. P. Richter's article Cher 5^. Backs Caniaten mi$ 
Migmenr Orgd, in the Backjahrbuch ior 1908, pp. 49—^3. For further 
fight on the problem see the section on the figured bass parts in 
the last chapter of the present book. 



238 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Years 1738 — 1734. 

the instrumental works. Most of the pieces for organ and 
orchestra are derived from clavier concertos*. Even some 
of the arias are derived from instrumental movements. 
The aria ''Stirb in mir", for example, from the cantata 
GoU soil allein mein Herze haben (No. 169) is merely the 
Siciliano of the clavier concerto in E major, to which 
Bach has added a vocal part. The arrangement is most 
masterly; but the music does not sound well, however 
fine it looks on paper. The cantata Gdsi und Seele wird 
verwirrei (No. 35) is wholly made up out of previous 
instrumental movements, of the provenance of which, 
however, we cannot now be sure. This seems to be the case 
also with the numbers of the cantata Ich geW und suche 
mit Verlangen (No. 49) in which the "concertising" organ 
is employed. Even the duet "Dich hab ich je und je ge* 
liebet" is a rearrangement, as may be seen from the. im- 
perfect declamation: 




IMch hab' ich jc und jc ge - lie - bet. 

The alto aria **Willkommen will ich sagen", from the 
cantata Wer weiss me nahe mit mein Ende (No. 27) is 
also anything but a model in this respect. 

The solo cantata for alto, Vergnugte Ruh, beliebte Seelen- 
lusi (No. 170), seems to be composed mostly of original 
matter. The trio accompaniment to the aria "Wie jammem 
mich doch" is very interesting; the organ pla5rs in two 
parts, and the united violins and violas take the third. 



* The cantata Ich habe meine Ztwersichi (No. 188) has for 
overture the D minor concerto, which itself is merely an arrange- 
ment of a violin concerto; the sinfonia of the cantata GoU soU 
aiUin mein Herie haben (No. 167) derives from the clavier con- 
certo in E major; the finale of the same concerto becomes the 
sinfonia of the cantata Ich geh* und suche mU Verlangen (No. 49); 
the prelude to the Ratswahl cantata Wir danhen dir, GoU (No. 39) 
is an arrangement of the first movement of the suite in £ major for 
solo violin. 



Bach's Uie oi the Organ. 239 

There is no bass foundation. It is unfortunate that the 
text of this work is utterly unsatisfactory. 

The disappointing effect of these cantatas comes, how- 
ever, from the way in which Bach has introduced the organ. 
It pla3rs in two parts only. As the lower part is identical 
with the orchestral bass, it has really only one obbligato 
part, which runs from beginning to end with hardly an 
interruption. This quite uninteresting employment of the 
organ is not what we expect from Bach. There is no dram- 
atic alteration between organ and orchestra, or any use of 
the effect to be derived from the opposition of the two 
so characteristic timbres. We ask ourselves how the master 
who, in his preludes and fugues, has revealed the special 
pol3rphony of the organ in all its richness, could here allot 
it so subordinate a task; and we are astounded that he 
did not think of making use, if only occasionally, of the 
effects derivable from the combination of organ and or- 
chestra. 

This does not imply that the works cannot be made 
effective. The preludes to GoU soil aUein mein Herze haben 
(No. 169) and Wir danken dir^ GoU (No. 29), for example, 
sound extremely well on the organ with a clear registration, 
with some silvery mixtures. In the accompaniment to 
the arias, however, the organ is less satisfactory, since it 
really only replaces a flute, and that not very profitably. 
Even the uncritical hearer feels, after a few bars, the inex- 
pressiveness of this accompaniment. 

Besides the "concertising" organ there was of course 
the great organ, which accompanied and played the figured 
bass. Thus the cantatas for obbUgato organ really require 
two organs. Where only one is available, the "concer- 
tising" one must also play the figured basses. In this case 
it will be best to give the bass part to the pedal, and play 
the chords with the left hand and the obbligato part with 
the right. When Bach gave these cantatas at St. Nicholas's, 
where the Ruckpositiv was not available, both organ parts 
would have to be played on one instrument. We know 



240 XXIX. The CantatM of the Years 1738— 1734. 



positively that this was the case with the RatswaU cantata 
Wir danken dir, GoU (No. 29). We have a text-book for 
a later performance of the work at St. Nicholas's, in 1749. 
The first chorus is one of those in which he writes in a 
simfde styk resembling that of Handel. Whether the aria 
'^Gedenk an uns*' is or is not derived from the Siciliano 
of some instnunental concerto cannot now be settled. 

The chorus of the cantata Wer weiss wie nahe mir mein 
Ende (No. 27) is very impressive. The strings and the bass 
iUustrate the words "Hin geht die Zeit'* (*Time passes 
away**) by means of the rhythm of a slow inexorable 
pendulum — 




Mingled with the choral voices as they sing of this flight 
of time are the wailing sighs of the oboes*. 

The accompaniment to the final aria, ^'Gute Nacht, du 
Weltgetiimmel'* ("Good night, thou tumult of the world**) 
is symphonic in character. The words "Gute Nacht*' and 
"Weltgetummel" are illustrated alternately, the form 
by means of a tranquil theme, the latter by means of the 
familiar "tumult" motive. The movement thus runs on 
exactly the same lines as the aria "Friede sei mit euch*', 
bom the cantata Halt im Geddchtms Jesum Christ (No. 67). 

In the end the obbhgato use of the organ does not seem 
in the long run to have satisfied Bach himself; he wrote 
no more cantatas of this kind. 

About the beginning of the thirties, too, he seems to have 
become conscious of the inadequacy of his cantata texts. 
He goes back to the chorale cantata. Picander first of 



* lime is symbolised by pendulum-beats, again, in the cantata 
Aiiis nar nach GoUes WUJen (No. 72). See p. 198. 



Choimle Cantatas, 241 



«f 



all tries to effect a compromise between the free ''modem 
cantata and the ch<M^e cantata, and to persuade Bach 
to compose texts in which the chorale verses are joined 
together by free poems. He interrupts, for example, the 
first verse of Wer weiss wU nahe mir mdn Ende (No. 27) 
with contemplative recitatives. In the cantata for the 
fifth Sunday after Trinity, Wer nur dm lieben Gatt Idsst 
walUm (No. 93) he adopted this procedure in two verses 
of the hymn. One of them is couched in this form: 

Recitative with chorale. 

''What help to us are all our heavy cares? 

• . • • They cnty oppress the heart with a thousand pains and 

sorrows. 
What help to us are all our sighs of woe? 
• . . . They bring us only dire calamity.** 

Bach here treats the melody as Picander has treated 
the text. The themes of the soU are all formed out of the 
first notes of the canius firmus. Even the volatile motive 
that expresses gay insouciance in the aria ''Man halte 
nur ein wenig stiUe*' is derived from the commencement 
of the melody — 




The device may be very ingenious, but it gives no artistic 
satisfaction. It amounts to a disfigurement of the melody, 
and negates Bach's most individual principle ; nowhere else 
does he handle the chorale verses in this way. 

He gets a particularly fine effect in the chorus by first 
of all giving out each line in free style in a couple of voices, 
and then bringing in the whole choir with the same line. 
In the recitative ''Was helfen uns die schweren Sorgen'* 
the bass figure seems to be crushed under a heavy mass — * 

* The ''Joy*' motive of the basses in the aria "Er kennt die rechten 
Ftettdenstunden" is given on p. z 12. 

Schweitier, B«ch. II. l6 



242 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Years 1728 — 1734. 




Yet Bach does not seem to have found much pleasure 
in this hybrid cantata. He now turns again to the simple 
chorale cantata. We have fifteen of these that appear 
to date from that epoch*. Some can be attributed with 
certainty to this period by reason of the quality of their 
organ parts, the arias and recitatives not bcdng figured, 

* I. Christus der ist mein Leben (No. 95, for the stxteenih 
Sunday after Trinity). 

2. Der Herr isi niein getreuer Hirt (No. 11 2* for the second 
Sunday after Easter). 

3. Ein' fesU Burg ist unser GoU (No. 8o» for the Reformation 
festival). 

4. Es ist das Heil uns hammen her (No. 9, for the sixth Sunday 
after Trinity). 

5. Gelobet sei der Herr (No. 129, for Trinity Sunday). 

6. Ich ruf Mu dirt Herr Jesu Christ (No. 177, for the fourth 
Sunday after Trinity). 

7. In alien meinen Taten (No. 97, for no fixed Sunday; per- 
haps used also as a wedding cantata). 

8. L^ den Herren (No. 137, for the twelfth Sunday after 
Trinity). 

9. Nun homm* der Heiden Heiland (2nd composition. No. 62, 
for the first Sunday in Advent). 

10. Sei Lob und Ehr (No. 117, for no fixed Sunday). 

11. Wachet auf, ruft uns die Stimme (No. 140, for the twenty* 
seventh Sunday after Trinity). 

12. Was willst du dich betrOben (No. 107, for the seventh 
Simday after Trinity). 

13. Was GoU tutt das ist wohlgetan (ist compositiont No. 98, 
for the twenty-first Sunday after Trinity). 

14. W€^ Gott tut, das ist wohlgetan (and composition, No. 99, 
for the fifteenth Sunday after Trinity). 

15. Was GoU tut, das ist wohlgetan (3rd composition. No. 100). 
The opening chorus of the third arrangement of Was GoU tiU, 

das ist wohlgetan is identical with that of the second. The third 
arrangement was probably used as a wedding cantata. The first 
two seem to have been composed at periods not far removed 
from each other. Another chorale cantata. Nun danhet alle GoU 
(No. 191, B. G. XLI) exists only in an incomplete form. The 
overture-form employed in the opening chorus of the cantata 
In alien meinen, Taten (No. 97) makes it probable that it is based 
on a Weimar or Cathen cantata. 



Chorale Cantatas. 243 

but marked Toed*. This does not mean that the organ 
did not co-operate here, but simply that the player on the 
great organ ceased, and Bach played the accompaniment 
from the score on the separate positive. When the cantatas 
were repeated at St. Nicholas's, however, he had to supply 
the figuring in the chief organ parts, and he figured the 
cofUinuo in full from the beginning. But at St. Thomases 
he would, as before, accompany the solos on his positive. 

All these cantatas have splendid choruses, especially 
Was Gatt tut, das isi wofUgetan (No. 99), Sei Lob und Ehr 
(No. 117), Lobe den Herrn (No. 137), and Gelobet sei der 
Hen (No. 129). The last-named cantata has also a final 
chorale with an imposing accompaniment. These choruses 
all follow the same type. The soprano takes the cantus 
firmus, and the other voices the figuration. There is an 
independent orchestral acompaniment, though the motives 
of it are reminiscent of the chorale melody. 

Here Bach's inexhaustible faculty of invention is plainly 
evident. He can write a number of choruses on the same 
principle, and yet give each of them such individuality 
that the similarity seems only destined to bring out more 
sharply the characteristic features of each of them. The 
arias in these cantatas are not so pleasing. Bach is con- 
tending with impossible texts. In a number of cases he 
tries to compose recitatives and arias to chorale verses. 
In this, however, he is unsuccessful; the regular form of the 
strophe is opposed to the plan of the aria ; and its uniform 
metre admits of no proper theme. It goes without saying, 
also, that the strophic aria is wearisomely long**. 

At other times Bach employs texts that are written 
round a chorale strophe; there are also free verses, though 
these do not appear to be by Picander, as they are remark- 
ably heavy and unsuitable for music. 



* See Noe. gy, gg, 139, and i^f. 

*^ The chorale strophee in cantatae Noe. 97* too, i^, 112, 117* 
i^* i37» and 177 are composed in the form of aria^ and recitatives. 



244 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Years 1728-^1734. 

Thus few of the solo numbers of these cantatas make 
an immediate effect on the hearer. One of the very finest 
is the alto aria ^'Ich will dich all mein Leben lang, o Gott* 
von nun an ehren'^ in the cantata Sei Lob tmd Ekr (No. ii7). 
In the bass aria in Was GoU kd, das ist woUgetan (No. 100) 
the music in itself is sj^endid, but the declamation is some- 
what banal; its faults are all the more noticeable as the 
declamation of the following alto aria is of a perfection 
rarely attained even by Bach. 

The solos of these chorale cantatas are, however, ex- 
traordinarily rich in "characteristic" pictorial music. In 
the bass aria of the cantata Was willsi du dich beMtben 
(No. 107) the solo violin has a series of wild scale passages, 
the tempo of which Bach has placed beyond doubt by his 
marking of vivau. The text runs thus: *'Auf ihn magst du 
es wagen . . . du wirst mit ihm erjagen, was dir ist niitc 
und gut" ("'Thou mayst venture on it with Him . . . thou 
wilt win with Him what is good for thee"). This example 
shows how, when Bach is fa^nated by an image, he can- 
not resist the temptation to illustrate it, and for the sake 
of this he will pass over the general mood of the poem 
that he ought to be expressing in his music. The following 
tenor aria "Wenn auch gleich aus der Hdllen der Satan 
woUte sich dir selbst entgegenstellen" ("Even though 
Satan himself should rise from hell and oppose thee^') 
gives him an opportunity to depict the contortions of the 
body of the huge dragon — 



■vt 1 JjJ43^^ I j;^^ 




'i'" jjjj J 1 1 rffr "" ^^^ ^ ffrf ^ ^"^ ^ 



The text of the aria "Leg ich mich spate nieder« erwache 
friihe wieder" ("I lay me down late, and awaken earl)^**). 



t$m Burg. i45 

m the cantata In dUn mrinm Taim (No. 97) is expressed 
by a motive suggestive of sinking down and rising again — * 




If the majority of these chorale cantatas do not make an 
effective whole, the fault Ues in the texts, which consist of 
a string of strophes without any inner dramatic coherence, 
and without sufficient musical distinction between them. 
Moreover there are too many strophes in most of the 
chorales. Cantatas worke<l out on these chorale lines re- 
quire short hjnnns, in which every verse suggests a different 
musical characterisation. These ideal chorales are very 
few in number. When, however, Badi finds a text of this 
order, we get a dramatic art-work of the most perfect 
kkd imaginable, as in the cantatas Ein* feste Burg (No. 80) 
and Wachd auf^ ruft uns die SUmme (No. 140). 

Bin* teste Burg was probably written for the Reforma- 
tion festival of 1730; as this happened to be the bicentenary 
of the delivery of the Augsburg Confession, the festival 
Mras a particularly brilliant one. In the first chorus Bach 
builds up the "stronghold sure" on mighty lines, sym- 
bolising it by a gigantic choral fugue in the style of Pachel- 
bel. Each of the separate fugues ends with a canon with 
the theme in augmentation, reaching from the pedal trom- 
bones of the organ to the trumpets of the orchestra. The 
movement runs to two htmdred and twenty-eight bars. 

In the second verse the fight on our behalf of the man 
whom God has chosen is depicted by the familiar "tumult*' 
motive'* — 



^ The extravagant "Joy'' motive of the first aria in the cantata 
GMU$ m d$r Herr is quoted on p. 113. For the ''tumult" motive 
of the aria "Strdte, siege, starker Held", in the cantata Nun homm 
der Heiden HHUmd (No. 6a), see p. 91 ; and for the iUustration 
of the text of ''Wir waien schon zu tief geiunken'% in the cantata 
JEs in das Heil uns homm&n her (No. 9) see p. 83. 



246 XXIX. The CaittAtais of the YearB 17^9^1^54. 




The sopranos join in with the chorale verse **Mit unsrer 
Macht ist nichts getan" ("With our own strength we can 
do nothing"), as if calling the hero to their aid; he answers 
with the song of triumph "Alles, was von Gott geboren, 
ist zum Siegen auserkoren" ("Everything that is bom 
of God is chosen for victory"). 

The third strophe depicts the assault of the devil on the 
citadel of God. There peals out a signal formed from 
the opening notes of the melody, whereupon a host of horrid 
contorted bodies throws itself on the walls — 




They mount, sink back again, recover themselves once 
more, again make the assault, again fall back into the 
depths — a wildly agitated massH>f the kind that Bach has 
painted also in the cantata Es erhub sick ein Streit (No. 19). 
Every now and then we hear shattering trumpet fanfares. 
From the battlements rings out the exultant song of the 
faithful: 

•*Und wcnn die Welt voU Teufd war, 

Und wollt uns gar verschlingen^ 

So ffirchten wir uns nicht so sehr ; • • •" 

After a final effort the furious assault falls to pieces. This 
chorale verse is framed between the mystical movements 
"Komm in mein Herzenshaus" and "Wie selig sind doch 
die", from the Weimar cantata AUes was von Gott %eboren^. 



^ This cantata was intended for the third Sunday in Lent. 
Bach was unable to use it in Leipdg, as no cantatas were given 
there during the Paauon time. 



Wachei auf. 



247 



Lutheranism and mysticism — this was the confession of 
faith that the cantor of St. Thomas's brought to the Re- 
fonnation festival. 

The cantata Wachet auf, ruft uns die Siimme (No. 140) 
deals with the parable of the ten virgins, — the Gospel 
for the twenty-seventh Sunday after Trinity. This Sunday 
comes into the church year only when Easter falls very early ; 
as a rule there are only twenty-six Sundays after Trinity. 

The first chorus depicts the awakening. All is anima- 
tion ; the bridegroom comes ; the virgins start up in dismay 
from their slumber, one raising the other — 




In this chorus we can see very clearly the changes that 
have come over our conception of Bach's music. Julius 
Stockhausen, of Frankfort, used to bring in the orchestra 
pianissimo and work it up through a slow crescendo, as if 
distant noises were gradually coming nearer. Siegfried 
Ochs begins forte and with a very quick tempo, so as to sug- 
gest the sudden confusion caused by the "Wachet auf!" 
(*'Awake!"). This is certainly the right way. To get 
the proper effect, the syncopated notes in the mounting 
semiquaver passages should be thrown into high relief. 
There need be hardly any fear of overdoing it; the more 
vehement the accents, the more clearly will the hearer 
apprehend the meaning of the motive*. 

The second verse, "Zion hort die Wachter singen" ("Zion 
hears the watchmen singing"), is dominated by a simple 
dance melody — 



* Spitta (II, 460) thinks that the semiquaver motive expresses 
"a feeling of mysterious bliss", that "overflows again and again 
in happy and expressive passages". 



248 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Years I728^i734« 




With this the chorale melody is combined dksonantly, as 
if it had nothing to do with it; the cry of the watchmen 
strikes into the music of the procession that is drawing 
nigh with the bridegroom. In order that this may have 
its proper rural quality, it is written for the strings imisono, 
with an accompaniment in the contrabasses*. 

The procession arrives. In the festive hall the ^^Gknia 
sei dir gesungen" (**Glory now to thee be given") is sung. 
The fooUsh virgins are left outside in the night, in despair* 

Not until Berlioz shaU we meet with any dramatic-* 
pictorial music comparable to this. 

The middle verse of the chorale is framed between two 
mystical dialogues between Jesus and the soul. The 
consummate quality of these seems to point, like the 
contemplative parts of the cantata Ein* feste Burg, to an 
origin in the Weimar period. 

These two cantatas taught Bach the advantage of 
short chorales for the composition of chorale cantatas. 
The idea now occurred to him to compile a chorale text 
out of characteristic stanzas from various hymns, and, in 
the cantata ChHstus der isi mein Leben (No. 95 )''^ to em- 
ploy chorales that express different aspects of death. The 
first of these — 

'^hristus der ist mein Leben, 
Sterben ist mein Gewinn/* 



* Of course the organ haxmonies must be filled in. The chofale 
should be sung by several tenors, not a soloist; the text is "Zion 
hears the waichmen singing". According to Spitta "the mystical 
tone of the cantata here finds its fuUest expression". He thinks 
"it is like the dance of the souls in bliss". 
** For the sixteenth Sunday after Trinity. 



Chnshi$ dif i$t mMn LsUn. 



24^ 



speaks of lassitude of death. The orchestra accompanies 
it with a melancholy fmieral lullaby*, in which is inter* 
woven a figure expressive of deep longing — 




A recitative, "Mit Freuden will ich von hinnen scheiden'* 
(**With joy I win depart"), during which the lullaby dies 
away, leads into the chorale "Mit Fried' und Freud* fahr 
ich dahin" ("With joy and peace I go thither"), in which 
the melody confidently wends its way above the quietly 
moving quavers in the bass. Then the sopranos ''^ sing 
the joyous Yiyvan of parting from the world, "Valet will 
ich dir geben" ("Farewell do I bid thee") the oboes ac- 
compan}ring it with a "joy" motive of almost excessive 
exuberance — 




The figures in the basses sjmibolise the ^Hinauf steht mein 
Begier" ("My longing is for heaven"). 

The same joyous mood in the face of death is expressed 
in the splendid tenor aria "Ach schlage doch bald, schlage 
doch bald, sel'ge Stimde!" ("Ah, strike soon, thou blessed 
hour"), the pizzicato of the strings giving a wonderful 
effect of distant bells. Bach's careful marking of the nu- 
ances here should be especially noted. 

This beautiful cantata, with its simple choruses, is 
very seldom performed, for which Spitta's unjust estimate 
of it is probably answerable, — though perhaps the ex- 



* The motive of this lullaby is quoted on p. 94. 

*^ It is quite wrong to give the cantus firmus to a 
cannot make herself heard above all the oboes and violins. 



who 



250 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Yean 1 728-^-1 754. 

traordinary technical demands that the tenor aria makes 
on the singer may have something to do with it. 

For the festival of the delivery of the Augsbm'g con- 
fession, which was lavishly celebrated in the Leipzig 
churches on the 25th, 26th, and 27th June, Bach did not 
write any new cantatas. He had recourse to the New 
Year cantata of 1724, Singet dem Herrn ein neues Lied 
(No. 190)*, and the two Raiswahl cantatas, GoU^ man 
loU dick in der StiUe (No. 120)'*'* and WUnschet Jerusa- 
lem GliUk. The latter is lost. This was the time of Bach's 
conflict with the Council. Perhaps the disgusted frame 
of mind he was in accounts for him not having written 
a new work for the festival. He thus did not contribute 
any musical celebration to ^ the two centenary feasts of 
the Reformed Church that came during his life-time. On 
the occasion of the bi-centenary of the beginning of the 
Reformation (31st October 1717), he had been in disgrace 
with the Duke of Weimar, and so the composition of the 
festival cantata had not been entrusted to him. 

Closely related to the chorale cantatas are the chorale 
dialogues Ewigkeit, du Dannerwart (No. 60)***, and Ach 
Gottf wie manches Herzeleid (No. 58)t. 

The first of these is concerned with Fear and Hope, 
wear (alto) sings the chorale ^'O Ewigkeit, du Donner- 
wort" ("Oh Eternity, thou awful word"), the orchestra 
painting its trembling. Then we hear the consoling voice 
of Hope (bass), reiterating incessantly "Herr, ich warte 
auf dein Heil" ("Lord, I wait for Thy salvation*'). Both 



♦ Sec p. 155. 

*^ This cantata b partly identical with the mourning cantatas 
Herr GoU, Bsherrsch&r otter Dinge (B. G. XIII^). The choms 
"Janchzet ihr erfreuten Stimmen", with its clear-cut motive d joy. 
Is particularly beautifuL 

^* Second composition, in D major. Solo cantata for alto^ 

tenor and bass, for the twenty-fourth Sunday after Trinity (1733?). 

t In C major. Solo cantata for soprano and bass, for the 

Sunday after New Year (1733?). ^^ the B. G. edition it is caUed 

the second composition, although that in A major is perhaps later. 



BwigM$; Ach GoH, me marches H^rtehid, 25Z 

proceed along the road to death: ''O schwerer Gang zum 
letzteii Kampf und Streite" ("Oh saddest way to the last 
combat") . . . **Mein letztes Lager will mich schrecken" 
("I dread my last resting-place") laments the despairing 
sotd, the passionately agitated orchestra adding a motive 
that reminds us of Peter's aria of despair in the Si. John 
Passion. Hope sings consolingly "Mich wird des Heilands 
Hand bedecken" ("The hand of the Redeemer will pro- 
tect me"). At the finish we hear the voice of the Holy 
Ghost in a wonderful arioso, *^lig sind die Toten, die in 
dem Herm sterben, von nun an!" ("Blessed are the dead 
that die in the Lord, from now henceforth"). The can- 
tata ends with Rudolf Ahle's beautiful hynm "£s ist 
genug, Herr, wenn es dir gefallt" (**Thy will, oh Lord, be 
done?*). 

The other dialogue, Ach GoU, me nuinches Herzeleid 
(No. 58) is constructed on similar lines. The opening 
duet, "Ach Gott, wie manches Herzeleid beg^gnet mir zu 
dieser Zeit . • . Geduld, mein Herze! Geduld!") ("Ah Lord, 
how much sorrow of heart is now mine ... Be patient, 
my heart, be patient!") reproduces the musical mood of 
"Mein letztes Lager will mich schrecken". The marking 
of adagio must not tempt us to take the movement too 
slowly and too softly. The instrumental accompaniment 
must flame and glow with suppressed despair*. The final 
duet, on the other hand, cannot sound too joyful, not- 
withstanding the chorale "Ich hab' vor mir ein* schwere 
Rei$* zu dir ins Himmelsparadies" ("I have a grievous 
journey before me to Thee in paradise"); the orchestra, 
in union with the voices, "Niu- getrost, getrost, ilu- Herzeni 
Hier ist Angst, dort Herrlichkeit" ("Be of good cheer, 
oh hearts! Here is anguish, there is glory") must dominate 
the lament. Note the animated steps of the basses, violas, 



* AU movements of tliis kind must be played heavily. The 
dttet in cantata No. 60^ "Mein letztea Lager will mich schrecken". 
Again, is nsuaUy taken in such a way that the music does not ex* 
press terror at aU. On the problem of these duets see p. pS, 



2$! XXIX< The CaatatM tl the Y«iM X7«S^J734. 

and second vkdins hastening joyously to the ^'Himniels* 
paradies'', with the semiquavers of the first violins stream* 
ii^ before them. 

If the idea of these two dialogues came from Picander, 
he did Bach's muse a great service. There is no mistaking 
the enthusiasm with which they have been written. 

The unusually large number of Bach's solo cantatas 
at this time is easily explained by the poor state of the 
St. Thomas choir at the beginning of the thirties. With 
the two chorale dialogues we have eleven of these solo 
cantatas. Two of them are soprano cantatas, — Falsdu 
Wdl, dif trau ick mckt (No. 52), for the twenty-third 
Simday after Trinity, and Janschzet Gctt m mUei^ LamUn 
(No. 51), for the fifteenth Sunday after Trinity. 

The introduction to Fakche WeU, dir trau ich mckt is 
taken from the first Brandenburg concerto (B. G. XIX). 
The accompaniment to the first aria. ^Immerhin, wenn 
ich gleich verstossen Inn" ("Ever when I am cast off*) 
is very characteristic. It illustrates the word "verstossen*' 
in the most drastic style imaginable — 




In the joyous theme of the final aria, "Ich halt' es mit dem 
lieben Gott, die Welt mag nur alleine bleiben" ("My part 
is with my dear Lord, I need not the world"), the music 
reminds us that it is the rejected one who has now found 
happiness in God. 

The cantata Jauchzet Gott in aJlen Landen (No. 51) is 
a brilliant and spirited piece of cohraktra for soprano 
and trumpet, the instrumental theme of the first aria 
being in this style — 



F0i$ck0 W$U; Jm$ckaet GoU; Scktmge dock; WiUir$hhe. 233 




For the last aria Bach uses the chorale **Sei Lob imd 
Preis mit Ehren'*, the alleluia of whidi becomes a ooncerto 
for soprano and trumpet with orchestral accompaniment. 
An sopranos interested in Bach are recommended to 
practise this cantata daily. Its full effect, however* is 
obtainable only when it is sung by a clear boy's voice*. 

The best known of the solo cantatas for alto is Schlage 
dock, gewUnschie Stundc (No. 53). Strictly speaking it 
is not a cantata, but a ^^mouming aria", as it is called on 
the title-page of the old manuscript in which it has come 
down to us. As Bach employs two bdls in this work, 
Forkd thinks that ^'it does not belong to the period of 
his purified taste.'* ♦♦ 

The other alto cantata, WidersUhe dock der SUnde 
(No. 54)*^ begins with an alarming chord of the seventh — 



7 
ft 
4 
2 




The trembling of the basses and violas, and the sighs 
of the violins, between them give the movement a some- 
what disturbing effect. It is meant to depict the horror 
of the curse upon sin that is threatened in the text. Of 
a similar character is the aria ^^Wer Siinde tut, der ist 



* There exists another version of the text of this cantata, 
running tfans, "Jtanchxiet Gott in aUen LaadenI Ifit den Eageln 
laast uns heut' nnserm Gott dn Loblied singen", — which in- 
dicates that Bach at some time or other iiMd thid oMliic for 

MlfhaflilUBH 

♦• Forkel, p. 62. 

^** The copy does not state for which Sunday this cantata was 
intended. 



254 XXIX. The Cantatcis cA the Yjeais 1798*^x7544' 

vom TeufeV* ("The sinner is of the devir*). It is a strict 
trio between the voice, the violas and the violins. The 
theme runs thus — 




Harmonically the movement is of wiparalleled harshness. 
The opening aria of the solo cantata for tenor, Ich 
armer Mensck, ich SUndenknechi (No. 55) is, as a rule, 
phrased so inanimately that the whole sense of the des* 
pairing wail is lost. The characteristic accent should fall 
on the second beat. The orchestra must phrase thus — 



i i'm r^ ^^i ^^ 




This passage — 




ff n i fftiiS 



should be played with a strong ctescendoy the last quaver 
being always heavily accented in contradiction to the beat, 
thus obstructing the rhjrthm, as it were. This motive 
belongs to the words "Ich geh' vor Gottes Angesicht mit 
Furcht lind Zittem zum Gerichte" ("I go in fear and 
trembling into the presence of God"). It suggests painful 
striving, as in the theme of the introduction to the cantata 
Hert^ gehe nicht ins Gericht (No. 105), of which it strongly 
reminds us*. 
Finally the motive — 




♦ Sec p. 189. 



Uh armer Mensch; tch will den KreuMStab' 255 

should also be phrased in oppositicm to the natural beat, 
the accent fallmg on the up-take quaver after the rest. 
The movement is only properly played when every sug- 
gestion of the charming Vs rhjrthm is gone; the impression 
must be one of urgent unrest. 

In the opening aria of the solo cantata for bass, Ick will 
den KreuzsHab gerne ttagen (No. 56)*, it is doubtful whether 
we should accait thus — 



J-— J f-- 




I J J riy '"IS 



Ich win den Kreuttab. 

The natural verbal accent indicates the latter. The first, 
however, is more characteristic, as it brings out the whole 
extent and all the severity of the ascending line by em- 
phasising the final syncopated note**. For the rest, the ac- 
companiment is wholly formed of the motive of transfigured 
grief. Perhaps the number is generally taken in rather 
too slow a tempo, so destro}dng the contrast with the final 
"Da leg* ich den Kmnmer auf einmal ins Grab" ("Then 
suddenly I lay my sorrow in the grave"). 

The fine *Svave" motive*** that accompanies the recita- 
tive-arioso "Mein Wandel auf der Welt ist einer Schiffahrt 
gleich" ("My course on earth is Uke a voyage") does not 
make its full effect when given to a solo violoncello. It 
comes out calmly and clearly if a bassoon and a viola 
are added. In the iuUi passages of the final aria, "Endlich, 
endlich wird mein Joch" ("At last, at last, is my yoke"), 
it is as well to add the violins to the oboe, so that the theme 
may give voice to all its ungovernable joy. 

This is one of the most splendid of Baches works. It 
makes unparalleled demands, however, on the dramatic 



* For the nineteenth Sunday after Trinity. 
*• The distinction ib of coune only slight, 1^ both the C shaxp 
and the D are accented. The effect of the difference in accentuatioo 
between the orchestra and the singer is not displeasing. 
*♦• Quoted on p. 75. 



256 XXIX. The Cantatas oi ^e Years 1738 — 1754. 

imagination of the singer who would depict convincingly 
this transition from the resigned expectation of death to 
the jttlMlant longing for deatli. 

The bass cantata for the Purification of Mary, Ich Mbe 
genug (No. 82) also has death for its theme. It depicts 
the heavenly home-sickness of the old man who is already 
detached from all the things of this world. Inexpressible 
joy weUs forth from the semiquaver passage with which 
the orchestra, in the first aria, accompanies the voice 
and the arabesques of the oboe. Then follows the glorious 
death-lullaby, ^"Schlummert ein, ihr matten Augen; fallet 
sanft und selig zu" ("Slumber now, weary eyes; close 
softly and happily") — 




Here again, however, the last expression is that of ecstatic 
joy, that suddenly finds voice in the aria "Ich freue mich 
auf meinen Tod" ("I rejoice in my death"). 

Bach also transcribed this cantata for soprano, perhaps 
with a view to his wife singing it in their domestic con- 
certs. He wrote the aria "Schlimmiert ein" in her Kkmer- 
bUchlein of 1725, only noting, however, the voice part in 
fuU. He would himself add a free accompaniment in per- 
formance. 

We have a t3rpical specimen of Bach's system of musical 
illustration in the cantata Siehe^ ich will Fischer auS' 
senden (No. 88)*. The orchestra accompanies the first half 
of the verse vrith flowing "wave" motives, as if to conjure 
up before the hearer the placidly heaving lake on which 
the fishers are embarking; at the words "Und danach will 



* Jeremiah XVI, 16. Solo cantata for soprano, alto, tenor 
and bass, for the fiftii Sunday after Trinity. It is also interesting 
to see that Bach accompanies the arioso ^'P&rchte dich nicht, denn 
von nun an wirst du Menschen fangen" ("Fear not, for from hence* 
forth sbalt thou be fishers of men", with the ^foy" motive. See 
p. 112. 



Was soil ich a%$ dir macheni 



^37 



ich viel Jager aussenden, die soUen sie fangen auf alien 
Bergen" ("And after will I send for many hunters, and they 
shall hunt them from every mountain and from every hill") 
this accompaniment suddenly ceases, and the horns strike 
in with gay fanfares. 

One of the most perfect specimens of Bach's mood- 
painting is to be seen in the accompaniment to the first 
aria of the cantata Was soU ich aus dir tnachen, Ephraim 
(No. 89) ♦. The text is foimded on Hosea XI, 8, and 
runs thus — 

/'Was soil ich aus dir machen, Ephraim? 

Soil ich dich schtitzen, Israel? 

Soil ich nicht bilhg ein Adama aus dir machen, 

Und dich wie IZeboim zurichten? 

Aber mein Herz ist andem Simies; 

Meine Bannherzigkeit ist zu briinstig!" 

("How shall I give thee up, Ephraim? How shall I deliver 
thee, Israel? How shall I make thee as Admah? How 
shall I set thee as Zeboim? Mine heart is turned within 
me; My repentings are kindled together." )♦♦ 

This text is reproduced by means of three themes. The 
first, in the bass, ssmabolises the wrath of God — 





The oboes give out wails and sighs — 




* Sdo cantata for alto, tenor and bass, for the twenty-second 
Snnday after Trinity. 
** Adznah and Zeboim were cities destroyed with Sodom. 



Schweitter, B«ch. II. 



X7 



258 XXIX. The Cantatas of the Years 1728— 1734. 
The sorrowful question is put by the violins — 




As these motives interwine and interpenetrate each other 
without coming to any conclusion, so God's heart is dis- 
tracted by contradictory thoughts upon Israel. 

That the theme in the violins is meant to suggest the 
sorrowful question is proved by the first chorus of the 
cantata Ich denier Mensch^ wer witd inich erldsen von 
dem Leibe dieses Todes? (No. 48), where the orchestral 
accompaniment is constructed upon a theme that is almost 
identical with that of '^Was soil ich aus dir machen, 
Ephraim?'' 

The first chorus of the cantata Ich glanbe^ luher Hen^ 
hilf meinem Unglauben (No. 109)*, is a marvel of poly- 
phonic declamation. The distressful anxiety of the words 
is most movingly expressed. The aria ^'Wie zweifelhaftig 
ist mein Hoffen, wie wanket mein geangstigt Herz" (**How 
uncertain is my hope, how my anxious heart doth falter'') 
is wholly taken up with the representation of some one 
walking uncertainly**. For this purpose Bach emplo3rs 
the heavy rh3rthm — 




by means of which, in the aria "^Konmi susses Kreuz", 
in the 5/. MaUhew Passion, he depicts the man staggering 
under the weight of the cross. The cantata ends with the 
simply figured chorale **Wer hofft in Gott" ("He whose 
hope is in God") the peculiar tense orchestral accom- 
paniment to which is probably intended to sjrmbolise the 
certainty of the hope. 



* For the twenty-first Sunday after Trinity. 
♦♦ See p. 93. 



Kfrr» deine Augen; Bs ist mchis G$sundes. 



259 



In the first chorus of the cantata Hen, deine Augen 
s§hsn nach dem Glauben (No. 102) * Bach gives a particular 
characterisation to each of the three sections of the text, 
so that the movement, apart from the final summary, 
is really composed of three choruses. Some idea of the 
splendid acerbity of this music may be had from the theme 
of the middle section, "Du schlagest sie, aber sie fiihlen 
nicht" ("Thou smitest them, but they feel it not") — 




The bass aria ''Verachtest du den Reichtum seiner Gnade" 
("If thou dost scorn the riches of His grace") begins with 
the leap of a seventh — 




^fMh^ 



yer*fteh*test dn 

The orchestral accompaniment of the first chorus of the 
cantata £5 ist nicfUs Gestmdes an fneinem Leibe . . . und 
isi kein Friede in meincn Gebeinen ("There is no soundness 
in my body . . . and no rest in my bones") (No. 25)** is 
constructed out of a series of sighs — 




while the trombones, cornets and flutes play the chorale 
"Ach Herr, mich armen Siinder" ("Lord, I, a wretched 
sinner") in five parts. 

The bass theme that accompanies the aria "Ach, wo hoP 
ich Armer Rat" ("Ah, where shall I, miserable one, find 
counsel") is interesting in that it reproduces exactly the 



* For the tenth Sunday after Trinity. 
** For the fourteenth Sunday after Trinity. 



»?♦ 



26o XXIX. Th« Cantatas of the Yaars 1726 — 1734. 

same hurried and faltering steps as we have in the theme 
of the aria **Ach, nun ist mein Jesus hin^\ in the St. Mat* 
ihew Passion. 

The final aria, ^'Offne meinen schlechten Liedem*', is 
dominated by a beautiful colloquy between the strings 
and oboes on the one side and the three flutes on the other. 

At a performance of this work the recitative in which 
Picander compares the world to a hospital should be cut 
out. It goes beyond all endurable limits of tastelessness*. 

The two cantatas last mentioned, — Nos. 102 and 25 — 
were performed by Emmanuel at Hamburg . . after he 
had corrected his father's errors. His revisions have been 
preserved; they do not throw a very favourable light on 
the understanding of Bach by his sons. In this partly dis- 
figured form the cantata Herr^ deine Augen sehen nock 
dem Glauben was printed for the first time in 1830. 

We shall probably never know how Bach could bring 
himself to turn the main chorus of this cantata into a 
Kyrie, the alto aria "Weh der Seele!" into a Qui toUis^ 
and the tenor aria "Erschrecke doch" into a Quoniam 
tu solus**. More barbarous perversions cannot be imagined. 

The blue sky seems to hang over the Ascension cantata 
Wer da glauhet und getauft wird (No. 37). It can easily 
be imagined how, in the final aria, Bach translates into 
musical motives the words "Der Glaube schafft der Seele 
Fliigel, dass sie sich in den Himmel schwingt" ("Faith 
gives the soul wings that it may soar to heaven"). 



* Die ganze Welt ist nur ein Hospital, wo Menschen von un- 

zahlbar grosser Zahl 

Und auch die Kinder in der Wiegen an Krankheit hart da* 

nieder liegen. 

Den einen qualet in der Brust ein hitz'ges Fieber bdser Lust; 

Der andre Ueget krank an eig'ner Ehre h&aslichem Gestank; 

Den dritten zehrt die Geldsucht ab und sturztihn vor der Zeit 

ins Grab • • . 

** See the small Masses in G minor and F major (B. G* VIII). 



Wm8 mir h^hagi. 261 



CHAPTER XXX. 

THE SECULAR CANTATAS. 

B. G. XI, Part II. (1861). 
B. G. XX, Part II. (1870). 
B.G. XXIX. (1879.) 
B. G. XXXIV. (1884.) 

The master of the secular cantatas was consigned to 
even longer oblivion than the master of the church cantata. 
Forkel knew only the Peasant Cantata*. The publication 
of the Bachgesellschaft edition brought to light several 
works of whose existence no one had had any notion. How 
many more must be irrevocably lost! Still we possess 
enough secular cantatas — about twenty — to be able 
to rejoice in the other side of Bach's genius. 

His first secular cantata originated in the Weimar 
period. It is entitled Was mir behagt^ ist nut die mufUre 
Jagd*^; it was performed on 23rd February 1716, on which 
day Duke Christian von Sachsen-Weissenfels celebrated 
his fifty-third birthday by a great hunting party. Bach's 
master, Duke Ernst Wilhebn, was invited, and surprised 
his friend with a "fine table-music'*. The cantata was 
"musicized" during the banquet in the gamekeeper's 
lodge; Duke Christian would have probably found it hard 
to believe that the cantata would do more to preserve 
his name for future ages than all his own sovereign acts. 

Bach evidently worked at it con amore. The text is by 
Salomo Franck, the secretary of the upper consistory at 
Weimar, for whose sacred cantata poems Bach had a high 
regard***. In accordance with the taste of the time, the 
poet goes back to m}i:hology, making sundry great and 



♦ Forked p. 62. 
♦• B. G. XXIX, p. 3 ff. 
^** It is printed in Franck's GHsUiche und WMiche Poesien, 
Part II, Jena 17 16. 



262 XXX. The Seeular Cantatas. 

small gods pay their homage to the object of the day's 
celebration. The theme of the text is as follows. Endy* 
mion feels himself to be slighted by Dia na, his belov^, 
andjreproaches her. She makes the excuse that today 
she must follow the cfiase^ and give her fa vourite hftro 
Christian a congratulatory kiss» — to whi ch arrangement 
Endjonion has no objection. They are reconciled, and 
together sing the praises of the great sovereign. . To giye 
the work the necessary musical variety, the Pan of the 
country and Pales, the goddess of the flocks, are added, — 
which makes a cantata of half-a-dozen recitatives, eight 
arias, and two choruses. 

The music is uncommonly expressive and of captivating 
freshness. The work begins and ends with brilliant fan- 
fares. In the aria ^'Willst du dich nicht mehr ergdtzen" 
£nd3nnion sings his languishing love-lament over an 
animated basso osUnato. Pan's song, '*Ein Fiirst ist seines 
Landes Pan" is constructed on an imposing form of the 
rhythm of solemnity — 




The aria of Pales, "Schafe konnen sicher weiden" ("Sheep 
can pasture in safety") is in the nature of a pastoral, and 
is accompanied by two flutes. At the finish Pan sings 
a dance-song in gigue-form, "Ihr Felder und Auen, sonst 
griinend euch schauen". 

This cantata was turned to account more than once 
afterwards. It was given on the birthday of the music- 
loving Prince Ernst August of Sachsen-Weimar, the only 
alteration necessary being the substitution of the name 
of Ernst Augiist for that of Christian. In the score the 
new name is simply written under the old one. Bach did 
not worry in the least over the fact that the names are 
accented differently, and that the declamation conse- 



Was mir b$kagi. 263 

quently became nonsensical. He calmly let his people 
sing* — 




Der trea - e Enst An-gost! 



When the cantata was given at a later date by the 
Telemann Society, on the name-day of the Electoral Prince 
Friedrich August, Bach, — as we can see from a printed 
copy of the words that is attached to the autograph score — 
made only such changes in the text as were absolutely 
necessary. This time the work was entitled •'Verlockender 
Gotterstreit". It was again performed before Prince 
Christian von Weissenfels, at a feast he was celebrating 
with his wife Louise Christine (n6e Countess StoUberg). 
On this occasion the final chorus was sung to the follow- 
ing text: 

''Die Anmut umfange, das GlQck bediene 

Den Herzog und seine Louyse Christine, 

Sie weyden in Freuden auf Bltunen und Klee, 

£s prange die Zierde der ftLrstlichen Eh' 

Die andre Dione, 

Fflrst Christians Crone!'' 

Our information as to all these different uses to which 
the cantata was put is derived from remarks in the score. 

Some of the numbers were incorporated in church 
cantatas. The final chorus, "Ihr UebUchste BUcke" was 
transformed into the opening chorus of the Michaelmas 
cantata Man singt mit Freuden vom Sieg (No. 149). The 
hunting music and two arias are used in the cantata for 
Whit Monday 1731, Also hoi GoU die Welt geliebi (No. 68); 
the bass aria of this, "Du bist geboren mir zum Guten'* 
is derived from Pan's aria "Ein Fiirst ist seines Landes 
Pan'', and the well-known soprano aria ''Mein glaubiges 



* Again in the first recitative of Diana and Endymion (p. 9), 
in Pan's recitative (p. 11), and in the duet between Diana and 
Endymion. 



364 



XXX. Th» Soctdar Cuntatas. 



Herze" is an enlarged arraogement of Pales' song, *'Weil 
die woUenreicben Herden'\ The latter is expanded from 
thirty-six to seventy-eight bars; the vocal phrase — 




is new; but the bass figure — 




is derived from the secular cantata. The arrangement 
is not wholly satisfactory. The simple aria of the hunting 
cantata is in its own way more beautiful and better balanced 
than that of the Whit Monday cantata, in which we cannot 
help seeing ultimately that a new patch has been placed 
on an old garment*. 

In Cothen Bach had no choir at his disposal as he had 
in Weimar. For the birthday music DurchlaucfUster Le<h 
pold, which he probably wrote for his master in his first 
year of service, he had to be content with a duet between 
soprano and bass**. In the two two-part arias, however, 
he tries to give the illusion that a choir is at work; he 
detaches the second violins and the violas from the rest 
of the orchestra, and makes them play second and third 
parts between the soprano and the bass. 

There seems to have been no poet available there for 
the text. The mechanically rhymed prose reminds us 
somewhat of the kind that Bach himself used to write 
when he put his hand to poetry. It is therefore not unlikely 



* Bach has written upon the same theme a small trio for violin, 
oboe, and clavier. See B. G. XXIX, pp. 250, 251. 

** B. G. XXXIV, p. 3 ff. It is true that he has marked the 
two-part finale "Choro*', but it was sung by his two soloists. The 
declamation is so curious, — e. g. on the words ''Nimm auch"» 
"GluckUch", and "sei dem Volke", — as to lead us to believe that 
the music was originally written to another text 



that the text of the serenata is his own. The charming 
music breathes of gaiety and happiness. 

In order that it might not be wasted he used it for the 
church cantata for Whit Monday, Erhdhtes Fleisch und 
Blut (No. 173). The style of the textual transformation 
may be gathered from the first recitative-^ 

Secular Cantata. Whit Monday Cantata. 

DnreUaneht*ster Leopold, Erh5htes Fleisch nnd Blat, 

Es singet Anhalts Welt Das Gott selbst an sich nimmt, 

Von nenem mit Vergnilgen, Dem er schon hier anf Erden 

Dein Cdthen sich dir stellt. Bin hbnmlisch Hell bestimmt 

Um sich Yor dir iXL biegen, Des Hdchsten Kind zn werden, 

Dnrehlancht^ster Leopold. Erhdhtes Fleisch imd Bint 

In 1725 the Duke of Cdthen took for second wife the 
Princess Charlotte Friederike Wilhelmine of Nassau. At 
that time Bach was settled in Leipzig ; but he had retained 
his title of Cothen Kapellmeister and his connection with 
the Court, and, of course, the duty of writing music for 
great occasions. On the 30th November 1726, the birth- 
day of the Princess, he brought his best singers from Leipzig 
and performed the congratulatory cantata Steigt freudig 
in die Luft, zu den erhabenen, Hdhen. A Uttle later on he 
used the same music for the birthday celebration of one 
of the Leipzig teachers, — probably the Rector Gesner. 
In this new form the cantata is entitled Schwingt freudig 
euch empor*. 

The music gives very characteristic expression to this 
idea of joyous soaring into the air — 




The festive nature of the cantata impelled Bach to adapt 
it for the first Sunday in Advent; but he retained the 
opening words, as these were necessary for the music. 



* We have the music in connection with this text. See B. G. 
XXXIV, p. 41 ff. 



366 XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

This was the origin of the sacred cantata Schwingt freuiig 
euch empor (No. 36). 

About the year 1733 the Cothen secular cantata was 
again recast. It was adapted to the text Die Freuie regd 
sichy and sung by the students on the birthday of the 
Professor of Law, Johann Florens Rivinus, who was very 
friendly with Bach*. 

Another Cothen cantata, Mit Gnaden bekrone der Himmel 
die ZeUen — perhaps written in 1721 — seems to have 
been performed at a New Year's festival or at some domestic 
celebration of the royal house^* It consists of solos and 
duets. At the end there is a chorus, but only of the simplest 
kind. This work also was converted into a church cantata 
with a new text, Ein Herz, das seinen fesum lehend weiss 
(No. 134). It was intended for the third day of Easter. 

A specially delightful piece of work is the secular Wedding 
Cantata for solo soprano, Weichet nur, hehrubie Schatten, 
which Bach wrote as "table-music" for the wedding of 
some couple whose names we do not know***. It has sur- 
vived only by accident ; it would have been lost to us had 
it not been copied out by Rinck, a pupil of Peter Kellner. 

The poem is much superior to the ordinary "occasional*' 
text that came Bach's way. The theme is the passing of 
winter and the coming of spring. Phoebus and his horses 
gallop through the new world; Cupid runs through the 
fields whenever he sees a pair of lovers kissing; may the 
love-spring of the newly-wedded pair overcome and out- 
last the transitoriness of outward things. 

To this expressive poem Bach has written some par- 
ticularly beautiful music. The vaporous semiquavers 
ascending in the strings in the opening aria depict the 
mists vanishing before the breeze of spring — 



* The four different texts wiU be found in B. G. XXXIV, 
Preface, p. 16 ff. 

** B. G. XXIX, p. 209 ff. The commencement is mutilated. 
On the chronology of this cantata see Spitta III, 68, 2S4. 
•♦• B. G. XI«, p. 75 ff. 



Weickei nur, h§tHAi€ SckmtUn. 



267 



Adagio. 
Viol. I. fianc 




while the oboe sings a dreamy, yearning melody of the 
type of which Bach alone seems to have the secret^. 

The aria that deals with the fleet steeds with which 
Phoebus flies through the newly-awakened world, begins 
in this way — 




As the sketch for this theme is found in the final allegro 
of the sixth sonata for violin and clavier**, which was written 
in Cothen, it is probable that the Wedding Cantata be- 
longs to the same period. 

When Bach settled in Leipzig he might have expected 
ntunerous commissions for ^'occasional" compositions. 
Such works were often called for in a town of that kind. 
Each great family festival, each birthday of any notable 
personality had to be accompanied by music specially 
written for the occasion. In addition there were many 
events in the university life, — "ovations" of students in 



* It is quoted on p. 114. 
** See I» 396. The sonata will be loand in B. G. IX* p. 154 it 



l68 XXX. The Secular Cantetae. 

honour of favourite professors^ the official festivals of the 
university, and the academic arrangements on patriotic 
occasions. Bach certainly counted on a substantial ad- 
dition to his income from these sources. The ordinary 
remuneration for a piece of occasional music was about 
fifty thalers. This cannot be called brilliant for the cir- 
ctmistances of the time; but the presence or absence of 
two or three such commissions would count for something 
in the cantor's domestic exchequer. 

It looks as if Bach were somewhat disappointed in this 
regard. He received practically no orders at all for official 
festivals at the university, owing to his having offended 
the academic authorities by his energetic action with regard 
to the services at the University Church*. He was out 
of touch with the students in the first few years, on account 
of his not conducting any of their Collegia musica. The 
pubUc did not look upon him as a composer who could 
write graceful and sentimental melodies. Perhaps, too, 
the Cothen-and-Weissenf els-Hofkapellmeister did not strike 
the Leipzig patricians as being sufficiently accommodating 
for a musician to whom they could give commissions for 
their festivals. We may therefore assume that Bach w^_ 
entrusted with only a small portion of the occasional music 
performed during his residence in Leipzig. Gomer and other 
third and fourth-rate great men, and, later on, his own 
pupil Doles, were much more in vogue than the master 
himself. Had he not undertaken, in 1729, the conductor- 
ship of the Telemann Collegium Musicum, he would have 
hardly made an appearance at all as a festival composer. 

His poet . for the secular cantatas was Picander , who 
served him better in wordly than in spiritual things. His 
heart was really in the former; for the church cantatas 
he could only string together phrases from the Bible and 
the hymn-books, without adding anythmg of his real self 
to them. In the secular cantatas he shewed tesl inventive 



* See I, 120 fi. 



power , and could always give a certain amount of interest 
to the mythological trappings of the situation. The rich- 
ness of his diction in pictorial images was of great service 
to him in these works, and his sincere feeling for nature 
makes him, at certain happy moments, a real poet. If 
Bach's secular cantatas are not merely occasional com* 
positions, but primarily art-works of genuine nature- 
poetry and only secondarily and by the accident of their 
origin "occasional'' works, we must thank Picander for it. 

His dexterity is evident in his first text, Der zufriedefi- 
gestelUe Aeolus, written for Bach in 1725 on the occasion 
of a students' celebration* in honour of the name-day 
(3rd August) of the Doctor of Philosophy August Friedrich 
Miiller (1684 — 1761). In the cantata Aeolus proposes, 
on this particular day, to restore to the imprisoned winds 
their liberty, in view of the approaching end of the smnmer. 
They rejoice madly over the destruction they will work 
everywhere; Aeolus himself tells them what is permitted 
of them, and laughs in anticipation of what they will do. 
The gentle Zephyrus sings his song of farewell. Pomona 
enters and begs for a delay for the sake of her fruit-laden 
trees, but in vain. Pallas is more fortunate. She con- 
jures the ruler of the winds not to disturb the feast that 
the muses are holding on Helicon, — the feast in honour 
of Herr August Miiller. This entreaty Aeolus cannot 
resist. He recalls to their caves the already half-liberated 
winds. Pallas, Pomona and Zephyrus sing a happy trio, 
which is followed by a duet by the two goddesses. The 
finale is a brilliant chorus, "Vivat August"**. 

The music is particularly vivacious. The first chorus 
and the recitative of Aeolus depicts the unbridled im- 
petuosity of the scurrying winds***. The aria "Wie will 



* The text of the C6then Graiuiaiion Cantata Sehwingi fteudig 
mteh empor (1726) is also by Picander. See p. 165. 

** Bach's poet, of course, had in his mind's eye the well*known 
scene in Vergil's A$nM. 
♦♦♦ See p. 58. 



270 



XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 



ich lustig lachen" ("How merrily will I laugh*') is full 
of lusty laughter. A remarkable contrast to this strong 
music is afforded by the autumnal melancholy of the aria 
of Zephyrus, "Frische Schatten, meine Freude" — 



T'rTfrr'r'^'^''^ ^ 




In the aria of Pomona we see the leaves falling wearily 
from branch after branch. 




What caressing grace, again, in the aria of Pallas I What 
restrained power in the air of Aeolus, with its accompani- 
ment for wind instruments alone, "Zuriicke, zuriicke, 
gefliigelte Winde!" What glorious sunshine in the G major 
theme of the duet of the goddesses — 




And all this for Herr August Miiller, who could have had 
no idea that Bach's music was a feast of the muses that 
would carry his name down to the remotest generations! 
At a later date Bach himself sinned against this splendid 
work. When Friedrich August II. was crowned King 
of Poland at Cracow, on the 17th January 1734, Bach 
performed with the Telemann Society, in the same month, 
a, festival cantata entitled Blast Ldrmen, ihr Feind^^ that 
is merely a perversion of the music composed in honour 
of August Miiller. The text seems to have been rewritten 
by himself, for no author's name appears on the text- 



VereinigU ZwUtracht ekr wechssIinUn Saiten, a^X 

book printed by Breitkopf , — an omission that no poetaster 
of that day would have consented to*. The new version, 
in .which "Valour", "Justice**, and "Grace" appear, does 
not harmonise with the ideas and moods of the music, so 
that the combination is quite nonsensical. Spitta con-- 
eludes from this that Bach certainly did not regard char- 
acterisation as the central point of his music**. This is 
an error. It merely proves in what a hurry Bach was to 
make sure that this Society should be the first to celebrate 
the coronation. The festival ode performed by the uni- 
versity in honour of the coronation, on the 19th February, 
was written by Gomer. 

The cantata Vereinigte ZunOracht der wechsdnden 
SaiUn was written in 1726 for the academic ceremony of 
the appointment of Dr. Gottlieb Kortte (1698 — 1731) as 
Professor of Roman Law***. The march with which the 
work opens was played by the wind instruments diiring 
the entry into the hall. For this reason it is not included 
among the orchestral parts of the cantata proper ; we pos- 
sess it in the score alone. 

For this composition Bach made use of the second 
Allegro and the final Trio of the first Brandenburg concertof . 
The Allegro became the opening chorus; the Trio, ar- 
ranged for full orchestra, became an instrumental inter- 
mezzo (rilomello). The alto aria, "Atzet dieses Ange- 
denken", with its individual accompaniment, also seems 
to be borrowed from somewhere. The music takes no 
further account of the insipid allegory, in which all the 
possible virtues appear and admonish the youth of the 
university to foUow the example of the new professor. 
What does it matter to Bach that it is tedious "Industry" 
that preaches to the sons of the muses in an aria, ^^Zieht 



* This text is now in the Royal library at Dresden. It is 
reprinted in Spitta II, 881 (German edition). 
•• Spitta II, 626. 
•*^ B. G. XX«, p. 73 ft 

t B. G. XIX, p. 16 £1, and 30. 



2/2 XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

euren Fuss nicht zurucke, ihr, die ihr meinen Weg erwahlt'* 
("Draw not back, ye who have chosen my way")? All 
he sees is the musical image of the elastic step; so he sets 
the dull moral to a piquant piece of ballet music, which 
can be turned into a dance by simply substituting an 
instrument for the tenor voice — 




To ensure the elegant performance of the movement^ 
Bach took the trouble to indicate the phrasing and ex- 
pression in the instrumental parts. The orchestra for the 
cantata consists of trumpets i, 2, and 3, oboi d'amore i 
and 2, taHle, violins i and 2, violas and coniinuo. Judging 
from the parts, each of the instruments, with the excep- 
tion of the third tnimpet and the drum, was multiplied — 
even the wind. For contrabass, cello and bassoon alone 
four unfigured cofUinuo parts were written out. 

Some time after 1733 — we cannot be sure of the exact 
date — this music was again adapted to the text Auf, 
schmeiternde Tone der muntern Trompeten, for the name- 
day of August III*. 

Several occasional compositions of that period must be 
regarded as lost. We merely know their titles, — and 
now and then their texts. Only by its title do we know 
of the cantata Siehe, der Hitter Israels^ which is mentioned 
in Breitkopf s list for Michaelmas 1761 as a "graduation'* 
cantata. On 5 th June 1732 the reconstructed St. 
Thomas school was reconsecrated with great solemnity. 
For this occasion Bach wrote the cantata Froher Tag, 
verlangte Stunden, the text of which still exists in the 



* The new text, with some newly-compoeed recitatives, is given 
in B. G. XX», p. 141 £f. 



Phoebus und Pan, 273 

library of the institution*. The cantata Entfernet euch, 
ihr heitem Sterne was, as we learn from Sicul's Das froh- 
lockende Leipzig, performed on the 12th May 1727, the 
birthday of King August II, about eight in the evening, 
in the market place, by the students of the university**. 
The monarch himself was in Leipzig, and listened to the 
work from a window in ApePs house. The music for the 
festival service in the University Church was written by 
Gomer. 

For the banquet at the wedding of the Leipzig merchant 
Heinrich Wolff and the daughter of Hempel, the Com- 
missary of Excise in Zittau, on 5th February 1728, Bach 
wrote the cantata Vergniigte PleissensUuU. The text is 
by Picander, who, in order to afford Bach an opportunity 
for musical painting, gives speaking parts to the rivers. 
At a later date Bach recast the text, substituted Apollo 
and Mercury for the Pleisse and the Neisse, and made 
them sing the praise of Leipzig and its Council***. When 
and for what occasion this revised version was performed 
we do not know. If it was during the period when Bach 
was at war with the Council, the composing of this libretto 
must have been even harder for him than the hammering 
out of the rh3mies. The text is just what we might expect. 

Der Streit zwischen Phoebus und Pan and the Coffee 
Cantata belong to the category of burlesque satire. Both 
were written about 1732. 

The matter for Phoebus und Pan was derived by Pi- 
cander from Ovid; but to ensure musical vivacity he made 
liberal additions of his ownf. In the sextet, Momus, Mer- 
cury, Tmolus, Midas, Phoebus and Pan order the winds 
to withdraw to their caves, so as not to disturb the 



* It is given in the Preface to B. G. XX*, p. 51 ff. The text 
is by Bach's colleague, Magister Winkler. 

** Given in B. G. XX«, Preface p. 43. See also Spitta II, 
628. There is a copy of the text in the Leipzig Town Library. 
^** Both texts wiU be found in the Preface toB. G. XX», p.46ff. 
See also Spitta II, 634, 635. 
t B. G. XI, p. 3 ff . 

Schweitzer, Bach. It I8 



274 



XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 



proposed contest of song. Bach, of course, did not let such 
an opportunity for pictorial music pass by him; we seem 
actually to see the clouds of whirling dust — 

Vivace ed Allegro, 




The tribunal is arranged. Phoebus chooses Tmolus for his 
advocate; Pan selects Midas. Thereupon Phoebus sings a 
melody in which we find embodied a number of themes 
which Bach uses to express imspeakable longing, — 




forte 



piano 



forte 



piano 



Pan sings a peasant dance-tune, — "Zum Tanze, zum 
Sprunge, wie wackelt das Herz" — in which words and 
melody are both plebeian, as if simg at a Kermess — 




'''^' i r^fffr'^' 



The middle section is a largo y in which he parodies the elegiac 
theme of Phoebus in an angular Vi rhythm — 






i 




5=^ 



The words run thus — 

"Wenn der Ton zu miihsam klingt 
Und der Mund gebunden singt, 
So erweckt es keinen Scherz." 

Tmolus awards the victory to Phoebus, and sings a song 
about music that is "bom of charm". Midas, in an aria 



Phoebus und Pan, 275 

written in the style of a village cantor, gives the prize to 
Pan, justifying his verdict with the remark that Pan's 
music "fell thus on his ears". As a reward for his "mad 
ambition" he is given asses' ears. Mercury, however, 
announces that "arrogant presimiption" alwa}^ wins the 
"cap and bells of Folly" in the end, and we hear the bell 
jingling in the accompaniment to the aria — 




Finally all imite in the praise of "charming music", that 
delights not only men but the gods, and for the sake of 
which we can calmly put up with "censure" and "jeers". 
As early as 1856 Dehn, the well-known Bach student, 
conjectured that the satire is not a general one, but that 
Bach had some particular circumstance in view*. He 
thought that the cantata was directed against the Rector 
Biedermann, of Freiberg (Saxony). To the general dis- 
cussion that took place, about the middle of the eighteenth 
century, as to whether, in the re-organisation of classical 
education, music was to keep its old place in the school 
course, this pedagogue had contributed, in 1749, a pamphlet 
entitled De vita musica^ in which he maintained that not 
only was music prejudicial to education, but that it was 
usually the worst boys in the school who took up art. His 
object was to depreciate and annoy his cantor. Doles, who 
a year previously had won great success with a Singspiel 
on the centenary of the Peace of Westphalia. Bach had 
to. endure from his own Rector just what his pupil Doles 
had to put up with from Biedermann. He consequently 
took a lively interest in the controversy that arose round 



* Johann Sebastian Bach als Polemiker, in Westermann's 
Monatshefte for 1856. 

1 8* 



276 XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

the pamphlet, and in which every musician of note, es- 
pecially Mattheson, fell fmiously on the luckless author. 
Bach regretted that his health did not permit him to take 
up the pen himself; but he had an answer composed by 
a certain Schroter, of Nordhausen, a member of the musical 
Society. This pleased him so much that on the loth De- 
cember 1749 he wrote to Einicke, in Frankenhausen, that 
"he did not doubt that such refuiationes would clean 
the author's dirty ear, and make it more fit to listen to 
music."* 

It would be quite possible that Bach had attacked the 
malicious Rector in a satirical cantata. On closer ex- 
amination, however, it becomes clear that Der Streii 
zwischen Phoebus und Pan does not relate to this matter; 
it is not directed against one who despises art, but against 
a superficial critic. A decisive point is that the text existed 
as early as 1732, when it was pubhshed in the third part 
of Picander's poems. It can therefore only refer to Bach*s 
critic Scheibe**. It is true that the latter's views upon 
Bach's music only appeared in the KriHscher Musikus 
of 1737***. His animosity, however, dates from 1729, 
when Bach had not supported his candidature for the post 
of organist at St. Thomas's as Scheibe would have liked. 
He would not fail to speak offensively of Bach's music 
afterwards, so that the composer had good cause to ridicule 
him musically in the Telemann Society. This explains 
the character and the date of origin of the work. The 
points of the text are clear. Midas is Scheibe. The latter 
had charged Bach's music with being turgid and confused, 
and maintained that it must have been artificial and 



* Spitta (III, 255 fi) gives a fuU account of the controversy. 
Th6 documents are to be found in Adlung and Marpurg. 

** Otto Lindner controverted Dehn's hypothesis in an article 
on Biedermann und Bachf in the Vossische Zeiiung for ist and 
8th July i860. The correct theory is stated by Rust in the preface 
to B. G. XI«, and by Spitta (II, 647, 648). 
••♦ On Schdbe and Bach see I, 178 ff. 



Phoebus und Pan, 277 

far-fetched, since it did not aim at an immediate appeal 
to the senses. This is why Midas sings — 

"Ach Pan! wie hast du mich gestarktl 
Dein Lied hat mir so wohl geklungen, 
Dass ich es mir auf einmal gleich gemerkt. 
.... Der Phobus macht es gar zu bunt, 
Allein dein allerliebster Mund 
Sang leicht und ungezwungen.'' 

[«0h Pan! thy song was life to met 

My heart was stirred with strange emotion I 

And as I listened, lol it seemed to me 

I heard the plaintive music of the woodland. 

The sighing of the restless ocean! 

Not Phoebus should receive the prize. 

But thou, whose song in simple wise 

Thy hearers all hath charmed."]* 

The cantata is thus a product of the same spirit as 
Wagner's Die Meister singer; Bach wrote it in order to rise 
superior, in his music, to the misunderstanding around him, 
and to place to his own lips the cheering and refreshing 
cup of high-souled irony — finding in this, like all great 
minds, strength to go on undisturbed with his work. Bach's 
heart was lightened when, in the aria of Phoebus and that 
of Tmolus, he had represented his art as that of godlike 
charm; the pessimism that had weighed on him since the 
production of the 5^ Matthew Passion, and that finds such 
bitter expression in the letter to Erdmann, was now overcome. 

The cantata must have been performed again at the 
time of the Biedermann controversy. At that time Bach 
did not conduct any of the students' singing societies; 
but the circle of friends who felt themselves wounded with 
him by the attack sought out the work again and foimd 
refreshment in it. This accounts for our possessing a manu- 
script copy of the text-book with the date 1749. The 
last two lines of the final recitative were altered to fit 



* Mr. Percy Pinkerton's translation, in Breitkopf and Hartel's 
English edition of the score. [Tr.] 



278 XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

the case of the malicious pedagogue. In 1732 they had 
been sung thus — 

"Ergreife, Phoebus, nun die Leyer wieder 
Es ist nicht Lieblicher's als deine Lieder." 

("Take up thy lyre again, Phoebus; there is nothing more 
delightful than thy song"). 
They were now transformed thus — 

"Verdopple, Phoebus, nun Musik und Lieder, 
Tob auch Hortensius und ein Orbil dawider". 

("Redouble, Phoebus, thy music and singing, even though 
a Hortensius and an Orbilius rage against them"). Orbilius 
is the Horatian schoolmaster, "ready to strike"; Hor- 
tensius, the Latin rhetor, is probably intended for Emesti, 
the odious Rector of St. Thomas's, who was particularly 
devoted to Latin oratory. 

The Coffee Cantata, Schweigt stiller plaudert nicfU*, is 
much more unassuming; it aims only at refreshment. 
In 1727 Picander had published, in the first volume of his 
poems, a story in which he had made merry over the in- 
creasing passion for coffee. The King of France, he says, 
has forbidden the beverage in Paris, which occasions general 
lamentation ; the women die as if the plague were raging ; 
this went on until the interdict was removed. It should 
be mentioned that the praise of coffee had been warmly 
sung in a collection of cantatas published in Paris about 
1703. The text of the first German coffee cantata was 
by Gottfried Krause (1716); we do not know who wrote 
the music to it**. 



* B. G. XXIX, p. 141 ff. The text is taken from Picander's 
Ernst' Schertshaffte und satyrischs GedichU, Part III, Leipzig, 1732* 
The Streit swischen Phoebus und Pan appeared in the same Part. 
** See Spitta II, 641 ff. It is well known that in the eighteenth 
century many princes expressly forbade the public or secret drinking 
of coffee in their dominions. The Landgrave Friedrich of Hesse 
issued an ordinance of this kind in 1766; it was in force more than 
twenty years; the "coffee smellexB" (Kaffeeriecher) who lodged 
information received one fourth of the fine. (See the Frankf. 
Zeitung for 26th July 1907.) 



Bach's Handwriting (Rough Copy) 
Reduced facsimile of a page of the "Coffee Cantaln" 



The Coffee Cantata. 279 

The theme of Picander's poem is as follows. Father 
Schlendrian (Routine) wishes to break his daughter Lieschen 
of the coffee habit*. "Oh father, be not so strict", she 
pleads. "If I do not drink my Uttle cup of coffee three 
times a day I shall be like a dried-up piece of roast goat's- 
flesh." Her prayer is reinforced by a roguish aria in praise 
of the black beverage. All threats are in vain. She will 
give up her promenades, her wide and fashionable whale- 
bone skirt, even the silver-work ribbon for her cap. Not 
until she is engaged to a man will she consent to give up 
coffee. **So do it today, dear father," she says coaxingly 
in an aria. He has hardly gone out when Lieschen makes 
it known that "no wooer need come to the house unless 
he will promise, and have it put in the marriage settle- 
ment, that I may have liberty to make coffee when I will". 

To this libretto Bach has written music that seems 
to come from Offenbach rather than from the old cantor 
of St. Thomas's. The work as it stands could be given 
as a one-act operetta. 

On Tuesday, the 7th April 1739, a "foreign musician" 
(fremder Musikus) annoimced a concert in the Frankfort 
market house, "in which, among other things, Herr Schlen- 
drian and his daughter Lieschen will appear."** This can 
only refer to Picander's poem. We do not know whether 
it was given with Bach's music, or whether the fremde 
Musikus had set it himself. If the former, then this is the 
only case which we can positively cite of a performance 
of one of his works in another town. 

The soprano cantata Von der VergnUgsamkeit also pro- 
bably dates from the early thirties***. It seems to have 
been written for Anna Magdalena, and was probably per- 
formed in the domestic concerts that Bach used to have 
as long as his elder sons were with him. It is not of great 



* Bach always spells the word "Coffee", instead of in the 
usual German form of "Kaffee". 

♦• Frankfurter Nachrickten, 1739. See Spitta II, 643. 
••• B. G. XI», p. los ff. 



28o XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

musical value. It is significant that he should have been 
attracted by such a text. At first sight it merely seems to 
be concerned with the praise of a certain homely content- 
ment and the art of putting away from us unnecessary 
cares and desires. But the religious note imperceptibly 
creeps in; the true contentment is peace and quietness 
in God. Thus the work that began in such banality ends 
with the praise of "divine sufficiency", that makes the poor 
rich and on the level of princes. This was the spiritual state 
of the great German m)rstic Bach, whose outward semblance 
was that of a comfortable citizen of the eighteenth century. 

Yet even he strove after vain things. In 1733 he went 
to Dresden to receive the title of court composer. It is 
not surprising to hear that while waiting for this he per- 
formed some patriotic cantatas in order to bring himself 
before the friendly notice of the royal house. On 27th July 
he presented his petition; on 5th September he conducted 
in the Telemann Society a dramma per musica, — Herkules 
auf dem ScheidewegCy — to celebrate the eleventh birthday 
of the Electoral Prince*. We learn this from Picander's 
poems, among which the libretto is printed; the autograph 
score merely has the title of "Gluckwiinschungskantate 
auf einen sachsischen Prinzen'' ("G)ngratulatQry Cantata 
for a Saxon Prince"). 

The subject is a familiar one. Pleasure and Virtue 
each try to capture Hercules, — who here represents the 
young prince. Warned by the faithful echo, he resists 
^he former, and falls into the arms of Virtue, whereupon 
the work ends with the chorus "Lust der Volker, Lust der 
Deinen, bliihe, holder Friederich!". 

As the summer meetings of the Collegium musicum were 
held in Zimmermann's garden, before the city gate, we 
may assume that this cantata was given in the open air, — 
as was the case, indeed, with most of the large secular 
works he wrote in Leipzig. 



♦ B. G. XXXIV, p. 121 £f. 



Die Wahl dss Herkulss. 281 

The music Bach has written to Picander's poem is, 
with all its charm and urbanity, full of characterisation. 
As Spitta sa;^, Handel's Wahl des Herakles is much inferior 
to that of Bach. It is not dear, however, what Spitta 
means by the reproach that the work is spoilt by an ''excess 
of sentiment'' that does not suit either the subject or the 
genre*. He is alwa}^ inclined, indeed, to under-appreciate 
Bach's secular cantatas. 

Although the Wahl des Herkules is rarely performed 
in otir concert halls, it is well known for all that, for the 
principal numbers — six in all — have been incorporated 
in the Christmas Oratorio, at which Bach was working 
at that time. 

The opening chorus, ''Lasst uns sorgen'*, is identical with 
the chorus *Tallt mit Danken" of the Christmas Oratorio. 

The slumber song that Pleasure sings over Hercules 
became the lullaby for the infant Jesus. This is the well- 
known aria, — 



I 



k 




The text of the original and that of the adaptation may 
be cited here for the purpose of comparison — 

^ The Choice of Hercules; 

Pleasure: ''Schlafe, mein Lieber, und pflege der Ruh', 
Folge der Lockung entbrannter Gedanken, 
Schmecke die Lust 
Der liistemen Bnist 
Und erkenne keine Schranken." 

The Christmas Oratorio; 

^'Schlafe, mein Liebster, genieBe der Ruh', 

Wache nach diesem ftb: aller Gedeihenl 

Labe die Brust, 

Empfinde die Lust, 

Wo wir unser Herz erfreuen." 



* Spitta II, 629, 630. 



282 



XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 



The aria "Flosst mein Heiland" in the oratorio is also 
taken from Die Wahl des Herkules, where, in the aria 
*Treues Echo", the hero asks the echo to reply to him. 
Here the musical effect is justified by the text. In the 
corresponding number of the Christmas Oratorio, however, 
the echo effect is meaningless, the text having nothing 
to do with question and answer. 

The aria "Auf meinen Fliigeln sollst du schweben 
corresponds to the aria "Ich will nur dir zu Ehren leben 
in the Christinas Oratorio. Here again the music betrays 
how much of it is original and how much borrowed. In 
the aria in the cantata the motion of the floating wings 
is suggested ; we seem to see an eagle soaring aloft with 
a few beats of his wings and then circling tranquilly in the 
air — 



>9 



99 




The text of the aria in the oratorio has no relation what- 
ever to this wonderfully plastic theme. Why did not Bach 
take the trouble to ensure, by a corresponding pictorial 
figure, community between the words and the music in 
the new text? 

So again with the aria "Bereite dich Zion" and its secular 
model "Ich will dich nicht horen". The theme of the 
middle section has meaning only in relation to the original. 
At one point the solo violin is silenced, and a curious figure 
enters in the basses — 




What does this signify? It is the familiar motive by 
means of which Bach represents the winding motion of 



Die WaM des Herkules and the Christmas Oratorio. 283 

a serpent or a dragon. The text, in fact, speaks of the 
serpents that approached the youthful Hercules — "the 
serpents that tried to cajole me". In the Christmas Oratorio 
the bass figure has no justification. 

The dialogue between Hercules and Virtue, "Ich bin 
deine", also loses its musical meaning when it becomes 
the duet "Herr, dein Mitleid" in the oratorio. No one 
acquainted with Bach*s thematic invention can doubt 
that both the motives of the aria express joy of the liveliest 
kind — 




In the original these themes are prompted by the text. 
Hercules' choice of Virtue is expressed in a sort of nuptial 
rapture — 

'Ich bin deine; du bist meinet 
Ich kiisse dich; kusse michi" 

The text of the adaptation, however, is quite colourless, 
and would never have given rise of itself to music of this 
kind. 

These examples of adaptations in a single work are typical 
for Bach. It is almost incredible that the same artist 
who insisted so strongly on characteristic expression in 
music could at another time constrain his music so bar- 
barously to fit an alien text. "We can congratulate our- 
selves*', sa}^ Spitta, "that with the exception of the final 
chorus and the recitatives, the whole of Die Wahl des 
Herkides has been incorporated in the Christmas Oratorio^ 
written a year later."* To this we may rejoin that our 
good luck is somewhat doubtful, since the adapted move- 



• Spitta II, 630. 



284 XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

ments make a notably uncomfortable impression upon us. 
Even the hearer who does not exactly know how the adapta- 
tions have been made will feel that the words and music 
do not agree. This makes full artistic en]03anent impossible. 
Spitta is secretly rejoiced at these superficial transcrip- 
tions, as they confirm for him his pet conclusion that the 
pictorial and the characteristic are only accidental, not 
essential, elements of Bach's art. The musician who is 
indifferent to all these theories will rather regret that 
the incorporation of Die Wahl des HerkuUs in the Christ 
mas Oratorio prevents us hearing it in its original form. 

On 8th December 1733, barely three months after Die 
Wahl des Herkules^ Bach performed a new cantata in 
honour of the royal house, entitled Tonet^ ihr Pauken, 
erschaUet TrotPipeten, dramma per musica der Konigin zu 
Ehren"*. Bach did not finish the work until the evening 
before the performance, as is shown by the note at the 
end of the autograph score — "Fine. DSGL 1733. d. 7 Dec". 
It is interesting to observe that the majority of the cantatas 
in honour of the royal house, including Die Wahl des Her- 
hides, bear the inscriptions J.J. (Jesu Juva — Jesus help) 
and SDGl. (Soli Deo Gloria — To God alone the glory'. 

The text must be by Bach himself, since no author's 
name is given in the programme book printed by Breit- 
kopf ♦*. The quality and the quantity of the dialect in the 
text, however, would be enough to betray the real author. 
The first chorus may be quoted as an example of Bach's 
poetry: 

**T6net ihr PaukenI ErschaUet Trompeten! 
Klingende Saiten erfullet die Luft! 
Singet itzt Lieder ihr muntren Poeten, 
Konigin lebe! wie frdhlichst geruft. 
Konigin lebe I diss wiinschet der Sachse, 
Kdnigin lebe! und bliihe und wachse!" 

• B. G. XXXIV, p. 177 ££. The 8th December was the Queen's 
birthday. 

** The original imprint of the text is in the Roysl Library at 
Dresden, showing that the programme books were sent to the Court. 



Preise dein Glueke. 285 

The finest numbers of this work also have passed into 
the Christmas Oratorio*. Here, however, the adaptations 
led to no violence being done to the music, both texts being 
of a general order and expressing the same joyous feelings. 

In January 1734, for the coronation of August II at 
Cracow, the ZufriedengesUlUe Aeolus was rearranged for 
a new text, Blast Ldrmen ihr Feinde**. 

In the autumn of the same year the King and Queen 
visited Leipzig. Bach hurriedly wrote the cantata Preise 
dein Glilcke^ gesegnetes Sachsen, which was performed in 
the market-place, before the windows of the royal pair, 
on the evening of 5th October***. "About 9 o'clock in the 
evening,** says Salomon Riemer*s Chronicle, "the whole of 
the students here performed before their Majesties a most 
submissive serenade, with trumpets and kettle-drums, 
composed by Hr. Capell-Meister Joh. Sebastian Bach, 
Cant, zu St. Thom. During it 600 students carried great 
torches, and four Counts, as Marshals, produced the music^f- 

In the recitatives, allusions are made to contemporary 
events. One of these speaks of the exploits of the French 
in the War of the Polish Succession: 

''In einer Zeit, da alles um uns blitzt und kracht, 

Ja der Franzosen Macht (die doch so vielmal schon ge- 

dampfet worden) 
Von Siiden und von Norden auch unserm Vaterland mit 

Schwert und Feuer draut, 
Kann diese Stadt so gliicklich sein, dich, machtgen Schutz- 

gott unsrer Linden, 
In ihrem Schoss zu finden/' 



* Tdnett ihr Pauken, Chrisimas Oratorio. 

X. Chonxs. Tdnet ihr Pauken. x. ChoniB. Janchzet, frohlocket. 

a. Aria. Fromme Musen. 2. Aria. Frohe Hirten eilt. 

3. Aria. Kron' und Preia' ge- 3. Aria. Grosser Herr und 



krfoter Daman. starker K5nig. 

4. Choms. Blicket ihr Linden. 4. Chorus. Herrscher des Him- 



mels. 



*♦ See p. 270. 

••♦ B. G. XXXIV, p. 245 f£. 
t B. G. XXXIV, Preface, p. 30. 



286 



XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 



The texts of the sacred cantatas of that time also give 
expression to the anxiety caused by the war. 

The music of this coronation cantata is somewhat unequal 
in quality. A number of the movements seem to be bor- 
rowed from other works. Only one number was taken 
from it for the Christmas Oratorio*. The first chorus 
afterwards became the Hosanna of the B minor Mass. 

Two days later, on the 7th October, the King's birthday 
was celebrated. For this festival Bach had long prepared 
a performance of the cantata ScfUdcht spielende WeUen 
at the Collegium Musicum**. The text is by Picander, 
who again did Bach the service of supplying him with 
a poem exceedingly rich in musical motives. He manages 
this by making the Vistula, the Elbe, the Danube and the 
Pleisse laud the good fortime of the Saxon Poland through 
which they flow. This is all Bach needs ; he lets the words 
of the text go where they wiU, and in almost every number 
depicts the changeful play of the waves. 

In the first chorus their multiform motion is represented 
by the co-operation of three motives — 

forte 



piano 



puui 




The truth of the picture to nature is astounding. All 
the irregularity and unexpectedness within a monotonous 
rhythm that give such fascination to the song of the waves 
is here achieved in tone. 



* The adaptation is again barbarous. The aria "Durch die von 
Eifer entflammten Waffen" ("By the weapons inflamed with 
anger'') is provided with the sacred text "Erleucht auch meine 
finstem Sinne" ("Lighten my darkened sense"). The text of the 
secular cantata is not by Picander; nor does it appear to be by 
Bach. 

•• B. G. XX«, p. I ff. 



SchUicht spielende Wellen, 



a87 



The text runs thus: 

"Schleicht spielende Wellen und murmelt gelindel 
Nein, rauschet geschwinde!" 

("Glide along, ye waves in play, and murmur gently I 
No, rush along swiftly!") 

As a great deal depends on the pla3dng here, Bach has 
liberally sprinkled the original parts with dots, ties, and 
dynamic marks. They show us, down to the smallest detail, 
how he wished his music to be performed. 

In the aria of the Elbe, "Jede Woge meiner Wellen 
ruft das goldne Wort August** ("Every one of my billows 
calls out the golden word Augustus*'), the appropriate 
motion is rendered by a solo violin — 




In the aria of the Danube the motion of the waves is repre- 
sented in a very complex style. The motive of the aria of 
the Pleisse runs thus — ' 








In the final chorus the motion is throughout tranquil and 
majestic — 




Thus in thirteen months, — from September 1733 to 
October 1734 — Bach had produced five cantatas in honour 
of the royal house He could hardly have shewn more 



288 XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

loyalty ; nevertheless he had still to wait two years for the 
title he so eagerly desired. 

After this the secular compositions became less and 
less frequent. The cantata Thomana sass annoch betrUbft 
performed on 21st November 1734 on the occasion of the 
induction of the younger Emesti, is now lost. The dreary 
text is preserved in Riemer's Chronicle*. 

Four years later (1738) another cantata of homage to 
the royal house was performed. Riemer*s Chronicle speaks 
of it thus: 

"On the morning of the 28th April, about 9 o'clock. Baron 
Woldemar von Schmettau gave a solemn discouise in St. Paul's 
church on the approaching marriage of the Princess Amelia and 
His Majesty the King of the two Sicilies. At nine o'clock in the 
evening the univexsity students, with many torches, performed 
a fine Nacht Musique, with trumpets and kettle-drums, before Apel's 
house in the market, — a submissive drama composed by Herr 
Capell Meister Joh. Sebastian Bach ; whereupon Count von Zierotin« 
Baron von Schmettau, Herr von Leipnitz and Herr von Maxschall 
were so gracious as 1x> submit the cantata most humbly to the 
Kings and the Princesses, and were allowed to kiss hands"**. 

We are not told whether this honour fell to the com- 
poser also. Magister Bimbaum mentions this cantata 
in his defence of Bach against Scheibe (1739), adding it 
as a proof that "the Herr Court Composer writes movingly, 
expressively, naturally, synmietrically, and in accordance 
not with a depraved but with the best taste*****. The 
music is lost. The text glorifies August II and his fatiier 
under the names of Solomon and David. The title of the 
cantata is WiUkommen, ikr herrschenden Gdtter der Erden. 

Altogether we have only three secular cantatas dating 
from Bach's last creative period. The first, Angenehmes 
Wiederau, belongs to the year I737t- On 28th September 



* See B. G. XXXIV, Preface, p. 58 if. The aria "Hochgelobter 
Gottessohn" in the cantata Bleib bet uns, denn es will Ab^nd werden 
(No. 6) seems to have been taken from this secular cantata. 
** See B. G. XXXIV, p. 48 ff., where the text also is printed 
••• See I, 182, and Spitta III, 252 fL 
t B. G. XXXIV, Preface, p. 36 ff. and p. 325 ff. 



Angenehtnes Wiederau, Mer hahn en neue Oberkeei. 289 

of that year Johann Christian Hennicke, a quondam 
lackey, who had prospered by the favour of Count Briihl, 
rendered homage at Wiederau on entering into possession 
of his land. Picander, who wished to curry favour with 
the parvenu, had written the text and asked Bach to com- 
pose the music. The opening chorus of the cantata — it 
b repeated at the end — is one of the most spirited move- 
ments ever written by Bach. We can easily understand 
him using it again for a festival work; it recurs in the 
cantata for Midsummer Day, Freue dicky erldsie Schar 
(No. 30). Four of the arias are also incorporated in the 
sacred work. The adaptation of the second is very imper- 
fect, as will be seen from a cursory comparison of the 
two texts: 

Angenehtnes Wiederau. 

Aria, '^as die Seele kann ergotzen. 

Was vergniigt xmd hoch zu schatzen. 
Soil dir lehn und erblich sein. 
Heine Fiille soil nichts sparen, 
Und dir reichlich offenbaren, 
DaB mein ganzer Vorrat dein." 

Frei4e dich, erldste Schar. 

Aria. ''Kommt, ihr angefochtnen Siinder^ 
Eilt tmd lauft, ihr Adamskinder, 
Euer Heiland ruft tmd schreit. 
Kommety ihr verirrten Schafe, 
Stehet auf vom Siindenschlafe, 
Denn jetzt ist die Gnadenzeit." 

The cantata Mer hahn en neue Oberkeet was also written 
for an act of homage on entering into possession of land. 
It was performed on 30th August 1742, when the Cham- 
berlain Karl Heinrich von Dieskau became Herr von 
Kleinzschocher*. The idea seems again to have come 
from Picander. As von Dieskau was his superior in the 
custom-house, he had good reasons for paying him 



♦ B. G. XXIX, p. 175 ff. 

Schw«itzer, Bach. U. I9 



290 



XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 



attention. Perhaps, too, the gentleman was one of Baches 
Dresden patrons. At any rate we find Frau von Dieskau, 
in 1752, mentioned as godmother to the first-bom son of 
Wilhelm Friedemann*. 

The idea of writing a piece of rustic music did not come 
inopportunely to Bach, for he had a strong penchant to 
burlesque. Almost all the movements are set in the form 
of dance-tunes; the overture is a potpourri of dances, 
terminating with a waltz. The action is simply this, — the 
village people come to congratulate the lord of the manor 
and offer him good wishes, after which they retire to drink 
free beer in the tavern. The text is skilfully put together 
by Picander. He gives Bach the opportunity to contrast 
the music of the town and that of the village. The com- 
poser also employs folk-melodies. One of these — 




Es neh-me zehn-tao-send Dn - ka - ten 



had lately become popular with the words "Frisch auf 
zum frohUchen Jagen"**. The other — 



'^nin^ r u\r r f\\ ^ tt\=^ 



Gieb Scha - ne, viel S5h - ne Ton art - ger Ge - stalt 

seems to have been well known as a cradle song. A third 
is used in the form of interludes in a recitative — 




It is the same time as appears in the Goldberg Variations. 
There may be other folk-melodies in the cantata, though 
we cannot be sure of them. 



* Bitter, C. P. Emmanuel und W. F. Bach, II, 215. 
** On its origin see Spitta III, 179 ff., where the other folk- 
tunes are also cited. 



O holder Tag. 29I 

The orchestra usually consists of a contrabass^ a viola, 
and a violin. In the song ^*£s nehme zehntausend Du- 
katen" a horn is added. The aria "Kleinzschocher musse 
so zart und siisse*' is instrumented in the town style, i. e. 
with flute and strings. Only Bach*s fatal passion for bor- 
rowing can account for the fact that the number "Dein 
Wachstum sei feste und lache vor Lust** is not set to original 
music but to the prize song of Pan, '^Zum Tanze, zum 
Sprunge"*; or was he so pleased with this that he wanted 
to hear it again? 

The cantata holder Tag was written as "table music'* 
for a wedding feast**. If the text can be trusted, the 
wedded pair were musical. The question is discussed 
whether music ought to have any place in such a feast; 
at the end the answer is given in the affirmative, especially 
as a "patron** of the art is here concerned. The spouses 
each received a copy of the parts, written with extra neat- 
ness and fastened with silk; these are now in the Royal 
Library at Berlin. 

This cantata probably belongs to Bach*s last creative 
period; it is a specimen of that art of "charm** on which 
he prides himself in Phoebus und Pan***. Charmingly 
roguish is the aria "Schweigt, ihr Floten** ("Be silent, 
ye flutes**), in which the frightened flute cannot achieve 
a complete theme, but merely gives out short fragments, 
after each of which it stops timidly — 




* See p. 274. The "number will be found in its original form 
in B. G. XI«, p. 38. 

** B. G. XXIX, p. 69 ff. Like the other wedding cantata, 
Weichet nur, betrHbte Schatten, it is written for soprano solo. 

*** The aria "Groeser Gdnner, dein Vergnugen" is taken from 
the cantata Angenehmes Wiederau, where it is set to the words 
"So wie ich die Tropfen zoUe". See B. G. XXXIV, p. 338. 

19* 



292 XXX. The Secular Cantatas. 

Soon after this first performance Bach provided the 
cantata with a new text, angenehme Mdodeil which 
sings the praise of art in general*. In this adaptation 
it was given at the house of Bach's Dresden patron, Count 
Flenuning, and probably at a meeting of the CoUegium 
tnusicunty — apparently at the one in 1749 at which Phoebus 
und Pan was revived. The new version of the occasional 
cantata seems to refer to the Biedermann controversy**. 
One recitative runs thus: 

''Wiewohl, beliebte Musika, so angenehm dein Spiel so vielen 

Ohren ist, 
So bist du dodi betriibt und stehest in Gedanken da, 
Denn es sind ihr'r vid, denen du verachtlicfa bist. 
Mich deucht, ich h5re deine Klagen selbst also sagen: 
Schweigt, ihr Fldten, schweigt, ihr T5ne '' 

The final section of the opening recitative — 

''Die Wissenschaften andrer Kiinste sind ird'nen Witzes 

kluge Dimste. 
Du aber ( — die MusikI — ) bist allein vom Himmd zu uns 

abgestiegen; 
So musst du audi recht himmlisch sein — ** 

is in the pure Bachian spirit. 

Two Italian cantatas have come down to us, — Amare 
traditare and Non sa che sia dolare***. The first is set for 
bass and davier accompaniment — a unique case with 
Bach. In the second, for soprano solo, the accompaniment 
is for strings and flute. A splendid sinfonia opens the 
cantata. Neither work, as we might expect from Bach, 
makes any attempt at imitating the Italian style. The 
texts are written in Germanised Italian; the second, judg- 



* The cantata will be found in this form in B. G. XXIX, 
p. 245 ff. 

♦• See p. 275. 
•♦• B. G. XI«, p. 93 £!., and XXIX, p. 45 ff. The fiist is given 
in the B. G. with a good German translation. Another Itelian 
cantata, Andro doll coUe al praio, is lost. See Spitta II, 637. 



Italian Cantatas. The Question of the Texts. 293 

ing from an aUusion here and there, is meant to console 
an Italian artist who is leaving Germany and returning 
to his native land. 

The fact that the secular c a ntata s are, mostly only 
occasional works, written to order, is apt to prevent oiu: 
doing them full justice. We are inclined to believe that 
with such an origin they must necessarily have been written 
hastily and mechanically, and so belong to a lower class 
of art. Bach and his generation, however, thought dif- 
ferently. When he had time, he wrote the works with par- 
ticular pleasure and took great pains with the perform- 
ance, as is evident from the careful way in which the parts 
have been revised, and the large number of phrasing marks 
and dynamic signs that they contain. 

It is consequently time to clear away a misconception, 
and to make the Bach of "charm" known to the musical 
world. The majority of these works were published nearly 
a generation ago, yet only one or two of them have been 
given on rare occasions here and there. Works like Phoebus 
und Pan, Die Wahl des HerkideSy Der zufriedengestelUe 
Aeolus, Weichet nut, betrUbte Schatten, Schleicht, spielende 
WeUen, and angenehme Melodei should appear regularly 
on our concert programmes; even the Coffee Cantata 
and the Mer hahn en neue Oberkeei should be brought for- 
ward for other reasons than as mere curiosities. 

It is curious that the experience of those who have 
produced the cantatas does not lead to further emulation. 
It has always been observed that the audience feels no 
sense of strangeness whatever, but is warmly enthusiastic. 
The Bach Society of Paris has had the courage to give 
some of the secular cantatas — including Weichet nut, 
Sefrubfe SckdUin^ the Coffee Cantata, and Mer hahn en 
neue Oberkeet — at its very first concerts, and owes its 
remarkable success in no small degree to this course. 

The question of the texts presents no particular dif- 
ficulty. Certain fundamental alterations are necessary, — 
as August II and his family, and Herr Kortte, Herr MuUer, 



294 XXXI. The Motets and the Songs. 

and all the other lights of science^ are of minor interest 
to us now, their names must be taken out of the poems. 
The proper method of adaptation is indicated for us in 
the music. The main thing is to see that the words embody 
the nature-poetry that have inspired the music. In Der 
zufriedengestelUe Aeolus only a few recitatives and the 
final chorus need altering; in other works the changes will 
have to be more drastic. When shall we find the poet 
who will supply the music of ScMeichty spielende WeUen 
with that poetic song of the waves that Bach dimly per- 
ceived when he wrote the work? To the objection "Have 
we the right to undertake such adaptations of the text?'* 
we may reply that Bach himself gives it us; he converted 
the Wedding Cantata, holder Tag, into the hymn to 
music, angenehme Melodei, The fate of the recitatives 
need not concern us. Bach himself, when making his 
adaptations, abandons them without scruple when he 
has no need for them. 

Our singers, for their part, should pitilessly worry the 
conductors, great and small, until they are given the 
opportunity to sing the splendid music that Bach has 
provided for them in these works. The sopranos espe- 
cially should plead for the solo cantatas angenehme 
Melodei and Weichet nut, betrUbie Schatten. 



CHAPTER XXXI. 

THE MOTETS AND THE SONGS. 

B. G. XXXIX. 

Of the motets that have come down to us with Bach's 
name, only six are by him, — ^ Singet dent Herm ein neues 
Lied:'' Der Geist hilfi unsrer Schwachheit auf: Jesu meine 
Freude: FUrchie dich nicht:^Komm, Jesu, komm: Lobel 



Origin of the Motets. 295 

den Herrny aUe Heiden*. The first, second, fourth and 
fifth are for double chorus. 

We have autographs only of Singet dent Herrn and Der 
Geist hilft unsrer SchwachheU auf; the others exist only 
in copies. The credit of first publishing Bach's motets 
belongs to Schicht, one of his successors in the cantorate. 
He issued them in 1803 through Breitkopf and Hartel**. 

Two motets were sung each Sunday both at St. Thomas's 
and St. Nicholas's, — at the commencement of the morn- 
ing service and of vespers respectively. This would lead 
us to suppose that Bach must have written a large munber 
of works of this kind. Had he done so some of them at 
any rate would certainly have survived. It appears, how- 
ever, that he took no trouble over the ordinary Sunday 
motet, and always had the traditional ones sung. Tliose 
of his that we possess were in fact not written for the or- 
dinary service but for special occasions. We learn by ac- 
cident the origin of three of them; Jesu meine Freude is 
the music for the funeral of a certain Frau Reese (1723); 
FUrchte dich nicht was written for the funeral of Frau 
Winkler, the wife of the deputy mayor; Der Geist hilft 
unsrer Schwachheit auf is entitled, in the vocal parts, "Motet 
for the burial of Professor and Rector Emesti", who died 
in October 1729. 

The Sunday motets were usually sung at Leipzig in 
Latin. We possess, however, no Latin motets by Bach. 
Ernst Ludwig Gerber says that he heard a fine Latin 
motet of Bach's, for double chorus, sung at the Christmas 



^* The motet Ich tasse dich nicht is a work by Johann Christian 
Bach, of which Johann Sebastian made a copy. It is too fine a 
composition to remain unperformed merely because it is not "gen- 
uine". Of the other motets formerly attributed to Bach we may 
mention Sei Lob und Preis mit Ehren; Lob', Ehre und Weisheit; 
Merk* auf, mein Herz, und singe; Unser Wandel ist im Himmel; 
Jauckzet dem Herrn alie Welt. On the question of authenticity 
see WuUner's exceUent Preface to B. G. XXXIX. 

** His edition contained six motets. Ich lasse dich nicht is given 
as a work of Johann Sebastian's. The other five motets are genuine ; 
only Lobet den Herrn, aUe Heiden is lacking. 



296 XXXI. The Motets and the Songs. 

service at St. Thomas's in 1767. In the old days, however, 
the term ^*motet" had such a general significance — even 
Zelter and Mendelssohn speak of motets when they mean 
cantatas — that we cannot deduce from Gerber*s remark 
any positive conclusion as to the existence of Latin motets 
in the strict sense of the word. 

All we can say, then, is that on the ordinary Sundays 
Bach gave other men's motets, not his own. 'the musicians 
of that time took no interest in the statutory portions 
of the service; they occupied themselves only with the 
"principal music*', — the cantata. Certain hints in the 
documents relating to the Krause affair* almost lead us 
to suppose that Bach did not conduct the motet himself, 
but turned it over to the prefect. In his memorial of 19th 
August 1736 he speaks of having to conduct himself as 
something quite out of the ordinary course**. 

The motets presented no text-problem, as Bach followed 
tradition in not setting original poems, but Biblical pas- 
sages and chorale verses. His way of combining these shows 
the same mastery that we see in his choice of chorale verses 
for the Passions. A wonderful effect is made at the end 
of FUfchU dich nicht by the entry of the chorale "Herr 
mein Hirt, Bruxm aller Freudenl Du bist mein, ich bin 
dein" ("Lord my shepherd, source of all joy! Thou art 
mine, I am thine") during the chorus "Fiirchte dich nicht, 
ich habe dich erloset; ich habe dich bei deinem Namen 
gerufen; du bist mein" ("Fear thou not, I have redeemed 
thee; I have called thee by thy name; thou art mine"). 
There is a similarly profound and moving stroke in the 
motet Jesu meine Freude, where Bach elucidates the verses 
of the m3rstical hymn by the intercalation of passages 
from the eighth chapter of the Epistle to the Romans. 
We may regard this text as Bach's sermon upon life and 
death. 



* See I, 140. 
** The memorial is given in Spitta III, 311. 



With or without accompaniment? 297 

The musical beauty of the motets was acclaimed by 
Mozart, who had the greatness of Bach borne in upon him 
in a flash during a performance of Singed dent Herrn*. 
Zelter writes to Goethe that if the latter could only be 
so fortunate as to hear a performance of a Bach motet he 
would feel that he was "in the very centre of the world"**. 
And truly when this music rings out we lose sight of the 
world with all its unrest, its care and sorrow. We are 
alone with Bach, who soothes our souls with the wonderful 
peace of his own heart, and lifts us above all that is, was 
and shall be. When the tones have died away we feel 
that we must sit still with folded hands, and thank the 
master for his legacy to mankind. 

The question is still debated whether the motets are to 
be performed a cappeUa^ or whether the voices should be 
supported by the organ or orchestra. We must remember 
that in Bach*s time the pure vocal style had been quite 
lost by German composers. Their vocal works are written 
instrumentally. If, however, the voices are to be handled 
in this free style they must be supported in some way. 
By a cappella music was understood, at that time, and on 
this side of the Alps, not music for voices alone, but com- 
positions in which the orchestra did not play an inde- 
pendent role. It was always taken for granted that the 
organ was to supply the harmonic foundation, and that 
instruments were to double the voices. The organ accom- 
paniment in particular was regarded as indispensable. 
Mattheson, in his Das beschiUzU Orchestre (1717), shows 
that in his day there were no longer any vocalists who 
could sing without the support of the organ or the clavier; 
during Kuhnau's cantorate the St. Thomas boys who sang 
in the streets used to employ a small portable regal; Kim- 



* See I, 232 for Rochlitz's account of Mozart's sudden en- 
thusiasm for Bach. 

♦• See I, 241. It is possible, however, that by "motet" Zelter 
really means "cantata". We learn from Mendelssohn that Zelter 
used to give the canta.tas before a small audience. 



298 XXXI. The Motets and the Songs. 

berger and Zelter are of opinion that all a cappeUa singing 
should be supported by the organ. Had Bach, therefore, 
performed his motets with the voices alone he would 
have been nmning counter to the practice of his epoch. 

Moreover, in the case of one of his motets — Der Geist 
hilfi unsrer Schwachheit auf — we possess a figured organ 
part and duplicate instrumental parts, all in Bach's hand- 
writing. The first chorus is supported by the strings, 
the second by oboes, taille and bassoon. In the autograph 
score there is no hint of these additions, — which implies 
that Bach regarded the making of the instnunental parts 
as a matter of course, and that his practice would be the 
same in the other motets, only that there the instrumental 
parts have been lost. The motet Lobei den Herrn, aUe 
Heiden was accompanied by at any rate the organ, as is 
shewn by the existence of a continuo part that is quite 
different from the bass of the choir. 

Internal evidence, too, points to the fact that in the 
other motets the voices were supported by the organ; 
otherwise we can hardly believe that in Singet dent Herm 
Bach would give the basses of the first chorus so long-held 
a note as this — 



q:.^ r i r i ri ri ri r i r 

— P : ' 



We must remember also that the motets for double chorus 
are so arranged that a continuo part can easily be made 
out of a combination of the two bass parts; Bach's con- 
tinuo part in Der Geist hilft unsrer Schwachheit auf is con- 
structed on this basis. How much he relies on the filling 
up of the harmonies here may be seen from tiie fact that 
where both basses are silent he makes the organist play 
with the tenor and work out the figured bass. 

Further, the motets are merely the same kind of vocal 
music as Bach writes everywhere else. In the cantatas 
are a great number of movements that are really nothing 



I 



With or without accompaniment? 299 

else but motets*. They have no independent orchestral 
accompaniment; tiie instruments double the vocal parts. 
And these choruses prove how remote Bach was from the 
ideal of true a cappella singing. He will rather have too 
many orchestral parts than too few. Strings and oboes 
do not satisfy him ; as a rule he employs four trombones — 
one to each voice-part. 

Historical considerations thus make it practically certain 
that Bach had his motets accompanied by organ and 
orchestra**. In art, however, historical considerations 
alone are never decisive. It might well have been that 
Bach, with his feeble choir, regarded the co-operation of 
the instruments as indispensable, and that we, with our 
large and expert choirs, not only can but ought to dis- 
pense with them. 

Here it must be unconditionally admitted that the double- 
choir motets in particular, when sung by a powerful and 
thoroughly efficient choir, are extraordinarily effective. 
But this does not settle the question. When we examine 
the works closely, and note the bold leading of the voices 
and the way harsh harmonies are piled up at the cost 
of a slight loss of beauty of tone, we are finaUy convinced 
that this freedom in the vocal writing is based on the 



* For example, the chorus "Wenn aber jener, der Geist der 
Wahrheit konmien wird", in Es isi euch gut, doss ich hingehe (No. 108) ; 
the chorus "Wer an ihn glaubet, wird nicht gerichtet", in Also 
hoi GoU die Welt geliebt (No. 68); and the opening choruses of 
Chfistum wit soUen loben echon (No. 121), fFcEr* Gott nicht mit uns 
diese Zeit (No. 14), Aus tiefer Not schrei ich mu dir (No. 38), and 
Ach Gott vom Himmel sieh darein (No. 2). 

** We must not omit to mention that Gerber, who says he heard 
a Latin motet of Bach's at a service in Leipzig in 1767, remarks 
that the St. Thomas's choir sang it "without any accompaniment". 
The question arises whether this "without any accompaniment" 
bars out the organ also, or merely means that no other instruments 
took part in it. Kimberger would not have been able to maintain 
positively that every chorus in the service was to be sung with 
the organ, if his teacher Bach had given the motets without the 
organ. It must be remembeied, too, that in Lent, when the organ 
was silenced, the motets also were discontinued. 



300 XXXI. The Motets and the Songs. 

assumption of a harmonic substructure, and that the 
motets are best performed with a choir of moderate size — 
about sixty voices — with organ accompaniment. 

If this view gains acceptance, the motets will be sung 
more frequently than they are now, since the opinion 
is at present widespread that only choirs of the utmost 
virtuosity dare venture to give them, and many a good 
Bach choir has not fulfilled expectations in the a cappeUa 
performance of a motet. If we are going to accompany the 
voices with instruments, we should employ not only strings 
but oboes and bassoons, as Bach always does in the motet 
choruses of his cantatas. If the instruments are numerous 
enough we get a peculiarly delightful timbre, and every 
detail of the part-writing comes out clearly. When the 
effect of an experiment with instrumental accompaniment 
is disappointing it is because strings alone have been used, 
and these on far too small a scale. The catUus firmus 
of the chorale may be accompanied by the trumpet. 

Bach*s work in the domain of the sacred song is prin- 
cipally known to us from Schemelli's h3nnn-book*. Of 
its sixty-nine melodies, twenty-four, according to the latest 
research, cannot be dated earlier than Bach. As the preface 
states that the melodies are "partly composed and partly 
improved in their figured basses by Herr Johann Sebastian 
Bach of Leipzig", these twenty-four are presumably his 
own**. As was pointed out in the chapter on the history 



* On the subject of Schemelli's hymn-book, and Bach's share 
in it, see I, 22. 

** The whole of the melodies in Schemelli's h3ann-book will 
be found in B. G. XXXIX. Those supposed to be by Bach are: 
"Vergiss mich nicht"; 'T>ir, dir Jehova will ich singen"; "Mein 
Jesus, was fur Seelenweh"; "Gott, wie gross ist deine Gute"; 
"Kommt, Seden, dieser Tag" ; "Kommt wieder aus der finstem 
Gruft" ; "Konun, susser Tod" ; "Ach, dass nicht die letzte Stunde" ; 
''O Uebe Seele, aeh die Smnen"; 'Ich halte txeulich still"; "Ich 
liebe Jesum alle Stnnd"; "Selig wer an Jesum denkt"; ^'Jesa, 
deine Liebeswunden" ; "Beschrankt, ihr Weisen dieser Welt"; 
"Bins ist notl ach Herr dies eine"; "O finstre Nacht, wann wirst 
du doch"; "Dich bet' ich an, mein hochster Gott"; "Jesu, Jesu, 



The Songs. 301 

of the chorale melodies, they are sacred arias rather than 
chorale melodies. The best-known are "Mein Jesu, was 
fiir Seelenweh'*, "Kommt, Seelen, dieser Tag", "Komm^ 
siisser Tod", "Liebster Heir Jesu, wo bleibst du so lange", 
and "Ich steh an deiner Krippe hier". 

In the Klavierbiichlein of Anna Magdalena we find 
another and simpler melody to "Gib dich zufrieden" than 
that which Bach wrote for Schemelli, and the aria "Ge- 
denke doch, mein Herz, zuriicke ans Grab und an den 
Glockenschlag". 

The dedication to his faithful life-companion, "Bist 
du bei mir", is especially moving*. 

The melody of the beautiful long-song "Willst du dein 
Herz mir schenken" is presmnably not by Bach. He 
copied it for his wife into the Klavierbiichlein, and inscribed 
it "Aria di Giovannini"**. The aria on the tobacco pipe 
however, seems to be his***. Like the two other songs 
from the first Klavierbiichlein, — "Bist du bei mir" and 
"Gedenke doch" — it contain* a meditation on death. 



du bist mein" ; "Liebster Herr Jesu, wo bleibst du so lange" ; 'Teh 
steh' an deiner Krippe hler"; "So wiinsch ich mir zu guter letzt"; 
'' Auf, auf, die rechte Zeit ist hier" ; 'Teh laas dich nicht" ; "Meines 
Lebens letzte Zeit". 

* "Bist du bei mir, geh' ich mit Freuden zum Sterben und zu 

meiner Ruh. 
Ach vergnugt w&r' so mein Ende, es driickten deine schdnen 

Hande 
Mir die getreuen Augen zu." 

** "Willst du dein Herz mir schenken, so fang es heimlich an» 
Dass unser beider Denken niemand erraten kann. 
Die Liebe muss bei beiden allzeit verschwiegen sein. 
Drum schliess' die grossten Freuden in deinem Herzen ein. 

*** "So oft ich meine Tabakspfeife, mit gutem Knaster angefullt, 
Zur Lust und Zeitvertreib ergreif e, so gibt sie mir ein Trauer- 

bUd 
Und fuget diese Lehre bei, dass ich derselben ahnlich sei." 



99 



302 XXXIL The Oratorios. 

CHAPTER XXXII. 

THE ORATORIOS. 

B. G. V>. The Christmas Oratorio. 
B. G. XXI>. The Easter Oratorio. 
B. G. II . The Ascensioii Oratorio (Cantata 

Lob^t GoU in seinen Reichen: No. ii). 

We possess the original score of the Chrisifnas Oratorio 
and the parts, the latter carefully revised by Bach himself. 
How closely he went through these may be seen from the 
fact that he noted that the copyist had required a wind 
player to transpose in the middle of a solo, — whereupon 
he removed the error. The score and the parts, — now 
in the Royal Library at Berlin — once belonged to Em- 
manuel, who has written on the cover "composed in 1734, 
in the fiftieth year of the composer". We also have a 
text-book of the first performance of the work. 

Bach's title of "oratorio" is misleading. An oratorio 
implies a Biblical action. This is lacking in Bach's work. 
It consists of lyrical meditations, held together by recita- 
tives that tell the Christmas story as it is given in Matthew 
and Luke. 

Moreover the work was never given under Bach as a 
whole and at one time, but in six parts, — on the three 
days of Christmas, New Year's day, the Sunday after 
New Year's day, and Epiphany. The Christmas Oratorio 
is therefore merely a collection of six cantatas which Bach 
wrote for the Christmas of 1734, and that only differ 
from other Christmas and post-Christmas cantatas in this 
respect, that the one mood runs through them all, and 
together they tell the full story of the birth of Christ. 

He must have conceived the plan of such a collection 
of cantatas as early as 1733. It was the time when he 
was trying to support his petition for the title of Court 
Composer by a number of occasional compositions in honour 
of the royal house. It was out of the question that this 



Origin of the Christmas Oratorio. 303 

music, after being performed, should be allowed to moulder 
in a drawer. The ceremonial and gladsome character of 
the choruses in these works made them specially suitable 
for the Christmas festival. We may thus almost say 
that Bach wrote the Christmas OraUmo in order that the 
finest movements of Die Wahl des Herkules and the Dramma 
per tnusica in honour of the Queen — Tonet^ ihr Pauken, 
erschallet Trompeten — should not be lost. Die Wahl 
des Herkides had been given on 5th September 1733, the 
Dramma pet musica on 8th December of the same year — 
both by the Telemann Society. 

In the original score we can distinguish the borrowed 
movements from the new ones by the fact that the former 
are carefully and neatly written, while the remainder 
have been written hastily and are sometimes hardly legible. 
Besides the numbers taken from Die Wahl des Herkules 
and the Dramma per musica, there are some others that are 
e-vidently fair copies. It is practically certain that these 
aJso are not original, but are taken from occasional com- 
positions which we cannot trace. The conclusion is that 
the great introductory choruses of the six cantatas and 
almost all the great solo numbers of the Christmas Ora- 
torio are borrowed*. 



* Fkom the Dramma per musica zu Ehren der Kdnigin are derived : 

1. The chorus "JaxLchzet, frohlocket" (ist cantata). 

2. The aria "Grosser Heir und starker Konig (ist cantata). 

3. The aria "Frohe Hirten eilt" (2nd cantata). 

4. The chorus "Herrscher des Himmels" (3rd cantata). 

From Die Wahl des Herkules are derived: 

5. The aria "Bereite dich Zion" (ist cantata). 

6. The aria "Schlafe, mein Liebster" (2nd cantata). 

7. The duet "Herr, ddn Mitleid" (3rd cantata). 

8. The chorus "Fallt mit Danken" (4th cantata). 

9. The aria "Fldsst mein Heiland, flosst dein Name" (4th 
cantata). 

10. The aria "Ich will nur dir zu Ehren leben" (4th cantata). 

From the "Cantata gratulatoria in adventum regis", Preise 
dein GlUche, gesegnetes Sachsen — performed on 5th October 
1734 — is derived: 



304 XXXII. The Oratorios. 

We must neither overestimate nor underestimate the 
bearing of this fact on the artistic value of the Christinas 
Oratorio. Spitta imderrates it, sa5^ng that the fact that 
the music was originally written for another text does not 
deprive it of any of its beauty. Others hold that the dis- 
covery of the provenance of the choruses and arias dissipates 
a good deal of the charm of the work. Against this it may 
be urged that a distinction must here be made between 
the choruses and the arias. The former are as good as 
original compositions could be; the declamation is ex- 
cellent; the moods and ideas of the text correspond as 
exactly to the music as if the latter had been composed 
expressly to these particular words. The impression one 
gets is rather that their charm and beauty do not mate 
with the text of the secular cantatas. 

The arias do not show the same happy agreement be- 
tween the music and the words. The music to "Ich will 
nur dir zu Ehren leben", "Bereite dich Zion", and "Hoir, 
dein Mitleid" in particular shows too clearly that it was 
prompted by other ideas and images than those of the 
present text*. The most artless hearer feels this dis- 
crepancy between the poem and the music; the majority 
of these arias do not affect him greatly. The declamation — 
thanks to the care with which the new text has been put 
together — does not often suggest adaptation, but it is 



11. The aria "Erleucht auch meine finstem Sinne" (5th 
cantata). 

The foUomng come from unknown cantatas: 

12. The aria "Schliesse mein Herze dies selige Wunder" 
(3rd cantata). 

13. The chorus "Ehre sei dir, Gott, gesungen" (5th cantata). 

14. The trio "Ach wann wird die Zeit erscheinen" (stii 
cantata). 

15. The chorus "Herr, wenn die stolzen Feinde toben'* 
(6th cantata). 

16. The aria "Nur ein Wink von seinen Handen'' (6th cantata). 

17. The aria "Nun mdgt ihr stolzen Feinde schrecken'* 
(6th cantata). 

* For further details see p. 282. 



The Choruses and Chorales. 305 

certainly not as natural as in other arias. All this, however, 
simply proves that the chief significance of the Christinas 
OrcUorio is not to be sought in the arias, and that it is 
no crime to "cut" them. 

The three choruses that belong to the action of the 
Christmas story — "Ehre sei Gott", "Lasset ims hin- 
gehen**, and "Wo ist der neugeborene Konig" — are 
supremely beautiful. The commencement of the first 
reminds us strongly of the youthful freshness of the organ 
fantasia in G major (Peters IV, No. 11); in the others we 
are struck by their remarkable simplicity and concision. 
In performance, the beauty of "Lasset uns hingehen" is 
usually spoiled by too quick a tempo ; people forget that the 
agitation and hurrying at the departure of the shepherds 
is ahready expressed in the semiquaver figure of the flutes 
and first violins, and that a quick tempo obliterates these 
runs and prevents the hearer perceiving their meaning. 
It may be suggested that the fine quaver-motive in the 
basses in "Ehre sei Gott" and "Lasset ims hingehen" would 
be brought out better by the addition of a few bassoons. 

It was a very happy idea of Picander's to accompany 
the action with short meditative recitatives. They are 
well written, and have inspired Bach to some beautiful 
and fervent music. Especially fine are **So geht denn 
hin, ihr Hirten, gehet", "Immanuel, o susses Wort", 
"Wohlan, dein Name soil allein in meinem Herzen sein", 
and the chorale with recitative "Er ist auf Erden kommen 
arm", — pastoral pipes playing round the last. 

Perhaps the most moving effects come from the chorales 
with independent orchestral accompaniment. "Ach mein 
herzliebes Jesulein, mach dir dn rein sanft Bettelein, 
zu ruhn in meines Herzens Schrein . . ." ("Ah! dearest 
Jesus, Holy Child, make thee a bed, soft, undefiled, within 
my heart, and there recline"*) sings the chorus on the 
announcement that Mary has cradled the Child in a manger ; 

* [Mr. Troutbeck's translation, in Novello's edition of the 
oratorio. Tr.] 

Sthweitcer,BMh. U. 20 



306 XXXII. The Oratorios. 

and we hear stately interludes in the three trumpets — a 
royal cradle-music for the Child in the stable at Beth- 
lehem. The chorale "Wir singen dir in deinem Heer" 
("With all thy hosts, oh Lord, we sing") is accompanied 
by the motive of the angels from the sinfonia at the com- 
mencement of the Second Part, since the preceding recita- 
tive indicates that it represents the combined song of 
angels and men. In the chorale *'Jesu, richte mein Be- 
ginnen" the horn parts are of exquisite tenderness. The 
final chorale, "Nun seid ihr wohl gerochen", with its 
wonderful trumpet figures, is a song of triumph of in- 
imitable grandeur. 

Chorales with independent orchestral accompaniment 
are found in the cantatas of the first Leipzig period, but 
not in those belonging to the period of the Cknstmas 
Oratorio. There are so many other things in this work 
that remind us of the earlier ones, that if the date were 
not so thoroughly vouched for we should be tempted to 
believe it had been written ten years previously. This is 
a unique characteristic of Bach — the years have no effect 
on the artist in him. At fifty he can write as youthful 
music as at twenty-five. 

Most hearers fail to perceive the beauty of the sinfonia 
that opens the Second Part; it gives them a slight feeling 
of disappointment. Instead of a tender pastorale, of the 
kind we have in Handel's Messiah^ they get a movement 
into the mood of which they cannot quite enter. Even 
when played most tenderly it has a certain restlessness 
in it; it does not give the hallowed impression of the star- 
strewn heavens that we should expect from a prelude to 
the narrative of the shepherds who are watching their 
flocks by night. Probably there is no conductor who has 
not felt the difficulty of making so extremely animated 
a movement give the idea of the serene tranquillity of 
nature. Anyone who has had the truly painful experience 
of going through several performances of the sinfonia 
cannot help asking, in the end, whether Bach really intended 



The Sinfonia and its Pfeiiormance. 307 

to express the mood that his interpreters put into it*» 
and that never succeeds in performance. 

But if the movement is i»:operly understood it has quite 
a different meaning. No one who knows that the motive 
in strings and flutes is generally employed by Bach to 
Sj^mbolise angels*^, and who notices that the movement 
is performed by two contrasted groups, — the four oboes 
having a theme of their own and being quite independent 
of the strings, whether they alternate or join with them — 
can have any doubt as to the meaning of the sinfonia. 
It represents the angels and the shepherds making music 
together. Bach is once more writing music that depicts 
a situation. The shepherds in the fields awake and blow 
their pipes; over them there hovers already the band of 
angels that is about to appear to them. Their music blends 
with that of the shepherds. Bach thus intends the move- 
ment to be an introduction to the recitative "And there 
were shepherds in the same country, abiding in the field . . . 
And lo, an angel of the Lord stood by them". If this be 
so, we need no longer take all the animation out of the 
sinfonia by playing it very softly and slowly; we can play 
it just as it is. The part for the flutes and violins must 
come out energetically if it is to suggest the joyous music 
of the angels. The oboes should play piano tiiroughout, 
and in a tempo just a shade slower. Where the strings 
alone are playing, or interrupt the oboes for a moment, 
a forte is required; the short parentheses in particular 
must give the effect of a shout of joy. Where the strings 
play with the oboes, the former should, as a rule, play 
piano, as if the angels were listening to the pipes of the 
shepherds. In this way we not only give an admirable 
and natural variety to the movement, but we make it 
immediately intelligible to every hearer. 



* According to Spitta, "the fundamental feeling" of the sin- 
fonia is a combination of "the grace of the Eastern idyl with the 
severity of the starlit boreal winter's night". (Spitta II, 581.) 
** See p. 80, where the two themes of the sinfonia are quoted. 



ao* 



3o8 



XXXII. The Oratorios. 



It is desirable also that the violin motive be played 
with a somewhat heavy grace, the third and ninth quavers 
receiving a kind of secondary accent that detaches them, 
as it were, from the note that follows: — 




For a fiiU performance of the Christmas Oratorio two 
evenings are required. If possible the performance should 
be so arranged that the first comes in Advent or Christmas, 
and the second in Epiphany. If only one evening is avail- 
able, it is better to "cut" the work freely rather than to hurry 
over it, for at the end the hearer is too tired to appreciate 
the beauty of the second part. It is a bad custom to make 
more cuts in the second part than in the first. The general 
principle to go upon is not to omit the great introductory 
choruses, the chorales, the recitatives, or anything relating 
to the action of the Christmas story; the cuts should all 
be in the arias*. 

For a popular performance in church we can safely 
cut out almost all the arias without any risk of leaving 
a mere torso ; as a matter of fact by so doing we shall make 
the action all the clearer and more beautiful**. The 



«« 



• For example, the arias "Grosser K6nig", 'TETrohe Hirten", 
Schliesse mein Herze" and "Erleucht auch" might be omitted 
altogether, and big cuts made in the echo aria "Fldsst mein Heiland" 
and the trio "Ach wann wird die Zeit". The short recitatives "Was 
Gott dem Abraham'' and "Ja, ja mein Herz'' might also be omitted. 
** This refers only to the long and independent arias, — "Bereite 
dich Zion", "Grosser Kdnig", "Frohe Hirten", "Herr, dein Mit- 
Idd", "Schliesse mein Herze", "Flosst mein Heiland", "Ich wiU 
dir zu Ehren", "Erleucht auch mdne schwachen Sinnen", ''Ach 
wann wird die Zeit", "Nur ein Wink", and "Nun mogt ihr stolzen 
Feinde". The contemplative solo pieces, that bear on the action, 
must be retained. The proposal to sacrifice the independent 
arias in a church performance must not be taken as a depreciation 
of the arias in general. It simply means that small societies, that 
feel that they cannot give the Ckrisknas Oratorio because of the 
expense of the soloists, will find the work very effective without 
the great solo numbers. 



The Easter Oratorio. 309 

cradle song, "Schlafe, mein Liebster", should be retained, 
but it should be removed to the point in the action to 
which it really belongs, — at the end of the recitative 
"And they came with haste, and found both Mary and 
Joseph . . . But Mary kept all these things, and pondered 
them in her heart." Then it becomes the lullaby that the 
mother sings to the Holy Child when she is once more 
alone with Him*. 

The Easter oratorio, KomnUy Met und laufei (B. G. XXP), 
is in its present form simply a large cantata. In its first 
form, as we see from the original parts, the work was a 
real oratorio. Mary the mother of James (soprano), Mary 
Magdalene (contralto), Peter (tenor), and John (bass) 
take part in it as active dramatic personages; the opening 
duet between tenor and bass represented the dialogue 
of Peter and John when running to the grave. At a later 
date the action struck Bach as insufficient for a religious 
drama; he took out the names of the characters, recast 
the opening duet in the form of a chorus, and left the 
middle movement only in duet-form. Unfortunately the 
orchestral parts of this third and definitive redaction that 
we possess are incomplete, so that Rust, when he was edit- 
ing the work, felt compelled to mediate between the second 
version and the third. He gives the first main move- 
ment and the middle movement in the form of a choral 
duet, and does not bring in the four-part chorus until 
the end**. 

The first movement contains a remarkable representa- 
tion of running. It is interesting to note that the original 



* In this case the redtatives "So geht denn hin" and "Ja, 
ja mein Herz" must also be cut out. It is incomprehensible how 
Bach could allow the cradle song to be sung after the bare an- 
nunciation of the angels. Even in performances in which the other 
arias are not sacrificed, the lullaby should be transferred to the 
point mentioned above. 

♦♦ See his Preface to B. G. XXI». It is fairly certain that the 
work was written about 1736. The date of the two revisions cannot 
be determined. 



3IO 



XXXII. The Oratorios. 



text originally was "Kommt, gehet und laufet" (**Come, 
go and run"); the later version of the words, which is much 
more animated and more singable, is by Bach himself. 

There is a wonderful peace expressed in the tenor aria, 
"Sanfte soil mein Todeskummer" ("Easy my death shall 
be"). The voice is accompanied by the first and second 
violins con sordini, with the fMtes d bee doubling them; 
it is one of the most beautiful sacred lullabies that Bach 
ever wrote. We seem to be gazing in a dream over a gently- 
moving sea, towards the fields of eternity* — 




The Ascension Oratorio, Lobet Gott in seinen Reichen 
(No. II), — called by Bach an oratorio, though the text 
has scarcely a trace of Biblical action — probably belongs 
to the same period as the Easter Oratorio. Perhaps the 
music of the powerful and animated opening chorus was 
originally written for some secular festival cantata; this 
seems probable from jme rather faulty pieces of declama- 
tion, such as this — 




Sucht sein Lob recht zo. 



▼er - glci - chen. 



and this 




bet Gott 



They do not, however, diminish the effect of this spirited 
movement. 



♦ The text should be altered somewhat; we hear a little too 
much of the "Schwcisstuch Jesu" ("handkerchief of Jesus"). 



Origin of the B Minor Mass. 



311 



The final chorus takes the form of a chorale fantasia 
upon the last strophe of the hymn **Gott fahret auf gen 
Himmel" : 

''Wann soil es doch geschehen^ wann konmit die liebe Zeit, 

Dass ich ihn werde sehen in seiner Herrlichkeit? 

Du Tag, wann wirst du sein» 

Dass wir den Heiland griissen? 

Dass wir den Heiland kiissen? 

Komm» stelle dich doch eini'* 

The music to which Bach has set these words glows with 
ardent, mj^tic love. The accompaniment perpetually 
repeats this passionate motive — 




CHAPTER jeOUII. 

THE MASSES. 

B. G. VI. B minor Mass. 

B. G. Vni. Four small Masses. 

B. G. XI^. Four SanOus. 

When Bach petitioned, on 27th July 1733, for the title 
of Court G)mposer*, he sent his sovereign the parts of 
the Kyrie and the Gloria of a Mass in B minor. He did 
not send the score ; this he kept for himself. It was a fre- 
quent practice at that time to perform large works without 
a score. 

These parts are now in the King of Saxony's private 
library at Dresden. As they show no signs of having 

• See I, 139. 



312 XXXIII. The Masses. 

been used, it is doubtful whether the work that Bach 
wrote in order to secure the KapeUmeistership was ever 
performed. He had written out most of the parts himself, 
and added phrasing signs and marks of expression. 

The Gloria consists not only of the "Gloria in excelsis et 
in terra pax hominibus bonae voluntatis", but comprises 
all the sections pertaining to this in the Mass — LaudamuSf 
Gratias, Dominey Qui toUis, Qui sedes, Quonianiy Cum 
sancto spiritu. 

It is curious that Bach should have described the Kyrie 
and Gloria, on the title-page of the original parts, as 
Missa, and designated the succeeding sections, — the 
CredOy Sanctus and Osanna — as independent parts, 
whereas, of course, it is the ensenible of them that con- 
stitutes the Mass. Emmanuel also enumerates the four 
parts separately in the catalogue of his musical library. 
Bach also entitles four smaller Kyrie and Gloria "Masses**. 
His reason for this strange nomenclature is unknown. 
The designation of the Kyrie and the Gloria as "Masses" 
has nothing to do with the "Missa brevis". 

Spitta thinks that the Credo^ Sanctus and Osanna may 
have been written between 1734 and 1738. Bach does 
not appear to have sent these sections to the Court. 

The parts of the Credo came into the possession of 
Emmanuel, who performed this section of the Mass in 
Hamburg, with an orchestral introduction of his own. 
We also possess the parts of the Sanctus; they are now in 
the Royal Library at Berlin. At the end of the original 
score of this section there is a note to the effect that the 
parts are with Count Sporck, in Bohemia. 
!. Franz Anton, Count of Sporck*, was the Governor of 
Bohemia; he had close relations with the Leipzig artists 
and scholars. He seems to have been deeply interested 
in music; when he heard of the invention of the French 
horn in Paris he sent two of his servants there to learn 



* See Spitta III, 43 ft 



Sections borrowed from other works. 313 

how to play the instniment. He died in 1738 — during 
Bach's lifetime, that is to say — at his estate of Lissa. 
Bach would not fail to claim his property from the heirs, 
so that the parts in the Berlin Library are no doubt those 
from which the Governor of Bohemia used to have the 
Sanctus performed for him. 

As a matter of prudence, and perhaps in the hope of find- 
ing the parts of the Osannay the Bachgesellschaft, in 1854, 
requested the director of the Prague Conservatoire to make 
inquiries as to what had become of the Count's music. 
An official of the estate replied that "many years ago a 
lot of old music had been partly given away, partly lost; 
some of it had been given to the gardeners to wrap roimd 
the trees" *. 

Thus we possess the complete original score of the B minor 
Mass, which belonged to Emmanuel, and the original 
parts of the Kyrie, Gloria, Credo and Sanctus. 

The whole work was probably never given by Bach in 
a Leipzig service; but it is certain that he performed the 
separate sections. He would presumably give the Credo 
on Trinity Simday; the Kyrie he could use in the principal 
services during times of mourning, as at these periods 
the cantata was omitted and the Kyrie was simg; of the 
Gloria we possess a score specially made in 1740, with the 
title "Festo nativitatis Christi"**. 

It must be added that some of the sections of the B minor 
Mass are borrowed from other works. The Gratias comes 
from the cantata Wir danken dir (No. 29) ; the Qui tollis 
from Schauei dock und sehet (No. 46); the Patrem omni- 
potentem from GoU, me ist dein Name (No. 171); the Cruci- 
fixus from Weinen, Klagen (No. 12); the Osanna from the 



♦ See the Preface to B. G. VI. Whether the parts of the Sanctus 
are those that Bach sent to Count Sporck cannot now be accurately 
determined, the note at the end being undecipherable. 

** For information regarding this Gloria see Spitta III, 40. 
This score was not available when the B. G. edition of the B minor 
Mass was prepared in 1855. 



314 XXXIII. The Masses. 

secular cantata Preise dein Gliicke; the Agnus Dei from 
the cantata Lobet Gott in seinen Reichen (No. ii). These 
are not mere transfers^ however, but rearrangements, 
often so thorough-going that it is more correct to speak 
of their being suggested by the original than borrowed 
from it. We can estimate the musical value of these 
numbers without the necessity of taking into account 
that they exist in other forms and other texts of the same 
nature. 

The salient quality of the B minor Mass is its wonderful 
sublimity. The first chord of the Kyrie takes us into 
the world of great and prof oimd emotions ; we do not leave it 
until the final cadence of the Dona nobis pacem. It is as 
if Bach had here tried to write a really Catholic Mass; he 
endeavours to present faith under its larger and more 
objective aspects. Some of the splendid and brilliant 
chief choruses have quite a "Catholic" tinge. Yet in the 
other movements we get the same subjective, intimate 
spirit as in the cantatas, which we may regard as the Pro- 
testant element in Bach's religion. The sublime and the 
intimate do not interpenetrate; they co-exist side by side; 
they are separable from each other like the objective 
and the subjective in Bach's piety; and so the B minor 
Mass is at once CathoUc and Protestant, and in addition 
as enigmatic and unfathomable as the religious conscious- 
ness of its creator. 

The dual nature of the work is evident even in the 
earliest movements. The introductory Kyrie eleison is 
"a large conception; it sends up a solemn supplication to 
God; the imiversal Christian church cries to its Father 
in heaven and bends before Him; we seem to see nation 
after nation pouring into the assembly and joining in the 
prayer*. The Christe eleison, on the other hand, is sunny 
and serene; it is the soul's glad and confident prayer to 



* It is incomprehensible how some conductors can end this 
section pianissimo instead of fortissimo. The final entry of the 
theme in the bass cannot be too pov^rful. 



The Kyrie and Gloria, 



315 



its Redeemer. In the last Kyrie the gloom of the first 
is overcome; we no longer hear cries and entreaties, but 
a quiet, composed lament. The tranquil motion and the ^ 
transfiguration of the bitter harmonies are like a symbol 
of the faith and hope that are mingled with this lament. 
The interludes with the animated — 




Ky - ri - e 



le 



ion 



in which we hear a reminiscence of the ardent supplication 
of the first chorus, are only there to throw into higher 
and higher relief the tranquility of the main theme — 




Ky - ri - c c - lei 



ion e - le ' i - ton 



There is some doubt as to how the Gloria should follow 
the Kyrie. There is a temptation to get a strong contrast 
by commencing the one immediately after the other. It 
is better, however, to interpose a fairly long pause between 
them, during which orchestra, choir and audience can 
traverse in silence the ground between the Kyrie and the 
Gloria, and ascend from the depths of the minor to the 
heights of the major harmonies from which, with the fiist 
D major chords, the world of praise and thanksgiving 
will be opened out before them. 

It is not to the advantage of the movement to read 
too much into Bach's marking of vivace. The first section 
of the chorus must end without any perceptible raUeK- 
tando and diminuendo before the Et in terra pax. That 
this second part is not to be taken piano is proved by 
the noticeably heavy orchestration. The length of the 
movement makes it undesirable to adopt so slow a tempo 
as the usual one. The build of the phrases in Hominibus 
bonae voluntatis shows that Bach wishes the Et in terra 
pax to be sung with a certain animation. 



3i6 



XXXIII. The Masses. 



The fine violin accompaniment to the Laudamus te is 
a t5^ical specimen of Bach's "joy" motive*. In the 
Graiias agimus, as in the last Kyrie, there is a conflict 
between the tempi of the two related themes. The wonder- 
fully cheerful and tranquil theme expresses the opening 
words — 






ZSL 



^S 



1 



^m 




■^- 



Gra 



ti - at a 



gi - mns d - bi 



The "propter magnam gloriam tuam" is set to a much 
more lively motive — 




prop - ter mag-Dam glo 




ri - am tn - am 

Their diversity is so great in Bach*s eyes that as a rule 
he does not employ them together, but makes the chorus 
up of a succession of segments, constructed now on this 
motive, now on that. The charm and the difficulty in the 
performance of this movement consist in giving each of 
the segments its own appropriate tempo without impairing 
the unity of the tempo as a 'whole. 

The Gloria, Laudamus, and Gratias constitute a single 
idea, and should not be separated by the slightest pause. 
After the Gratias we may pause for a moment, and then 
begin, with the Domine, the praise of Christ that continues 
to the Credo, The close connection of the texts here — 
the Domine, Qui toUis, Qui sedes, Quoniam, Cum sancto 
spiritu — must be reproduced in the succession of the 
movements. 

The solos in these movements are generally taken much 
too slowly, so that, — especially when the singers indulge 



♦ See p. no. 



The Credo, 317 

liberally in ralleniandi — the natural animation of the 
music suffers*. In the tuUi parts of the Quoniam it is 
advisable to strengthen the two obbligato bassoons by 
two or more violoncellos. In the accompanied parts one 
would almost venture to recommend an alternation be- 
tween two solo bassoons and two solo violoncelli. 

Between the Cum sancto spirilu and the Credo comes 
the first large incision in the B minor Mass. From this 
point to the Sanctus all the sections are closely connected. 
They fall into three groups. The first, which relates to 
the Father, contains the Credo and the Patrem omnipo" 
tetUem; the second, which relates to Christ, consists of the 
Et in unum deum^ the Et incamaius esty the Crucifixus 
and the Et resurrexit; the third, dealing with the Holy 
Ghost, embraces the El in spiriium sanctum and the Con^ 
fiteor. The three groups should be separated from each 
other by very short pauses; within each group the move- 
ments must follow each other without a break*. 

The Symbolum Nicaenum is a hard nut for a composer 
to crack. If ever there was a text put together without 
any idea of its being set to music it is this, in which the 
Greek theologians have laid down their correct and dry 
formulas for the conception of the godhead of Christ. In 
no Mass has the difficulty of writing music for the Credo 
been so completely overcome as in this of Bach's. He 



* I was particularly convinced of the pref erability of a quick 
and tense tempo for these movements by a performance of the 
B minor Mass at Heidelberg under Professor Wolfrum. His tempi 
in general were the ideal ones for the work; it is to be wished that 
he would make them available for general use by giving the met- 
ronome numbers. 

The remarks in the text as to the tempo in the solos being 
too slow applies to the whole of the B minor Mass. The iMudamui 
<0 is, as a rule, almost dragged. 

** So much stress is here laid upon the right grouping of the 
numbers of the B minor Mass because it is of great importance 
to the effect, and many modem conductors do not know enough 
of the liturgy to avoid making false and capricious breaks in the 
continuity of the work. 



3i8 



XXXIII. The Masses. 



has taken the utmost possible advantage of any dramatic 
ideas in the text; when emotion can be read into it he 
does so. 

The external configuration of the text is itself masterly. 
The sections that lend themselves to brilliant tone-paint- 
ing are worked out twice; others are compressed and treated 
continuously. The effect of the Confiteor mostly depends 
on the precise management and the close connection of 
the final periods of the Credo. One of the most striking 
features of the B minor Mass in general and the Credo in 
particular is Bach's excellent Latin declamation. His 
most daring colorature are only the artistic intensifi- 
cation of the natural syllabic values and accents of the 
words. 

The theologian Bach also had a hand in the composi- 
tion of the Credo. He knew what the Greek fathers had 
in their minds when they took such pains to prove the 
identity of Christ with God and yet assert a diversity and 
independence of persons. To the dogmatist Bach the 
parallel passages of the Ei in unum Dominum — "deum 
de deo» CHiod of God**), "lumen de lumine" (*Tight of 
lights"), "genitum non factum" (**begotten, not made"), 
"con substantialem" ("of like substance") — were not 
merely empty sounds to be turned into music; he knew 
what the formulae meant, and translated them into terms 
of music. He makes both singers sing the same notes, 
but in such a way that it does not amount to the same 
thing; the voices follow each other in strict canonic imita- 
tion; the one proceeds out of the other just as Christ 
proceeds of God — 




et 



ia n - Dttoft 



ml- nam 




in n - num Do 



mi •mm 



The Credo. 



319 



\ 



Even the instruments take part in the canon. They signify 
in a special way the commnnity of substance and dif* 
ference of persons; the notes — 



l^ r, J ^ 




are always phrased two distinct ways in the different 
instruments; either — 



i^^r, J y J' , 




or 



ji^r. JT J' 



Bach thus proves that the dogma can be expressed much 
more clearly and satisfactorily in music than in verbal f or- 
mulae. His exegesis of these passages in the Nicene Creed 
has resolved the disputes that excited the Eastern world 
for many generations and finally delivered it over to Islam; 
his presentation of the dogma even makes it acceptable 
and comprehensible to minds for which dogma has no 
attraction. 

In the dewy-fresh and flowing music of the Et in unum 
spiritum sanctum Bach's imagination had been fired by 
the word **vivificantem"; he depicts the Spirit as **that 
which makes alive" — 




At the end of this movement, at the Descendit de coelis 
("He descended from heaven") we get the motive of 
falling — 




In the Ei incarnatus est the Holy Spirit hovers over the 
earth as if in quest of a being into which it can enter -^ 



320 



XXXIII. The Masses. 



| i''|i.i ij m.i ]^ lii tt£L i J^ i 



At the words "Et homo factus est" it sinks to a restless 
conclusion — 




P i Wf^ff m 



*^ 



/ts 



? 



At the same moment the motive appears in the bass, 
symbolising the Spirit being abased into flesh. 

The Crucifixus is constructed upon a basso ostinato 
formed from the chromatic motive of grief; the choral 
writing is soft and vaporous, like that preceding it, so that 
the inexpressible sadness of the harmonies has a touch 
of the superterrestrial and the transfigured in it, as if the 
composer had had in his mind the '*It is finished" of the 
^d^g Lord. 

Y The Et resurrexit represents the victorious jubilation 
\ of redeemed mankind. Note should be taken not only of 
\ the fine line of the bold theme but of its perfectly natural 
\ declamation — 




Et re - sar - re 



xit re - sar - re - xit. 



The chorus'^upon the Credo has for its theme the well- 
known splendid old intonation of the creed — 



^ 



p 



-^- 



291 



s 



Cre - do in a-nam De-urn. 



The steadfast and confident quaver-sequences in the bass 
symbolise the firmness of the faith. They are most effective 
when the individual notes are not tied but detached from 
each other, with an up-take grouping — 



The Credo. 



321 




The tempo must not be too slow, or else the augmenta- 
tion of the theme at the end, commencmg in the vocal 
basses and extending to the whole movement, will not be 
p^ceptible to the hearer. 
^ Bach could not base the Confiteor chorus on the old 
church tone, as this does not yield a theme capable of 
being developed polyphonically. He is thus compelled 
to invent a theme of his own; but he twice introduces 
the old intonation, — from the seventy-third bar onwards 
in a siretto between the bass and the alto, and again in tri- 
umphant breadth in the tenor. It nms thus* — 







Con - 



te - or 



n • nnm bap • tU - ma 




!ii re -mil -si • o-nem 



pee - ea • t& - mm. 



Very characteristic of Bach, again, is the setting of the 
Et exspecto resurrectionem mortuarum. We should expect 
music with something m}rsterious and a touch of longing 
in it; instead of this, the orchestra expresses, by means 
of the joyous 'Resurrection" motive, the exultation of the 
elect at the last day — 



iihrifliriUfi(^\l^l^! \ fUi ^ 



Bach lets himself be guided by the correct feeUng that 
in the Credo ever3rthing presses onward to a big conclusion, 
which he must not retard by music of too intimate a kind. 
Note that in the Palrem omnipotentem he passes over the 



* "I acknowledge one baptism ior^iht remiaaon of sins. 

Schweitzer B«ch. II. 21 



Iff 



322 XXXIII. The Masses. 

m5^tical suggestions of the word "invisibilium" — "Creator 
of all things, visible and invisible" — because he does not 
wish to interrupt the brilliant stream of music. Many 
conductors imagine that Bach, following his usual prac- 
tice, meant to bring this word out saliently, and to express 
the mystery of the creation of the invisible underworld; 
and they try to rescue what there is to be rescued of the 
word, by having it sung pianissimo and with a rallen- 
tando, — or rather by wishing to have it so sung, for this 
method is so opposed to the structure of Bach's music 
that it alwa}^ comes to grief, and only results in making 
the choir unsteady and the conclusion of the movement 
uninteUigible. 

For the Sanctus, Bach, who was a student of the Bible, 
has had in his minds' eye the beginning of the sixth chapter 
of Isaiah, from which the words are taken. There it is 
told how the Lord sat on His high throne, surrounded 
by the seraphims, who cried unto one another "Holy, 
holy, holy is the Lord of hosts", so loudly that "the posts 
of the door moved". Bach's music, as Spitta noted, aims 
at expressing this "oying to one another". As this can 
hardly be done with the five-part pol3^hony that he else- 
where employs in the Mass, he here writes the chorus in 
six parts. There is hardly anything else in all music that 
expresses so perfectly the idea of the sublime. The basses, 
that have to support these pol3^honic triplets, move along 
in the most tranquil and powerful "step" motive to be found 
in all the scores of Bach — 



'Xiir^f^^J i r j^^ i f jf jir jFj ^^ 



A marvellous effect is made by the trumpets and kettle- 
drums, which Bach employs with somewhat unusual dis- 
cretion. In the Pleni sunt coeli and the Osanna, again, 
he observes a wise moderation in this respect that is of 
inestimable advantage to the whole movement. 



The Benedicius and Agnus Dei. 323 

In the Benedicius and the Agnus Dei we get perhaps 
the clearest light on the difference between Bach's con^ 
ception of the Mass and Beethoven*s. For Beethoven, 
the S3nnphonist, these two sections are the culminating 
point of the drama of the Mass as he conceives it; for Bach, 
who thinks in terms of the church, they are the point at 
which it all dies slowly away. In Beethoven's Agnus Dei 
the cry of the pained and terrified soul for salvation is 
almost dreadful in its intensity; Bach's Agnus Dei is the 
song of the soul redeemed. 

In the Benedicius he has probably made use of some 
previous composition of his, — so, at least, one assumes 
from the rather abrupt style and the repetitions of the 
words. 

The Dona nobis pacem is also a confident and hopeful 
laudation of peace rather than a prayer for it. There is 
deep significance in the fact that Bach has these words 
sung to the music of the GraUas agimus (''We thank Thee"). 
A tender style of pla3mig does not suit the character of 
the movement. 

When the B minor Mass was published, the serious 
error was made of omitting the figuring of the continue 
in the Credo ^ for the reasQp that it was in Emmanuel's 
writing, and could not be proved to have an authentic 
origin. Granting that the figuring is Emmanuel's own, 
it is at any rate better than none at all, since no one was 
in a better position to replace a lost original than he. More- 
over it is almost certain that his continuo part is a copy of 
the original. The editor's suspicions were probably aroused 
by his noticing that the figured chords were not alwajrs 
congruous with those of the obbligato parts. But on these 
grounds he might have rejected many an original figuring 
by Bach, the genuineness of which is proved precisely by 
the fact of its independence. It is to be hoped that the 
error will be corrected by printiug Emmanuel's figuring — 
which is in the Berlin Library — in the new edition of the 

21* 



324 XXXIII. The Masses. 

Bachgesellschaft*. Anyone who has had to accompany 
the B minor Mass on the organ knows how difficult it is 
even for the player familiar with Bach to divine the har- 
monies, especially in the solo pieces and the Et incarnaius 
est. 

The Bachgesellschaft score is misleading again in the 
Credo and the Confiteor. According to this, the Credo is 
to be sung by the choir with organ accompaniment, while 
the first and second violins play the theme; in the Coip- 
fiteor only the organ is to be employed. If the B. G. score 
is a correct reprint of the parts that once belonged to 
Emmanuel, then the error must be in these. Bach cer- 
tainly did not desire these two choruses to be accompanied 
only by the organ; in the whole of his scores there is no 
other example of the violins alone playing an obbligato 
above the chorus in this fashion. The Credo and the 
Confiteor are to be given like the last Kyrie, i. e., the 
strings and wood-wind must double the voice parts. 
Further, if we consider how often Bach, in motet choruses 
of this kind, doubles the voice parts with the brass**, 
it is hardly credible that they would have been idle here, 
especially as the notes are long ones. It needs no proof 
that the two obbligato vioUn parts in the Credo should 
be supported by at any rate, the wood-wind if they are 
to be heard; it is not less certain that the intonation of 
the Credo, that enters in augmentation in the basses to- 
wards the end, as well as the Confiteor intonation, — 
first in the basses and altos, then in the tenors, — cannot 
be heard even by the hearer who knows they are in the 
score, unless an instrument comes to the assistance of 
the voices *♦♦. Even then, with our heavy choirs, the in- 



* On this question see also Seifferf s remarks in the Back- 
iahrbuch for 1904, p. 72 ff. 
♦♦ See p. 299 ff. 

*** At the performance conducted by Bach himself he told 
the instmmentalists by word of mouth to play from the vocal 
parts; he would not say so in the score because it was self-evident 
to him. This explains why the score and the parts give a wrong 



Instrumentation of the Credo and Confiteor, 325 

tonations demand the support of the organ as well. In 
these passages the organist should play the continuo bass 
on the pedal, give the harmonies with one hand on a 
subsidiary manual, and with the other hand play the pas* 
sages in question on the great organ with the eight and 
foxir-feet principals and mixtures; only in this way can 
these antique melodies come trimnphantly through the 
mighty pol5q)hony in the way that Bach contemplated. 
The Kyrie and the Gloria were published in 1833 by 
Nageli of Zurich, who had acquired the original score 
after the death of Schwenke, Emmanuel's successor; 
their poor reception was not of the kind to encourage 
Nageli to bring out the whole work, and the remainder 
was first published in 1845 by Sinurock, of Bonn. In a copy 
of the score of the Credo that was formerly in the posses- 
sion of the Berlin Singakademie, Zelter has altered certain 
high passages in the trumpets with a view to making 
them more playable, and indicated some excisions. This 
suggests that he had performed this section of the Mass, 
or had intended to do so. The letters to Goethe throw 
no light on the matter. The first complete performance 
of the Mass was that of the Berlin Singakademie in 1834 
and 1835* ; perhaps the most perfect performance the work 
has ever had was that by the Berlin Philharmonic choir 
under Siegfried Ochs**. 



idea of how Bach wished the work to be performed. Against 
these views it may be objected, with some show of reason, that in 
the Pairem omnipoUntem and the Et exspecio resurrectianem Bach 
wishes to heighten the effect of the instruments by keeping them 
silent until then. The reply to this is that he would nevertheless 
have employed the strings and wood-wind to support the voice 
parts, and that the necessity of bringing out clearly the intonation 
of the Credo and the Confiteor certainly outweighed all other con- 
siderations. The scale is turned by the reflection that in the cantatas 
he always accompanies motet choruses of this kind with strings, 
wood-wind and trombones, and that in the last Kyrie, which is built 
on precisely the same lines as the Credo and the Confiteor ^ all the 
instruments previously employed are used to strengthen the chorus. 
♦ Part I, 20th February 1834; Part II, 12th February 1835. 
** On the a4th April 1896^ in the Garrison Church. 



326 XXXIII. The Masses. 

When Bach received the title of Court Composer he sent 
four Kyrie and Gloria — which he caUed Masses — to the 
Court as tokens of his assiduity*. As he was in a great 
hurry, he did not waste time in writing new works, but 
to a large extent made these Masses up out of cantatas^. 
The adaptations are perfunctory and occasionally quite 
nonsensical. In the G minor Mass, for example, Bach adds 
the text of the Gloria to the gloomy music of the first 
chorus of the cantata AUes nur nach GoUes Willen (No. 72). 
The Gloria of the A major Mass is an arrangement of the 
bass solo with chorus 'Triede sei mit euch", from the 
cantata HaU im Geddchlnis Jesum Christ (No. 67). Memory 



* Two of the Masses — those in G major and A major, were 
certainly written about 1739. Spitta rightly supposes that the 
two others — in G minor and F major — belong to the same period. 
As Bach had no opportunities for the performance of Masses of 
this kind, we can only assume that he intended them for Dresden. 
** The following movements can be traced to cantatas in our 
possession: 

Mass in F major: The Qui toUis and the Quoniam are derived 

from HerTt deine Augen sehen nach dem dauben 
(No. 102); and the Cum sancto spiritu from 
Datu ist erschienen (No. 40). 
Mass in A major: The Gloria is derived from Halt im Geddchitiis 

Jesum Christ (No. 6y); the Qui tallis from Sieks 
JTM, doss deine Gottesfurcht (No. 179); the Quo^ 
niam from GoU der Herr ist Sonn und Sckild 
(No. 79); and the Cum sancto spiritu from 
Erforsche mich GoU (No. 136). 
Mass in G minor: The Kyrie is derived from Herrt deine Augen 

(No. X02); the Gloria from AUes nur nach 
Gottes Willen (No. 72); the GraHas, Domine, 
and Cum sancto spiritu from Es wartet alles 
auf dich (No. 187). 
Mass in G major: The Kyrie and the Quoniam are derived from 

Siehe du^ doss deine Gottef^chi (No. 179); the 

Gloria and the Domine Deus from Gck der 

Herr ist Sonn' und Schild (No. 79); the GraHas 

from Warum betrUbst du dich (No, 138); and the 

Cum sancto spiritu from Wer Danh opfert (No. 17). 

For further information see the Preface to B. G. VIII. The 

Kyrie of the Mass in A major, which Spitta thought might be 

original, also seems, judging from the occasionally strained dedama* 

tion, to be taken from another work, — perhaps a lost cantata. 



The Smaller Masses. 



327 



of the earlier work makes him reproduce, in the instru- 
mental accompaniment to the new movement, the contrast 
between the unrest of the world in which the disciples Uve 
in alarm, and the peace that the risen Lord brings them. 
But in the new arrangement he does not trouble in the 
least about the significance of the music. He fits the instru* 
mental accompaniment to a brisk chorus, and has the 
Gloria in excekis sung to the 'Humult" motive. In a number 
of these adaptations he does not even trouble to declaim 
the words in accordance with their sense. 

Probably the only original section is the Kyrie of the 
Mass in F major. It consists of a short but admirable 
four-part chorus, which the horns and oboes accompany 
three times with the chorale melody "Christe, du Lamm 
Gottes'\ which Bach also employs in the cantata Du 
wahrer GoU und Davidssohn (No. 23). In the vocal basses 
we hear the final Kyrie of the Litany. The two melodies 
that run through the movement are as follows — 



*'Christe» du Lamm Gottes. 



$» 



i 



^ 



J J ^^^^^ r ^ 



i 



-9- 



-^^ 



32: 




Chri - ste 



lei 



son 




* * 



^ 



^ 



2C 



Ky 



il • e - - - Ici 



f9- 



E 



^ _ 



-9- 



•on 




son. 



328 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

As the Litany was sung only in Lent and Advent, and 
on the first Sunday in Advent the Kyrie was sung to "con- 
certed music", Spitta conjectiures that the introductory 
movement of the F major Mass was composed for this 
Sunday. It represents a splendid blend of CathoUc and 
Protestant church music. 

The fact that Bach had to make up these Masses from 
his cantatas proves that he did not compose the sections 
of the Mass used in the Leipzig service. He copied out 
for this purpose Mass-movements and whole Masses of 
all kinds of composers, known and unknown, German and 
Italian*, but he felt no impulse to set these texts himself. 
He did not even compose the Sanctus that he had to use 
on feast days. Of the four settings of this text that have 
come down to us from him, — (B. G. XI^), C major, 
D major, D minor, G major — probably only one, — that in 
D major — is his own composition. We shall always regret 
that he did not write a short, concise Mass as a counter- 
part to the Magnificat. 



CHAPTER XXXIV. 

THE CANTATAS AFTER 1734. 

We possess about seventy of the cantatas Bach wrote 
after 1734; about thirty of these belong to the years 1735 
and 1736; the remainder, — chiefly chorale cantatas — 
were written between 1737 and 1745. 

The cantata Lohe den Herren^ tneine Seele (No. 143; 
second composition) was probably performed on New 
Year*s day 1735. The text of the aria "Tausendfaches 
Ungliick, Schrecken" ("A thousandfold misery and fear**) 
describes how grievously the neighbouring peoples had 



* See the list of these copies given by Rust in the Preface to 
B. G. XI ^, and the corrections made by Spitta III, 29. 



Lobe den Herrn; Wdr GoU nicht mit uns. 329 

suffered from war and destitution during the previous 
months, while for the land in which this cantata was sung 
to the praise of God the preceding year had been one of 
blessing. This situation, as Spitta shows, agrees best with 
the year 1734, when almost the whole of Eiurope had 
been convulsed by the War of the Polish Succession (1733 
to 1735), Saxony, however, being spared the horrors of 
war, and further having the gratification of seeing its 
sovereign enter Warsaw in December of that year as the 
bearer of peace. The text of the cantata is mainly made 
up out of three verses of Psalm 146 and two verses of the 
chorale "Du Friedefurst, Herr Jesu Christ". There is 
a particularly fine effect in the concluding chorus, in which 
the soprani sing the third strophe of the chorale and the 
other voices accompany them with alleluias. The orchestra 
comprises strings, bassoons, three horns and kettle-drums. 
In the aria "J^^> Retter deiner Herde", which the strings 
accompany with the chorale, the bassoon and continuo 
bass have an interesting duet. 

The cantata for the fourth Sunday after Epiphany, 
War* GoU nicht mit uns diese Zeit (No. 14), upon Luther's 
paraphrase of Psahn 124, also seems to belong to the 
year 1735. The first chorus is a fugal one in the style of 
Pachelbel. As in the chorale prelude Wenn wit in hochsten 
Ndten sind (Peters VII, No. 58), Bach here employs through- 
out the inversion of the melodic segments as counter- 
themes in the separate fugues that make up this skilfully 
wrought chorus. The cantus firtnus is given to the instru- 
ments alone. This is one of the most difficult of Bach's 
vocal movements. If well done, the hearer will not be 
conscious of the ingenuity of the workmanship; all he 
will perceive will be the spirit of transfigured peace that 
breathes through the music. 

The two arias contrast with the chorus by their strongly 
realistic character. In the first, "Unsre Starke heisst 
zu schwach, unserm Feind zxx widerstehn" ("Our strength 
is too weak to withstand our enemy") the orchestra depicts 



330 



XXXrV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



the tumult of the world-battle in which the faithful cry 
to God for help; in the second, *^Gott, bei deinem starken 
Schiitzen sind wir von den Feinden frei" ("God, Thy 
mighty help hath set us free from our enemies"), the 
*^ghty help" is represented in an angular but powerful 
trio between the two oboes and the continuo bass. The 
voice enters with a proud theme of its own, that appears 
to ssnnbolise the word "free". The aria is a notable ex- 
ample of Bach's delineation of power. If its true character 
is to be preserved in performance, the marking of vivace 
must not be taken in an exaggerated modem sense*. 

As the text of the Reformation cantata, GoU der Hen 
ist Sonn* und Schild (No. 79), also speaks of the miseries 
of war and salvation from them, it likewise seems to relate 
to the special events of 1735. In the first chorus the largely- 
planned S3niiphonic accompaniment is built up out of two 
themes. The first, beginning as a fanfare in the horns, is 
apparently a solenm hynm of triumph — 



j,» tff'f,fj:s \ i^ 




Afterwards it is used as the accompaniment to the chorale 
"Nun danket alle Gott". The second theme is overpower- 
ing in its exultation — 




The chorus goes its own way at the beginning and the 
end, tranquilly and majestically. In the middle section, 
however, the voices are caught up in the stream of exulta- 



* Spitta justly remarks that at the commencement of the 
recitative we must read "Ja, hatte Gott es zugegeben" instead of 
*'Ja, hatt' es Gott nicht zug^;eben", as it is printed in the B. G. 
edition. 



Gott der Herr ist Sonn' und Schild. 331 

tion of the second theme *. The chorus is one of the most 
impressive ever written by Bach. A positively blinding 
radiance gleams from it; it b as if we were looking at a 
victorious battle in the rays of morning. 

In the cry sent up in the midst of the battle, "Gott, 
ach Gott, verlass die Deinen ninmiermehr'* ("Oh God, 
forsake not Thy own"), the raging conflict is depicted by 
means of the "tiraiult" motive ♦♦. The musical pictiure 
strongly reminds us, as Spitta observed, of that in the 
aria with chorus "Mit unserer Macht ist nichts getan" in 
the cantata Ein* fesU Burg (No. 80). 

Among the cantatas written for the Sunda}^ after 
Easter are nine of which the natiure of the texts shows 
them to have been connected. They extend from the 
second Sunday after Easter to the third day in Whit. 
Spitta accidentally discovered the poems in the Versuch 
in gebundener Schfeibart (Part I) of Marianne von Ziegler, 
published in 1728 ♦*♦. 

In these texts the Biblical words play a much larger 
part than in Picander's; this gives Bach the opportunity 
to write fine ariosi and motet-like choruses. It would 
certainly be agreeable to him also to have the aria texts 
in free strophes rather than in the strict tripartite scheme 
of the da cafo aria. As poetry the texts are greatly superior 
to those of Picander. As we read through the scores we 
fancy we can realise the delight with which Bach set to 
work on these new texts. He undoubtedly composed them 



* Spitta (III, 74) thinks he sees "elaborate combinatioDS of 
instraments" in this chorus, "down to the rhythm of the dnuxis". 
This movement was afterwards turned by Bach into the Gloria 
of the G major Mass (B. G. VIII, p. 162 ff.). 
♦♦ See p. 91. 
*** In hiB biography Spitta conjectured that these libretti were 
by "a new poet", but he was unable to identify the poet until later, 
in his Musikge$chichUich» AufsOite (Berlin 1892). Upon Marianne 
von Ziegler see I, 115. The texts of Goit fdhrei auf mU Jauck- 
g&n (No. 43) and Ich bin ein guter HirU (No. 85) are not found 
among her poems, though their quality forbids us to attribute 
them to anyone but her. 



332 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



all in one sequence. Spitta attributes them to the year 

1735*. 
The cantata for the second Sunday after Easter, Ich 

bin ein gtUer Hirt (No. 85) is written for a solo quartet 

It is in Bach's delightful l3rrical style. Particularly fine 

is the simple, heartfelt tenor aria, "Seht, was die Liebe 

tut". The soprano aria "Der Herr ist mein getreuer Hirt" 

is in the form of a chorale prelude upon the melody "Allein 

Gott in der Hoh* sei Ehr". 

The powerful first chorus of the cantata for the third 

Sunday after Easter, Ihr werdet weinen and heiden (No. 103) 

— *Te will weep and cry aloud, but the world wiU rejoice . .. 

Yet your mourning shall be turned into joy" — is based 

upon the continual antithesis of a theme in the rhythm of 

joy and a motive of wailing — 




In the tenor aria "Erholet euch, betriibte Stimmen" 
("Uplift yourselves again, ye grieving voices"), the "joy" 
motive carries away aU the voices of the orchestra with 

* See Spitta III, 70 £f. The cantatas are as follows: — 
Ich bin ein guUr Hirt (No. 85, for the second Sunday after Easter). 
Ihr werdet weinen und heulen (No. 103, for the third Sunday after 

Easter). 
Es ist euch gut^ doss ich hingehe (No. 108, for the fourth Sunday 

after Easter). 
Bisher habt ihr nichts gebeten (No. 87, for the fifth Sunday after 

Easter). 
Gott fdhret auf mit Jauchxen (No. 43, for Ascension). 
Auf ChrisH Himmeifahrt allein (No. 128, for Ascension). 
Sie werden euch in den Bonn tun (No. 183, second composition, 

for the sixth Sunday after Easter). 
Wer mich liebet, der wird mein Wort halten (No. 74, for the first 

day in Whit). 
Also hat GoU die Welt gekebt (No. 68, for the second day in Whit). 
Er rufet seine Schafe (No. 175, for the third day in Whit). 



Ihr werdet wein&n; Es ist euch gut; Bisher habt ihr, 333 

it in a wild dance. The music here expresses the words 
"O Freude, der nichts gleichen kann" ("Oh joy beyond 
compare"), which occur in the middle of the text.* 

The text of the cantata Es ist euch giU, doss ich hingehe 
(No. 108), for the fourth Simday after Easter, is founded 
on two beautiful passages from the farewell words of 
Jesus. Bach sets the first — "It is expedient for you that 
I go away; for if I go not away the Comforter wiU not 
come unto you" (John XVI, 7) — in the form of a bass 
arioso, in which the strings accompany the vaporous 
arabesques of the oboe d'amore with tender staccato quavers, 
representing the passing away of the transfigured Saviour. 
The orchestral picture reminds us of the musical illustra- 
tion of the words "But after I am risen again, I wiU go 
before you into Galilee", in the St. Matthew Passion.*^ 

The second passage — "Howbeit when he, the Spirit 
of truth, is come, he will guide you into all truth" (John 
XVI, 13) — is set as a motet. In the tenor aria "Mich 
kann kein Zweifel storen" ("No doubt can disturb me") 
the semiquavers wandering aimlessly, as it were, in the 
solo vioUn, S}mibolise the doubt, while the firmly moving 
bass represents inmiovable faith. Then the joy of faith 
finds expression in the contralto aria "Was mein Herz von 
dir begehrt, ach, das wird mir wohl gewahrt" ("Ah, what 
my heart desires of Thee, that wilt Thou give me"), in 
which the first violins give out the "joy" motive in every 
possible form. This cantata is a perfect expression of the 
mood of the farewell words of Jesus, as they are given in 
St. John. 

These words are the basis also of the cantata for the 
fifth Sunday after Easter, Bisher habt ihr nichts gebeten 
in metnem Namen (No. 87)***. The bass arioso "In der Welt 
habt ihr Angst ; aber seid getrost, ich habe die Welt iiber- 
wunden" is as effective as it is simple. In the alto aria 



* The bass motive of this aria is quoted on p. ii3< 
•♦ See p. 215. 
*** Solo cantata for alto, tenor and bass. 



334 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



"Vergib, o Vater, unsere Schuld" ("Forgive, oh Father, 
our trespasses") the sighs and moans of the oboes are 
carried up to heaven by the ascending basses. The tenor 
aria "Ich will leiden, ich will schweigen", which closes 
the cantata, is one of Bach's most beautiful creations. 
The first violins circle about the voice as if in a saintly 
dance — 




The form of this aria is interesting as being typical of a 
number of others written about the same time. It uses 
the tripartite da capo scheme, but departs from it to the 
extent that the vocal theme is different from that of the 
orchestra. The words are declaimed in a free arioso. Thus 
in these movements Bach partly emancipates himself from 
the Italian aria. The intermediate form which he creates 
is in many respects an ideal one. 

In the large Ascension cantata, in three parts, GoU 
fihret auf mit Jauchzen (No. 43), the superiority of Marianne 
von Ziegler's texts, from a musical point of view, becomes 
quite clear. For the opening chorus she chooses the 
splendid verse from the Psalms, "God goeth up with a 
merry noise, and the Lord with the sound of a tnmipet". 
Bach of course represents the "going up'' by means of 
bold upward-striving lines ; the chief figure in the violins 
covers two octaves in four bars. The soprano enters 
with this phrase — 



JH" r 1 1^ ^ r I gJ' ^' ^^^ ^ ^^^ ^ 



Gott fth 



ret tn^ — Gott fith 



ret auf — 



to which the three tnmipets add their fanfares. The 
concise form of the chorus makes the strength of the music 
all the more effective. 



GoU fdhret auf, 335 

In the tenor axia '7^ tausendmal tausend begleiten 
den Wagen", the violins have a theme in unison, that 
rises and falls time after time in a manner suggestive of 
the peculiar melodic line of the aria "Geme will ich mich 
bequemen", in the St. MaUhew Passion*, Here, as there, 
the fluctuations of the melody have their meaning. They 
are meant to symbolise the movement of earth and heaven, 
which, according to the text, "bend" beneath the chariot 
of the Lord. 

The soprano aria "Mein Jesus hat nimmehr" resembles 
in its march-form the introductory arioso of the cantata 
Es ist each gui, dass ich hingehe (No. 108)**. In the course 
of the text, mention is made of the "return" of the Son 
to the Father. Perhaps this explains the step-like rh3rthm 
that runs through the whole movement. 

In the bass aria, "Er ist*s, er ist's, der ganz allein", which 
is accompanied only by the triunpet, Christ's victory is 
described under the Old Testament image of the treader 
of the winepress. Bach of course does not let pass the 
opportunity to represent this proud stamping in his music, 
and he does not hesitate to write such progressions as 
these in the bass — 



y ^ J J . J I J J 17 



I f r r r "f 



The alto aria **Ich sehe schon im Geist, wie er zur 
Rechten Gottes auf seine Feinde schmeisst" is at the 
first glance surprising. It looks as if the fervent music 
did not agree with the words ("Now I see in spirit how 
He sits on the right hand of God and smites His enemies"). 
The almost melancholy tone of the movement is explained 
by the final words of the text "Ich stehe hier am Weg imd 
schau ihm sehnlich nach" ("I stand here by the way and 



* See p. 221. 
♦♦ See p. 333. 



336 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

look towards Him with longing''). There is a kind of 
divine home-sickness in the dialogue of the two oboes. 
The movement is typical of the freer form of aria that Bach 
was employing at this time. 

The smaller Ascension cantata, "Auf Christi Hinmiel- 
fahrt allein" (No. i28)*, begins with a chorale chorus 
upon the melody "Allein Gott in der Hoh' sei Ehr", to 
which the orchestra adds an independent accompani- 
ment in upward-striving lines. The most striking of the 
instrumental motives is derived from the opening notes 
of the chorale — 




J j I r r ' I' 



The bass aria "Auf , auf mit hellem Schall" is a bravura 
piece for a solo trumpet. Its style — it is constructed 
on the "joy" motive — reminds us of the tenor aria *TEr- 
holet euch" in the cantata Ihr werdei weinen und heulen 
(No. 103). This second Ascension cantata also ends with 
an aria more thoughtful than brilliant. 

In the cantata for the sixth Sunday after Easter, Sie 
werden euch in den Bann tun (No. 183, second composition; 
solo cantata for soprano, alto, tenor and bass), there is an 
antithesis between the other movements and the sombre 
introductory arioso "Sie werden euch in den Bann tun; es 
kommt aber die Zeit, dass, wer euch totet, wird meinen, 
er tue Gott einen Dienst daran". They express the joyous 
anticipation of death. In the soprano aria "Hochster 
TrSster, heil'ger Geist, der du mir die Wege weist darauf ich 
wandeln soil", the confident setting-out upon the way that 
leads to death is accompanied by a cheerful dance theme — 



j. it" ^ ^ 




* For the feast days Bach needed two cantatas, as the evening 
service also had to be musical. 



Wef mich liebet; Also hoi GoU, 



337 



The first chorus of the cantata for Whit, Wer mich 
liebet^ der wird mein Wort haUen (No. 74), is an arrange- 
ment of the opening duet of the Weimar cantata bearing 
the same title (No. 59). The music of the aria "Komm, 
mein Herze steht dir offen" is derived from the same 
source. The imperfect declamation of the first words 
is enough to show that Marianne von Ziegler's text has 
simply been written underneath it. In the arioso upon 
Christ's farewell words, "I go, but I shall return to you", 
the "step" progression — 




r.f^ir 




must be made to stand out clearly through the quaver 
figures, or the accompaniment of the continuo bass will 
not tell its story. The last two arias are noticeable more 
for length than for depth. 

In the cantata for the second day of Whit, Also hat 
GoU die Welt geliebt (No. 68), the two arias "Mein glau- 
biges Herze" and "Du bist geboren mir zugute" are taken 
from the Weimar secular cantata Was mir behagt, ist nur 
die muntre Jagd*. The choruses are original. The first, 
upon the fine passage in John III, 16, is accompanied by 
the gently -swaying rhytiun with which Bach loves to 
express the feeling of joyous serenity — 




In the other, — a motet-like chorus, in which strings 
and wind are added to the voices — Bach writes peculiarly 
severe music to express the idea of the Last Judgment, 
already in process, of which St. John speaks in the passage 
"Whosoever believes in Him shall not be judged, but 
whosoever believes not is already judged". 



* B. G. XXIX, pp. 25 if. and 12 ff. See also anU^ p. 263. 

Schw«itittr, Bach. VL 32 



338 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

The cantata of the third day of Whit, Er rufet seine 
Schafe mii Namen (No. 175)*, begms with an arioso and 
aria for three flutes. In these two lovely pastorals Bach 
employed the fUUes d bee, not the traverse flutes. The bass 
aria "Offnet euch'* is accompanied only by two trumpets ♦♦. 

Of the Easter cantatas written in tiie middle of the 
thirties we may mention two — Erfreut euch, ihr Herzen 
(No. 66), and BleiV bet uns (No. 6), both intended for 
Easter Monday. 

The great opening chorus of Erfreut euch, ihr Herzen 
(No. 66) is very agreeable in its sentiment. Even the 
orchestration is better than that of the other festival 
cantatas; only one trumpet is employed, and that most 
effectively. The accompaniment is dominated by the 
"joy** motive. It does not appear, however, in the middle 
section (marked andante by Bach), as the text speaks of 
"tears and fears and anguish". 

The arias of this rather broadly-planned cantata are 
likewise written in a more pleasant style. The forte, piano 
and pianissimo that Bach has marked in the bass aria 
"Lasset dem Hochsten" are very instructive. 

The solo movements of Bleib^ bei uns, denn es will Abend 
werden (No. 6) are also somewhat lengthy. The most notable 
section is the opening chorus, a masterpiece of poetry in 
music. "Abide with us, abide with us", say the disciples 
at Emmaus, pleadingly and caressingly*** — 



i 



, ft- - ft- 



V I CJ tj" f. I f' g 



ZL 



^9^ 



Bleib bei uns, bleib bei nns 



* Solo cantata for alto, tenor and bass. 
** The aria "£s dunket mich ich seh dich kommen" comes 
from the secular cantata Durchlauchtster Leopold (B. G. XXXIV, 
p. 32); the chorale harmonisatioii of ''Nun werter Geist" is taken 
from the cantata Wer mich liebei, der wird mein Wort halien (No. 59). 
*** Note the cmious accentuation of the "bei"; in the sequel 
the accents are varied thus — "bleib' bei uns"; ''bleib' hei uns"; 
"bldb' bei uns". 



Bleib* bet uns; Am Abend, 



339 



At the words "denn es will Abend werden" ("for even- 
ing is nigh'*) the voices descend, as if the gloom of night 
were weighing upon them — 



¥ i ' ^' n rr 




^m 



denn es ^rill A - - bend wer • den andder 

tr 



U i J. J' j^fafcW^.^ ^ 



Tag hat sich ge - nei - - get. 

In the accompaniment we hear an anxious quivering — 




In the andante of the middle section the triple rhythm 
gives way to Vi time; the words "Bleib' bei uns" become 
still more expressive of entreaty and pain. Long-drawn 
cries resound from the gloomy fields; then all is still. Once 
more the prayer returns, in the caressing triple rhjrthm. 
The cadence suddenly slips into the major, and ends in 
bright colours, as if the Lord had intimated the granting 
of the prayer. 

The same mood dominates the introductory sinfonia 
to the cantata for the first Sunday after Easter, Am 
Abend aber desselbigen Sabbais (No. 42), except that the 
anxiety expressed in the harmonies of the "Bleib' bei uns" 
is lacking here. In this remarkable movement Bach is 
painting the same evening calm that he has expressed in 
the accompaniment to the arioso in the St. Matthew 
Passion* — "Am Abend, da es kiihle ward". The string 
figures suggest the hovering shades of evening — 

* What 18 meant by the words m this aria "Denn was aus Lieb' 
and Not geschieht, das bricht des Hdchsten Ordnung nicht" will 
probably never be known. It is regrettable also that the poet has 
not taken farther advantage of the dramatic situation, instead 
of indulging in not very profound reflections. 

22* 



340 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 




The oboes respond with a motive of the same kind — 




Thus the shades melt into one another and become darker 
and darker, but arousing no fear, — only an inuneasurable 
yearning for peace and rest. Then the first oboe sings 
a h3ann of longing, that dies away in the night in long- 
sustained tones — 




Gantabile 

The second oboe answers — 




Cantabile 

The gloom deepens — 




piano 



The movement ends in the minor. Then the Bible words 
are recited over a quivering bass accompaniment — "Then 
the same day at evening, being the first day of the week, 
when the doors were shut where the disciples were as- 
sembled, for fear of the Jews, came Jesus and stood in the 
midst". The Lord brings His distressed disciples the peace 
of evening; for this reason the accompaniment of the aria 



Nun ist das Heil; Ich Blender Mensch. 



341 



**Wo zwei Oder drei versammelt sind" ("Where two or three 
are gathered together") is composed of reminiscences of 
the sinfonia. 

In the chorale duet "Verzage nicht, du Hauflein klein" 
the bassoon and violoncello have a theme that strides along 
in wide-spaced intervals, and in its fundamental idea re- 
minds us of the theme of immovable faith in the chorale 
fantasia Jesus ChHstus unset Heiland (Peters VI, No. 30). 
It is also interesting by reason of the phrasing that Bach 
has indicated for it* — 




The final aria, "Jesus ist ein Schild der Seinen", is 
an outburst of exultant joy. 

Of the Michaelmas cantata, Nun ist das Heil und die 
Kraft (No. 50) only the first double chorus has been pre- 
served; but this is so powerful in plan and execution that 
we can dispense with the remainder, and almost regard the 
lack of the solo pieces as a blessing. The theme is con- 
structed out of the "strength" motive, — that occurs also 
in inversion — and the "joy" motive**. This choral 
double fugue is one of Bach's mightiest pieces of vocal 
music. 

Bach wrote the cantata Ich elender Mensch, wet wird 
mich erldscn von dem Leibe dieses Todes (No. 48) upon the 
Gospel for the nineteenth Sunday after Trinity (Matthew 
IX, 1—9), in which Jesus heals the man sick of the palsy 
and forgives his sins. While the chorus sings the despair- 
ing words from the seventh chapter of Romans that give 



* The whole cantata should be studied for the extremely careful 
way in which Bach has added the phrasing marks and dynamic 
signs. Hardly any other sacred cantata is so instructive in this 
respect as this. 

•♦ Quoted on p. 118. 



342 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



the cantata its title — "Oh wretched man that I ami 
Who shall deUver me from the body of this death?" — 
the orchestral accompaniment incessantly repeats the sor- 
rowful question — 




y ^m f i^'7 Ni)-ia rit f 



while the trumpets and oboes play, in canon, the chorale 
"Herr Jesu Christ, ich schrei' zu dir". 

The full sense of grief is given in the sinister har- 
monies of the chorale "Soil's ja so sein, dass Straf und 
Pein auf Siinden folgen miissen"; but it exhausts itself 
at the words "Biissen" ("atonement"), with which the 
strophe ends. In the succeeding prayer to Jesus, "Ach 
lege das Sodom der sundUchen GUeder, sof em es dein Wille, 
zerstoret danieder", sorrow is quite overcome. The music 
breathes a serene longing for death. The theme anticipates 
the joyous and passionate animation of the following aria, 
"Vergib mir Jesus meine Siinden, so wird mir Jj&b und 
Seel' gesund". The theme of this last movement com- 
mences thus — 




fJjr i r'MCfJ-r.p 



The last aria but one, therefore, should not be taken too 
slowly; the final aria can hardly be taken too quickly. 
It must be simg in a kind of wild ecstasy — no raUef^ 
tandi in the cadences and no diminuendi in the transitions 
from forte to piano. That Bach's idea was that of haste 
almost breaking into a dance is shewn by the fact that in 
the cantata Emgkeity du Donnerwort (No. 20) he em- 
ploys similar music, but in the minor, to express the violent 
horror of the words "O Mensch, errette deine Seele, ent- 
fUehe Satans Sklaverei imd mache deine Seele frd" ("Oh 



Es warUi alles auf dich. 343 

man, save thy soul; fly from Satan's bondage and make 
thy soul free").* 

Perhaps it was at the direct inducement of Bach that 
Picander wrote a number of cantata poems which, like those 
of Marianne von Ziegler, took BibUcal passages as their 
point of departure. He selected for this purpose, almost 
exclusively, verses from the Old Testament, preferring 
those of unusual length. Unfortunately the reflections 
he spins upon them are not so expressive as those of his 
model. We need have no scruple as to cutting out almost 
the whole of the recitatives in these cantatas. 

The musical connection of these works** is evident at the 
first glance. They resemble each other not only in the 
large scale on which the choruses are laid out, but in the 
great — sometimes excessive — length of the orchestral 
introductions to the choruses and arias. There are hardly 
any concise solo pieces in these cantatas. 

Three of these works are founded on two Biblical pas- 
sages each, and are accordingly planned in two parts. 
They are Brich dem Hungrigen dein Brot (No. 39 ; for the 
first Sunday after Trinity); Es wartet alles auf dich (No. 187; 
for the seventh Simday after Trinity); Es ist dir gesagt, 
Mensch, was gut ist (No. 45 ; for the eighth Sunday after 
Trinity). 

The finest of them, as a whole, is Es wartet aUes auf 
dich (No. 187), which also has a satisfactory text. The 
first BibUcal verse is set as a chorus; the second — the 
beautiful passage from the Sermon on the Mount, "Take 
no thought for your hfe, what ye shall eat or what ye 



* This theme is quoted on p. 196. 
** They are the following cantatas: 

Bfich dem Hungrigen dein Brot (No. 39). 

Es ist dir gesagt, Mensch (No. 45). 

Es wartet alles auf dich (No. 187). 

Es ist ein trotzig und verzagt Ding (No. 176). 

Wer Dank opfert (No. 17). 

Unser Mund sei voU Lachens (No. no). 

Wir mUssen durch viel Triibsal (No. 146). 



344 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

shall drink" — is declaimed in a simple bass arioso. In 
the alto aria "Du Herr, du kronst allein das Jahr" the 
orchestra has a cheerful melody, in which Bach has marked 
the nuances almost from bar to bar. The first part of 
the soprano aria {adagio), "Gott versorget alles Leben" 
("God nourishes every living thing") is founded on the 
rhjrthm of solemnity; at the words "Weichet, ihr Sorgen" 
("Away, ye cares") — un poco aUegro — the music breaks 
into flsdng figures*. 

The pecuUarly unsteady accompaniment in the first 
part of the chorus of Brich dem Hungrigen dein Brot 
(No. 39) — "Give the hungry man thy bread" represents 
the procession of the poor and the suffering, who are 
being supported and led to the house in accordance with 
the Biblical precept ♦♦; the second part abandons this 
motive, and is expressive of praise and thanksgiving. The 
arioso upon "Wohlzutim und mitzuteilen, vergesset nicht", 
which opens the Seconda Parte of the cantata, is not so 
satisfactory as the setting of the second Bible passage 
in Es wartet alles auf dich (No. 187). 

Even Bach could not cast into a correct musical period 
the formless passage from Micah on which the first chorus 
of the cantata Es ist dir gesagt, Mensch (No. 45) is based. 
The many reiterations of the "It is said unto thee" at the 
commencement are quite disconcerting. It is incom- 
prehensible why Bach should set himself the impossible 
task of making a chorus of this verse, instead of declaiming 
it in a simple arioso, as he does in the second part with 
Christ's words "Es werden viele zu mir sagen an jenem 
Tage". 

We also possess the parts of this cantata, revised and 
corrected by Zelter***. They throw a doubtful light on 



* The small Gminor Mass (B. G. VIII) consists, from the Damine 
DeuSp Agnus Dsi onwards, entirely of movements from this cantata. 
** On the problem of this chorus see p. 46. 
*** Fragments from them are given in the Preface to B. G. Xt 
p. 17 ff. 



Wer Dank opfert; Es ist ein trotxig und verzagt Ding, 345 

his way of relieving Bach's work of its thin tinsel and 
bringing out the "bright substance immediately under- 
neath"*. His alterations are really ludicrous; we get 
the idea that his purpose was to substitute for Bach's 
intelligent declamation the most uninteUigent that can 
be conceived. 

The following cantatas deal with only one Biblical 
passage each — Es ist ein trotzig und verzagt Ding (No. 176; 
for Trinity) ; Wer Dank opfert (No. 17 ; for the fourteenth 
Sunday after Trinity) ; Unser Mund sei voU Lachens (No. no ; 
for Christmas); Wir mUssen dutch viel TrUbsal in das 
Reich Gottes eingehen (No. 146; for the third Sunday after 
Easter). 

The cantata Wer Dank opfert (No. 17) consists of a large 
and sharply -chiselled chorus and two interesting arias. 
The text, unfortunately, is a poor one. 

In the first chorus of Es ist ein trotzig und verzagt Ding 
(No. 176) the orchestral parts of the accompaniment to the 
theme are marked first forte, then piano. This makes 
it probable that Bach had the chorus theme also sung 
forte at first, and piano from the middle onwards, thus — 



!>V'r,^Jp J'f, ^^Plffff^^^^ ^ 




Es ist ein tro-tzig, ein tro - - - tzig und ver- 
/ort€ piano 



'h'^^ p ^' f. r. M r. J' 



zagt Ding um al- ler Men-schen Her - ze 

On closer inspection the whole chorus is seen to be 
planned on the idea of this direct transition from forte to 
piano. This way of representing the antithesis between 
"trotzig" ("arrogant") and "verzagt" ("poor-spirited") 
may appear somewhat naive; but the musical effect is 
natural and not without charm. 



* See Zelter's remarks in a letter to Goethe^ antSf I, 229. 



346 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

The soprano aria "Dein sonst hell beliebter Schein" 
is set in march-rhythm, like a gavotte, the words being 
those that Nicodemus speaks to himself on his night 
journey to Jesus*. 

The lengthy orchestral preludes to each of these cantatas 
explain how Bach came to employ many of liis free or- 
chestral compositions for church works. The chorus of 
the cantata Unser Mund sei voU Lachens (No. no) is 
worked into the allegro section of the second D major 
overture (B. G. XXX^ p. 66ff.), and so framed between 
the first and final grave**; the chorus of the cantata Wir 
mussen durch viel TrUbsal (No. 146) is inserted in the 
adagio of the clavier concerto in D minor (B. G. XVII, 
p. I ff.), and is prefaced by an organ transcription of the 
allegro. In neither case has Bach made the arrangement 
without regard to the character of the text. The triplet 
rh3rthm of the D major overture seems really a musical 
representation of laughter, so that it has been conjectured, 
not without reason, that the overture may have originated 
at the same time as the cantata, and that the theme of the 
middle section was written with an eye to the words "Unser 
Mund sei voll Lachens" ("Our mouth is filled with laugh- 
ter") ♦♦♦. The elegiac mood of the adagio in the D minor 
concerto harmonises excellently with the words "Wir 
mussen durch viel Triibsal in das Reich Gottes eingehen" 
("We must through much tribulation enter into the King- 
dom of God")t. 

The solo movements of the last-named cantata are of 
extraordinary beauty; even their excessive length, which 



* For an explanation of this curious movement see p. 47. 
** On the insertion of this vocal movement in the overture 
see I, 410, where the theme of the allegro is quoted. 

*** The duet "£hre sei Gott" in this cantata is a transcription 
of the "Virgo Jesse floruit" that originally formed part of the 
Magnificat in D major. See B. G. XI^ p. no, and Preface, p. ix. 
t The allegro of the clavier concerto in D minor goes splendidly 
on the organ, where a beautiful tone-colour, not too strong, can 
be obtained. 



Wir mUssen dutch viel TrUbsai; O ewiges Feuer» 347 



they share with the other arias of this period, cannot 
prejudice us against them. In the soprano aria *'Ich sae 
meine Zahren mit bangem Herzen'' ('^I sow my tears 
with a heavy heart"), the two oboes let fall a tear in each 
bar — 




ji^fUi^j'J'M 



n 



The duet between tenor and bass, "Wie will ich mich 
freuen" is one of the loveliest and sweetest of the move- 
ments constructed on a "joy" motive. 

The cantata for Whit, ewiges Feuer (No. 34) is shewn 
by the existence of a set of older parts to be founded on 
a motiming cantata of the same title*. The semiquaver 
figures of the first violins run through the whole of the first 
chorus like the lambent flames that are to set the heart on 
fire — 



^^^ ggQ ^^^ 




The exquisite lulling music of the alto aria **Wohl 
euch, ihr auserwahlten Seelen" is not fully explained by 
its present text. This is one of the cases in which the mere 
knowledge of Bach's musical language is sufficient to 
make us decide that the music was originally written for 
another text**. 



* The declamation of the revised text is not always faultless, 
as may be seen from the first chorus. 

** The theme belongs to the category of the "cradle-song*' 
motives. 



348 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

The splendid chorus "Friede iiber Israel" seems to have 
been abbreviated from its original form. 

The music of the cantata for Midsummer Day, Freue 
dich, erlosU Schar (No. 30) is derived from the secular 
cantata Angenehmes Wiederau, which Bach wrote in honour 
of Christian von Hennicke, who was f^ted on 28th Septem- 
ber 1737. Only the introductory chorus of the sacred 
arrangement — it recurs at the end — can now be per- 
formed. The declamation, indeed, is not always quite 
natural, and the words have clearly been written to fill 
up a prescribed verse-form rather than to express a poetical 
idea; but we forget aU this in view of the positively start- 
ling force of the music. Perhaps no other of Bach's 
works equals this in fire and splendour of sonority. Any- 
one who could supply the music with a new and singable 
text, — suitable, say, for Christmas, — would be doing 
Bach a great service. 

In the solo numbers the fitting-in of the text is so out- 
rageous from the musical and declamatory point of view 
as to be unendurable. Some magnificent music is thus 
going to waste. It would be a worthy task for some poet 
to provide the secular cantata with an expressive poem, 
and so restore this grand music to the world*. 

The few solo cantatas of this period — the end of the 
thirties — that we possess relate almost exclusively to 
Christmas and Epiphany**. 

* The secular cantata can easily be restored from the cantata 
Freue dich, erloste Schar (B. G. V^^, pp. 323 — 395) and the supple- 
ment (pp. 399 — ^408). Of course there is no necessity to preserve 
all the recitatives. 
** Selig ist der Mann (No. 57; for soprano and bass; for the 
second day of Christmas). 
Susser Trost, mein Jesus kommt (No. 151; for soprano, alto, 

tenor and bass; for the third day of Christmas). 
Liehster Jesus, mein Verlangen (No. 32; for bass and soprano; 

for Epiphany). 
Meine Seufzer, meine Trdnen (No. 13; for soprano, alto, 
tenor and bass; for the second Sunday after Epiphany). 
Es reifei euch ein schrecklich Ende (No. 90; for alto, tenor 
and bass; for the twenty-fifth Sunday after Trinity). 



Selig ist der Mann; Susser Trost. 349 

In the cantata Selig ist der Mann (No. 57) there is a 
dialogue between Jesus (bass) and the believing soul 
(soprano). The first bass arioso delivers in expressive 
music the words "Blessed is the man that endureth tempta- 
tion; for when he is tried he shall receive the crown of 
Ufe^'; the orchestra adds a symphonic accompaniment. 
Bach would have worked out his solos wholly in this 
ideal form had not the da capo aria been the fashion of the 
day. The moving lament of the soul, "Ich wunschte mir 
den Tod, wenn du, mein Jesu, mich nicht liebtest", is set 
in the same free arioso style. An idea of the overwhelming 
sorrow expressed in the accompaniment can be had from 
the opening bars for the first violin — 



¥ i m i a. i iM 



t 



la* 

In the succeeding vivace, which is somewhat in the style 
of an aria, Jesus comforts the soul with the song of triumph 
"J^> ]^* ich kann die Feinde schlagen". The words of the 
middle section, "Bedrangter Geist, hor auf zu weinen^' 
("Cease to weep, oh afflicted soul") are set to wonder- 
fully expressive music, the violins having a motive sug- 
gestive of sighs. "Ich ende behende mein irdisches Leben", 
sings the joyous soul, happy to meet its death, in an aria 
with an animated V4 rhythm, as if it were hastening from 
this world to its Redeemer, leaping and dancing on its 
way*. 

The cantata for the third day of Christmas, Silsser Trost, 
mein Jesus kommt, Jesus wird anitzt geboren (No. 151, 
for soprano, alto, tenor and bass) consists, apart from the 
recitatives, simply of two arias and the final chorale. In 
the first aria the strings (piano sempre) sing a lullaby 
over the infant Jesus — 



n 



* It is not clear why Spitta should regard this cantata as 
donoiestic religious music" rather than music for the church. 
There is nothing in Bach's works to justify a distinction of this 
kind. 



350 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 




Molto Adagio. 



4J?J^jj?Ji'^ 




to which the flute adds exuberant runs and figures — 




The theme of the alto aria, In Jesu Demut kann ich 
Trost^ in seiner Armut Reichtum finden^ is constructed 
on the same lines as that of ^'Geme will ich mich bequemen" 
in the St. Matthew Passion. It represents humility ("De- 
mut"); it sinks, rises, sinks again, again recovers, and in 
the final cadence quite goes to pieces, as it were. The 
ties that Bach has marked for the instruments here are 
particularly instructive. The indications in the orchestral 
part as to the co-operation of the strings and the oboe are 
interesting in themselves, and no doubt applicable to many 
other scores. They play unisono until a piano comes, when 
the violins cease, leaving the oboe to continue alone. 

The opening aria of the cantata Liebster Jesu, mein 
Verlangen (No. 32; dialogue for bass and soprano) reminds 
us strongly of the first movement — so full of longing — 
of the secular cantata Weichei nur, betrObte SchaUen (B. G. 
XI*). In the final duet — vivace — between the believing 
soul and Jesus, all care is driven away before the joyous 
rushes of the instruments. The theme runs thus, the oboes 
always hunying alone with the strings — 




forte 



Meine Seufzer; Es reifet ettch, 35 1 

The second violins and the violas fly about in loud staccato 
quavers throughout the movement. 

In the bass aria of the cantata for the second Sunday 
after Epiphany, Meine Seufzer, meine Trdnen (No. 13, 
for soprano, alto, tenor and bass), we have one of Bach's 
most remarkable dual themes. It begins with the "sigh** 
motive, which is immediately followed by the motive of 
joy. The text that Bach wished to express by means of 
this juxtaposition nms thus: "Groans and piteous weeping 
bring no relief to care ; but he who looks towards heaven 
will find a joyous light shining in his sorrowful bosom'**. 
The introductory aria and the chorale with orchestral 
accompaniment, "Der Gott, der mir hat zugesprochen", 
are very sombre in tone. 

In the first aria of the cantata for the twenty-fifth 
Sunday after Trinity, Es reifet euch ein sckrecklich Ende 
(No. 90), Bach declaims the word "schreckUch" ("dread- 
ful") several times in this fashion — 



giMPj, J'MjiJ'^jl lij 



ein schreck ----- Uch En - de? 

In the passionate final aria, "So loschet im Eifer der 
rachende Richter den Leuchter des Wortes zur Strafe doch 
aus" confused demisemiquaver passages fly up and down 
in the various instruments like a flame struggling against 
the storm- wind. Even Spitta frankly admits Bach's pic- 
torial intention here.** It is one of the most powerful 
symphonic accompaniments to be found in all Bach's 
works. 

The most glorious feature of these solo cantatas is that 
the German Bach here finds free expression. It is true 
that for many movements he still retains the da capo form. 
We are hardly conscious of it, however, for it is so changed 



• The theme is quoted on p. 106. 
** Bach has represented the flickering of flames in other places. 



352 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

that he seems to have risen superior to it. Where he stiU 
employs the repetitive scheme of the da capo aria he very 
often does away with the identity of the vocal and the 
instrumental theme. He thus makes a peculiarly delight- 
ful type of aria. The texts of these solo cantatas are as 
a rule expressive. 

At this very time, — about 1736, — Bach became weary 
of the search for "free" poems for his "church pieces", 
and definitely resolved to revert to the chorale cantata 
and to write a cycle of works in this genre. We may pro- 
bably assume that this kind of cantata struck him as 
being the most suitable to the church, and that conse- 
quently he wished to make a year's cycle of this kind the 
culminating point of his labour for the service. 

By an evil fate he halted half-way on the path that led 
back to the chorale cantata. The admirable older cantata, 
with its text compounded out of chorale verses and Biblical 
passages, does not enter his mind now. What he wants 
is a chorale cantata that will permit him to retain the 
"speaking" recitative and the da capo aria. He wiU not 
again endeavour to set hymn strophes as recitatives and 
da capo arias, as he did at the beginning of the thirties. 
Picander offers to cast the chorale strophes into madrigal 
form for him*. Bach agrees, and so seals the fate of the 
cantata texts to which he devotes his final labours. 

Nor is it comprehensible from the purely musical stand- 
point how Bach could remain satisfied with this kind of 
chorale cantata, as it compelled him to renounce all free- 
dom in the choice of the form for his choruses. We rather 
get the impression that the sacrifice was not a serious one 
for him. He seems to have wearied of looking for pictures 
in which he could express his ideas, and felt a certain relief 
in being absolved from the search and having simply 
one task before him — to keep a chorale melody going as 
a canius firmus in the soprano, and to build up the other 



* These cantatas also contain "free" aria-texts. 



The later chorale cantatas. 353 

voices line by line in motet form. Indeed, while all these 
choruses are plainly signed with his name, no two of them 
are aUke, in spite of their having the same scheme in com- 
mon; each of them has a personality of its own. 

Bach accepts as a necessary evil the fact that in choruses 
of this kind he can introduce the text only in melodic 
segments separated by interludes, and so has to dismember 
sentences that are one and indivisible from both the de- 
clamatory and the intellectual point of view. Moreover 
he can give only limited expression in his choruses to the 
poetry of the text, since he cannot employ themes of his 
own invention. Thus it comes about that the main work 
of musical representation in these choruses devolves upon 
the orchestra, which as a rule has no concern at all for the 
melody, but weaves round the chorale and its figuration 
a free fantasia in which the basic idea or emotion of the 
text finds characteristic expression. The themes and 
motives of this orchestral accompaniment throw a great 
deal of light on the nature of Bach's musical language. 

In the arias of these chorale cantatas he is more than 
usually dependent upon his poet. Very often the latter 
gives him a mere formless and senseless mass of ideas 
compiled out of one or more chorale verses, quite unsuitable 
for music, and moreover necessitating arias of excessive 
length. Now and then, however, Picander has succeeded 
in fastening upon the characteristic point of the verse 
and expressing it concisely, so that the cantatas contain 
some arias of surpassing beauty. 

Many of these cantatas do not form a poetic whole, 
the text being lacking in natural dramatic structure. In 
the cantatas that are more lyrical in feeling this defect 
is not so noticeable, which explains our finding the pearls 
of the collection among them. In aU these chorale can- 
tatas, however, we have not only the last but the deepest 
expression of Bach's piety. His music shews how deeply 
he has been penetrated by these hynms. He has chosen 
them as the basis of his cantatas because he lives and moves 

Schwcitxcr, Bach. IL 33 



354 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

and has his being in them, and finds in them aU his thoughts 
and emotions in their fullest form. And as Bach, the man 
of piety, feels thus, it hardly occurs to Bach the artist 
that he is renouncing his freedom. 
'. The scores of this year's cycle of chorale cantatas became 
Friedemann's at the division of his father's property, as 
we learn from a letter of Forkel, dated 3rd April 1803*: 

"I have had in my houae the whole year's cycle that was in 
the possession of Wilhelm Friedemann Bach, — the one that is 
so exceUently written upon chorale melodies. Friedemann Bach 
was at that time in great distress, and asked me twenty louis d'or 
for the complete property in the cycle, or two louis d'or for the 
loan of them. I was not rich enough then to put down the twenty 
louis d'or all at once, but I could a^ord the two. As it would have 
cost me more than twenty louis d'or to have had all the cantatas 
copied that half-year, I resolved to copy some of the best move- 
ments myself for my two louis d'or. I consequently possess now 
only two works written upon the chorales "£s ist das HeU una 
konmien her" and "Wo Gott der Herr nicht bei uns halt". Both 
are extraordinarily beautiful. The whole collection, for which I 
was asked twenty louis d'or, Friedemann was compelled by want 
to sell for twelve thalers. I do not know who bought it." 

B. F. Richter conjectures**, not improbably, that the 
purchaser was Doles, the cantor of St. Thomas's. It is 
more than doubtful, however, whether the cycle was then 
complete. Rochlitz mentions only twenty-six chorale 
cantatas of Bach as belonging to Doles. 

The parts of these cantatas remained in the possession 
of Bach's widow. When, in 1753, she asked the Council 
for a grant, she was given'forty thalers "on account of her 
poverty, and in return for certain pieces of music". Ac- 
cording to Richter, these were the parts of the cycle of 
chorale cantatas, which, however, appear not to have 
been complete. 



♦ Quoted in Preface to B. G. XXXV, p. 29. Ddrffel, who 
communicates this fragment, does not tell us the name of the ad- 
dressee of the letter from which it is taken. 

** See, on this question, his interesting article Oher die Sckick" 
sale der der ThomasschuU gu Leipjtig angehdrenden Kantaten /. 5. 
Backs, in the Bachjahrbuch for 1906, pp. 43 — ^73. 



JesUy nun set gepreiset; Was frag ich. 



355 



Some of these chorale cantatas were intended, according 
to Spitta*s chronology, for the year 1735 ♦, — for example 
the New Year's cantata Jesu^ nun sei gepreiset (No. 41). 
The "joy*' motive dominates the orchestra in the first 
part of the chorus, the two trumpets working out the fol- 
lowing splendid figuration — 




At the words "dass wir in guter StiUe", where the praise 
gives way to prayer, the "joy" motive ceases in the accom- 
paniment and does not return until near the end, where 
the prayer "Behiit Leib, Seele und Leben hinfort durchs 
ganze Jahr" is repeated. The final chorale is interwoven 
with the trumpet fanfares of the first chorus. The two 
arias rank among the most beautiful of Bach's Ijnics. 

In the accompaniment to the first chorus of the cantata 
for the ninth Sunday after Trinity, Was frag ich nach 
der Welt (No. 94) — which also seems to date from 1735 — 
Bach gives Qying figures to the flute and first violins, 
while the other strings have staccato quavers. This is how 
he elsewhere depicts some one running — the staccato 
quavers are especially characteristic. He is therefore not 
expressing here the rather contemplative mood of the 
text, but the hastening of the soul to withdraw itself from 
the world. Only when we know the meaning of the or- 



* It is quite possible that some chorale cantatas of an earlier 
date, such as Ein* feste Burg and Christus d$r ist nmn Leben^ also 
belonged to this cycle. Bach did not arrange his works to suit 
the season, as he ¥ras alwa3rs performing the older cantatas again. 
He made up the present yearly cycle of chorale cantatas by taking 
up a number of pre-existent works of this kind, and adding others 
for the Simdays that were lacking, until the cycle was complete. 
Of the five cycles that he left at his death, two must have consisted 
of chorale cantatas. Those of which the St. Thomas's School pos- 
sessed the parts — the cantatas now to be discussed — belong 
without exception to his later years. 

23* 



356 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

chestral accompaniment can we find the right tempo for 
this superb and closely woven movement, and the right 
way of performing it. 

The first chorus of the cantata for the nineteenth Sunday 
after Trinity, Wo soil ich fliehen kin (No. 5), contains a 
similar piece of orchestral painting. In the aria **£rgiesse 
dich reichlich, du gottliche Quelle, ach walle mit blutigen 
Strdmen auf mich" ('Tour forth abundantly over me. 
oh divine stream of blood'*), a solo viola keeps up a delight- 
ful flowing and murmuring obbligato. The chief motive 
of this accompaniment recurs in the great orchestral S3rm- 
phony to the first chorus of the cantata Christ unser Hen 
xum Jordan kam (No. 7). The aria "Verstunmie, HoUen- 
heer'* is also extremely effective. The solos in the cantata 
Was frag ich nach der Welt (No. 94), however, suffer from 
the poor quaUty of the texts. 

The cantata for the third day of Christmas, Ich freue 
mich in dir (No. 133) seems also to have been written for 
the year 1735. The scantily figured chorale is sung to a 
simple orchestral accompaniment, based on the naive 
**joy" motive, consisting of continuous semiquaver pas- 
sages, of which we have a t}^ical specimen in the chorale 
prelude Lobt Gott^ ihr Christen, aUxugleich (Peters V, No. 40). 
This mode of expressing joy is frequently used in the Christ- 
mas chorale cantatas. 

This chorus shows us the risks that the declamation 
has to run even in the simplest chorale figuration; in two 
places Bach phrases thus — 




Ach wie ein sil - tserTon! 

In the chorus of the cantata Was frag ich nach der Wdt 
(No. 94) there is a passage in which, if he does not divide 
the syllables of a word by a pause, as in the foregoing 
example, he separates the words in a way hardly less ob- 
jectionable — 



Gelobet snsi du; Ckfishtm wir soUen lohen sckon, 357 



^*ltr J'l jy J' jy j^l J 



Wenn ich michnnr an dir 



The two arias of the Christmas cantata are very charac- 
teristic. The first begins with the cry — 



jiVih ji J'it jt r'< Jm [i 



ge-trost, ge*trost, ge - trost! 

In the second, — **Wie lieblich klingt es in den Ohren, 
dies Wort: Mein Jesus ist geboren" ("How exquisitely 
do these words ring in the ear: My Jesus is bom") — 
Bach cannot forbear making the violins illustrate the "ring- 
ing" at the words "klingt es in den Ohren". 




"HittL 



We possess three Christmas cantatas belonging to this 
cycle. The cantata Gelobet seist du, Jesus Christ (No. 91) 
is intended for the first day. The chorus is naturally based 
on the "]03^' motive. The tenor aria, accompanied by 
three oboes, is a charming lullaby. In the duet "Die 
Armut, so Gott auf sich nimmt" ("God takes poverty 
on Himself') the violins have a unisono theme in the 
rhythm of solemnity*, symbolising the celestial majesty 
of Jesus, while the voices tell us of the "human form" that 
makes us equal to the angels. 

In the cantata for the second day of Christmas, Christum 
wir sotten lohen schon (No. 121) the chorus is treated in 
pure motet style. The orchestra duplicates the voices. 
One is inclined to regret that Bach did not employ this 



* Quoted on p. 95. When perfonning this fine work it is best 
to leave out the recitative with chorale, "Der Glanz der hochsten 
Hcrrlichkeit". 



358 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



form more frequently in his chorale choruses. The curious 
music in the aria ^'J^^annis freudevolles Springen erkannte 
dich, mein Heiknd, schon'' can only be explained on the 
supposition that Bach is representing the leaping of the 
child in Elisabeth's womb at the greeting of Mary*. The 
barbarous declamation in the tenor aria is in itself suf- 
ficient to show that the music has been taken from another 
source ; it is incomprehensible how Bach could listen to it. 
In the cantata for the Sunday after Christmas, Das 
neugeborne Kinddein (No. 12), the chorus and orchestra 
have some lullaby music about the performance of which 
Bach was so particular that he has suppUed it most care- 
fully with phrasing marks. This movement is especially 
instructive with regard to the echo effects that he uses 
in his orchestral works. The theme, the beauty of which 
comes to a great extent from the splendid sjnnmetry of 
its form, begins thus — 




In the recitative "Die Engel, welche sich zuvor vor euch, 
als vor Verfluchten scheuten, erfiillen nun die Luft im 
hohem Chor", the chorale is played by the three flutes. 
The chorale trio "0 wohl uns" (for soprano, alto, and tenor), 
in which the alto has the melody, is accompanied by the 
orchestral basses with the "angel" motive. Bach taking 
it to represent the song of the angels in the **h6hem Chor" 
("choir on high")*». 

The cantata for Epiphany, Liehster Immanuel (No. 123) 
is one of the finest expressions of Bach's mysticism. Its 
first chorus reminds us a good deal of that of the cantata 



• See p. S6, 
♦♦ See the motive on p. 81. It is identical with those of the 
pastoral S3anphony of the Christmas Oratorio and the accompani- 
ment to the chorale "Wir singen dir in deinem Heer" (in the same 
work), which ends the angels' song "Ehre sei Gott in der Hohe". 



LMsier Immanuelj: Meinen Jesum lass ich nicht. 359 

Du Hirte Israel (No. 104). ^Xiebster Immanuel! Liebster 
Immanueli" cry the orchestra, all the instruments re- 
peating continually the opening phrases of the melody 




Lieb-ster Im - ma - nu - el. 

It suggests a crowd of people appealing to the Lord, Whose 
glory has just been revealed in baptism, to be allowed to 
kiss the hem of his garment. 

The text is very beautiful : — 

''Liebster Immanuel, Herzog der Frommen, 

Du meiner Seelen Heil, komm nur bald! 

Du hast mir, hochster Schatz, mein Herz genommen, 

So ganz vor Liebe brennt und nach dir wallt. 

Nichts kann auf Erden mir Lieb'res werden, 

Als wenn ich meinen Jesum stets behalt/' 



After this chorus the tenor sings of the "cruel way to 
the cross", the two oboi d'amore adding an expressive 
lament. At the end comes the joyous march-song "Lass, 
o Welt, mich aus Verachtung", in which the soul bids 
the world farewell. Unless we know, from other scores 
of Bach, what is meant by the staccato quavers in the basses 
and the hurrying figures in the flute we are apt to render 
this music wrongly, failing to perceive the joyousness 
and urgency of it, and reading into it the rather elegiac 
mood of the text. 

The first chorus of the cantata for the first Sunday after 
Epiphany, Meinen Jesum lass ich nicht (No. 124) must 
be sung with particular delicacy in order that it may not 
cover up the runs of the oboe d'amore concertantCy in wliich 
Bach has expressed the whole of the fervour that he has 
seen in the text. In the moving aria "Und wenn der harte 
Todesschlag** ("And when the cruel blow of death"), the 
terrors of death are three times overcome by the words 
Ich Ijlsse meinen Jesum nicht" ("My Jesus will I never 



iC 



36o 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



leave"). The strings incessantly accompany the poignant 
song of the oboes with the "blow of death" — 




This ceases each time the words "Ich lasse meinen Jesmn 
nicht" recur. 

This movement only makes its full effect when the strings 
give a really terrifying expression to their semiquavers, 
with a heavy accent on each note. The final duet between 
soprano and alto, "Entziehe dich eilends, mein Herze, 
der Welt", is more effective when sung by several voices*. 

This method of performance may be recommended 
again for the joyous final duet, "Wenn Sorgen auf mich 
dringen", of the cantata for the second Sunday after 
Epiphany, Ach GoU, me manches Herzeleid (No. 3; second 
composition). In the first chorus of this work the cantus 
firmus is in the bass, — an unusual position. In the sorrow- 
ful orchestral accompaniment we hear with especial clear- 
ness the sighs of the first violins — 




The march-like character given to the movement by 
the remaining strings and the orchestral basses has been 
suggested to Bach by the text, which speaks of the narrow 
and calamitous way that leads to heaven. In the recitative 
with chorale, **Wie schwerlich lasst sich Fleisch imd Blut 
zwingen zu dem ewigen Gut", the stubborn basso ostinato 
s}miboUses the word "zwingen" ("to force"). 

In the cantata for the third Sunday after Epiphany, 
Was mein GoU will, das g^scheh allezeit (No. in), the spirited 
accompaniment (founded on the "joy" motive) to the 



* Simple duets and trios for the final numbers are characteristic 
features of many of these later chorale cantatas. 



Was mein GoU wiU; Mii Fried* und Freud'. 



361 



introductory chorus shows that Bach interpreted the 
words of the beautiful chorale ("God*s will be done") not 
in the sense of quiet submission but in that of joyous and 
confident faith. The chorus, in which the violins have 
runs of this kind — 




must be sung jubilantly and triumphantly. 

The duet for alto and tenor, "So geh ich mit beherzten 
Schritten, und wenn mich Gott zum Grabe fiihrt" ("I go 
with courageous steps, even though God be leading me to 
the grave") is like a gladsome, stately march. The voices 
are accompanied at their entry by the following figures 
in the first violins — 




An the music for the Feasts of Mary in this cycle has 
survived. The cantata Mit Fried* imd Freud^ fahr^ ich 
dahin (No. 125) was written for the Purification. In the 
first chorus we seem to hear the weary uncertain steps 
of the pilgrim of heaven — 




^1 JM^^Tn ^ ;^ | 1 



The other instruments have a similar motive, alternating 
with a triplet figure that is full of inexpressible feUdty. 
In the beautiful aria "Ich will auch mit gebrochnen Augen" 
we almost get the impression that Bach is continuing to 
depict the steps, only that the music now, as in the duet 
"So geh ich mit beherzten Schritten", in the cantata last 
mentioned, represents a more assured and joyous pro* 
cession. 



362 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

The accompaniment to the recitative "O Wunder» dass 
ein Herz vor der dem Fleisch verhassten Gruft sich nicht 
entsetzt'* (**0h wonder, that a heart does not shrink from 
the detested grave'*) is very characteristic of Bach's pic- 
torialism. The '^ot shrinking from the grave" becomes, 
in the orchestra, a matter of positive rejoicing; it is with 
the "joy" motive that the voice is accompanied — 




In this cantata, again, it is best to allot the final duet 
to several voices. 

In the first chorus of the cantata for the Annunciation, 
Wie schdn leuchiet der Morgenstem (No. i) Bach uses two 
obbligato violins. His music converts the text into an 
expression of mystical exuberance. In the orchestral 
accompaniment the themes of the separate lines of the 
chorale are largely employed as motives. The arias, too, 
are masterly; in the last of them he again makes use of 
two obbligato violins*. 

The powerful first chorus of the cantata for the Visita- 
tion of Mary, Meine SeeP erhebt den Herrn (No. 10) — 
written upon the German Magnificat — is constructed 
upon a bass that embodies an exuberant "joy" motive**. 
The idea of a bold ascending movement dominates Bach's 
imagination again in the aria *Herr, der du stark und 
maditig bist" ("Lord, Who art strong and mighty"), in 
which the first violins have the following free figures — 




^F^ 



r : * In the fiisty "ErfuUet, ihr himmlischen, gottlichen Flammen» 
die nach euch verlangende, glaubige Brnst", we can almost believe 
that Bach is trying to give the impression of a flickering flame. 
♦♦ It is quoted on p. iii. 



Herr Goti, dich hben aUe wir; Christ unset Heft. 363 

The proud semiquaver figures in the bass should be 
noted. 

In the hasso osHfuUo of the aria "Gewaltige stosst Gott 
vom Stuhl" ("God casts the mighty down from their seat") 
the motive of falling and that of haughty strength are 
combined in one theme*. In the duet between alto and 
tenor with the cantus firmus of the Magnificat — which 
Bach afterwards made into a chorale prelude (Peters VII, 
No. 42) — the voice parts should be increased. 

The imposing music to the first chorus of the Michaelmas 
cantata, Herr Gott, dich lohen aUe wir (No. 130) reminds 
us strongly of the kind of chorus that Bach used to write 
in his first Leipzig period. In the bass aria "Der alte 
Drache brennt vor Neid" ("The old dragon is consumed 
with envy") he tries to show the hearer the powerful body 
of the serpent working its way upward in furious contor- 
tions — 




'^'•'^^j^jij 



This movement is accompanied by three trumpets and the 
kettledrum; to make it sound well in performance is one 
of the most difficult of the problems presented by Bach's 
scores**. 

In the instrumental accompaniment to the cantata for 
Midsunmier Day, Christ unset Herr zum Jordan kam (No. 7), 
Bach has employed on a large scale the method of paint- 
ing he had already used in his chorale preludes upon this 
chorale (Peters VI, Nos. 17 and 18) ***. The representa- 



* Cited on p. 90. Upon the meaning of the semiquaver figures 
in the strings in the recitative "Was Gott den Vatem alien Zeiten", 
see p. y6, 

♦♦ The simple tenor aria, "Lass o Furst der Cherubinen" should 
be sung by several voices to each part, the first and second violins, 
in this case, being added unisono to the flute. 

♦♦♦ See pp. 58, 59. See also the fine representation of rapid waves 
in the first chorus of the secular cantata Schieicht, spielende Wellen 
(B. G. XX«). 



364 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



Hon of the rh}rthm and the sound of the moving water 
is as realistic as it could be. We see great waves and little 
ones; some overtake the others and break over them; 
the rapid song of the flutes is bright and gloomy in turns; 
then the monotony of the even motion is again broken for 
a moment by a mighty surge of the greater waves. The 
following are the chief of the themes and motives by means 
of the succession and interlocking of which Bach depicts 
so wonderfully the animated play of the waves — 




^m 





r. V ftf *> f J/ h 1; ^ cTJ I 




J^pf' J7M j'r P jy Ufj'rg J^B 






^vfrfr^irr 




The recitative "Merkt imd hort ihr Menschenkinder'\ 
which proclaims the promises of baptism and calls for 
faith in them, is accompanied by a theme that has been 
prompted by the idea of firm and assured steps. Here 
again, as in the chorale prelude Jesus ChristuSy unset Hei- 
land (Peters VI, No. 30)*, Bach*s purpose is to represent 
immovable faith in the marvel of the sacrament. 



♦ See p. 61. 



Ack wie fMchtig, ack wie nickHg. 



365 



>» I', r 1 rtf [ rll 





In the great chorus of the cantata Ach me flUcfUig, ach 
wie nichtig (No. 26; for the twenty-fourth Sunday after 
Trinity) Bach again paints a picture for which he had 
made the sketch in a chorale prelude upon the same melody 
(Peters V, No. i)*. 

As a rule the accompaniment to this chorus is played 
much too loudly for it to suggest the flying and undiUat- 
ing mists. The best effect is ensured by having only a 
few voices to each part and making the orchestra play 
piano throughout. This will permit of a much quicker 
tempo than is customary. The phrasing must be the one 
plainly indicated in the bass figure — 




Particular care should be taken not to accent the first 
semiquaver in the fourth beat. If it receives the very 
slightest emphasis the upward motion of the melodic Une 
is impeded. 

The two arias are also conceived in very characteristic 
style» and their tone-colour is particularly effective. In 
the first, '*So schnell ein rauschend Wasser schiesst, so 
eilen unsers Lebens Tage'' (**The days of our life hasten 
away like rushing water"), Bach depicts the '^hastening'* 
in much the same style as at the comjnencement of the 
Easter oratorio, Kommt, eilet und laufet (B. G. XXI >); in 
the last he expresses the words "An irdische Schatze das 
Herze su hangen ist eine Verfuhrung" ("It is a deceit- 



* The sketch and the complete picture are shown on pp. 57, 58. 



366 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

ful thing to fix the heart on earthly treasures") by means 
of a theme fomided on the "joy" motive, making it a cheer- 
ful song of freedom from the world. But as soon as the 
words "rauschen und reissen die waUenden Fluten" ("The 
floods rush overwhelmingly along") or "in Trummer zer- 
fallt" ('^faUs in ruins") occur, the orchestra at once re- 
produces these pictures in appropriate motives. 

In the cantata for Septuagesima, Ich haV in Gottes Herz 
und Sinn (No. 92), Picander was particularly anxious 
to please the composer, so he besprinkled the text liberally 
with pictures and images. He interrupts the second chorale 
verse with a recitative, in which "mit Prasseln und mit 
groQem Knallen die Berge und die Hiigel fallen" ("the 
mountains and hills fall with a great crash"), and the 
flowing waves are also invoked. He was not deceived 
in his expectation that Bach would seize upon these op- 
portunities for tone-painting, — as he gladly does again in 
the aria "Seht, wie bricht, wie reisst, wie fallt, was Gottes 
starker Arm nicht halt" (''See, how breaks, how splits, 
how falls, whatever God*s strong arm doth not uphold")*. 

Very characteristic, again, is the bass accompaniment 
to the aria "Das Brausen von den rauhen Winden" ("The 
roaring of the boisterous winds"). In the final aria, 

''Meinem Hirten bleib' ich treu, 
Will er mir den Kreuzkelch fiillen, 
Ruh' ich ganz in seinem Willen, 
Er steht mir im Leiden bei", 

Bach expresses this superterrestial serenity of soul in a 
kind of spiritualised dance-melody — 




The same spirit breathes through the first chorus. Un- 
fortunately the tasteless recitatives that fill out the chorale 
strophes are a serious drawback to this cantata. 



♦ See p. 82. 



Warum beMibsi du dich; Herr Jesu Christ. 367 

Hans Sachs's fine hymn, which Bach uses in the cantata 
Warum beMibst du dich, mmn Herx (No. 138; for the fif- 
teenth Sunday after Trinity) is also so disfigured by Pican- 
der's poetical additions that it can hardly be p^ormed 
without alterations. Moreover the interrupting recitatives 
in the first two chorale choruses are very unfortunate 
from the purely musical standpoint, to say nothing of the 
quality of the passages that have been inserted. It is a 
pity that the beautiful und expressive music of the first 
chorus, in which the chorale motives are used also in the 
orchestral accompaniment, has been so disfigured. At 
the finish the chorale is simg without any interruptions, 
the orchestra adding a rich and animated accompaniment*. 
This chorale cantata stands alone in the peculiarity of 
its structure. We get the impression — Spitta expresses 
the same opinion — that Bach had set to work upon it 
without any very clear plan. 

The accompaniment to the first chorus of the cantata 
for Quinquagesima Sunday, Herr Jesu Christ, wahr^r Mensch 
und Gott (No. 127), is wholly based on the rh}rthm of 
solemnity. It will be remembered that in an aria of the 
cantata Gelobet seist du, Jesu Christ (No. 91) Bach em- 
ploys this rhythm to express the text **God takes poverty 
on Himself', which likewise deals with the divine and hu- 
man nature of Jesus. Thus the music in each case represents 
the divine majesty. As Quinquagesima Sunday, however, 
introduces the period of the Passion, in the cantata for 
that day Bach makes the strings and wind give out alter- 
nately the chorale "Christ, du Lamm Gottes'*, in a solemn 
rhjrthm. 

In the soprano aria "Die Seele ruht in Jesu Handen, 
wenn Erde diesen Leib bedeckt . . . ach, ruft mich bald, 
ihr Sterbeglocken" ('The sold reposes in Jesus* hands, 



* The fine bass aria "Auf Gott steht meiiie Zuversicht", which 
is accompanied by the "joy'' motive, was utilised by Bach for the 
GraHas agimus of the G major Mass (B. G. VIII, pp. 178 if). Hans 
Sachs's chorale is found in the Wittenberg hymn*book of 1586. 



368 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



even when the earth covers my body . . . Ah, call me soon 
away, ye bells of death") the tolling of the funeral bells 
is heard in the flutes, the oboe adding a strain of ecstatic 
yearning. The lengthy final arioso gives Bach an oppor- 
tunity to depict the terrors of the Last Judgment and of 
the destruction of the world. He does so with the same 
enthusiasm as in the cantatas of the first Leipzig period. 
There is a striking resemblance between the magnificent 
principal choruses of the cantatas Ach lieben Christen^ 
seid getrost (No. 114; for the seventeenth Sunday after 
Trinity) and Mache dich mein Geisi hereUy wache^ flM 
und bete (No. 115; for the twenty*second Sunday after 
Trinity). In each of them Bach expresses the idea of some 
one raising and comforting himself by means of many 
repetitions of a short soaring motive that is seen also in 
the first chorus of Wachet auf, tuft ims die Stimtne 
(No. 140) — 

Cantatat "Ach lieben Chriaten seid getrost". 




Cantata: "Mache dich mein Geist bereit". 




This motive gives a bright and joyous complexion to the 
musical expression of the text. Bach takes account only 
of the words "bereit" ('•ready") and "getrost" ("confident"), 
not troubling in the least about the fundamental mood 
of the verses, which is almost a sombre one. This is espe- 
cially noticeable in the first chorus of the cantata Mache 
dich mein Geist bereit. It should be mentioned that we 
possess also another commencement of the chorus, ex- 
tending as far as the fifth bar, which Bach rejected in favour 
of the present version*. These choruses must of course 
be taken in a brisk and energetic tempo. 



* See Preface to B. G. XXIV, p. 24. 



Ach liehen Christen. 



369 



The solos in both cantatas are beautiful and impressive. 
In the aria "Ach schlafrige Seele, wie? ruhest du noch? 
Ermuntre dich doch!" ("Ah, drowsy soul, dost thou still 
sleep? Come, rouse thyself!"), in the cantata Mache 
dich mein Geist bereity the orchestra has a lulling slumber- 
song, through which we hear the warning and terrifying 
call of the alto voice. In the allegro passage at the words 
"Es mochte die Strafe dich plotzlich ereilen" ("Chastise- 
ment may suddenly overtake thee") there is a momentary 
start of terror in the accompaniment ; at the end, however, 
where the text speaks of the eternal sleep of death, the 
slumber-song returns. There is a wonderfully intimate 
feeling in the soprano aria "Bete aber auch dabei", which 
Bach has marked tnoUo adagio. 

The solos in Ach lieben Chrislen seid getfost aim more 
at the characteristic. "Wo wird in diesem Jammertale fiir 
meinen Geist die Zuflucht sein" ("Where, in this vale of 
sorrow, can my spirit find refuge") asks the tenor. The 
sorrowful flute accompaniment seems to suggest the con- 
fused uncertain beating of wings — 



li^njftift 



^ 



T I H I ' ^ I n I :. 



But when the answer comes, "AUein zu den Vaterhanden 
will ich mich in der Schwachheit wenden" ("In my weak- 
ness will I turn to my Father's hand alone"), the soul 
also finds the path along which it is to take wing; it glides 
through the air with a uniform and easy motion — 

Flftiito. 




In the chorale "Kein* Frucht das Weizenkomlein bringt, 
es fall* denn in die Erden" (*If the grain bring forth no 



Schweitzer, Bach. tL 



24 



370 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



wheat, let it fall to the earth") the basso osUnato sjonbolises 
the motion of the arm as it flings the grain away, and the 
falling of the latter — 




We possess also the sketch for this curious figure. The 
theme occurred to Bach when he was working at the opening 
chorus. Dreading lest he should forget it, he wrote it 
down on an empty line of the score, where it runs thus — 




As will be seen, the pictorial idea is fully contained in this 
sketch; in the improved version, however, it is made much 
more characteristic. The V4 rhythm and the pauses give 
the theme the abruptness and the angularity that are typical 
of the motion of the sower's arm as seen from a distance. 
Thus Bach*s notion of "improving" it is to make it more 
realistic. This accidental light upon his way of transform- 
ing a theme is very instructive as to the nature of his art. 
Further, in order, that the hearer's attention may not 
be distracted from the pictorial figure. Bach admits no 
obbligato instrument in the accompaniment. The violas 
can be used effectively here to assist the continuo bass at 
the interval of an octave. The organist, by means of one 
or two four-feet stops, should brighten the timbre of the 
manual on which he is playing with his left hand. Scrupu- 
lous care shoidd also be taken to accent strongly the 
quavers that terminate the semiquaver run, since other- 



A us tiejey Not; Allein zu dir, 371 

wise the meaning of the figure will be obscured. In the 
chorale half-a-dozen clear boys* voices should be employed. 

The transfigured music of the alto aria, "Du machst, 
o Tod, mir nun nicht femer bange", is all the more im- 
pressive in virtue of its contrast with the realism of the 
preceding movement. 

When performing the cantata Aus tiefer Not schrei ich 
zu dir (No. 38; for the twenty-first Sunday after Trinity), 
it is as well to omit the solitary aria it contains. The un- 
endmrably wretched declamation proves the music to have 
been borrowed from another work. The first chorus is 
in the form of a concise chorale motet. The final trio 
has also a motet character; it should, of course, be performed 
by a small chorus, not by the soloists. 

The splendid motet upon "O Jesu Christ, meins Lebens 
Licht", which is printed in the B. G. edition as cantata 
No. 118, was not originally written for the church, but was 
performed in the open air, at a funeral ceremony. For 
this reason it is accompanied by wind instruments alone. 
Nothing precise can be learned from either Mattheson or 
Walther as to the instrument called the "Lituus" that is 
here employed twice. It probably belonged to the comet 
family. The work could be re-orchestrated for chiurch 
use. We possess another score of it, used by Bach for a 
performance in a building. In this he replaces the cometto 
and the three trombones by strings, to which, perhaps, 
the wood-wind were added. 

In the first chorus of the cantata AUein zu dir, Herr 
Jesu Christ (No. 33; for the thirteenth Sunday after Trinity) 
a sunny confidence is expressed by means of a "joy" motive 
in uninterrupted semiquavers. The energetic "step" 
motives in the accompaniment probably symbolise stead- 
fast faith; perhaps they are specially prompted by the 
passage "Allein zu dir, Herr Jesu Christ, mein* Hoffnung 
steht auf Erden" ("My hope on earth, Lord Jesus Christ, 
is fixed on Thee alone"). The most sharply characteristic 
of these motives runs thus — 

24» 



372 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



j ,'i^r^', i ^'^i^rS i ^ 




In the aria "Wie furchtsam wankten meine Schritte" 
("How fearful and uncertain were my steps") the violins 
give it out in an uncertain and feeble form, — 



p 



^fe 




the other strings adding their pizzicato in a march-rhythm. 
In the themes we should of course accent the s)aicopated 
quavers, not the strong beats of the bars, if we are not 
to destroy the pictorial suggestion of the motion*. 

In the bass aria "Bald zur Rechten, bald zur Linken 
lenkt sich mein verirrter Schritt" ("My wandering steps 
turn now to the right, now to the left"), in the cantata 
Herr Christ, der ein^ge GoUessohn (No. 96 ; for the eighteenth 
Sunday after Trinity), Bach depicts the reeling gait by 
means of intervals of a similar kind — 




At the words "Gehe doch, mein Heiland, mit" ("But 
let my Savioiir go with me") the stumbling accompaniment 
ceases in all the parts, and is replaced by a short and 
delicate march. The chorus of this cantata is exceptionally 
beautiful. It receives an individual physiognomy through 
the animated semiquaver figures in the flauio piccolo and 



* The final duet should be sung by several voices. 



Erhalt* tins, Herr; Schmiicke dich, 373 

violino piccolo^ that run through the whole movement. 
The cantus firmus is here in the alto. 

The first chorus of the cantata for Sexagesima, ErhalP 
unsy Herty hei deinem Wort (No. 126), is an expression of 

confident joy. Besides the rhythm of joy, ^ JJ^ JJ^ 

a descending semiquaver figure runs through the accomp- 
animent. It reminds us very much of the one in the 
Michaelmas cantata, Es erhub sich ein Streit (No. 19), 
that represents the falling of the vanished hosts of hell. 
In the Sexagesima cantata the motive has a similar poetic 
significance, as may be seen from the fact that the basses 
have this semiquaver figuration at the words "die Jesum 
Christum, deinen Sohn, stiirzen wollen von seinem Thron" 
("Who would cast down Jesus Christ, Thy Son, from His 
throne"). 

The bass aria "Stiirze zu Boden, schwulstige Stolze" 
("Fall to the ground, thou swollen pride") is accompanied 
by a theme composed of two motives. The first depicts 
the falling; the second, in an ascending motion, paints 
the huge effort to rise again, which is ended by a new fall*. 
In this realistic cantata Bach introduces, as he so often 
does, a movement wholly composed of spiritualised music. 
The duet of the two oboes in the tenor aria "Sende deine 
Macht von oben" seems like a heavenly choir singing the 
praise of God. 

There is mystic feeling again in the gentle triplet motion 
that runs through the great introductory chorus of the 
cantata Schmiicke dich, Hebe Sede (No. 180; for the 
twentieth Sunday after Trinity). We feel that Bach is 
at work upon one of his favourite melodies. In lively con- 
trast to this thoughtful chorus is the tenor aria "ErmimtVe 
dich, dein Heiland klopft, ach offne bald" ("Arouse thee 
and open; thy Saviour knocks"), in which the flute re- 
presents the joyous hastening by means of an extremely 
animated version of the "joy** motive — 



* The theme is quoted on p. 83. 



374 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 




The soprano's h5nnn of praise, "Lebenssonne, Licht der 
Sinnen", is accompanied by the orchestra in majestic^ 
flowing, wave-like lines. 

The first chorus of the cantata Wo Gott der Herr nicht 
bei uns hdU (No. 178 ; for the eighth Sunday after Trinity) 
is accompanied by the rh3rthm of solemnity in the orchestra. 
In the solos Bach's pictorial conception of the text is al- 
most too evident. The accompaniment of the bass aria 
"Gleichwie die wilden Meereswellen" ("Like the wild 
waves of the sea") flows along in agitated wavy lines; the 
chorale "Auf sperren sie den Rachen weit" ("Their jaws 
open wide*') is accompanied by a motive that is the exact 
inversion of the one in the arioso of the St. MaUhew Passion^ 
"Der Heiknd fallt vor seinem Vater nieder" ("The Saviour 
falls before His father"); in the tenor aria **Schweig' nur, 
taumelnde Vemunft" ("Be silent, reeling reason"), Bach 
is chiefly concerned to represent the reeling in the most 
drastic way, by figures of this kind — 



j,i r m I rj m^ 




I'yj^ 'unnri^ 




How strongly Bach's imagination is influenced by pic- 
torial images in these last cantatas may be seen from the 
cantata Wohl dem^ der sich auf seinen Gott (No. 139; for 
the twenty-third Sunday after Trinity). In the aria "Das 
Ungluck schlagt um mich ein zentnerschweres Band; doch 
plotzlich erscheint die helfende Hand; mir scheint des 



Wohl dem; Nitnm von uns^ Herr. 



375 



Trostes Licht von weitem** ("Misfortune overwhelms me 
on every side as with heavy bonds; but suddenly appears 
the helping hand, and the light of comfort shines on me 
from afar"), three principal motives are used in succession. 
The first s3rmbolises the entwining of the heavy bonds — 




^ 





The second represents the rescuing hand that raises the 
fallen soul to heaven — 

Vivace 



j,¥)t,j]'J^nj;3fn/j Jrn 



The third s3nnbolises the flickering light that has become 
visible in the distance — 




The third motive has already appeared in the prelude to 
the aria; it also ends the movement. 

It may be observed that the excessive pictorial tendenqr 
in the ageing Bach is noticeable not only in his thematic 
invention, but to an even greater extent in the fact that 
he no longer works the motives out musically, but is satis- 
fied with the perpetual repetition of them. 

The cantata Nimm von uns, Herr, du treu&r Gott (No. 191 ; 
for the tenth Sunday after Trinity), is one of those that 
are sadly disfigured by the excessively tasteless recitative- 
passages that are dovetailed into the chorale text. Bach 
himself was unconscious of the wretched quality of this 
text. He worked at it with extraordinary devotion. For- 
tunately Picander had left the first strophe intact. B^ch 



376 XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 

makes a double motet of it. One of these, worked out 
upon themes of his own, is given to the orchestra ; the other, 
upon the splendid melody "Vater unser im Himmelreich") 
is given to the choir. We cannot help wishing that Bach 
had left us more chorale-choruses of this tj^. The theme 
that accompanies the final duet, ^'Gedenk an Jesu bittern 
Tod; nimm, Vater, deines Sohnes Schmerzen" (**Think of 
Jesus* bitter death ; oh Father, take away Thy Son's sorrow" ) 
has a basic affinity with the sobbing, sighing theme of the 
aria "Erbarme dich" in the St. Matthew Passion. It is 
also interesting from the fact that Bach himself has marked 
the phrasing, which is very instructive — 



i 



^^^ 



s 




The first chorus of the cantata Ach Gott vom Himmel 
sieh darein (No. 2 ; for the second Sunday after Trinity), 
is in the form of a simple motet. In the aria "Tilg, o Gott, 
die Lehren, so dein Wort verkehren" ("Extirpate, oh 
God, the wise ones who pervert Thy word"), the "per- 
versity" is painted in the typical Bach style. The music 
of the final aria seems to be derived from some other work. 

The beautiful music to the tenor aria "Troste mir, Jesu, 
mein Gemute", in the cantata Ach Herfy mich armen 
sunder (No. 135 ; for the third Sunday after Epiphany) 
was also probably written originally for another text, 
judging from the imperfection of the declamation. In 
the bass aria "Weichet all* ihr Obeltater, weicht" ("Away, 
ye evildoers"), the rushing away is depicted in a manner 
as perfect from the pictorial as from the musical point of 
view*. The first chorus — upon the melody "O Haupt 
voU Blut und Wunden" — is extremely effective in its 
wonderful simplicity. The cantus firmus is in the bass. 
The orchestra is occupied only with a motive formed out 



* The chief theme ol this interesting movement is quoted on p. 88. 



Ach Herr, mich armen Sunder; Jesu, der du tneine Seele, 377 

of the first notes of the melody, as if it were repeating 
incessantly the words "Ach Herr ! mich armen Siinder !" 

The solos in the cantatas of the last period are remark- 
able not only for their length but for the character of the 
instrumental accompaniment. Bach seldom employs the 
orchestra for this purpose; as a rule he contents himself 
with one or two solo instruments and the continuo. The 
solos in the cantata for the eleventh Sunday after Trinity, 
Herr Jesu Christ, du hochstes Gut (No. 113) are typical in 
this respect. The chorus of the cantata is in extremely 
simple style; the voices sing the plain chorale to an or- 
chestral accompaniment. 

The chorale used by Bach in the cantata for the four- 
teenth Sunday after Trinity, Jesu, der du meine Seele 
(No. 78) begins thus — 

"Jesu, der du meine Seele 
Hast durch deinen bittern Tod 
Aus des Teufels finstrer Hdhle 
Und der schweren Sedennot 
Kraftiglich herausgerissen ** 



("Jesus, who hast by Thy bitter death mightily torn my 
soul from deep distress and the gloomy pit of the devil"). 
The bitter death and the distress of soul are depicted by 
Bach in a theme based upon the familiar chromatic se- 



quence 




j^j^jij 



The "mighty tearing" of the soul from the gloomy pit of 
the devil is s3nnbolised in this figure — 




The whole movement is constructed out of these two 
themes. The extraordinarily rich detail makes the chorus 
one of the most expressive ever written by Bach. 



378 



XXXIV. The Cantatas after 1734. 



The fine solos of this cantata run to considerable length. 
In the duet **Wir eilen mit schwachen, doch emsigen Schrit- 
ten" (**We hasten with feeble yet diligent steps**) the 
bass of course does not fail to reproduce the motion sug- 
gested in the words. 

The latest cantata of Bach*s that we can date is Du 
FriedefUrst, Herrjesu Christ (No. 116). Its two recitatives 
contain allu^ons to the bitter hardships of war. 

''So strecke deine Hand 
Auf ein erschreckt geplagtes Land, 
Die kann der Feinde Macht bezwingen, 
Und uns bestandig Frieden bringen" — 

so concludes the second recitative. This can refer only 
to the Prussian invasion in the autumn of 1744. The can- 
tata was performed on the twenty-fifth Sunday after 
Trinity, which in that year fell on the 15th November. 

The music is eloquent of the depth of feeling from which 
it came. There is a whole world of sorrow in the alto 
aria **Ach unaussprechlich ist die Not*' and the trio '^Ach 
wir bekennen unsre Schuld**. Yet even in these melan- 
choly days Bach's joyous faith does not desert him. In 
the first chorus the orchestra has a gladsome, animated, 
aspiring motive, that reminds us of that in the cantata 
Ach Ueben Christen, seid getrost (No. 114) — 





To this accompaniment the choir sang to the afflicted con- 
gregation the hymn of the Prince of Peace, who is a strong 
^lidper in man's need'*. Did the Leipzigers understand, 
that Sunday, the sermon the cantor was preaching to them 
from the organ galleiy? 



The Phrasing. 379 



CHAPTER XXXV. 

THE PERFORMANCE OF THE CANTATAS AND 

PASSIONS. 

A lively contest rages at present as to the way to per- 
form Bach's vocal works; the main point in dispute is 
whether the cantatas and Passions are to be given accord- 
ing to the original scores, or whether we should make more 
or less drastic modem arrangements of them. 

Perhaps this discussion attracts far too much attention 
to itself, so that another and elementary question receives 
less consideration than it deserves, — the question^ that 
is, of the phrasing. 

When time pressed, and Bach could only look hastily 
over the orchestral parts, he marked the phrasing, but not 
the dynamic nuances. He attached more importance, 
indeed, to the phrasing than to the correctness of the parts. 
Many a time he has inserted ties and left wrong notes 
unaltered, though he must have perceived them had he 
read the score with ordinary care*. 

In present-day performances we are not nearly careful 
enough as to the phrasing; the majority of conductors 
do not as yet sufficiently appreciate its significance to 
insist on the instrumentalists phrasing properly. As they 
find no phrasing marks in most of the cantatas, they 
think that Bach had no particular wishes in this respect, 
and that it is enough if the notes are strung together in 
any seemly fashion. Even when a cantata is being given 
in which llie parts are covered with Bach's own ties, both 
players and conductor very often think they are following 
his directions when they are not realising his wishes in 
the slightest. 



* E. g., in the cantatas Christus, der ist mein Lehen (No. 95), 
and Ich bin ein guUr Hirt (No. 85). 



380 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

The first thing necessary to give life and rhythm to 
Bach's themes and periods is his own phrasing. It has 
a character of its own. If this is disregarded, if instead 
of the authentic phrasing we adopt a general one that 
is applicable to any kind of music, the work becomes 
peculiarly heavy and inert. The colour of it fades; the 
outlines are effaced; the hearer can no longer foUow the 
several voices; all he hears is an inextricable and weari- 
some medley; the work makes no vital impression. 

If we look merely at this or that cantata with Bach's 
phrasing marks, it is impossible for us to realise the import- 
ance and the bearing of them. For this we need to examine 
a large number of works of which he has carefully revised 
the parts. The chief of these are the Brandenburg con- 
certos, the St. Matthew Passion^ the B minor Mass, the 
Christinas Oratorio and the Easter Oratorio; the following 
secular cantatas — Phoebus und Pan, Schleicht, spielende 
Wellen, and holder Tag; and the following church can- 
tatas, — Wer sich selbst erhdhet (No. 47), Herr, gehe nicht 
ins Gericht (No. 105), Liebster Gott, wann werd^ ich sterben 
(No. 8), Ach Gott, wie manches Herzeleid (No. 58), Emg- 
keit, du Donnerwort (No. 60), Ich habe genug (No. 82), 
Ich mil den Kreuzstab (No. 56), Christus, der ist mein 
Leben (No. 95), Ihr werdet weinen und heulen (No. 103), 
Erfreut euch, ihr Herzen (No. 66), Bleib bei uns (No. 6), 
Am Abend abet desselbigen Sabbats (No. 42), Es wartet 
aUes auf dich (No. 187), Sitsser Trost, mein Jesus kommt 
(No. 151), Liebster Jesu, mein Verlangen (No. 32), Meine 
Seufzer, meine Trdnen (No. 13), Christ unser Herr zum 
Jordan kam (first chorus; No. 7), Nimm von uns, Herr 
(No. loi)*. 

Anyone who has carefully studied these works, or a 
number of them, feels that a new light has been thrown for 
him upon the question of the grouping and the sequences 
of notes. He becomes aware of a wealth of tonal combina- 



* Of course not all the numbers in these cantatas are phrased 
to the same extent. 



The Phrasing. 381 

tions that were previously undreamt of by him. The most 
wonderful thing, however, is that this multiplicity is not 
the product of accident or caprice, but seems to come from 
certain basic ideas as to the combination of a complex 
of notes in a long musical period. 

Characteristic and individual as this phrasing seems, 
it is quite natural when we see the origin and nature of 
it. It comes from the idea of the natural use of the some- 
what slackened bow. It is characteristic of Bach that he 
demands it of the wind instruments also, and to a certain 
extent of the clavier and organ as well. 

The first principle* we can deduce from the parts that 
Bach himself has revised is this, that his phrasing has 
generally an up-take character. Instead of conceiving 
in one group the strong beat and the notes of the following 
weak beats, he groups the latter with the succeeding strong 
beat. Speaking in general terms, the axiom is that in Bach 
the accented note is as a rule not the commencement 
but the end of the group. The grouping that is usual else- 
where J J J J J J j j is the exception with him ; the group- 
ing that is unusual ebewhere j J J J J J j • j^ jj J is 

with him the rule. 

The other possible groupings of the four notes are also 
more frequent with him than the simple linking of the 
last three to the first. He prefers figures of this kind: 

Jrn JTTj ;TJ3 ; J7T3 JTT] JTJ] ; J7T] JTJ] 

.^_. ,^^ „^ ..^__^ .^, ,^^ _ ^ • ^ ^ • _ ^ • • .^ ^ • - -^ 

imiSmrmrrn. 

It is unnecessary to quote examples to illustrate this 
fundamental rule; anyone who will glance through a few 
of the cantatas named above will at once meet with a 
dozen of them, and will then understand why the ordinary 



* The general principles of the Bach phrasing are given in 
I. 365 «. 



382 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

phrasing can have no other result than the disfiguring 
of Bach's music. 

The second rule is that the intervals which interrupt 
the natural succession of the notes are to be detached 
from the tie and played staccato^ whether they begin or 
close the period. The following are ty^icsX examples: 

Ratswahl cantata: Wir danken dit^ GoU (No. 29). Aria. 




Cantata: Ich Kobe genug (No. 82). Aria. 




Secular cantata: Preise deinlGiacke (E.G. XXXIV). Aria. 



^'' "' Mi ' iLu I diJ dj ^ff 



The cases in which the phrasing alters in the same pas- 
sage, owing to a change in the position of the character- 
istic interval, are very instructive: 

Cantata: Susser Trost, nmn Jesus kommt (No. 151). Aria. 



tf'^r.J? I J?IJjJj.J^ ^ 




It is equally important to remember that when a larger 
interval enters in a sequence that is grouped on a definite 
principle, it does not submit to the preceding phrasing, 
but abolishes it — 

^^ ^Cantata: Herr wis du mUst (No. 71). Aria. 



The Phrasing. 



383 



Cantata: Liebster G0U9 wann werd' ich sterben (No. 8). Aria. 




Cantata: Wer sich selbst erhohetf dersolPerniedrigt werden (No. 47). Aria. 




' These examples derive their force from^the fact that a 
modem instnimentalist who had them placed before 
him without any phrasing marks would not play them as 
above, but on an exactly^opposite principle, — tieing 
the largest intervals; so that a conductor might say to 
the cellists who asked him as to the phrasing of a run, 
"Play it in just the opposite way to what you think is 
correct; then you will be right." 

The study of the parts that Bach himself has revised 
shows us moreover the senselessness of the supposed Bach 
**tradition" that when the tempo is not very fast the 
notes of the instrumental bass should be detached from 
each other so as to come out the more clearly. Only 
certain basses, consisting of natural sequences in imiform 
quavers or crotchets, are to be played in this way, especially 
in passages where the music expresses walking or running. 
In cases of this kind Bach usually indicates the staccato 
points for the first bars, or marks the movement staccato 
sempre. As a rule, however, he demands the same vitality 
in the grouping of the bass notes as in the other parts. 
We can even say that the phrasing in the bass is almost 
more important than elsewhere. If the bass figure is 
not perceptible to most of the hearers, this is generally 
due to the fact that it is not phrased in accordance with 
Bach's intentions, but as a characterless succession of 
notes. 

How Bach wishes his basses to be played can be seen 
from the aria "Blute nur", in the St. Matthew Passion. 



384 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

At the commencement of the middle section he phrases 
the bass thus — 




mfT-t 1 .p^ j-U; ^ p mr I f[j. r ^ 




In motives constructed on formulas of this kind 3 M-i 
J3 :j J5H J^ and *1 J^ J J f J^ J J ^^ ^^^ quavers 
or crotchets are, as a rule, to be separated from each 
other. 

In figures founded on the rhjrthm I J » J J i J i we must 

carefully discriminate as to the form to which the phrase 
belongs*. The "solemnity" rhjrthm and the **passionate" 
rh3rthm must be phrased in such a way that the short 
note is heavily accented, and drawn, as it were, towards 

the long note that succeeds it , thus ••• J.3 J.3 J.3 J • 

But if the motive is one expressive of charm or peace, 
the short note must be quite without accent, and drawn 

towards its predecessor, thus ••f ••• ••• | *•• ••• •••. 

In triple rhjrthms the customary phrasing, in which the 
unaccented notes are linked in a imiform succession to the 

preceding acccented note, j J J J j J J J J J j J , is rather 

more frequently met with than in the quadruple rhythms; 
nevertheless there are some very significant combinations 

of other kinds, such as -| ppp PPp PPp PfP I P; 



♦ On the various forms of the rhythm ^THH^T^ and 
their meanings see pp. 94 ff. 



The Phrasing. 



385 



i i:£llD }:£uIf }j 6£££^6£££^J gfetj^ 



19. 



If. 



tUULT ' 6££££f tllLU * UUX/ OUi: 

One peculiarity of the figures in the triple rhythms 
is that Bach more frequently introduces staccato interrupt- 
ing notes, and more of them, within the ties, than he does 
in the quadruple rhythms. The following are t3^ical 
cases — 

Cantata: Wer sich selbst erhohett der soU emisdrigst werden(i^o. 47). 



^^S^P^P 



Cantata: In alien meimn TaUn (No. 97). Aria. 



■Mi ^ ^j j'ti!f I tf I'fef l ifj . 



Cantata: Nimm von unSf Hen^ du tr^uer GoU (No. loi). Aria 




It is noticeable, again, that in the triple rhythms Bach 
very often introduces variants into the phrasing, as if 
desirous of breaking a monotony that might spoil his 
tonal figures. In most cases the change is made in the 
bass. In the bass of the aria "J^^^ Woge meiner Wellen", 
in the cantata Schleichi, spiehnde WeUen (B. G. XX>), he 

opposes to the normal phrasing J J J j J J the following 

J J J J J J ; in the bass of the aria "Fromme Musen", 

in the secular cantata Tdnet, ihr Pauken (B. G. XXXIV), 
the normal rhjrthm and the other are placed side by side — 




Schweitzer, Bach. IL 



as 



386 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

The variants in the phrasing in the upper parts are 
not so sharply antithetical as this, but are all the richer 
and more interesting. In an aria with accompaniment 
for a solo vioUn in the secular cantata Der zufriedenge- 
stdUe Molus (B. G. XI>), Bach indicates the following 

groupings - i?=^/5ra^^ ^m^m 

and-JJJJJ^JjJJJJ^; in the aria "Seht, was die 

Liebe tut'^ in the cantata Der Herr ist mein getreuer Hirt 
(No. 85), he groups the last six quavers against the first 
three — 



m 



^ 



£ 



ri^ jTi JTi ' n^ m ^^ 

y^ •J-J. •J.J- y*" •JV •♦ 



The intention is so delicate that the instrumentalists^ as 
a rule, are not aware of it, and simply play three uniform 
and connected triplets. 

In the runs in the alto aria in the cantata Es wartet 
alles auf dich (No. 181) the antagonism between the natural 
rhythm of the bar and that of the phrasing is very marked — 




The following examples will give an idea of the delight- 
ful variety of phrasing by means of which Bach tries to 
overcome the monotony of triple rh3rthms: 



Secular Cantata: SchlHcfU, spiehnde Wellen (B. G. XX'). 
Aria with solo violin. 



The Fhrasiiig. 



387 




Christmas Oratorio: Air with flute accompaniment. 



lUU^rUmijL^ 





Cantata: Liebster Jesu^ mtin Verlangsn (No. 32). Aria. 




A ntimber of varieties in the phrasing are found in the 
prelude to an aria in the cantata Lobe den Herrn (No. 137)9 
of which three bars may be quoted here* — 

* 



¥ " ^^rj e^^ P 





In ^Vs time, again, which is a combination of the triple 
and the quadnq>le, Bach varies the phrasing in several 
ways — 



♦ The cantata Schleicht, spielende Weilen (B. G. XX«) may 
be specially recommended for a study of Bach's phrasing in triple 
times. 

as* 



388 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 



Cantata: LiebsUr GoU, 
Bass aria. 



wann werd' ich sUrben (No. 8). 




}^In the rhythms in common time Bach does not intro- 
duce so many varieties of phrasmg, though they are plenti- 
ful enough for all that, as may be seen in the alto aria 
^^chliesse metn Herze" in the Christmas Oratano^ where 
we find passages like this in the solo violin part — 




Generally speaking, however, in V4 ^^le he simply 
differentiates the ties and indicates the natural alterna- 
tions of staccato and legato. It shoyld be noticed, how- 
ever, that almost every one of his ties and dot^ has for its 
object to ensure the freedom of the phrases as against the 
ordinary metre of the bar, and to diminish the authority 
of the strong beats. A typical example of this tendency 
may be seen in the cross-tieing of the notes in an aria in 
the cantata Ach Gott, wie manches Herzeleid (No. ^8) — 




(Certain other phrasings that alternate regularly between 
staccato and legato have the same end in view. There is 
a very significant case of this kind in an aria in the cantata 
Schweigt stiUe, plaudert nicht (B. G. XXIX) — 



The Phrasing. 389 



mi ... ,*tb f*fT>f I ^p 



Other movements in which the transition from legato 
to staccato can be studied are the arias **Blute nnr, du 
liebes Herz" and "Gebt mir meinen Jesum wieder", in 
the St. Matthew Passion. The full wealth of Bach's blend- 
ing of the two in semiquaver passages is seen in the orches- 
tral accompaniment to the first chorus of Christ, unser 
Herr, zum Jordan kam (No. 7). 

On the whole we may say that single notes that interrupt 
the natural flow of the phrases are to be played staccato^ 
especially when they are separated from the other notes 
by large intervals. If they form a large group of their 
own, then staccato and legato must alternate within this. 

In rhythms of this formula "IJ^J^IJ^J^ the 
question as to whether the second note is to be attached 
to or separated from the first must be settled in each case 
by the nature of the motive. In the aria ^'Schlummert 
ein", from Ich habe genug (No. 82), Bach phrases thus — 




while he marks the violin solo in the Laudatnus te of the 
B minor Mass thus — 




*" If the first two notes form a large or striking interval, 
they must, as a rule, be played without legato. 

It will be generally noticed that Bach's ties and staccato 
points aim at bringing out as saliently as possible the 
rh3rthmic individuality or peculiarity of the phrase, while 



390 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

the ordinary phrasing rather tries to tone down the 
characteristic quality of the melody, as if it were ex- 
cessive. 

No one who has tried to understand the essence of 
Bach's own phrasing can ever again place unphrased 
parts before the orchestral players ; he will mark the proper 
ties and dots in the works that have come down to us 
without them. The task is a long and weary one, but 
the reward is great. 

We meet with fewer insoluble problems than we should 
expect, since a little research into the original parts that 
have been phrased will always afford us a number of 
analogies that will elucidate the obscure case. These re- 
searches will convince us that Bach's phrasing is through- 
out deliberate and rational. His ties and dots are always 
explicable from the nature and the function of the rhythms 
and the intervals; the conviction grows upon us that this 
phrasing is "inevitable", — rules can even be foimd for 
the variations. His markings in the Christe eleison of the 

Bminor Mass— /773 /7T3; W? 







— can astonish only those who 

regard this one movement alone; as soon as we coUect 
analogous cases we see that Bach could not, without being 
untrue to himself, have phrased in any other way than 
he has done. It is easy, again, to discover, why, in the 
Et in spifitum sanctum of the Mass he writes at one time 

J J J J J J, and at another J J J J J J; and a little practice 

wiU enable us to understand why, in the same movement, 

he phrases thus J J j J J ^ J j andagainthus j J j j XTlT^* 

The difficulty in some cases would be to decide upon 
the correct distribution of legaio and staccato; absolute 
certainty is not always to be e3q)ected here. Very in- 
structive examples of the rather rare emplo3nnent of an 
uninterrupted staccato may be seen in the cantatas Liebster 



The Phrasing. 391 

JesUy mein Verlangen (No. 32) and Wo soil ich fliehen hin 
(No. 5). 

Too much care cannot be taken to ensure the up-take 
phrasing of the basses. Our instrumentalists are so un- 
accustomed to it that they do not even observe it when 
the notes plainly indicate it, as e. g. in the Credo of the 
B minor Mass. 

The conductor should not only mark the dots and ties 
in the parts but should often instruct his players as to 
the nature of Bach's phrasing. Until the players acquire 
the instinct of grouping Bach's phrases according to their 
sense rather than according to the bar divisions, it is 
hopeless to expect a faithful performance of any of his 
works. 

If our instrumentalists are to bring out Bach's phrasing 
properly they must understand that it goes along with 
a great multiplicity of accents, that cannot be brought 
out too sharply. If our orchestras so often think they 
have fulfilled Bach's intentions when they have done 
nothing of the kind, it is because they have had regard 
only to the external aspects of the ties and dots, and have 
mostly missed the accentuation that can alone convert 
the separate notes into organic groups. 

In no composer, as was remarked in connection with 
the phrasing and accentuation of the clavier works*, are 
the dynamic values of the notes so relative as in Bach; 
no one makes such play as he with light and shade. But 
ill luck will have it that the dogma of the dynamic equival- 
ence of the notes in his music is hardly disposed of even yet. 

The importance of the right accentuation of two tied 
notes cannot be sufficiently strongly insisted upon. One 
of them must always be played comparatively heavily, 
so that the other seems to disappear. If the sequence of 
notes is in the normal rhythm of the bar, the accent must 
be given to the first, thus — 



♦ On the general principles of Bach accentuation see I. 375 ff. 



392 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 



e- e. *-. 




The more we take from the second note in these cases, 
the closer we come to Baches intentions. Passages like 
those in "O Mensch, bewein dein' Siinde gross" (in the 
St. Matthew Passion) and the DonUne^ Qui toUis^ and 
Qui sedes of the B minor Mass are always played much 
too cumbrously. 

If the succession of the two tied notes is contrary to 
the normal rhythm of the bar, then the second is to be 
accented even more strongly, if possible, than the first 
was in the preceding case — 




In the first chorus of the B minor Mass this cross-accentua- 
tion must place the normal V4 accent quite in the shade — 




A very instructive light on the question of the treatment 
of three tied notes is afforded by the introductory num- 
bers of the cantatas Es ist nichts Gesundes 'an meinem 
Leibe (No. 25) ^nd Jesus schlift^ was soil ich hoffen (N0.81). 
The orchestral accompaniment has quite a different effect 
when accented thus — 



with a certain obtrusiveness of emphasis, instead of the 
notes being made practically uniform* 



The Accentuation. 393 

Bach's purpose here is the same as in the orchestral 
accompaniment to the first Kyrie in the B minor Mass. 
He wants to throw a strong cotmter-accent on to the 
second and fourth beats, and by means of the antagonism 
between this and the natural bar-accent to ensure the 
animated variety of rh3rthm that is necessary for the 
"elasticity" of his figures. 

This method of treating V4 ^^^ ^ very common with 
him. it is one of the distinguishing characteristics of his 
style. A comparison of Handelian and Mozartian pieces 
in common time with those of Bach will show that in the 
two former there is hardly a trace of these continual 
rhythmic contrasts; in Beethoven they are more fre- 
quenty but not so frequent as in Bach, who indeed always 
intends them where he indicates or presupposes phrasings 

o« this kmd - jjj ^ ij iJ or ^2; ^£^ or 

The general rule may be laid down that Bach's tie mostly 
means that a strong accent must fall on one of the inner 
notes comprised within the tie. This gives uncommon 
force to the correct accentuation of the up-take phrasing. 
A bass in a regular motion, of the outline of which the hearer 
is never conscious when it is accented in the ordinary 
way, becomes unexpectedly plastic when it is phrased 
and accented thus — 



iuhmTmii 



The most instructive example in this respect is the 
Credo of the B minor Mass, the majestic bass figure of 
which is generally lost upon the hearer, owing to its up- 
take character not being properly brought out by means 
of the accentuation. If, however, it is phrased in this 
way — 



394 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 




it will come out clearly, without there being any necessity 
to strengthen the instruments. 

The basses in the chorus "Sind Blitze, sind Donner", 
in the St.MaUhew Passion, should be played in this 
manner — 




if they are to stand out prominently. The result will show 
that this is how Bach conceived them. 

There are thus innumerable cases in which Bach's fine 
bass figures can be made to tell, by letting the hearer 
perceive them, as it were, through the breaks in the normal 
accentuation of the bar. 

Retardations, syncopations ahd aU other notes that have 
any rhythmical peculiarity should be brought out strongly, 
especially in the triple times. In this regard, however, 
our worthy instrumentaUsts are curiously coy; it costs 
endless trouble to get them to play such passages properly, 
even in the most striking rhythms. In the characteristic 
passage in the theme of the aria Qui sedes, in the B minor 
Mass — 




it is difficult to persuade them that the natural accent 
of the first quaver is to be regarded only as a preliminary 
accent to that of the third. 



The Accentuation. 395 

Motives constructed on this formula, J^ J J3 I J^ J ^ 
are to be accented contrary to the normal rhytimi of the 
bar. The strong accent which we necessarily associate 
with the first note must be regarded as a kind of spring- 
board to the main accent on the second note. At the com- 
mencement of the aria "Ach, nun ist mem Jesus hin'% 
in the St. Matthew Passion, we should accordingly play 
thus — 



^m 




Notes of small value, especially when they precede an 
accent, are generally made most effective when played 
with a certain heaviness, as if we were afraid they might 
pass by tmobserved. This remark holds good in particular 
for certain motives that are founded on the rhythm of 

solemnity or passion JJ J.J '.J J.J* 

It should be recognised that the Bach staccato means, 
in the majority of cases, not a lightening but a certain 
weighting of the note. 

These rules as to the accent in Bach, founded as they 
are on his own phrasing marks, are confirmed by what 
we know of the nature of his themes and motives. It 
has been already remarked, in connection with the clavier 
works, that their structure is not always clear from the 
natural rhythm of the bar, their real form very often 
only becoming apparent in the main accent that comes 
at the end. This is true of the themes of the cantatas to 
an even larger extent; they are much freer and bolder in 
their construction than the clavier themes. Bach having 
kept in view, in the latter, the limited possibilities of phras- 
ing and accentuation on a keyed instrument. 

All the earUer notes strive as it were towards the prin- 
cipal accent. Before its entry we have the impression of 
chaos; when it comes it relieves the tension and makes 



396 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

everything dear in a moment; the restlessness is at an 
end; the theme stands before us in plastic outlines; we 
perceive the musical period as an organic whole. If we 
do not experience this sense of tension followed by relief » 
the theme has not been properly played ; it has been phrased 
in the ordinary rh)rthm of the bars, instead of in its fund- 
amental rh3rthm. 

It is important to observe that in the mighty periods 
in which Bach conceives his themes the principal accent 
is led up to and from by one or more preliminary or sup- 
plementary accents, the former process, however, being as 
a rule longer than the latter. We must therefore emphasise 
the characteristic intervals and the notes that form the 
culminating point or the conclusion of a melodic line, 
whether they fall on a strong or a weak part of the bar. 
In general this rule will coincide with the one previously 
formulated as to the accenting of retardations, syncopa- 
tions and other sahent notes in the rhjrthm. 

The difference made to a Bach theme by not accenting 
the strong and semi-strong beats of the bar can be studied 
to advantage in the final chorus of the First Part of the 
St. MaUhew Passion. If the instrumentalists are allowed 
to play the ascending semiquaver passage — 




in the way that seems most natural to them, they will 
accent the E at the commencement of the third beat, in 
which case the hearer will not get the sense of the interval 
of the seventh that is the basis of the passage. If how- 
ever the accent is thrown on the A of the begiiming of 
the fourth beat, the line makes its proper effect on him. 
In the former case he will hear — 



The Accentuation. 



397 



in the latter case — 




Nor should we play thus in this chorus — 




but thus — 




If we accent in this way the final points of the lines and the 
characteristic intervals, we get a certain rhythmical ten- 
sion between the upper parts — violin, violas, oboes and 
flutes — and the basses, which keep to the normal bar- 
accentuation. Only in this way can the hearer be made 
conscious of the wailing motives of the upper parts; pre- 
viously they were lost in the bar-rhythm; he no longer 
gets the impression of monotony which he could not ward 
off when the movement was rendered in the ordinary way. 
Special attention should be given to the melodic lines 
that Bach traces with the "jo)^'* motive. Take, as a tj^ical 
example, the splendid motive — 




from*'the instrumental accompaniment to the first chorus 
of Was mein Gott will, das g'scheh aUzeit (No. iii). The 
usual accentuation — on the first and third beats — does 
not bring out the meaning of the passage; if, however, 
we accent the second and fourth beats, in such a way 



398 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

that the main emphasis falls on the last beat of the second 
bar, the hearer gets a sense of the heaven-storming, joyous 
faith that Bach desires to express in the motive. 

The effects that can be made by the appropriate accent- 
uation of even small melodic lines may be seen in the 
first chorus of Wachet auf (No. 140), by accenting according 
to its real nature the semiquaver motive that depicts the 
hurried wakening, instead of according to the normal 
V4 scheme — 




In this chorus, again, we can study how to bring out clearly 
those themes of Bach that are based on scale figures. Much 
can also be learned in this respect from the first chorus 
of Ach wie flOchtig (No. 26)*. 

The characteristic accentuation of complete themes 
may be illustrated by two examples from the St. Matthew 
Passion. The commencement of the aria *^Geme will ich 
mich bequemen" should be played thus — 




This accentuation prepares the way for the principal accent 
in the remainder of the theme — 




When we accent the theme in this way, bringing out 
heavily the descending notes after the preliminary accent 
and between the main accent and the succeeding accent, 
the theme strikes the hearer as a connected whole; and 

♦ Seep. 365. 



The Accentuation. 399 

at the same time he understands how it expresses the 
obeisance implied in the words ^'Geme will ich mich be- 
quemen". With the ordinary accentuation both the form 
and the sense of the theme are completely lost*. 

For the first period of the theme of the aria "Gebt mir 
meinen Jesum wieder" we should disregard the V4 metre, 
and accent thus — 




The second period should be played on analogous lines. 
Bach's desire to have the second and fourth beats accented 
throughout is clearly shown by his ties, and by the way 
in which he makes the other instruments accompany the 
solo violin**. 

We need have no fear that by bringing out strongly 
the greater and smaller outlines, and by accenting the 
characteristic notes in what often seems at first an almost 
unnatural way, we shall give the melody a restless and 
unrhjrthmical character. We shall always observe that 
when the theme is rightly accented the bar-rh)^thm is 
still felt to be implicit. 

When we ask for this kind of phrasing and accentuation 
from an orchestra with merely a superficial knowledge 
of Bach, the instrumentalists feel like a man who is asked 
to "declaim" instead of speaking in the ordinary way. 
But just as the latter comes to see in time that what seemed 
affected to him at first is the correct thing, and what seemed 
natural is merely a negligent way of speaking, so it happens 
with the players ; what they thought unnatural at first be- 
comes more and more self-evident to them. At the same 
time they begin to realise how much Bach's music asks 



* On this theme see p. 221. 
♦♦ The phrasing and accentuation of a number of themes have 
been already discussed in connection with the works in which 
they occur. 



400 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

of them; they see that each of them must fed himself to 
be a soloist, and that a correct performance is impossible 
unless each of them realises from moment to moment 
the true connection of the notes, internal as well as external. 
An orchestra that is merely a herd of driven beasts is of 
no use for pla3nuig Bach. We often hear very good or- 
chestras play the accompaniments to the cantatas and Pas- 
sions in mediocre style, simply because the players have 
no idea of the demands that this music — which is not 
difficult in itself, especially as regards the strings — makes 
upon the musical imagination of each individual. On 
the other hand we shall find that ordinary orchestras 
sometimes play Bach excellently when they really try to 
do so. A conductor with the gift of inspiring enthusiasm 
will not shrink even from performing the cantatas occa- 
sionally with military bands*. 

With regard to the tempo markings a distinction exists 
between the earlier and the later works. In the former, 
Bach usually indicates the tempo; in the latter he only 
does this occasionally, even in the cantatas the parts of 
which he has carefully revised**. The appropriate tempo 
for a movement is as a rule not hard to find if we examine 
the text and the nature of the music. The old tempi were 
generally rather too slow, which did some injustice to the 
more passionate of Bach's movements. Even today many 
arias ought to be taken much more quickly than they 
usually are. ^A htuiied tempo, however, must always be 



* I have often assisted as organist at performances of the 
cantatas in small garrison towns in Alsace, such as Kolmar, Weissen- 
burg, and Saarburg, and have always been astonished to find 
how well the strings and vdnd could play the less difficult Bach 
works after a httle training. 

** Among the cantatas partly or wholly provided with tempo 
indications we may mention Goties Zeit (No. io6), Du wahrer 
Gott und Davidssohn (No. 23), Nun homm' der Heiden Heiland 
(No. 61), Weinen^ Klagen (No. 12), Selig ist der Mann (No. 57), 
Sasser Trost (No. 151), and Mache dich mein Geist bereit (No. 115). 
The tempi are also marked in the B minor Mass and many of the 
secular cantatas. 



The Tempo. 40I 

avoided. It should be noted how simple the vocal part 
is in certain movements of a passionate character; this 
seems to indicate that Bach wishes them to be taken 
quickly*. 

Sometimes the problem of the proper tempo for a move- 
ment can only be solved by long experiment. Some move- 
ments, again, are enigmas; we shall never be quite clear 
as to the tempo they require. 

We may formulate the general principle that the tempo 
is correct when the details and the ensemble are equally 
perceptible and equally effective. Here again, as in the 
clavier and organ works, we must remember that the 
hearer who is listening to a work of Bach's for the first 
time often feels a moderate tempo to be a quick one, if 
the modulations are very rich and the contrapuntal writ- 
ing very complicated. 

The real difficulty in Bach's music lies not in choosing 
the tempo but in maintaining it. No one who knows 
the scores of the cantatas can doubt that Bach demands 
great elasticity in the tempo, — the unity of which, how- 
ever, must not be impaired. If the hearer perceives the 
nuances too clearly, he at once gets an impression of un- 
steadiness and a lack of rh3rthm. 

Our singers especially have not sufficiently realised this 
as yet, — otherwise their performances would be more 
frequently satisfactory on the rhj^thmical side than they 
are at present. They are particularly at fault in their 
treatment of the cadences. They draw them out to ex- 
cessive length, and insist too much on even the most un- 
important transitional cadences, — which results in the 
arias bemg torn into separate fragments. The hearer 



* Examples of a very quick tempo will be found in the duet 
"Lass, Seele, keine Leiden", from Argredich Seele nicht (No. 186) 
and the arias "O Mensch, errette deine Seele", from O Ewigkeit, 
du Donnerwort (No. 20), and "Wirf mein Herze, wirf dich doch", 
from Mein GoU, xtne lang, ach lange (No. 155). The tempi of the 
Passions, the B minor Mass, and the Magnificat have been dis- 
cussed in connection with the analyses of these works. 

Schweitzer Bach. 11. 26 



402 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

with a sense of rh)rthm is nervously affected by this; as 
soon as he scents a cadence coming from afar he realises 
that the tempo will infallibly be slackened, that there will 
be a discrepancy between the voice and the accompanying 
instruments, that the orchestra will try to get back to the 
original tempo in the interludes, and that at the next ca- 
dence the game will begin all over again, and be repeated 
six or seven times before the aria comes to an end. 

The art of transition, of which Wagner speaks in one 
place, should be the ideal that every Bach singer should 
keep before him with regard to the tempo. Much will 
be attained if we can first of aU get rid of the mistaken 
notion that every cadence must be taken in a slower tempo. 
The next thing desirable is that where raUeniandi seem 
called for in the cadences, they should be applied circum- 
spectly and with moderation. The ensemble of singer and 
orchestra should never be in the slightest degree impaired. 
Many raUentandi that seem possible from the point of view 
of the vocal part are impossible to the orchestra. In this 
respect Bach's arias differ from those of the Italians. The 
orchestra with him does not merely accompany the singer; 
it is a separate entity; it cannot bow to the caprices of the 
singers. These must realise that they have to declaim 
their part expressively to a symphonic orchestral move- 
ment, and that the tempo must not vary very much, the 
effect being rather obtained by the finest nuances of tempo 
and rh3rthm. 

The tempo can be perceptibly varied where the verbal 
sense requires it. An excellent example of this is the so- 
prano aria "Ich folge dir gleichfalls", in the St. John 
Passion. Here the usual raUentandi are wrong, as they 
negate the joyous urgency of the music; the only justifiable 
raUentandi are those required by the words "Hore nicht 
auf , selbst an mir zu Ziehen, zu schieben, zu bitten" ("Cease 
not to draw near to me and pray"), — the music here 
depicting the effort of *T>ringing back". But to overdo this 
raUentando in the least is to endanger the effect of the aria. 



The Tempo. 403 

In Bach's arias it is advisable not to carry a raUmtando 
through to the end, but to lead imperceptibly into the 
normal tempo again at the conclusion of the cadence, so 
that when the orchestra enters with the interlude it has 
not to fall abruptly into another tempo. 

Practically these considerations all amount to this, that 
the customary stereot3^d raUentandi in Bach's music 
are bad, and that only those are justifiable that proceed 
from proper reflection upon the musical and poetical nature 
of the work. This implies that the conductor and the 
singer should come to an understanding as to the tempo 
and its variations, and the general conception of the work 
before, not at, the rehearsal. They must not shrink from 
long rehearsals and much correspondence; both will bear 
rich fruit. Every thoughtful conductor and singer knows, 
to his sorrow, that one of the greatest obstacles to a good 
performance of a Bach cantata or Passion is the too limited 
time devoted to the rehearsal of the solos. 

Our singers probably sin most against Bach's tempi 
in the recitatives; they take them much too slowly, and 
with "expression" in the bad sense of the term, slowing 
down at each word that they wish to throw into reUef, 
and introducing rallentandi in the cadences at the end of 
the subordinate sections, so that the hearer gets the im- 
pression only of a series of fragments, not of a connected 
whole. But if the singer aims simply at reproducing the 
verbal period as Bach has written it, he instinctively 
avoids any dragging, indulges in no senseless raUentandi, 
and tries to make his effect chiefly by means of the de- 
clamatory prominence of the most characteristic words. 
This or that section must be simg in a special tempo only 
when the sense of the text demands it ; and in these cases 
the art of transition must be called into play so as to pre- 
serve the general unity of the tempo. No improvement 
in the delivery of the recitatives is to be looked for until 
our singers see clearly that they must not so much be 
"sung" as "spoken" with a certain musical feeling. How 

26* 



404 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

far the average singer is from this ideal as yet may be seen 
from the way he renders the recitatives in the Passions. 
His drawling mode of delivery often prolongs the perform- 
ance by almost half an hour; but that is the least evil he 
works. Far worse than this is the fact that he is always 
**depicting" instead of narrating, wearies the audience with 
his false pathos, and neutralises the effect of the glorious 
occasional passages in which Bach has given the evan- 
gelist a situation to paint. It would be a good thing if 
our "Evangelists" would now and then recite from memory 
the story of the Passion ; this would save them from many 
of the stereotyped errors in the deh very of Bach's recitative. 
The ultimate reason for the unsatisfactory performance 
of the part of the Evangelist is very often the fact that 
the singer does not know the story of the Passion by heart. 
If Bach emplojrs two themes in a movement, the artistic 
problem is to ensure to each its proper tempo without 
destroying the unity of the general tempo. The charm and 
the difficulty of this problem may be realised from a study 
of the first chorus of Ihr werdet weinen und heulen (No. 103). 
There are many choruses in which Bach has expressly 
marked more tempi than one*. It goes without sa3ang 
that the middle section of the choruses and arias should 
be taken a shade faster or slower than the main sections, 
conformably to the sense of them. It is certain also that 
we can allot a special tempo to this or that segment of 
a passage; in the final chorus of Christen dtzet di&sen 
Tag (No. 63) Bach himself has marked the words "Aber 
niemals lass geschehen" adagio. Markings of this kind, 



* £. g., the first choruses of Der Himtnel lachi, die Erde fubi- 
lieriet (No. 31) — allegro, adagio, allegro — , and Jesu, nun set ge- 
preiset (No. 41), in which Bach has marked the two middle sec- 
tions adagio and presto. In the choruses of his youthful works 
he almost always prescribes more than one tempo, as in these can- 
tatas he is specially bent on composing the text line by line. In 
the analysis of the B minor Mass (p. 315) examples are given in 
which the tempo of a movement is the product of a contest be- 
tween two different motives. 



The Ornaments. 405 

however, give no warrant for the capricious rallentandi^ 
merely designed for effect, by which certain conductors 
think they lend an added interest to Bach's music, even 
in the chorales. 

Where Bach has sharply contrasted two motives in 
obedience to the poetic idea, it would be wrong to tone 
down the antithesis by passing gradually from the one 
tempo to the other. In the final aria with chorus 
of the cantata Halt itn Geddchtnis Jesum Christ (No. 67) 
a rallentando in the concluding bars of the passages that 
are constructed on the "tumult" motive must necessarily 
weaken the effect of the entry of the "peace" motive in 
the wind instruments; even a diminuendo is out of place 
here; the more abrupt the transition is the better*; the 
instrumental basses must still give out the last bar of 
their "tumult" motive forte even after the wind have en- 
tered piano. In the antiphonal cries, again, of the chorus, 
"Wohl uns" and "O Herr", there should be no gradual 
mediation between the two tempi. 

The question of ornaments presents no special difficulty 
with regard to the cantatas and Passions, since Bach 
almost always adopted the principle of writing out in full 
the complicated or even the simple ornaments. The signs 
he emplo3^ are to be interpreted in the light of the general 
principles laid down by Emmanuel, Quantz and Turk on 
this subject**. 

As a rule the trills are taken too quickly and irregularly. 
Our instrumentalists find a strange difficulty in entering 
into the spirit of Bach's style. It would be as well if the 
conductors would write out the signs in full in the orchestral 
parts. This would at any rate ensure a certain uniformity 
in the performance, which at present is sadly lacking^ 
in spite of all explanation. 



* On this aria see p. 192. 

** See the detailed exposition of Bach's ornamentation in 
I. 345 If. Rust discusses the ornaments of the cantatas in par- 
ticular in the Preface to B. G. VII. 



406 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

Too much importance camiot be attached to a simple 
and quiet rendering of the trills. The following mode 
of realisation may be suggested for the trills in the bass 
accompaniment to the aria "Mein teurer Heiknd" in 
the St, John Passion — 



l^p^y-^tffj 




Very often the context shows that the trill is best realised 
as a simple PraUtriUer; an example may be seen in the 
oboe duet in the aria "Sehet, Jesus hat die Hand", in the 
SL Matthew Passion. 

As many of the trills that Bach has marked are barely 
possible or quite impossible on the wood-wind of to-day, — 
and must have been even more so on the imperfect instru- 
ments of that period — Rust* conjectured that the sign t 
or /r in these cases signified a kind of tenido. This hypo- 
thesis can hardly be maintained. On closer examination 
we get the impression that by the trill sign Bach very fre- 
quently intended the single or double PralUriUer. In any 
case the acceptance of this view might solve many diffi- 
culties. 

As regards the realisation of the ornaments in the violin 
solo of the aria "Erbarme dich", in the St. Matthew Passion, 
it is first of all to be observed that the opening bars, ac- 
cording to the score and the parts, are not vnitten 



but 



Since in the vocal part of the aria **Was willst du dich, 
mein Geist, entsetzen'*, from Liebster Gott, wann wercT ich 
sterben (No. 8), the score has the sign a^^ and the voice part 
has the small notes, this realisation of the sign may pro- 





♦ Preface to B. G. VII. p. i8 it 



The Ornaments. 



407 



bably be regarded as authentic*. The only question is 
whether Bach meant this slur to be part of the beat, or 
to be r^arded as a portamento, outside the beat, between 
the F sharp and the D. The former is the more natural; 
but in the later part of the solo we meet with passages 
of this kind — 




in which the slur is written out; it is therefore a probable 
assumption, — and one that has been put forward by 
connoisseurs, — that Bach's notation in the opening bar 
implies another kind of slur, not included in the beat**. 
There ought to be little difficulty in coming to an agree- 
ment as to the difference between the long and the short 
Vorschlag in this movement ; the long Vorschldge are merely 
those that come before a dotted or undotted crotchet; all 
the rest are short. It goes without sa5nng that in each case 
the accent falls on the small note of the Vorschlag***. 

The appoggiatura, in the narrower sense of the term, 
gives unnecessary trouble to inexperienced singers. It 
is well known that in the vocal cadence Bach and his con- 
temporaries did not write the falling second or the falling 
fourth as such, but wrote the final note twice, or the 
equivalent of twice. The following recitative in the St. 
Matthew Passion — 




drei-mal^ver -leug-nen 



* The B. G. editors have made the mistake of printing the 
realisation in the text and the authentic sign in the Preface (p. 27), 
instead of vice versa. In the aria "Ach schlafrige Seele", from 
Mache dich, mein Geist, bereit (No. 115), and in other places, the 
B. G. edition rightly prints .w^. 

** Stockhausen, for example, held that the Bach slur must not 
always be included in the beat. Whether this opinion can be 
historically justified is doubtfuL 
*♦♦ See I. 348 ff. 



4o8 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

must therefore be sung thus — 

and the 



\y^ and tne ♦ ♦ k. 

0^1 ^ fc-fa^ ? foUowing iji ^. V O^ 

^' n/T ; •^-' passage ' — 



passage 

drei-mal Ter-leng-nen nicht al -^le - zeit 



thus — 




nicht al - le - zeit 



This method of notation, in which, as in the Hebrew 
**Q're-K'thib", we have to read something else than what 
is written, is explained by the reluctance of the old mu- 
sicians to write out retardations in full ; for the same reason 
they wrote the Vorschlag thus — 




instead of thus 



^ 



The laws of euphony were not extended to the eye. The 
appoggiatura in the narrower sense is therefore simply 
a matter of the three Vorschldge involved in a vocal cadence. 
It was not notated in the ordinary way, but omitted al- 
together, in order that the organist or cembalist, who had 
the voice part written out partially or in full above his 
figured bass, might not be put out by the retardation 
when he came to play his final chord. The terrors that 
this method of notation has for the laity vanish as soon as 
the reason for it is explained. 

It should be observed that nowadays it is not the custom 
to take every interval of a third in a vocal cadence as an 
appoggiatura, — by the mediation of the second. Julius 
Stockhausen, for example, very often disregarded the 
appoggiatura in a transitional cadence*. 



♦ I owe this information to Herr Theodor Ceroid, teacher of 
singing in Frankfort, who was associated for many 3rears with 
Stockhausen in his teaching work. 



The Ornaments. 409 

Many singers think it necessary to distinguish between 
two short VorsctUdge, — an accented and an unaccented 
one, i. e. one not taken in the beat. The authentic tradi- 
tions of the eighteenth century seem to give no warrant 
for this view; and practical experiment will show that the 
short accented Vorschlag is alwa}^ more natural in its effect 
than the unaccented one. 

It is still a matter for investigation whether the rule 
that the trill must begin with the subsidiary note holds 
good without exception in Bach's vocal music. The answer 
would probably be in the affirmative. In certain cases 
the trill commencing with the principal note may have 
a charm of its own; as a rule, however, we should render 
it in the traditional way more frequently than is the custom 
now. It is hardly credible that Bach conceived the vocal 
trill differently from the instrumental. Every singer is 
bound to be pleased with the result when he takes the triU 
in the correct way. A particularly good method is to pause 
slightly on the principal note before beginning the trill 
with the subordinate note, and then gradually increase 
the tempo; thus — 




On short notes the sign tr mostly indicates only a Prall- 
triller or double PralMriUet. 

For the dsmamics of Bach's vocal music the following 
works may be recommended for study : the secular cantatas 
SMeicht, spielende WeUen (B. G. XX«) and holder Tag 
(B. G. XXIX), and the church cantatas Ach ich sehe, 
jeizt da ich zur Hochzeit gehe (No. 162), Herz und Mund 
und Tai und Leben (No. 147), Mein Uehster Jesu ist ver- 
loren (No. 154), Schauet doch und sehet (No. 46), HerTy 
gehe nicM ins Gericht (No. 105), Liehster GoU, wann werd* 
ich sterben (No. 8), Ich bin vergnilgt mit meinem Glucke 
(No. 84), ChristiiSy der ist mein Leben (No. 95), Erfreut 



410 XXXV. The Perfonnanoe of the Cantatas and Passions. 

euch, ikr Herzen (No. 66), Am Abend aber desselbigen 
Sabbats (No. 42), Es wartd dUes auf dich (No. 187), SUsser 
Trost, mein Jesus kommi (No. 151), Liebster Jesu, mein 
Verlangen (No. 32), Ich dender Mensch (No. 48), Ich freue 
ffUch in dir (No. 133), Gelobet seist du (No. 91), Das neu- 
geborne Kindelein (No. 122). 

Among these movements are some in whic& Bach dis- 
tributes farte^ piano and pianissimo in the subtlest way, — 
e. g. the first chorus of Das neugeborne Kindelein (No. 122), 
and the arias in Ich freue mich in dir (No. 133) and Es 
warUt aUes auf dich (No. 187). As a rule, however, he is 
content with simple alternations of forte and piano. In 
the majority of the arias the nuances mean very .little, 
since the piano in the orchestral parts merely indicates 
the entry of the voice. Nevertheless it would be a mis- 
take to think that Bach wished for no more nuances than 
he has usually marked. Proof to the contrary may be 
had in the movements which he has liberally sprinkled 
with forUy piano and pianissimo. Moreover we must al- 
ways remember that he revised his parts only for his per- 
sonal use, not for publication or for performances by 
other people*. He relied principally on verbal directions. 
Nor must we forget that the singers and players, being con- 
stantly engaged in performing his works under his own 
direction, were intimately acquainted with his intentions, 
and would do the right thing of their own accord. 

These considerations determine our own course of action 
with regard to the parts in a performance. Whatever 
authentic marking exists must be attended to ; but beyond 
this we can venture upon many things which must not 
be regarded as unauthorised though they are not written 



* The scores contain no indications for phrasing and no dynamic 
marks; even the figuring of the conHnuo is omitted. How Bach 
marked the parts when it was a case of performance by some one 
else may be seen from the Kyrie and Gloria of the B minor Mass; 
the phrasing is indicated in the most precise way, while the d3aiamic8 
are merely suggested. 



The D3niainica. 41 1 

in the parts, for they correspond to what Bach would tell 
his players by word of mouth. The parts must accordingly 
be elucidated and explained. 

The nuances that Bach has marked must be carried 
out, as in the clavier works and the Brandenburg con- 
certos, with a certain abruptness. He loves the immediate 
antithesis of forU and piano \ generally speaking he does 
not provide for the transition of one into the other by 
means of a diminuendo or crescendo. This is especially 
true with regard to the arias. The orchestral preludes 
and interludes must be played in a solid forte\ at the entry 
of the voice the instruments suddenly pass into piano^ 
This abrupt transition cannot be successfully managed at 
the first attempt ; some practice in it is required. No con- 
ductor, however, will regret making the attempt to get 
his orchestra to enter into the spirit of the old tradition; 
moreover this is the best way of weaning the instrumen- 
talists from the false kind of raUentandi. It has the further 
advantage that a number of transitional bass figures, 
that were formerly lost in the diminuendo^ now make their 
proper effect. 

Among the peculiarities of Bach's djmamics, which can 
be studied in the parts that he has so carefully marked 
with nuances, are the echo effects. He often introduces, 
by way of contrast, two or three pianissimo bars where 
it would not occur to us to do so. At the first glance the 
device seems artificial and pedantic; but as many themes 
and passages are calculated on it, it is one of the most 
natural and most telling effects that we can introduce 
into the accompaniment of the arias. As has been al- 
ready mentioned, the players in Bach's time probably 
rendered these passages by slackening the hairs of the 
bow*. The curious change of timbre obtained in this 
way unfortunately cannot be obtained with the modem 
bow. 

OCC Xf 209* 



4X2 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

Bach gives us no indications as to the nuances he em- 
ployed in the arias after the entry of the voice. He would 
regard this as belonging to the province of correct declama- 
tion. He would certainly permit every cr&scendo and di- 
minuendo that was needed to give expression to the words. 
All nuances, therefore, that have a natural musical or 
poetical justification may be regarded as not only per- 
missible but necessary. From the character of Bach's 
music it is clear that nothing could be more odious to him 
than a Ufeless delivery of an aria. The more dramatically 
it can be sung the better. Even the purely lyrical move- 
ments in the cantatas gain in performance by the infusion 
of a certain inward vivacity. 

In proportion, however, as the singer attains to a more 
profound conception of the text will he adopt a simple 
style of performance. Many an effect that he thought 
fine at first will come to seem bad and factitious as he 
understands the music better. 

If the singer articulates clearly and declaims with natural 
feeling, and the instrumentalists — even when they are 
pla3nng piano — put life into their phrasing and accentua- 
tion, the dynamic problem solves itself. It will be observed 
that in Bach the question is generally not one of long 
periods of crescendo and diminuendo, but of throwing 
single words into high relief, — notwithstanding that 
examples can be adduced in which the guiding idea of the 
music has apparently been an increase or decrease of tone. 

Perhaps it is not superfluous to remind singers that 
it is always bad to force the voice in performing Bach. 

Good Bach singers are comparatively rare. The majority 
fail because they lack the necessary technical foimdation. 
Their conception maybe right, but tiieir voices are not fully 
obedient to them. The often-repeated opinion that Bach's 
works do not need the bel canto is utterly false. They 
need this — but something more as well. It would be well 
for every Bach singer to devote some time to acquiring 
the lightness that is aimed at in the Italian and French 



Singing and Declamation. 413 

schools, for which an acquaintance with good Italian vocal 
music is indispensable. It must not be forgotten that Bach 
formed himself on the Italian style of singing, and pre- 
supposes this in his music. Present-day singers, as a rule, 
perform it too heavily. 

To this external art of singing has to be added the other 
art of natural poetic declamation, that is so necessary in 
German music. Bach's coloratura has really hardly any- 
thing in common with that of the Italians. It is not an 
end in itself, but the servant of the declamation, — which 
makes it harder, not easier. The singer must be superior 
to every technical difficulty if he is to render the runs 
simply and with a certain naturalness that is indispensable 
to their proper effect, — for they should not impress us 
as coloratura but as fine enunciation. In passages of this 
kind a certain urgency of tempo is preferable to dragging. 

The directness of delivery that suits Bach's music so 
well really demands a perfect technique. Few of our 
singers, apparently, realise the mischief done by inappro- 
priate crescendi, or they would not prolong so unnaturally 
and embellish as they do every sustained note, even the 
shortest. In Bach's arias and recitatives we should not 
be conscious of the art of singing as such, no matter how 
indispensable it may be ; on the contrary the singing should 
be fresh, ingenuous, and "youthful" in the best sense of 
the word. It should not be forgotten that the parts were 
written, without exception, for bojrs and very young 
singers. Bach's style was naturally influenced by the 
fact that these were the only interpreters he had at his 
disposal. 

The feminine delicacy with which very many of our 
singers render the arias is therefore foreign to Bach's 
ideas, and does harm to his music. It is to be hoped that 
a time will come when more attention will be paid than at 
present to the natural lightness of the boy's voice, and 
more use made of boy singers in performances of Bach. 
We shaU then probably find that the current prejudice 



414 XXXV. The Perfonnaiice of the Cantatas and Passions. 

as to the inexpressiveness of a boy's singing is not justified. 
Has not every musician discovered from his own experience 
that his artistic sensibility developed in an extraordinary 
way from his twelfth to his fifteenth year, and that later 
on he had to acquire afresh what at that time came naturally 
to him? Why should bojrs at that age merely play the 
piano well? Why should they not achieve something in 
the much more natural art of song? Every one who has 
studied Bach's scores carefully knows that there are many 
movements in them that can never be fully effective except 
with the freshness and the tifnbre of the boy's voice. Per- 
haps the day will come when we shall once more hear the 
soprano cantata Jauchzet Gctt in alien Landen (No. 51) 
again sung by the fresh voice of a boy. 

That beautiful bo}^' voices are the ideal for the Bach 
choruses will not be disputed by anyone who has heard 
a good boys' choir in one of the cantatas. Schreck has 
shown, with the St. Thomas boys of today, what can be 
done with an ensemble of this kind. The advantages 
of the boys' choir are the natural ease of the voices in the 
higher register, the clarity of the Hmbre of the soprano 
and alto, and, above all, the homogeneity of the voices 
as a whole. The glorious outlines of Bach's alto parts 
cannot be followed properly except in a boys' choir. 

The difficulties of getting boys to perform Bach must 
not be overrated. The easier cantatas can be given by 
any good college choir after careful rehearsal. Certain of 
the secular cantatas, such as Der zufriedengesklUe JEolus 
seem to be written for a choir of this kind. Perhaps the 
practice of Bach's works will bring about a new era in 
the rather sorry state of singing in our high schools. 

The conductor who has a few good boys' voices in his 
choir should use them to support the women's voices. 
It cannot be too strongly urged that the cantus firmus 
of the chorales, — even in the chorale arias — should al- 
ways be sung by boys. Anyone who has heard boy so- 
pranos in the introductory choruses of the chorale cantatas 



The Employment of Boys' Voices. 415 

can hardly imagine them again without these. Not many 
voices are required; half a dozen of them, together with 
the women's voices, are sufficient to bring out the melody 
in broad, plastic lines. 

Boys' voices are very effective, again, in the canti 
fermi of the final chorales. There need be no fear that 
they will impair the fineness of the expression here, as will 
be evident to anyone who makes the experiment rationally. 
On the contrary it is a matter • for wonder that we have 
been so long satisfied to have the chorale melodies sung 
by women's voices, that lack the full, penetrating, "ob- 
jective" tone that is here required. 

There is still considerable difference of opinion as to 
the best way of rendering the final chorales. One view 
is that they should be given a cappella, without the accom^ 
paniment for strings and oboes that Bach has indicated 
or presupposed — to which the flutes and even the brass 
may sometimes be added. It is urged that Bach's purpose 
was merely to support his rather inefficient singers, and 
that our large modem well-trained choirs can dispense 
with this assistance. It would be a pity if this view should 
gain ground. There is a great danger in the a cafpeUa 
performance of the chorales by a large choir; it is very 
easy to achieve falsity by exaggerating the d3mamic shad- 
ings. It is indisputable that a great effect can be made 
on an audience by four hundred voices deUvering one line 
of a chorale fortissimo and the next in a hardly audible 
pianissimo \ but it is almost equally indisputable that 
this is not the right way. The simple and beautiful out- 
lines of the chorale melody are lost in these mighty crescendi 
and decrescendi, the raUentandi that they almost of necessity 
bring with them, and the long holding of the fermate for 
the sake of effect. We lose the sense of the chorale as 
a whole, and only perceive the fragments. What should 
we say if any other simple melody were sung by a chorus 
in the same coarsely effective style? Yet it is permitted 
in chorales which are not only simple but full of piety! 



4l6 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

For these exaggerated nuances we should substitute 
a simple but impressive declamation, studiously avoiding 
anything like sentimentality or excitement. The choir 
should almost speak rather than sing, the dynamic shad- 
ings being obtained, as it were, within a gamut of a sharply 
defined recitation; care should be had with regard to the 
endings of words and of sentences; the fermaU should 
be no more than natural breath-pauses, short or long as 
the sense of the line requires; this method will bring us 
nearer artistic truth than the present style. If after this 
the chorale does not affect the audience, it will at all events 
give it a deeper artistic conception of the nature of the 
sacred melody. 

In a performance of this kind the instnmients are neither 
a hindrance nor a superfluity, but a necessity*. They 
afford a golden background for the declamation; they 
work out the melodic outlines and permit the voices to 
attend almost exclusively to the clear delivery of the text. 
It should be noted that the harmonies in Bach's chorale 
movements aim not so much at large d3mamic effects as 
at bringing out separate words and syllables. The enun- 
ciation of our large choirs in pianissimo passages is often 
very defective, the audience hearing neither singing nor 
speaking, but only a confused murmur, — which cannot 
be agreeable even to an uncritical hearer. 

These views must not be taken to mean that under no 
circumstances must the chorales be simg a cappella by large 
or small choirs ; there are occasions when it would be wrong 
to throw away the opportunities thus afforded for a striking 
effect. Each case of the kind, however, should be able 
to show its own justification. For the rest, we should 



♦ The instruments must co-operate in places where they are 
not prescribed in the B. G. edition. If they are not indicated in 
the chorale, this simply means that the parts of the cantata are 
lost. Bach comparatively rarely marks the instrumentation of 
the final chorale in the score, and does not even take the trouble 
to write the text in there, often inserting no more than the first line. 



The Choir in general. 417 

never approa<:h the problem of the performance of Bach's 
music in a narrow-minded spirit. 

It is often debated whether large choirs are an advantage 
in the cantatas and Passions. It is hardly possible to give an 
unequivocal answer. It is obvious that Bach's music, 
with its compUcated polyphony, does not aim at the same 
massive effects as Handel's. It would even be easy to 
name a number of works that for purely external reasons 
call for a choir of only moderate dimensions, — the can- 
tatas, that is to say, in which Bach employs a solo violin 
or solo oboe with the chorus. In other works, internal 
considerations forbid the use of a large choir; by their very 
essence they are a kind of sacred chamber music. The 
works in which Bach wrote simply for the choir usually 
at his service — with three or four voices to a part, — 
are really much more numerous than is generally sup- 
posed. Further it must be acknowledged that even Bach's 
largest and most powerful choruses are extremely effective 
with a small choir of really good voices — say six or eight 
to a part. Julius Stockhausen's experiences in this way 
with a choir of his pupils, in the St. John Passion^ are ex- 
tremely encouraging. The desire to hear Bach's works 
more frequently with the "original equipment" is there- 
fore well justified. It is certain that his polyphony shows 
to the best advantage under these conditions. 

On the other hand it would be a mistake to deny that 
there is some reason in, and some justification for, our 
large choirs, to which we have become so accustomed, 
and which are often called for by the size of the building 
in which we are giving Bach's work. Bach indeed never 
dreamed of a performance of the Gloria^ the Et resunexit 
and the Osanna of his B minor Mass by three or four 
hundred singers; nevertheless we may venture to perform 
them in this way, and it has been done successfully. We 
ought to recognise, however, that it is all a matter of 
chance. Even with a choir of hundred and fifty voices 
there is a danger of the lines of the vocal polyphony 

Schweitzer, Bach. II. 27 



41 8 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

coming out too thickly and heavily in a way directly opposed 
to the nature of Bach's music. Audience and conductors 
often show, in this regard, a happy simplicity and modesty. 
They are satisfied with choral performances that are 
really more like a confused din than the polyphony of Bach, 
and that have not even the saving grace of mechanical 
precision. Siegfried Ochs has conclusively shown that 
this danger can be avoided, and that the same clarity, 
precision and delicacy can be obtained with large choirs 
as with small. In this respect the performances of the 
Berlin Philharmonic are an event in the history of Bach 
interpretation. 

With our large choirs, the dsmamic nuances necessarily 
seem more sharply defined than in performances on the 
scale of those of Bach himself. In reality, only the broad 
and simple dynamic plans can come out. The conductor 
discovers, in the case of almost every work, that when 
the orchestra and organ enter he has to resign himself 
to the loss of many interesting nuances that he had set 
his heart on at rehearsal. In the choruses, as in the chorales, 
the range of dynamic possibilities is finally limited by 
the vivacity of the declamation. Opportunities for the 
usual big crescendi and decrescendi are not too plentiful. 
There is no excuse, however, for introducing nuances for 
the mere sake of variety. On the other hand the more we 
work at Bach the more convinced we become of the impor- 
tance of dear enunciation, down even to the finest detail. 

A certain martellaio — used with discretion and in modera- 
tion — is very effective in the coloraiure, as it brings them 
out more clearly than the customary strict legato, in which 
the successive notes flow smoothly one into the other. 
The least exaggeration, however, is bad. 

If the choir can declaim well, and -the orchestra phrase 
and accent well, the hearer will feel no desire for a number 
of pronounced d3mamic shadings. The leading of the 
voices, if it be sufficiently spirited, compensates for every- 
thing; the piling-up of the parts produces a crescendo^ 



The Choir in general. 419 

and a natural decrescendo comes as they diminish in number. 
False nuances frequently have no other effect than to ob- 
scure for the hearer the natural d3mamic impression that 
Bach's polyphony ought to give him. Special care must 
be taken not to pursue any dynamic chimaeras in the 
opening choruses of the chorale cantatas. 

Bach gives hardly any direct d3mamic instructions in 
his choruses. Valuable hints for forte and piano can be 
had, however, from a consideration of the instrumental 
parts. If the full orchestra co-operates, the movement 
is usually meant to be taken forte; if this wholly or partially 
ceases, the movement is generally intended to be piano. 
As a rule the greater crescendo and diminuendo, which we 
are indined to get d3mamically, are produced by Bach by 
adding or subtracting instruments, — i. e., by increasing 
or diminishing the number of obbUgato parts. This fact 
is of great importance for the proper interpretation of 
his scores. 

In the cantatas Bach often uses, as in the Brandenburg 
concertos, di JuUi and a solo ensem ble, not only in the 
or chestra but in the cho rus. As a rule he would say verbally 
when the r ipieno pla yers* were to enter or leave off. For- 
tunately, however, some indications of this kind are found 
in the parts. He desires the alternation of the solo and 
the tuUiy for example, in the opening choruses of Die 
Himmel erzdhlen (No. 76), Ich glaube, liebet Herr (No. 109), 
and GoU ist mein Kdnig (No. 71); in the chorus "Was be- 
triibst du dich" from Ich hatte viel BekHmmernis (No. 21); 
and in the chorus "Alles nun, was ihr wbllP from Etnunge- 
fdrht GemMe (No. 24). For the first chorus of Unset Mund 
sei voll Lachens (No. no) he even writes out special ripieno 
vocal parts. If he thus worked with two tonal masses 
with the small choirs he had at his disposal, how much 
more would he have done so with the large choirs we 
have today! 



* For the explanation of this term see I, 124. 

27* 






420 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

The piano and forte obtained by stronger or softer 
singing can never replace those resulting from the increase 
or diminution of the number of voices. The latter means 
is the more natural one where the effect desired is not 
one of transition, but of the contrast of tonal degrees. 
It achieves this excellently; the leading of the voices 
comes out much more clearly in a piano of a small choir 
singing with moderate force than in the sustained pianissimo 
of a large choir, where indeed it is often far from distinct. 
Bach aims at effects of this kind. Why do we always 
fight shy of them? In any case there is one thing we should 
insist upon, — that in the middle movements of the choruses, 
where the instruments are silent, only a portion of the 
choir shall sing. The effects to be made in the fugues by 
means of successive increases of the number of voices at 
decisive entries, and in the lyrical choruses, such as those 
of Du Hirte Israel (No. 104) and Liebster Immanuel (N0.123), 
by means of the alternation of various choral masses, 
and the effect of shadings of this kind in the large choruses 
of the festival cantatas — all this offers a rich field for 
interesting experiment. 

The absurdities that follow from the continual em- 
ployment of a large chorus in the Passions have already 
been mentioned.* In the chorales the best effect is often 
obtained by the use of some thirty or forty good voices. 

On the other hand it may be argued that not all the 
movements which we regard as solo numbers were allotted 
to soloists by Bach himself. For him solo singing and choral 
singing passed over into each other in a way to which there 
is no parallel now. We must remember that his choristers 
were soloists, and his soloists choristers. The best of them 
were skilful in coloratura. Perhaps it is not too hazardous 
a view to take that, as bo3^' voices blend so well, he did 
not scruple to have solos sung by two, and if necessary 
three, of his choristers. We sometimes wonder how he 

♦ See p. 213. 



The Orchestration. 421 

could orchestrate an aria or a duet in such a way that 
the best singers cannot hold their own against the orchestra*. 
Is the solution of the enigma to be found, perhaps, in the 
doubling of the solo voices? Anyone who has happened 
to hear boys' voices in a church, without seeing the singers, 
will have observed that it is almost impossible to say 
whether solo passages are being taken by one or two voices. 
Voigt rightly remarks, when discussing, from the practical 
standpoint, the possibility of allotting the solo numbers 
to more than one voice, that Bach's solos "do not express 
individual sentiments, as opposed to the general sentiments 
of the chorus", and that "they should not be allotted to 
definite individual singers"**. 

It will not be denied that the opening duet of the Easier 
Oratorio (B. G. XXI*) presupposes a choral performance; 
that a number of simple duets and trios in the latest can* 
tatas give one the same impression, and are certainly more 
effective when sung by several voices, has already been 
argued in connection with the discussion of these works***. 

The understanding of the scores is of tlie greatest im- 
portance for the orchestral parts. The piano in the in- 
strumental parts of the arias not only means that at the 
entry of the voice the orchestra is to play softly, but that 
the ripieno also has to cease. Thus the instrumental piano 
also is obtained by a diminution of the number of the players. 



* Who can boast that he has ever heard the opening duet of 
O Ewigkeitt du Donnerwort (No. 60) even fairly well done ? A 
glance at the score shows that it can never be sung properly by any 
two voices, even those of the best singers. 

** W. Voigt, Erfahrungen und Ratschldge beMUglich der Auf- 
fUhrung Bachsch&r KirchenkaniaUn, in the Bachfahrbuch for 1906, 
pp. I — ^42. 

*** See, for example, the simple but splendid duets and trios in 
the cantatas Allein su dir, Herr Jesu Christ (No. 33); Ai4s tiefer 
Not (No. 38); Du FnedefUfsU Herr Jesu Christ (No. 116); Gott 
der Herr ist Sonn' und Schild (No. 79) ; Meinen Jesum lass ich 
nicht (No. 124); Mit Fried' und Freud' fakr* ich dahin (No. 125); 
Meine Seel* erhebt den Herren (No. 10); Herr Jesu Christ, du hochstes 
Gut (No. 113); Jesu, der du nteine Seele (No. 78). 



422 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

This nattiral use of the tuUi — for the preludes and inter- 
ludes — and the Senza Ripieni — for the accompaniment 
to the voice — is coming slowly into acceptance. It is 
beginning to be recognised how much more effective is 
the piano obtained by the use of a few instruments as 
compared with the pianissimo plajdng of a larger number. 
It carries better; it is capable of more modulation; the 
leading of the voices is quite clear. As there is no need 
to play pianissimo^ — a normal tone-strength being all 
that is required — we can get better phrasing and ac- 
centuation; the nuances also can be made more pro- 
nounced. At first this kind of accompaniment strikes the 
hearer as curiously thin; he soon becomes accustomed to 
it, however, and is pleased to have lost his perpetual fear 
that the voice is about to be submerged by the orchestra. 

In the halls in which we are accustomed to perform 
Bach, however, it is not advisable to employ too few 
instruments. For string accompaniments the following 
will be found best as a rule — two desks for the first and 
second violins and violas, and one desk each for the cellos 
and double basses*. In the accompaniment of a recitative 
in Ich Hebe den Hochsten (No. 174) Bach prescribes three 
string instruments to each part. 

The piano, however, does not merely signify that the 
ripieno instruments concerned are to cease; it refers also 
to the instruments in the tuUi that have been pla3dng 
the same parts. In the opening number and in the duet 
"Ich hab' vor mir ein' schwere Reis'", Irom Ach Gott, 
wie manches Herzeleid (No. 58), the three oboes, in the 
tuUi passages, play with the strings ; in the passages where 
the voice enters they are marked facet, the strings alone 



* At a very interesting performance of the Si. Matthew Passion 
in the cathedral at Basel, in 1906, I observed that many of the 
instrumental parts did not come out, there being too few desks 
of them for the space ; this was especially noticeable in the accom- 
paniment to the music of Jesus. In other passages, however, the 
advantages of the principle were fully manifested. 



The Orchestration. 423 

accompan3dng ; the third oboe goes to the support of the 
soprano, which sings a chorale. There is a similar case 
in the alto aria in SUsser Trosty mein Jesus komnU 
(No. 151). This is accompanied by the oboe d*amore; in 
the tuUi passages, however, this part is played by the 
whole of the violins and violas. In the first chorus of 
Was frag* ich nach der WeU (No. 94), Bach, in order to 
get certain echo effects, sometimes makes the oboes play 
with the violins, and sometimes silences them. 

It is a mere accident that these indications have come 
down to us; Bach has for once entered in the parts the 
instructions he was accustomed to give by word of mouth. 
In arias in which the oboes and violins play in unison, 
piano probably often means that either the wind or the 
strings are to cease. This rule may be tested in the can- 
tatas Ich will den Kreuzstab gerne tragen (No. 56) and 
Ich armer Mensch, ich SiindenknecM (No. 57), in the open- 
ing numbers of which, according to the Bachgesellschaft 
editions, the oboes should play from beginning to end 
with the strings, whereas, as a matter of fact, the voices 
ought probably to be accompanied only by the strings 
or only by the wind, or by the one or the other in turns. 

In the aria "Sanfte soil mein Todeskummer'*, from the 
Easter Oratorio (B.G. XXI') the violins are doubled by 
the fkUes d bee in the octave. It is more than doubtful, 
however, whether Bach had the flutes played throughout, 
or whether they ceased in the accompaniment to the voices. 

The fact that the parts of the instruments that merely 
double others in the tutti are written out in full is only 
an apparent contradiction of the views here advanced. 
The obbligato parts were copied out ; the conductor would 
say to what extent the instrument in question was to play 
from them. It was only in rare cases that separate parts 
were made for the ripieno instruments. 

The false conclusions to which we can be led by a literal 
following of the score and its markings may be seen in 
.connection with the bassoon. ^\, the beginning of on^ 



424 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

cantata is a note to the effect that the bassoon is to play 
with the cellos. To do this throughout the movement 
would be a gross error; it merely means that the bassoon 
must co-operate in the chorus, and now and then in the 
tuiti of a strongly scored aria. 

On the other hand the absence of any indication as to 
the co-operation of the bassoon does not imply that we are 
not to employ it to strengthen the basses, at any rate in 
the choruses. In the majority of choruses it is really 
essential; and if the choir is a large one it is as well to em- 
ploy not merely one but two or three bassoons. It should 
even be used in the iutti passages of the aha where it will 
be effective, — at any rate wherever the violins and violas 
are reinforced by the wood-wind. 

We may venture upon still other courses that are not 
indicated either in the score or in the parts, but which 
were probably pursued by Bach himself. We must con- 
sider the circumstances at the performances in St. Thomas's. 
It was a case of doing with the smallest possible number 
of written parts; even in the choruses there was usually 
only one copy for each vocal part. The instrumentalists 
mostly played standing ; they half knew their parts by heart. 
Thus it was quite practicable for other instruments to play 
at times from the same part in the tutti of the arias. 

When the Bachgesellschaft edition indicates an oboe 
accompaniment to an aria, this does not alwajrs imply 
that the part is to be played by merely one oboe from 
beginning to end. We may be sure that when Bach had 
one or two oboes at his disposal he did not let them remain 
idle, but made them join in the iutti when he came to a 
vigorous theme. Nor is it unlikely that he supported the 
oboe with two or more string instruments, which would 
play in the Uttti from the same part. 

Even these historical considerations are unnecessary; 
often the music itself shows that in the hUti of the arias 
that were accompanied by the wind, the *'solo instru- 
ments" were either doubled, or supported by strings, or 



The Orchestration. 425 

both. We cannot help feeling it to be ridiculous when a 
bold and proud theme is suggested, rather than actually 
given out, by a single oboe or flute. Every assistance is 
permissible, and indeed imperative, that makes the ob- 
bligato part more effective, — for it is of the part, not 
the instrument, that Bach thinks in the first place. 

Two oboes are prescribed for the instrumental duet 
that accompanies the chorale aria ^^Und was der ewig giit'ge 
Gott", in Wahrlichy ich sage euch (No. 86); but even the 
best pla3^rs cannot perform these haughty runs in such a 
way that the introduction has its desired effect. For the 
UiUi, therefore, we must double the oboes and add the 
whole of the violins. It is to be observed that in many 
themes that are marked for oboes alone, the phrasing is 
so string-like in quality that the right grouping and accent- 
uation of the notes are quite impossible without the co- 
operation of the violins. Thus in the tutti passages of the 
opening numbers of Sie werden euch in den Bann tun 
(No. 44) and the first aria oijesu, nun set gepreiset (No. 41), 
for example, we may add the strings in the oboe duet 
and the oboe trio*. It is frequently necessary to add the 
strings in the UUH passages even in an aria for solo oboe. 

How much has to be added to the received scoring may 
be seen from the arias in which, according to Bach's score, 
the oboes are to play with the first and second violins. 
We may reasonably wonder why he leaves the violas 
without the support of the taille, which, with Bach, takes 
the place of the third oboe. He, however, would have 
wondered that anyone should think him capable of such 
an inconsistency; he presupposes, indeed, the co-operation 
of the taille in just the same way as that of the oboes; 



* Another case that justifies the support of the oboe by the 
strings is the chorale aria "Valet will ich dir geben", in Christus, 
der ist mein Leben (No. 95). It should be mentioned, too, that 
in large halls the strings may also be sometimes used to advantage 
with the oboes in the vocal accompaniments, when there is no 
danger of the voice being drowned. 



426 XXXV. The Perfonnance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

the only difference is that his marking calls for the writ- 
ing of special oboe parts, whereas the taille was played from 
the viola part. Or else ... at that time, to his sorrow, 
he had no third oboist. 

If the theme requires it, the solo flute should be supported 
in the tuUi passages by the oboe or the violins, or by both 
together. Perhaps the best example of the necessity of 
this rule is the aria "Lass, o Fiirst der Cherubinen", from 
Hen GoU, dich loben alle wir (No. 130). 

It is very frequently desirable to strengthen the oboes 
by the flutes. The fact that both instruments played 
from the same part* in the cantata Jesus schldfty was soil 
ich hoffen (No. 81) makes it practically certain that where 
Bach writes flutes he intends the oboes also to play, and 
vice versd. The first and last arias sound particularly 
well in this arrangement. 

The employment of flutes in the oboe accompaniments 
to choruses — sometimes an octave higher — cannot be 
too strongly recommended; this is often the only means 
of ensuring that the oboe shall be really heard. It has 
already been said, in coimection with the Passions, that 
the flutes themselves must sometimes be reinforced by 
the piccolo if their runs are to come out clearly. 

We ought not to shrink from any combination of in- 
struments that will bring out the obbUgato parts properly; 
these combinations are all to be found in Bach's scores. 
In the opening chorus of Herr^ gehe nicfU ins Gerichi (N0.105) 
he even adds the horn to the first oboe in order to make 
the latter part stand out better. 

Perhaps it is even justifiable to try the experiment of 
allotting the violin soli in certain movements to two or 
more desks in the tutti. Bach's reason for marking a 
movement "solo violin" was frequently simply this, — 
that the part was much too difficult for his ordinary players. 



* See the acute remark? of Ru^t ip the Prei^jce to B. G. X^^, 
p. 14. 



The Orchestration. 427 

As our orchestras contain many violinists with a techni- 
que sufficient for the solo, Bach himself, in these circum- 
stances, would probably be the first to give the part to 
a number of the players in the tuUi passages, when the 
themes are of a powerful nature. This experiment should 
be tried sometimes with the Laudamus te of the B minor 
Mass. 

The question as to whether the foregoing proposals can 
be adopted must be decided anew for each individual 
case. There are UdU in which any reinforcement of the 
solo instrument would be a flagrant error, many parts 
being conceived so absolutely in terms of the flute or the 
oboe that the whole effect would be ruined by the addition 
of any other instrument. It wiU seldom do harm, how- 
ever, to double the instruments. 

The indispensable pre-requisite, however, is the recogni- 
tion of the fundamental fact that a conductor must inter- 
pret a Bach score discreetly and moderately. No one 
who knows how Bach's works have come down to us will 
raise much objection to the principle. Bach wrote obbUgato 
parts, not parts for particular instruments. The subjec- 
tivity of the instrument only slightly influences his writ- 
ing. He does not orchestrate in the modem way, but 
just as he registers on the organ; what he has in view is 
the particular timbre. No violence is done to his inten- 
tion, however, when this timbre is simply made more effec- 
tive by means of the occasional co-operation of other in- 
struments. We must remember that many scores have 
come down to us without any indication as to the orchestra- 
tion. If in these cases the parts are lost, the realisation 
of the score is sometimes puzzling even to a Bach expert. 



* This is speaking broadly; the necessary qualifications of 
the statement, through which alone it can be rightly understood, 
will be self-evident to every one who knows the scores. To others 
it would be of no use to mention them, for this would necessitate 
the enumeration of many examples, the bearing of which would 
not be understood. 



428 XXXV. The Performaiice of the Cantatas and Passions. 

Nor must we think that when Bach repeated a cantata 
he did not sometimes substitute one solo instrument for 
another. Frequently circumstances would compel him to 
do so. What else could he do when he had, say, no good 
flute player, and the cantata he was repeating had a difficult 
solo for that instrument? In his memorial of 1730 he 
says that at times he had neither a third trumpet, nor 
a third oboe, nor a flutist, nor a viola player, nor a cellist^ 
nor a contrabassist, nor sufficient violinists, and that for 
the bassoon he had to call upon a member of the town 
band I* 

The foregoing suggestions, therefore, do not open the 
door to caprice, but simply indicate that we should deal 
with the instrumental parts just in the way that Bach 
himself would have done had he had sufficient space and 
competent players. Many justifiable complaints as to the 
poor effect of Bach's music will cease when once we have 
got rid of the mistaken notion that the few orchestral 
parts that have been transmitted to us give a correct idea 
of the performance Bach had in his mind, and that we 
must keep strictly to these if we wish to be right. The 
nature and the extent of the freedom we can import into 
our interpretations are not to be settled by theories, but 
by repeated experiments. "Whatever sounds well and is 
impressive, and does not aim merely at external effect, 
has always some kind of artistic justification. 

When once the hearer has become used to the ordinary 
Bach orchestra of the cantatas it gives him undisturbed 
pleasure. The metallic clang that results from the con- 
tinual co-operation of wood-wind and strings soon becomes 
so agreeable to him that he cannot dispense with it. A 
good example of splendid orchestration is the cantata 
Liebster Immanuel (No. 123), the introductory chorus of 
which is accompanied by two flutes, two oboi d'amore, 
and strings. 



* See I, 134, and Spitta II, 264 if. 



Bach's Orchestra. 429 

If this simple orchestra does not suffice, Bach strength^is 
the wind. In the first chorus of Wie schdn leuckP uns der 
Morgenstern (No. i) he adds two horns to the two oboes, 
the two concertante violins and the remaining strings; 
in the opening chorus of the cantata Es ist nichis Gesundes 
an meinem Leihe (No. 25) a choir of four brass wind and 
three flutes gives out a chorale to the accompaniment of 
the strings and oboes; in the cantata Lobe den Herm 
(No. 143) he adds three horns to his orchestra. 

His festival orchestra was distinguished from the ordinary 
one by the addition to the strings and wood-wind of four 
trumpets. The instrumentation of Preise Jerusalem 
(No. 119) is typical, — four trumpets, two flutes, three 
oboes, and three strings. 

Bach's fondness for the wind is particularly shown in 
his accompaniments to the solos. For the first two num- 
bers of the cantata Er rufet seinen Schafen. (No. 175) he 
employs three flutes; the instrumental part of the bass 
aria is played by two tnmipets. A recitative in the cantata 
Sie werden euch in den Bann tun (No. 183; second com- 
position) is accompanied by two oboi da caccia and two 
oboi d*amore. In the first aria of Hen GoU, dich loben 
alle wir (No. 130), and in the aria "HeiMgste Dreieinig- 
keit" from ErschaUet, ihr Lieder (No. 172), the voice has 
to struggle against three trumpets and the kettledrum; 
a recitative in Preise Jerusalem (No. 119) is accompanied 
by kettlednmi, four trumpets, two flutes and two oboes; 
in the aria "Ach, es bleibt in meiner Liebe", from Du 
soUst GoU deinen Herm (No. 77), Bach is satisfied with 
one trumpet. His fondness for clangorous sound is shewn 
again by the fact that in a number of motet-choruses he 
doubles the voices with the brass*. 

Bach proceeds upon the basis of the old town band, so 
that many of the instruments he uses are no longer known 
to us today. This raises the question of the necessity of 

♦ See p. 299. 



430 XXXV. The PterfonnaDce of the Cantatas and Passions. 

rearranging his scores. Can we perform them as they are 
written, or is it better to touch them up in such a way as 
to get the effects and timbres he wanted by a certain amount 
of modem re-instrumentation? 

The modem orchestra has developed from the old by 
a process of selection. From each orchestral group, — 
strings, wood, and brass, — there have fallen out a number 
of "intermediate" instruments. Only the ones that were 
most perfect and capable of the most varied uses have 
stood their ground. People gave up the idea of having the 
same instrument in all possible registers and qualities. 
This reform, which at the same time implies a certain 
impoverishment, came from the ItaUans. Bach, although 
he was contemporary with this reform, ignored it. He 
employed instruments that were already becoming obsolete 
in his own day. Handel wrote for what was then the mod- 
em and more simplified orchestra. The brass instruments 
were naturally most affected by the reform ; but a number 
of string instruments also fell into disuse. Bach still uses 
the violino piccolo, a small Quartgeige (three-quarter 
violin) ; he makes it play in octaves with the ordinary violin. 
It plajrs a special rdle in the cantata Herr Christ, der eirCge 
Gottes Sohn (No. 96), in which it has an obbUgato part 
in conjunction with the piccolo flute. 

The gamba, which Bach employs in the Passions, is a 
six-stringed instrument, occupying a place between the 
cello and the viola; the viola d'amore, which he uses 
in the 5/. John Passion, somewhat resembles the viola. 
It had seven strings; under the gut strings touched 
by the bow, — the three deepest being overlaid with 
metal — were seven metal strings which increased the 
resonance; these gave the instrument its peculiarly 
beautiful timbre. 

The larger string instruments gave Bach a lot of trouble. 
Our contrabass as yet did not exist. The violone and the 
violone grosso, which he sometimes used in large choruses, 
were so imperfect that it was impossible to play his bass 



The Strings. 43 1 

runs on them*. The player was content to perform the 
principal notes, leaving the remainder to the celli and the 
other string instruments that co-operated an octave higher — 
the viola pomposa**, invented by Bach, and the violoncello 
piccolo. In the cantatas of Bach's later period he often 
gives solo passages to the latter instrument***. 

What is the bearing of these facts on modem perform- 
ances? The viola pomposa and the violoncello piccolo can 
easily be dispensed with. Bach employed them to bring 
out the bass more clearly. This can be done in other 
ways; it is partly secured, indeed, by the perfection to 
wluch the contrabass has now been brought. The violon- 
cello piccolo solos can be played by any good cellist on his 
own instrument; when necessary they can be divided 
between the cello and the viola. The loss of the viola 
d'amore is felt as a misfortune only in the 5^. John Passion. 



" * Bach's violone could not play such basses, for example, as 
those in the first chorus of Set Lob und Ehr* dem hochsten Gut 
(No. 117). We must remember, too, that often his cello and violone 
players were merely students, as is clearly seen from his memorial 
of 1730 to the Council (Spitta II, 246 ff.). As a rule the violone 
players and the inexpert cellists gave as many of the notes of their 
part as they could. Sometimes, however. Bach wrote out a sim- 
plified part for them, and we consequently find two basses in the 
score, — a rudimentary one surrounded by a richly figured one. 
Examples may be seen in the sinfonia of the Wedding Cantata 
Der Herr denkei an uns (B. G. XIII^, p. 73 ff.) and the aria "Kraft 
und Starke" from Man singet mit Freuden vom Sieg (No. 149). 
At other times the basses exhibit a certain independence of each 
other, as in the chorale duet "Verzage nicht" from Am Abend 
aber desselbigen Sabbais (No. 42). They are quite independent in 
the aria ''Ach, wann kommet der Tag", from Wachet, beiet (No. 70). 
See also the cantata Bereitet die Wege (No. 132) and the secular 
cantata O holder Tag (B. G. XXIX). 

** See I, 204, 205. This instrument is never indicated in the 
scores. Perhaps the viola pomposa and the violonceUo piccolo 
are identical; in this case the latter would simply be the name 
used in the score for the instrument invented by Bach. 

♦♦♦ It sounded an octave deeper than it was written, as is proved 
beyond doubt by the orchestral parts of Jesu nun set gepveiset 
(No. 41 ; see Preface to B. G. X). There is a solo for violoncello 
piccolo in Ich geh* und suche mit Verlangen (No. 49). 



432 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

It would be an advantage, however, if gamba plajnng were 
cultivated again, the cello and the viola, or the two together, 
being poor substitutes for the solos on this instrument. 
It will be noted that we are already beginning to realise 
the poverty of our string instruments and trying to remedy 
it. Viola players who can also play the gamba will pro- 
bably be the rule in the future. The necessities of our 
modem orchestra will also compel us to look for string 
instruments with a higher range than the violin. Then 
we shall be able to perform the violin parts in many of 
Bach's scores in the way that makes them most effective, 
though he has not marked them so, — i. e. by doubling 
them with the octave above. In general the arrangement 
that is equivalent to drawing a corresponding four-feet 
register is quite in Bach's spirit; he himself doubles the 
cello in the octave with the violoncello piccolo, and the 
vioUn with the viohno piccolo. 

Bach uses both the transverse flute and the flute d bee. 
In his emplojrment of the latter he probably stood alone 
among the musicians of his time; he even uses it in his 
later works, — e. g., the cantata Herr Jesu Christ, wakr'r 
Mensch and GoU (No. 127), which dates from the end of 
the thirties*. 

The disappearance of the flute i hec'is not a very great 
misfortune. It is one of the family of long flutes; it was 
constructed like the open flute pipe of the organ, and 
blown in precisely the same way. A number of finger- 
holes — six to eight — made it possible to produce various 
tones from this primitive instrument; some of them ware 
always rather impure, being obtained by only half closing 
the hole. The overtones being completely lacking, the 
timbre was soft but inexpressive**. 



* For further examples of the use of the tlikte d bee see the 

Actus tragicus (No. 106) and the cantata Jestis schldft (No. 81). 

** There were various kinds of fli^tes d bee, including heavy bass 

instruments. See Ernst Euting's Zur Geschichte der Bassinsint- 

mente im XVI, und XVII, fahthundert, Berlin, 1899. 



The Flutes, Oboes and Bass. 433 

The parts for fUUe d beo hardly suffer at all from being 
played on the modem transverse flute. With regard to 
the general question of Bach's flute parts it may be asked 
whether the metal flute is not preferable in many cases to 
the wooden flute. The metal flute, which the French mostly 
use, has the advantage of speaking more easily. In many 
solos it is certainly more effective than the wooden flute, which 
is almost exclusively used in Germany. In the choruses, 
however, the fuU round tone of the wooden flute is greatly 
to be preferred. It is thus best to employ them together. 

The question of the oboe in Bach performances is not 
nearly so complicated now as it was a little while ago. 
Formerly the oboe da cacda and the oboe d'amore had both 
to be replaced by the cor anglais, which does extremely 
well for the oboe da caccia, but is a poor makeshift for the 
oboe d'amore, the tone of the instrument Bach had in 
view being much softer and more tender*. In the mean- 
time the oboe d'amore has come into use again in the 
modem orchestra. Five instruments of this type are now 
made, which any reasonable good oboe player can master 
without much difficulty**. The many beautiful passages 
for the oboe d'amore in Bach's works are only truly ex- 
pressive when played as he intended them. Even the or- 
dinary hearer at once perceives the difference. 

The question of the brass instruments is a very com- 
plicated one. Bach employs the trombone, the cometto, 
the trumpet and the horn. 

In his epoch there was a complete family of trombones, — 



* The oboe d'amore is practically an alto oboe, the oboe da 
caccia a tenor oboe; the taille, — the third oboe — can easily be 
replaced by the cor anglais, which instrument is merely an im- 
proved form of the old oboe da caccia. Max Seiffert, in his inter- 
esting article on Praktische Bearbeihmg Bachscher Kompositionen, 
in the Bachjahrhuch for 1904, p. 5 ff., contends that a practical 
experiment would decide us against* rather than for, the retention 
of the old instruments. He cannot have had the oboe d'amore in 
his mind when he said this. It is constructed on a perfectly sound 
principle. 

*^ A good oboe d'amore costs about £ 10. 

Schweitser, Bach. 11. 28 



434 XXXV. The Fterformance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

soprano, alto, tenor and bass*. These instruments were 
capable of much purer tone than the trumpets, but could 
only be used in long-drawn passages; the town musicians 
employed them in choruses. Similarly Bach does not use 
them in the orchestra, but only to accompany motet-like 
choruses. Each vocal part has its corresponding trom- 
bone; see, for example, the opening chorus of Ach GoU 
vom Himmel sieh darein (No. 2). 

Bach frequently substitutes the cometto for the discant 
trombone, — in this again following the practice of the 
town bands. The cometto was an instrument with a beU- 
shaped mouth-piece, and usually an S-^haped tube of 
wood, wrapped round with leather. The "serpent" was 
a member of this family, — it was simply the bass cor- 
netto**. The discant cometto had seven holes, so that, 
as with the fl4te d bee, the player had to get the full scale 
by only partially closing some of the holes. Under these 
circumstances several of the tones were bound to be impure. 

The cometto had a clear and not very strong tone, — 
a mixture of the timbres of the trumpet and the wood- 
wind. Bach certainly used it to support the canius firmus 
in the large chorale choruses in many places where it is 
not indicated either in the score or the parts, — for the 
wind players of course, knew the chorale melody by heart. 

In the motet -choruses accompanied by the wind it is 
best to employ the bugle for the soprano and alto trom- 
bones; the parts for the tenor and bass trombones can be 
played on the original instruments, the slide trombones 
being preferable to the valve trombones***. It should be 
observed that the trombones of that day, being smaller^ 



* The trombone slide is first mentioned by Zarlino, in 1588. 
See Eating's BlasinstrumenUf 1899. 

** The Lituus, used in the cantata O Jesu Christ, mein's Lebens 
Lichi (No. 118), probably also belonged to the cometto family. 
*** In England the sUde trumpet that is still in use there can 
probably be employed; this corresponds directly to the discant 
trombone. The slide trumpet was known in Bach's time ; he means 
this in8tnm:ient when he writes tramba da Hrarsi. 



The Trumpets and Horns. 435 

were not so strong as ours, but had a brighter tone; as 
our choirs are much heavier than those of Bach's day, 
however, the proportions are preserved. 

If it is impossible to employ the brass, these motet- 
choruses may be supported simply by the wood-wind and 
strings, the former in as large numbers as possible; in any 
case the effect will be satisfactory ♦. If the upper part is 
a chorale, the trumpet way always take this. 

There can hardly be any doubt that all the chorale 
melodies used in the choruses — with the exception of 
the final chorales — should be reinforced by the trumpet, 
even where the score has no indication to this effect. 

There used to be the most confused opinions current 
upon the trumpet and upon the technique that Bach 
demanded of its players; this confusion was ended by the 
thorough researches of Eichborn**. One error in particular 
needs to be cleared away, — that things were possible 
on the old natural trumpet that are impossible on the present 
valve trumpet. The runs that Bach writes for his players 
were about as difficult on their instruments as they are 
on ours. The only difference is that his players were well 
practised in them, while ours are not. 

The natural trumpet — the only one known in those 
days — consisted of a cylindrical tube with a thin conical 
opening at the top; it was generally bent and curved 
something like the cavalry trumpet of today. The C and 
D trumpets were the most frequently used. The open 
tube of a trumpet of this kind gave the ground tone, the 
octave, the fifth, the pure fourth, the major third, the 
minor third, the minor seventh, the major second, then 
a diatonic scale, not quite pure, in the fourth octave and 



^ In this case the experiment may be tried of adding the reeds of 
the organ. 

** Hermann Eichborn, Die Trompete in alter und neuer Zeit 
(Leipzig, 1 881); Das alte Klarinenblasen auf Ttompeten (Leipzig, 
1894). The above remarks are based on these studies. I owe a 
good deal of valuable technical information to Herr Wilhehn Riff, 
the teacher of the trumpet at the Strassburg Conservatoire. 

a8» 



436 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

a chromatic scale in the fifth octave from the grotind 
tone. These notes have been retained in the trumpet and 
can be produced theoretically — by varying degrees of 
force in the breath pressure and the varying movements 
of the lips, which here correspond to the reed mouthpiece 
of the oboe. As the two lower octaves are poor, use was 
made only of some tones in the middle and the penultimate 
(diatonic) octave. The diatonic octave could be still further 
enriched, as on the C trumpet F could be blown F sharp, 
G, G sharp, and B flat, B natural. The practicable tones 
were therefore the four notes of the third octave, reckoned 
from the ground tone, the diatonic scale of the fourth 
octave, with F sharp, G sharp and B*; of the fifth (chrom- 
atic) octave the first four diatonic notes were the most 
important, since the other intervals, though theoretically 
complete, could not be obtained, owing to the difficulty 
of getting the necessary fineness of lip-pressure. Yet in the 
second Brandenburg concerto Bach demands from the solo 

trumpet the fifth diatonic note of this octave, — the g. 
Eichbom gives the following as the scale: 



g 



13L 



I 



^^- 



■^- 



2z: 



m 



impure 



impure 



m 



<g I fr^ 



b^ %ol 



impure 



impure impure impure 



very difficult 



The mysterious art of "darino playing"** therefore con- 
sisted of nothing more than the mastery of these tones 



* The diatonic octave could have been further enriched by 
"stopping", — a device derived from the technique of the horn. 
In Bach's time, however, this was not thought of. 

♦♦ In the seventeenth and early eighteenth centuries a distinc- 
tion was made between the players of the upper and of the lower 
trumpet parts, the former being caUed "clarino", the latter "prin- 
cipale". [Tr.] 



The Trumpets and Horns. 437 

by incessant practice from youth upwards. Bach's reason 
for writing his parts so high was that these were the only 
notes that were at all complete on the instruments of that 
epoch. 

The player was helped by the easy "speaking" of his 
simple and delicately constructed instrument and its 
narrow dimensions*. Moreover he employed a special 
mouthpiece for pla3ang in the high register. The smoother 
this is, and the sharper its angle, the easier and more certain 
are the attack and the articulation of the high notes. Ac- 
cording to Eichbom, the following would be the ideal 

shape for the mouthpiece in clarino playing. L- — J As 

a matter of fact it does not alter the tone wholly for the 
better; in the higher register it becomes dry and lacking 
in expression. 

We cannot therefore suppose the contemporary render- 
ing of Bach*s trumpet parts to have been ideal. As the 
above table shews, a number of tones remained impure 
even in the best circumstances; others were imcertain; 
the timbre in the upper register was not beautiful, resembling 
that of a child's trumpet. The one advantage of the in- 
strument — and it is a very great advantage with regard 
to Bach's orchestration — was that its tone was weaker 
than that of the trumpet of today; an oboe, or certainly 
two oboes, could hold their own against it quite well. 

After the practice ceased of writing scores in purely 
obbligato parts — that is to say, after the middle of the 
eighteenth century — there was no motive for the study 
of clarino plajnng. About the same time the town bands 
also became extinct. At the end of the century valve- 
trumpets began to be made in England and Germany; 
from these there developed the modem instrument. Our 
trumpet really unites several instruments in one, the 



* The narrower the trumpet, the easier are its high notes, and 
the more difficult its lower ones. The former are of fine quality, 
while the middle and lower register are "dry". 



438 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

arrangements of crooks and valves allowing the player 
to lengthen or shorten the tube at will*. By combining 
the serviceable diatonic notes of these various trumpets we 
get the complete chromatic scale. The nature of the trumpet 
is not altered in any way. As before, the performer plays 
on the "natmral" tnunpet, only that by a pressure of the 
finger he places to his mouth each time the trumpet that 
produces the desired note most easily and most purely**; 
and on this adaptable instrument he can do whatever is 
possible on the **natural" trumpet. Of course the other 
conditions must be fulfilled. When some musicians were 
discussing the possibility of playing Bach's trumpet pas- 
sages, and expressing every possible theory on the subject, 
Gevaert, the director of the Brussels Conservatoire, drily 
interjected that it was "ime question d'embouchure et 
d'entrainement". That is the whole point; it is simply 
a question of mouthpiece and technique. 

With the ordinary mouthpiece Bach's higher notes 
cannot be easily and surely played. Flatter ones make 
them possible. It is a matter of finding the right type, 
and of our players' lips becoming accustomed to it. It 
cannot be too flat if beauty of tone is desired***. 

Of course the art of producing the high notes purely 
and easily is not to be learned in a day; still less can a 
Bach trumpet part be played at sight at rehearsal, nor, 



* The three valves of the modem trumpet correspond, in their 
combinations, to seven positions. 

** It should be observed, however, that the lower third cannot 
be produced on the valve-trumpet as a natural note. 

*** After some years of research and experiment the trumpeter 
of the Brussels Conservatoire has constructed a special mouthpiece 
for performing the Bach and Handel trumpet parts. He uses 
the D trumpet, described by Gevaert in his TraiU d* Instrumenia* 
Hon (p. 281 ff.); though at historical concerts he is able to play 
the parts on the natural trumpet. But he plays no other trumpet, 
so as not to spoil his embouchure for this particular mouthpiece. 
To make it possible for him to do this, an administrative post has 
been found for him at the Conservatoire. [See also Grove's Dic- 
tionary, new edition, V, 271, column 2.] [Tr.] 



The Trumpets an<} Horns. 439 

when this proves impossible, should it be declared un- 
playable. If there ever comes a generation of players 
who practise Bach from the commencement, and make 
a special study of the higher register and of the lip-tech- 
nique demanded by the flat mouthpiece, people will be 
astonished at the long prevalence of the view that Bach 
wrote unplayable trumpet parts*. 

It must be admitted that the valve-trumpet, as it is 
constructed today, rather increases the difficulty of blow- 
ing. The complicated path taken by the column of air 
as it passes through one of the crooks hinders its free 
vibration ; the attack of the note is not so natural as in the 
normal trumpet, where the air-path is not so circuitous. 
This inconvenience, however, can be greatly diminished 
by making the tubes as thin and dehcate as possible, 
and by avoiding all superfluous apparatus for the evacua- 
tion of moisture and all unnecessary solderings. By these 
means the vibratory capacity of the valve-trumpet may 
be made not much less than that of the natural trumpet. 

The proper performance of Bach's trumpet parts demands 
therefore very lightly-built and narrow valve-trumpets, 
special mouthpieces, tested in every detail, and particularly 
practised players**. 

We may aifirm, however, that even the ordinary per- 
formances of the present day are in many respects better 
than those of Bach*s players, the tones being purer and 
more certain. We can therefore put up with a certain 
sluggishness of tone in the higher notes. 



♦ Gevaert wrote me a few years ago that he believed that as 
regards facility in the higher register the pupils of the present 
day were already often superior to their teachers, owing to their 
having practised it from the commencement. 

♦* It must not be forgotten that the trumpeters of Bach's day 
had a much more practised ear than modem players have for the 
intervals that are produced solely with the lips. A trumpeter 
informs me that modem players find such difficulty in the higher 
register not only because they are deficient in lip-technique, but 
because their ear is not sufficiently fine. 



440 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

Until the ideal Bach trumpet comes we should employ, 
in the cantatas, the trumpet in D, for which Bach usually 
writes. The trumpets in high D made by Alexander, of 
Mainz, may be recommended. They not only greatly 
lighten the task of the player who is accustomed to them, 
but produce a tone which, particularly in the higher register, 
is much softer than the ordinary. It has already been 
remarked, in discussing the Brandenburg concertos, that 
this firm's tnmipet in high F is the best for the second 
concerto*. But a good player should not despair if he 
cannot play the part easily on the new instrument after 
several weeks' practice. Familiarity is a matter not of 
weeks and months, but of years. 

It is more than doubtful whether Bach had trumpet 
parts of this kind performed by one player only. Eichbom 
draws attention to the number of trumpets employed in 
an orchestra in that epoch, and conjectures, perhaps 
rightly, that they shared difficult passages between them, 
each of them taking a short section. Whether this view 
be right or wrong historically, the plan recommends itself. 
It is barbarous to expect our trumpeters to play a Bach 
part from beginning to end. From artistic considerations 
alone we ought to employ two, since the moment a wind- 
player becomes ever so little fatigued he loses his certainty 
in high passages. 

The demands made on the trumpeters in a Bach per- 
formance are so severe because the same player, if he 
belongs to an orchestra, has so recently had to produce 
the deeper tones required from the trumpet in modem 
compositions. We shall probably come to a time when 
wind-players will specialise for Bach and Handel, and will 
be as much sought after and as well paid as the solo singers. 

When no good trumpeters are to be had, it is always 
best to give the higher tnunpet part to two or three C or 



♦ The cost of a D trumpet is £ 3 — 5, that of an F trumpet £ 5. 
Either of them can be hired for a month for £ i. 



The Trumpets and Homs» 441 

D clarinets, or at all events to resort to the assistance 
of these in the high notes*. 

It should be mentioned that in his earlier works Bach 
writes for the trumpet in a more fanfare-like and less 
obbligato style than in his later ones. These early parts are 
really the finest and most effective that he ever wrote 
for the instrument ; an example may be seen in the cantata 
Es erhub sich ein Streit (No. 19). 

Whether, even with good instruments and good players, 
we can ever be made to "enjoy" the arias accompanied 
by two or three trumpets, is another question. But till 
this time comes we must not revolt at the device of sub- 
stituting the wood-wind for the brass, out of pity for the 
voice when there is only one singer. 

The question of the horn is similar to that of the trumpet. 
It was only a little time before Bach*s death that the 
muting of the horn was achieved by the Bohemian Anton 
Hampel. Bach is acquainted only with the simple como 
da caccia — the hunting horn — that had come into use 
in Paris at the end of the seventeenth century and be- 
ginning of the eighteenth. Thus the homist, like the trump- 
eter, had to use special mouthpieces for the high notes. 
In connection with Bach it is therefore more correct to 
speak of a trumpet in the form of a horn than of a real 
horn**. The timbre of the modem horn is somewhat duller 
than what Bach had in view. If the part is a high one, 
it is as well to divide it between horn and trumpet, since 
only the finest horn virtuosi can produce the upper tones 
well. The bugle, if the player is at all master of his in- 
strument, gives better results than one is commonly in- 
clined to suppose. It may be observed that even ex- 



* See the instructive remarks of Voigt in his able article £f- 
fahrungen und Ratschldge bezUglich der Auffuhrtmg Bachschw 
Kifchenkantaten^ in the Bachjahrhuch tot 1906, p. 8 U, His sug- 
gestion to transpose certain high notes into the lower octave must 
not be blindly condemned as mere heresy. The unprejudiced 
hearer will in any case not be much disturbed by this procedure. 
♦* See Eichbom, Die Ddmpfung beim Horn, Leipzig, 1897. 



442 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

perienced musicians among the audience wonder at the 
flexibility of the runs, without suspecting that it i^ not 
the ordinary horn that is playing*. 

As the tone of the modem trumpet and horn is stronger 
than that of the instruments of Bach's day, we must see 
that we get the right relation between the brass on the 
one side and the strings and wood on the other. Every 
voice in a Bach score counts for as much as the others. 
But this is true not only of the orchestral parts among 
themselves, but of these in relation to the voice parts. 
The flute part must come out just as clearly as that of 
the soprani in the choir. The true essence of a Bach score 
does not consist in the accompaniment of the chorus by the 
orchestra, but in the co-operation of a vocal mass and 
an instrumental mass of equal significance with it. In 
the performances tmder Bach himself, indeed, the orchestral 
part was in the ascendant; in a festival cantata there 
were eighteen or twenty instnunents to twelve singers**.. 
But even on ordinary occasions he had at least as many 
first and second violins as soprani and alti, — if not more — 
as is shown by the fact that the parts for those instruments 
are frequently written out in duplicate, which is not often 
the case with the vocal parts ; nor must we forget that the 
slighter tension of the bow in those days led to a much smaller 
tone being drawn from the violin than is custontiary today. 

It is in this Ught that we must consider our present practice 
of performing Bach's cantatas with choirs of two hundred 
voices. It was mistakenly assimied to be self-evident that 
the orchestra should be quite weak in comparison with 



* This, of course, is only a makeshift, until such time as our 
homists shall again he expert in the higher registers. Even today- 
there are a few viruosi who can play the first horn part of the 
F major Brandenburg concerto exactly as it is written. The part 
should only he divided between the horn and the trumpet when 
there is no good bugle player available, since horn and bugle blend 
much better than horn and trumpet. 

** On the question of the chorus and orchestra that Bach had 
at his disposal see I, 123 ff. 



The Right Proportions of the Bach Orchestra. 443 

the choir, and should be practically inaudible when the 
latter entered. Those who were conscious of this dispro- 
portion felt the need for re-orchestration of the works, 
which they often carried out. The most natural solution 
of the problem, however, is to strengthen the instrumental 
parts in proportion to the numbers of the choir. There 
was nothing in the modem view to negate an increase in 
the number of the strings ; but the advocates of re-orchestra- 
tion made merry over the proposal to employ with a large 
choir a dozen oboes, a dozen flutes and half a dozen bas- 
soons, and ridiculed the idea of asking a modem audience 
to listen to a "bellowing" of this kind. This, however, 
did not disconcert the advocates of performances in ac- 
cordance with the original score. Siegfried Ochs in par- 
ticular fought gallantly both with word and deed for the 
right principle; his performances have shown that it is 
possible to get an instrumental equivalent to a large 
chorus without any re-orchestration, simply by using the 
proper number of instruments, and that an orchestra of 
this kind, if efficiently handled, is not in the sUghtest 
degree unwieldy. 

The old notion that Bach's music cannot be performed 
just as it is written will probably die out by degrees. We 
still, however, occasionally meet with a choral conductor 
who, when a beautiful cantata is recommended to him, 
immediately asks "whether there is an arrangement of 
it published" — which shows how our self-reliance has 
been destroyed by these "arranged" editions. 

As the tone of our instruments is much stronger than 
that of the older ones, and some of the numbers of our 
mixed choirs do not count at full strength, something 
like the following disposition of the orchestra may be re- 
commended for a choir of fifty to eighty voices: six first 
violins, six seconds, six violas, four cellos, two contra- 
basses, two flutes and two oboes for each part. For a 
choir of a hundred to a hundred and fifty voices the follow- 
ing would be the ideal : ten first violins, ten seconds, ten 



444 XXXV. The Perfonnance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

violas, six cellos, four contrabasses, six flutes and six 
oboes for each part. Even at the end of the eighteenth 
century it was taken for granted that the orchestra was to 
be hardly numerically weaker than the choir. Hiller 
had an enormous orchestra at the famous performance of 
the Messiah at Berlin in 1788. 

After the size the disposition of the orchestra is of prime 
importance. The customary arrangement, with the or- 
chestra thrust like a wedge into the choir, is perhaps not 
the best for a Bach performance. The strings and wood- 
wind are better placed in front of the choir; only in this 
way can the proper effect be secured*. 

It is a mistake for the conductor to make the orchestra 
play piano at the entry of the chorus — which he some- 
times does in accordance with modem custom, or because 
the instruments soimd too loud where he is standing. It 
is very seldom that a listener in the church or the concert 
room finds the orchestra too loud in a Bach chorus; it 
much more frequently happens that he simply does not 
hear it at all. It cannot be too often repeated that in a 
Bach performance it is not a question of an accompanying 
orchestra, but of the co-operation of a vocal choir and an 
instrumental choir, the latter plajnng, if anjrthing, the 
leading role. 

The correct proportions of the instrumental forces, 
however, are not enough; the correct realisation of the 
figured bass is also essential. Bach's obbligato parts, 
absolutely free as they are in their movements, presuppose 
a harmonic foimdation; the harmonies resulting from the 
combination of these parts necessarily contain retardations, 
dissonances and consonances that arise from the casual 
meeting of the themes rather than from the harmonic 
ground-plan of the whole. If the hearer perceives only 
the obbligato parts, he will get — even when the writing 



* To increase the effect of the wood-wind, they should be placed 
in the forefront, before the violins. See Voigt's article, already 
cited, in the Bachjahrbuch for 1906. 



The Figured Bass Part. 445 

is in four or five parts — only a confused and incomplete 
sense of the harmony that Bach had in his mind; the 
essential is mixed up with the accidental. 

It is in the figured bass that Bach has indicated the 
real, decisive harmonic sequences. This figured bass is 
not an abstract of the harmonies made by the obbligato 
parts, but occupies a quite independent position with 
regard to these, — sometimes so independent that at the 
first glance one might doubt the correctness of the figur- 
ing, which does not seem to agree with the orchestral parts. 
In a Bach work, therefore, we have to take account of 
a kind of "final" harmony, resulting from the combined 
activities of the fxmdamental harmony of the figured bass 
and the "moving harmonies" of the obbligato parts. 

It is only the presupposition that the firm ground-har- 
mony defining the course of the piece will be brought out 
elsewhere that Bach can venture to let the voices go their 
own way unhindered, without anxiety as to the general 
harmonic "stability" of this or that bar. It is with his 
music as with the facade of the Strassburg Cathedral. 
The rich filigree ornamentation that covers this like a veil 
of fine lace carved in stone would not have the needful firm- 
ness and consistency unless it were supported by a whole 
network of delicate iron bars. Bach's obbligato parts 
are held together in the same way by the fundamental 
harmonies of the figured bass. The first thing he did after 
finishing a cantata was to prepare the figured contintw part. 

When Bach*s works b^an to be revived, no account 
was taken of the figured bass, even in cases where only 
the bass and a solo instrument were pla3ang together, — 
which seems almost incomprehensible when we reflect 
that at that time Zelter and other musicians with a know- 
ledge of the traditions of the old school were stiU living. 
In the first pianoforte edition of the St Matthew Passion 
(1830) not a note of the figured bass is given even in the 
arias! The performances were of the same character. 
The public was treated to a dialogue between a contrabass 



446 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

and a flute, or even to a contrabass monologue, and it 
was all put down to the account of the good old times! 
If the conductor found it tmendurable, he cut these pas- 
sages out of the arias, or did away with the aria altogether. 
It was only after the issue of the great Bachgesellschaft 
edition that the musicians who were interested in Bach 
learned of the existence of the figured bass. It was an 
unexpected revelation for them: their feeling of salvation is 
described for us in Robert Franz's open letter to Hanslick*. 



* Offener Brief an EdiMtd Hanslick: Vher Bearbeiiungen alter er 
Tonwerke, namenUich Bachscher und Hdndelscher Vokalmusikf 
Leipzig, 1 87 1. 

Even in the modem piano editions there is no figured bass 
part : see, for example, the Peters edition of the St. Matthew Passiont 
which takes no notice of the harmonies indicated by Bach. If 
the instruments do not happen to enter in the upper parts until 
the second beat, this edition gives the bare bass, but not the chord 
that Bach intended. This practice turns a movement like "Ich 
will bei meinem Jesu wachen" into mere caricature. Bach con- 
ceived it with rich harmonic sequences; in the piano edition it 
sounds thin and empty. There is the same procedure, followed by 
the same result, in the Breitkopf piano editions, e. g. in the first 
aria of "]e8u schlaft, was soil ich hoffen" (No. 81). 

Our piano editions are very unsatisfactory in other respects. 
They do not show the authentic bass figure of the contrabasses 
and cellos, or where it ceases; frequently we are given a purely 
fantastic bass, compiled by the editor from the cello and contra- 
bass part and that of the violas; still more frequently it is dis- 
figured by absolutely wrong notes; octaves are introduced — even 
when they make the whole figure unrecognisable — as if these 
were the one thing needful ; the authentic phrasing is very often 
not regarded; the editor mixes up his own dynamic marks with 
those of Bach, so that it is impossible to distinguish one from 
the other; the instrumentation is very frequently not indicated. 

All lovers of Bach must unite in energetically demanding that 
these piano editions shall some day wholly be withdrawn, and re- 
placed by critically correct editions, based on the following princi- 
ples: (i) Everything that is not authentic — phrasing signs, dynamic 
indications, octave doublings — must be omitted; (2) along with 
the obbligato parts there should be printed, in smsdler type, the 
notes resulting from the figured bass, so far as they are not already 
contained in the obbligato parts; (3) the figuring should be given 
beneath the line ; (4) if there is no authentic thorough-bass part, 
and the harmonies have to be conjecturally reconstructed, this must 
be indicated at the commencement, along with the orchestration. 



The Figured Bass Part. 447 

The new impulse was so strong, however, that it over- 
shot its mark. The figtired bass began to be regarded 
merely as a license for all kinds of experiments, the object 
of which was to eliminate every trace of "Zopf ' and to 
obtain an orchestral tone that should be as rich and varied 
as possible. Thus Robert Franz became the father of the 
"arrangement" theory. His piano editions and "practical 
editions", and those that followed his lead, became the 
standard among lovers of Bach, and to some extent still 
remain the standard. The hearer now got a modem sub- 
stitute for the figured harmonies, instead of the harmonies 
in their original form and on the original instrument. 

This discussion, which is not yet settled, has therefore 
two questions to decide. The first is: shall the figured 
harmonies be given to the instrument for which Bach 
intended them or to the orchestra? The second, which is 
botmd up with the first, is whether we ought to realise the 
harmonic sequences in accordance with Bach's own indica- 
tions, or whether we should be coming closer to his ideas 
by setting our imaginations to work upon the harmonies. 

As both Rust and Spitta have remarked, the only original 
instrument to be considered in connection with the realisa- 
tion of the thorough-bass is the organ, — on both historical 
and practical grounds*. There is no evidence that Bach 
used the cembalo for the vocal solos**. We must remember 
that while in every cantata of which we possess the parts 
there is a figured continuo part — generally in Bach's own 
handwriting — transposed a tone lower for the organ***. 



* For the benefit of the lay reader it may be pointed out that 
"thorough-bass part" and ''continuo part" are identical terms, 
signifjring the copy of the instrumental bass part in which Bach 
has indicated the harmonies by means of figures. 

♦♦ See Voigt's strictures (in the Bachf'ahrbuch for 1906, p. 11 ff.) 
on Seiffert's hypotheses {Bachjahrbuch for 1904, p. 64 ff.). There 
are some valuable reflections in Richard Buchmayer's article 
Cembalo oder Pianoforte? in the Bachjahrbuch for 1908, pp. 64 — 93. 
*** At that epoch the pitch of the instruments differed from that of 
the organ. Moreover, the pitch in which vocal and instrumental works 
was performed was at that time about a semitone lower than ours. 



448 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and PassioDs. 

it is only rarely that we have a thorough-bass part that is 
untransposed and therefore suitable for the cembalo*. 
It is a question therefore of either organ or orchestra. 
And here it must certainly be admitted that there is a 
very strong temptation to entrust the working-out of the 



* There was certainly a cembalo in the organ gallery ; we still 
possess the description and the accounts of the installation and 
tuning of it. It may have been used at rehearsals; perhaps Bach 
played the basses on it, perhaps even gave the harmonies. But 
whatever may be thought of this hypothesis, it is certain that 
the fact of the cantata being accompanied throughout by the organ 
remains unshaken. The organ undertook the realisation of the 
figured bass. The only movements planned without organ accom- 
paniment are those that are also without natural basses, — e. g. the 
aria "Jesu, lass dich finden", from Mein Hebster Jesu ist verloren 
(No. 154); the aria "Doch Jesus will", from Schauet dock und sehei 
(No. 46) ; the aria "Wir zittem und wanken" from Herr, gehe nichi 
ins Gericht (No. 105); the aria "Aus liebe will mein Heiland ster- 
ben", in the St. Matthew Passion. 

When Bach did not wish for any harmonies, as is now and then 
the case, he writes tasto solo. They must have been supplied every- 
where else, even at the commencement of the choral fugues, where 
only one voice-part enters. If we omit them here, some of the 
instrumental parts, such as that of the flutes in the opening bars 
of "Lass ihn kreuzigen", in the St. Matthew Passion, are simply 
left suspended in the air. 

The sign tacet in separate numbers of a cantata — see e. g. can- 
tatas Nos. 97, 99, 129, 139, and 177 — does not mean that the 
organ was sUent, but that the part was played on the great oxgan 
from another part than that of the accompanist. This accounts 
for the concertante accompaniments in the cantatas for concer- 
tante organ not being figured. It seems to indicate that at these 
times Bach himself took the organ, and played from the score. 
Or was a special part written for the concertante accompaniments 
by the organist of St. Nicholas's, for whom, according to Richter's 
theory (see II, 237) these cantatas were written? The probability 
is that we have not yet mastered the problem of the cantatas with 
concertante organ. In spite of Richter, I am more and more in- 
clined to think that Bach composed these concertante numbers 
for himself. 

If the figuring is lacking throughout a cantata, it implies that 
the parts, — or at any rate the transposed conUnuo part — have 
been lost. If a transposed conHnuo part exists, but without any 
figuring — as, for instance, in the case of the cantata Siehe, ich 
will viel Fischer aussenden (No. 88) — this probably indicates 
that Bach played the whole accompaniment on the positive. 



The f'igured Bass I^krt. 44^ 

harmonic foundation to the orchestra. No one who knows 
Bach's music and is versed in modem orchestration can 
help imagining the effect to be obtained by enriching the 
harmonies with orchestral colour and interesting rhjrthms, 
and so bringing out, by means of this ^'accompanying 
orchestra", at once the great thematic and dynamic lines 
of the chorus and the body of tone made by the obbligato 
instruments. Only pedantry can be blind to the artistic 
charm of a problem of this kind; only a prejudiced critic 
can close his eyes to the fact that in certain modem ar- 
rangements of Bach the problem has to some extent been 
solved in brilliant fashion. 

No amoimt, however, of reflection or admission can alter 
the final conclusion that it does not become us to play 
Bach's music otherwise than as it was conceived. It is no 
use always sajdng what Bach himself would have put into 
his scores had he had the resources of the modem or- 
chestra. It is sufficient that he had not those resources; 
he did not think "coloristically" ; he tries to get all his 
effects, even the "modem" ones, by the co-operation of 
obbligato parts ; for the realisation of the harmonic substra- 
tirni he calculated on soft flue-work ; and therefore his works 
are most likely to achieve their native effect by our not 
tampering with the principle of them. We do the hearer 
more service by educating him to understand and enjoy this 
simple beauty than by presenting Bach's works to him in 
such a way that they are neither ancient nor modem. 

With regard to the question as to whether the figuring 
should be realised simply or freely, a remark of Rochlitz's 
has caused a lot of mischief. He says that in Bach's time 
the accompanying cembalist or organist "did not merely 
strike the chords, but freely added melodic sequences of 
his own in the upper part and ingenious combinations m 
the middle parts," and that Bach himself particularly 
excelled in this art*. From this it seemed to go without 



* Rochlitz, Fm Freunde der Tonkunst^ II, 375 if. 

Schweitier, Bach. II. 29 



4 

450 XXXV. The Perfcxrmance of the Cantatas and 

sajong that Bach*s figuring really only served the player 
as a harmonic starting-point for an original accom- 
paniment conceived in the general spirit of the work*** 
Rochlitz's remark is correct as far as it goes; only he 
forgets to add that it refers to what Bach used to do with 
the meagre and imperfect figurings of others, not to his 
practice with regard to his own thorough-bass, which, 
with its rich and uninterrupted figuring, of itself suppUes 
the ^'fantasy" he desired in the accompaniment of his works. 
No comparison is possible between Bach's figured basses 
and those of Handel. The latter merely give simple and 
often rather uninteresting chordal sequences; the former 
represent a strict four- or five-part movement, in which 
each voice is an obbhgato part. Bach did not permit 
his pupils to interpret the basses as they hked. The precise 
rules for realising the figuring have been transmitted to 
us ; we have figured basses of Bach's that have been worked 
out by Kimberger, presmnably in the spirit of his master**. 



* This is the opinion expressed by Robert Franz in his open 
letter to Hanslick. It was on this principle that he and his sue* 
cessors made their pianoforte arrangements, and up to quite re- 
cently organists who had to accompany in Bach's works accepted 
this theory ahnost as a dogma. Anyone who expects to find in 
Franz's dissertation a clear exposition of the principles of "ar- 
rangement" will be greatly disappointed. The cardinal problems 
are not touched upon at all, and for the rest are always settled by 
reasoning from Handel to Bach, — an error still customary today. 
** The following are the main documents on the question of 
the realisation of the figured basses: (i) the rules given in Anna 
Magdalena's Klavierbuchlein (see I, io8, and Spitta III, 1 18, 347 ff.) ; 
(2) Peter Kellner's copy of precepts dictated to him by Bach (see 
I, 218, and Spitta III, 315 ff.); (3) the Albinoni violin sonata, the 
figuring of which Gerber worked out under Bach's guidance (see 
I, 218, and Spitta III, 388 ff.); (4) Kimberger's realisation of the 
thorough-bass in the trio from the Musikalisches Opfer (see I, 421, 
422; given in B. G. XXXP, pp.52 — 57). This realised accom- 
paniment by a Bach pupil is, with the rules that have come down 
to us from Peter KeUner, probably the most instructive thing of 
the kind that we possess. There is also much valuable informa- 
tion on the subject of thorough-bass accompaniment in the writings 
of Mattheson and Quantz and the pianoforte schools of Emmanuel 
Bach and Turck. 



The Figured Bass Part. 451 

Anyone who really tries to construct the figured bass part 
according to these principles will soon see that they generate 
a finer "fantasy" than any we can invent for ourselves. 

This holds good also of tiie movements that are accom- 
panied by the caniinuo alone. If Bach, in these places, 
gives only the bass figure to the instruments, and the 
upper voices to the organ, it is not because he is too indolent 
to write something for the other instruments, but because 
the bass figure is so important and so independent that 
the hearer's attention must not be distracted from it by 
any other instrumental parts. Observe, however, what 
simple and beautiful melodic upper parts can be obtained 
by the proper realisation of the figuring! The pity is 
that these movements are so disfigured in our piano edi- 
tions*. 

The realisation of the continue part in the choruses is 
affected by the fact that our forces are different from 
those of Bach's day. Orchestra and choir are much larger 
than they were then ; if we realise the thorough-bass on the 
same scale it sounds too loud; while if we tone it down 
too much it does not fulfil its purpose. Long experiment 
is necessary before we hit upon the proportions in which 
choir and orchestra will blend properly. Of course the 
problem of the modem organist — owing to the situation 
created by our huge forces — is different from that of 



* What violence can be done to the intentions of the composer 
may be seen in the fanciful realisation of the figured bass of the 
aria ''Gewaltige stosst Gott" from Meine Seel* erhebt den Herm 
(No. 10) in Breitkopf and Hartel's piano edition; the demisemi- 
quaver runs have aU been added to Bach's text by the editor. In 
the arrangement of the aria ''Geduld, wenn mich falsche Zungen 
stechen'\ in Peters' edition of the St, Matthew Passion, again, 
too many accessories have been added. That the simple realisation 
of the figured bass of itself gives a beautiful melodic upper part 
may be seen from the aria 'Ich gehe hin", from Wer mich liebet, 
der wird mein Wort halten (No. 74); and every organist who has 
had to accompany the aria "Offne dich", from Nun komm* der 
Heiden HeUand (No. 61), knows how difficult it is to add upper 
parts to the bass in the absence of any figuring. 

29* 



452 XXXV. The F^rfonnance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

the organist who accompanied under Bach himself. He 
has to help the parts to stand out and to make choral 
effects tell. A very great deal depends upon his co-opera- 
tion. He has this advantage over Bach's organist, that 
he can study his part in advance from the score. The 
conductor and he should come to a complete understand- 
ing, before the first rehearsal, as to the rdle the continuo 
accompaniment is to play in the choruses of the work. 

The organ must always play where there is a figured 
bass, — tiierefore also in the chorales and the recitatives 
that are accompanied by the orchestra. Even when the 
organ harmonies are so discreetly filled in that the hearer 
does not perceive them independently, and cannot be 
certain of the organist's co-operation, they still ought to 
be there, since they form the substratum that supports 
the instrumental harmonies, giving these not only com- 
posure and steadiness but also a peculiarly soft colouring. 

Unfortunately the voicing of our organs is an obstacle 
to proper accompaniment; the excessive wind-pressure 
produces too dull a tone, and one that blends neither with 
the voices nor with the instruments*. The organ timbre 
should be the soft harmonic ground against which the 
lines of the obbligato parts can group themselves; instead 
of this it rather serves to confuse these lines and efface 
them. As soon as we happen to accompany a Passion or 
a cantata on a good Silbermann organ we realise for the 
first time how unsuitable the modern organ is for that 
purpose. On our instruments we have to experiment 
for a long time until we have found a number of registers 
which, when properly blended, give the desired quality 
of tone. Organ accompaniment as we so often hear it is 
simply calculated to disfigure Bach's music; and we cannot 
blame the advocates of the "arrangement" theory if they 
substitute the orchestra for the heavy, — and often heavily- 



* The general unsuitability of our modem oigan-tone for 
Bach's music has been discussed in Chapter XIV. 



The Organ. 453 

handled — instrument, and merely call upon the organ 
for assistance here and there. 

In the accompaniment of the soh we have to take into 
account this drawback, that the swell-chest manual which 
we use for this purpose is placed high up and at the back, 
and so is a long way off the platform with the soloists 
and orchestra, which renders impossible not only an exact 
ensemble but any kind of blending of tone. In a big per- 
formance, therefore, there should be substituted for the 
large organ, in the recitatives and arias, a small portable 
positive, placed among the instruments. It must be re- 
membered that the positive of the main organ, on which 
Bach had the soloists accompanied, came out into the 
church. 

The proposal to substitute the harmonium for the old 
portable positive is incomprehensible. Bach wants the 
*Svide" tone of the "Musikgedackt" and the salicional of 
his day; and for this we would substitute the narrow, nasal 
tone of the harmonium — replace an instrument with 
proper flue^pipes by one in which the vibrations are pro- 
duced by metal tongues I* 

The tone of the portative organ we meet with today is, 
indeed, not calculated to prove the possibility of using 
this instrument, though it alone has historical justification. 
One would think the sole purpose of the builders had been 
to show what a coarse tone can be produced even on a 
miniature organ. If they would only make again portative 
organs voiced in the Silbermann style, people would be 
astounded at the ideal support this deUcate tone gives to 
the singer and the instruments, and how perfectly it 
"carries**. In case of need a one-manual portative with 
bourdon 8' and salicional 8' wiU suffice. The ideal would 
be a two-manual instrument with bourdon 8', salicional 8', 
and flute 4' on the second manual, and bourdon 16' and 



* Even connoisseurs of the old instruments, such as Gevaert 
and Seiffert, have unfortunately hecome the advocates of the har- 
monium. 



454 XXXV. The Perfonnance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

principal 8' on the first. It should be observed that a por- 
tative organ is not relatively any dearer than a harmonium*. 

Almost more important than the question of the har- 
monies is that of bringing out the bass. With Bach the 
bass is not, as with other composers, merely a harmonic 
foundation-line; it is at the same time an obbhgato part, 
of the detail of which the hearer must be just as conscious 
as of those of any other part. In the church or the concert- 
room the bass is usually not heard at all, or only in frag- 
ments ; and for this the conductors and organists are answer- 
able, who give far too Uttle attention to this question. 
The large size of our orchestras and choirs increases the 
difficulty of bringing out the bass. How is it possible to 
produce in the lower part a real equivalent to such salient 
upper parts? Not by any increase in the number of the 
contrabasses; too many of them, or too forcible playing, 
is rather a disadvantage, as it gives a peculiar buzz to the 
tone. It is much better to add to the number of the cellos 
and to reinforce them with bassoons. Sometimes also 
a few violas will be very effective — pla}dng the bass part 
an octave higher, instead of the violoncello piccolo. But 
all this does not suffice with a large chorus and orchestra; 
the tone lacks the necessary consistency. 

The arrangers of Bach's vocal works have been acutely 
conscious of this problem, and have tried to solve it with 
the deep brass instruments. This, however, is practicable 
only in the rare cases where Bach has written tranquil 
basses; and even there the brass is much too heavy. The 
only solution is the employment of flue-work stops in the 
lower register; and for this only the organ is of use. Only 



♦ Of course the present-day portative should be fitted with 
a Venetian shutter swell, so as to make crescendi and diminuendi 
possible. A pedal is also desirable. The Alsatian organ^buildeis 
Dalstein and Harpfer (Bolchen) supply portative organs of the 
type described above, with the Silbermann voicing, at about £ 70 
for the one-manual and £ 140 for the two-manual instrument. 
A two-manual, with bourdon 8^ and salicional 8' on the second 
keyboard, and principal 8' on the first, costs about J£ 120. 



The Organ. 455 

when strings and flue-work stops play the bass figures 
together can the latter, without becoming obtrusive, hold 
their own against the vocal and orchestral upper parts, 
having now a tone-colour adequate to the whole mass. 
The proper rendering of the organ part therefore con- 
sists in letting the left hand play the bass part note for note 

— and with the right phrasing — on a stronger manual, 
while the right takes the figuring on a softer manual. This 
is the tradition ; it is also the course suggested by practical 
experiment. The pedal is not in itself requisite in accom- 
panying. Naturally, however, a good player will make 
use of it, and find many opportunities to turn his dexterity 
to account. For example, if he wishes to bring out with 
appropriate force the lower voices in a chorus, he will 
employ three basses, — one for the passages with orchestra 
alone; a somewhat stronger one for the ordinary combina- 
tion of chorus and orchestra; and a strong one for the forte 
passages. He will draw a bass on the chief manual and 
one on the pedal, and let the three basses separate or com- 
bine, using either the manual or the pedal or both together, 

— it making no difference, in the latter case, whether he 
couples or pla)^ the same part with the left hand and the 
feet. This shading in the bass was not desired by the ac- 
companist in Bach's day; it is rendered necessary, how- 
ever, by the size of our modem forces. And of course the 
player will employ the pedal also in cases where — as in 
the chorale cantatas — he has to reproduce a cantus firmuSf 
or where he strikes the chords on the great organ in order 
to bring out special effects, or where he plays the har- 
monies on two different manuals so as to bring a part out 
more clearly. 

He must never forget, however, that he is solely respon- 
sible for the proper effect of the bass figure ; the trouble it 
gives and the combinations it demands are weU known 
to every organist who has had to perform this task in the 
chorale chorus "O Mensch, bewein* dein* Siinde gross*', 
in the 5/. Matthew Passion, 



456 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

Care shoiild be taken that the registration is not too dull. 
Bach's bass figures are conceived in eight-feet tone; and 
therefore too many contrabass and sixteen-feet stops are 
bad, as they make the part sound an octave too low, and 
leave a gap between it and the next highest part — that 
of the violas. Eight-feet stops should therefore be used 
throughout, even in the pedal; one or two sixteen-feet 
stops will be enough ; frequently none at all are necessary 
in the manual on which the left hand is plajdng*. On the 
other hand it must not be forgotten that Bach, as is shown 
by his instrumentation, counts on the four-feet tone also 
for the bass figure: in forte bass parts two or three fine 
and clear four-feet stops are extremely effective. Nor 
should we shrink from the use of mixtiures and reeds if 
they happen to be good. In general we should aim at 
a clear and intense rather than a thick tone-colour, if 
only for the sake of precision. 

For the arias also we must have in readiness two bass 
timbres — one for the UMi^ the other for the accompani- 
ment passages. It depends upon circumstances whether we 
shall draw a soft bourdon i& or not. We must remember 
that if the bass contains many sustained notes, — as in 
the recitatives, for instance — the sixteen-feet tone easily 
becomes obtrusive, and an unpleasant hollow is left be- 
tween the bass and the harmonic parts. A good eight-feet 
bourdon, in the deep octave, will often be better. In any 
case the organ bass should never cease, even in the solo 
movements; as soon as it does so — even if we have not 



* In the first choros of Ein* feste Burg (No. 80), for example^ 
the bass should be played with eight-feet stops alone, and the six- 
teen-feet only employed when the cantus firmus enters in the lower 
part. In the opening chorus of the cantata Du solist Gott deintn 
Herrn (No. 77) it is clear from the clefs Bach has used that with 
the exception of the cantus firmus the whole bass is to be played 
with eight-feet stops. It goes without saying that when the canius 
firmus enters in the bass it must be reinforced by a trombone. 
Bach assuredly posted a trombone player by the organ, to join in 
these passages. 



The Organ. 457 

been conscious of hearing it before — the cellos and contra- 
basses also disappear, since their foundation is now lacking. 

The movements in which only the bass and the organ 
accompany may generally sound so badly because the 
four -feet tone which gives the necessary clearness and 
distinctness is missing from the bass. It may be remarked 
that, according to some parts that have come down to us, 
and sundry indications in the scores, Bach had the contra- 
basses and cellos supported in these passages by the violas, 
or the violas and vioUns, — at any rate in the tutti. We 
shall probably not go wrong if we observe this rule in many 
solos that are accompanied by the cofUinuo alone*. 

In performances under Bach himself the violone seems 
very often to have ceased upon the entry of the solo voice, 
and to have only joined again in the tutti**. This, however, 
is no reason why we, if we have one or two good contra- 
basses at our disposal, should not let them join in piano. 

For a long time it was thought pedantic to use contra- 
bass and cello for accompan3dng the recitatives. Many 
who tried to dispense with these instruments, e. g. in the 
part of the Evangelist, ultimately had to revert to the old 
practice, since the organ bass alone is not sufficiently 
clear and precise, even for simple chord-progressions. It 
does not allow of accents in the basses. In the fine quaver- 
figures of the bass of arioso movements an excellent effect 



♦ In the aria "Hasse nur", from Die Himmel erzdhlen (No. y6)f 
the gambas play with the bass; in the aria "Streite, siege, starker 
Held", from Nun kamm' der Heiden Heiland (second composition; 
No. 62), Bach writes "violini $ viola sempre col contintio". The 
importance of this marking consists in the fact that it is only in- 
serted because of the sempre; it was self-evident that the violins 
and violas in these passages should play from the coniintto part, 
but not that they were to continue sempre, i. e,. in the piano 
passages as well, where the voice entered ; it therefore had to be 
marked so. 

** Authentic information as to this may be had, e. g., in the 
alto aria in Was Gott tut, das isi wohlgetan (No. 100). Bach's prin- 
ciples on this point may be studied most fully in the secular cantata 
O holder Tag (B. G. XXIX), which is richly provided with con 
violone and senza violone marks 



458 XXXV. The Bsrloniianoe of the Cantatas and Fa«toii8. 

is obtained by strengthening the cellos; and a discreetly 
used bassoon often does good service. 

The gaps that are created when the proper continuo 
accompaniment ceases may be realised in such a cantata — 
very fully orchestrated throughout — as Ich wiU den 
Kreuzskib gerne tragen (No. 56), which is often performed 
in the concert-room with a harmonium. In the Si. Ma^ 
thew Passion we see from the score that in the recitatives 
of Jesus the strings enter with the organ and continue 
with it; if we go contrary to Bach's intentions here, we 
must take into account the restless and peculiarly flicker- 
ing quahty of the chords that are sustained by the strings 
alone; the softest bourdon or salidonal — so soft as not 
to be audible in the ensemble — gives them a quite new 
character — much quieter and more uniform — without 
the accompaniment being at all strengthened by the device*. 

The accompanying organist usually lays for too little store 
by precision. We still hear the organ after chorus and or- 
chestra have ceased; in the arias and recitatives it is always 
a shade too late. The player, however, thinks he is perfectly 
in time. He has forgotten that the lower register, in which 
he duphcates the bass, necessarily "speaks** somewhat more 
slowly, and that a certain delay is caused by the distance 
between the first orchestral desks and the organ, which is 
often considerable owing to the size of our choirs, — to 
say nothing of the fact that very many organists follow 
not the conductor but their own ear, which doubles and 
trebles the chances of error. Precision in accompaniment 
is possible only when the conductor's beat is scrupulously 
obeyed, and care is taken always to be the merest trifle 
ahead in pressing down and releasing the keys ; the organist 
must always fell that he is entering or ceasing a shade too 



* A very interesting example of the joint performance of 
chords by orchestra and organ may be had in the recitative "Ver- 
doppelt;euch demnach", from Christen, dttet diesen Tag (No. 63). 
The organ binds them together in crotchets; the orchestra separates 
them by means of quavers with rests between. 



The Organ. 459 

soon ; if it sounds quite right to him, he may be sure that 
in the hall or the church the organ sounds too late. 

As the full effect of Bach's music depends upon the proper 
bringing out of the harmonic basis of the obbligato parts, 
and of these again among themselves, conductors and 
organists should try to discover, at rehearsal, how things 
sound from various parts of the hall; otherwise, as it is 
impossible for them to judge of the relative strength of 
the various parts from where they sit, they will frequently 
err as to the real effect of this or that passage. To discover 
whether his registration is right, the organist should tem- 
porarily give up his seat at rehearsal to a pupil; he will 
then have some valuable experiences, and will realise how 
the smallest detail is often of the utmost importance. It 
may happen that the proper timbre depends upon the 
drawing or closing of a soft four-feet register, the presence 
or absence of which seems of no consequence whatever. 

For a good player perhaps the best organ part is a piano 
score, in which he has entered the thorough-bass figuring 
and the main lines upon which he will work it out. He 
must not forget, however, to revise the basses, or eke he 
will unconsciously play a number of false notes in every 
cantata. With experience he will learn to get his effect 
not by motley successions of tone-combinations, but by 
fine transitions between various degrees of strength and 
tonal nuances. In the recitatives much harm is done by 
the chords being too massive and too loud in comparison 
with the voice. Organ accompaniment is a matter of 
temperament. An impetuous, unreflecting temperament, 
however, often does the wrong thing; the right thing comes 
only from a temperament that is thoughtful and refined. 

The following are some of the cantatas most frequently 
performed — GoUes Zeit (No. 106); Ich hatte viel BekUm- 
tnernis (No. 21); Ein^ feste Burg (No. 80); Wachet auf 
(No. 140) ; Ich mil den Kreuzstab gerne tragen (No. 56) ; 
Gott der Herr ist Sonn^ und Schild (No. 79); Ach melflUckUg^ 
ach me nichtig (No. 26) ; Half im Geddchtnis (No. 67). 



460 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

Other works, equally fine, are seldom or never given. 
Breitki^f and Hartel have not yet engraved the parts of 
many wonderful cantatas, having never yet been asked 
for them. The explanation of this unequal appreciation 
of Bach's works is that very few conductors possess the 
complete edition, and so are in a position to make a free 
choice; the others keep to the cantatas of which arrange- 
ments are published, or which they have heard, or seen 
in some programme or other*. It sometimes happens, 
too, that choir conductors make a bad choice through 
ignorance, selecting a too difficult cantata for a not very 
expert choir simply because they do not know the ea^ 
ones; or they give a public imperfectly acquainted with 
Bach a cantata that is not calculated to make it under- 
stand and love him more, but rather to frighten it. It goes 
without sa3dng, too, that in choosing a cantata the quality 
of the text should be taken into consideration. 

The following lists, without pretending to be complete, 
may be of assistance in making a proper selection. They 
include only works that are effective as a whole, and of 
which the texts are satisfactory. 

Cantatas particularly suitable for performance: 

KomiHy du sUsse Todesstunde (No. 161); Himmdskdnigy 
set wiUkommen (No. 182); Wachei, betet (No. 70); Er- 
wUnschtes Freudenlicht (No. 184); Herr, gehe nicht ins 
Gericht (No. 105); Schauet dock und sehet (No. 46); Liebsier 
Gotty wann werd^ ich sterben (No. 8); Es erhub sich ein 
Streit (No. 19); Chrises, der ist mein Leben (No. 95); Herr, 
deine Augen (No. 102); £5 ist nichis Gesundes an meinem 
Leibe (No. 25); GoU fahret auf mit Jauchzen (No. 43); Am 
Abend aber desselbigen Sabbats (No. 42; some of the recita- 
tives should be "cut**, and the middle section of the first 
aria should be provided with new words); Nun ist das 
Heil und die Kraft (No. 50); Es wartet alles auf dich (N0.187; 
the text is very fine); Jesu, nun set gepreiset (No. 41; very 



* See Voigt's remarks in the Bachjahrbuch for 1906, p. 2 if. 



Cantatas suitable for Perfonnance. 461 

large choir); Gelobet seist du, Jesu Christ (No. 91); Meinen 
Jesum lass ich nicht (No. 124) : Meine SeeP erhebi den 
Herren (No. 10); Mache dich, mein Geisi, bereit (No. 115); 
Ach, lieben Christen, seid getrost (No. 114); Du Friedefi$r$t, 
Herr Jesu Christ (No. 116). 

The following are easy to perform, and are of a more 
popular character: 

Aus der Tiefe (No. 131); Uns ist ein Kind gebaren 
(No. 142); Nun komm* der Heiden Heiland (No. 61; first 
composition); Seht welch' eine Liebe (No. 64); Es ist das 
Heil uns kommen her (No. 9); Wer da glaubet und getauft 
wird (No. 37); Das neugeborne Kindelein (No. 122); Aus 
tiefer Not (No. 38; omitting the aria "Ich hore", which is 
borrowed from another work); Ach Herr, tnich arnten 5im- 
der (No. 135 ; without the tenor aria, which is probably 
borrowed). 

: The following cantatas are useful for winning pver a 
public that is musically cultured but not yet intimate 
with Bach: 

Die Himmel erzdhlen (No. 76) ; Sie werden aus Saba alle 
kommen (No. 65); Du wahrer Gott und Davidssohn (No. 23); 
Herr, wie du mlU (No. 73); Du Hirte Israel (No. 104); 
Ihr werdet weinen und heulen (No. 103) ; Ich dendet Mensch 
(No. 48); Liebster Immanuel (No. 123); Was mein Gott 
will (No. III). 

Of the solo cantatas the following may be mentioned: 

Mein Gott, wie lang, ach lange (No. 155 ; alto, tenor, 
bass); Meine Seele rUhmt und preist (No. 189; tenor); Schau, 
lieber Gott, wie meine Feind* (No. 153; alto, tenor, bass. 
Very popular); Mein liebster Jesus ist verloren (No. 154; 
alto, tenor, bass) ; Erfreute Zeit im neuen Bunde (No. 83 ; 
alto, tenor, bass. The text is very fine); WahrUch, ich 
sage euch (No. 86; soprano, alto, tenor, bass. Easily under- 
stood; text very fine); Wo gehest du hinf (No. 166; alto, 
tenor, bass. Easily understood; text very fine); Ich lasse 
dich nicht, du segnest mich denn (No. 157; tenor, bass); 
Sehet, mr gehen hitkiuf nach Jerusalem (No. 159; alto, tenor, 



462 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

bass) ; Ich habe genug (No. 82 ; bass) ; Jauchzet GoU in alien 
Landen (No. 51; soprano); SchU^e doch, gewiinschie Stunde 
(No. 53; alto); Ich artner Mensch, ich SUndenknechi (No. 55 
tenor); Was soil ich aus dir machen^ Ephraim (No. 89 
soprano, alto, bass); Siehe^ ich mil viel Fischer (No. 88 
soprano, alto, tenor, bass); Ich bin ein guter Hirt (No. 85 
soprano, alto, tenor, bass); Bisher habi ihr nichts gebeten 
in meinem Namen (No. 87 ; alto, tenor, bass) ; Selig isi der 
Mann (No. 57 ; soprano, bass) ; Silsser Trost, mein Jestf^ 
kommt (No. 151; soprano, alto, tenor, bass); Liebster JesUy 
mein Verlangen (No. 32; soprano, bass); Meine Seufzer^ 
meine Trdnen (No. 13; soprano, alto, tenor, bass); Es 
reifet euch ein schrecklich Ende (No. 90 ; alto, tenor, bass) ; 
Meine Seele rUhmt und preist (No. 189; tenor. Short 
and simple); Der Friede sei mil euch (No. 158; bass. Very 
simple; the accompaniment consists only of continuo and 
a solo violin) ; Ewigkeii, du Donnerwort (No. 60 ; second 
composition; alto, tenor, bass); Ach GoU, me manches 
Herzeleid (No. 58; second composition; soprano, bass). 

It is hoped that these lists may be of assistance not 
only to choir conductors but to musical amateurs who can 
sing, and that they may help to introduce the cantatas 
into the home. In Mendelssohn's time these works were 
given in small circles — often with a modest choir, — with 
a pianoforte accompaniment; in this way many came to 
learn their Bach. This practice has unfortunately ceased, 
just at the time when Bach's cantatas can be had so easily 
and so cheaply; we seldom find amateurs in possession of 
any but those that have been performed in their neigh- 
bourhood; our amateur singers wait for collections of Bach's 
arias, instead of getting a number of cantatas containing 
the finest arias for their peculiar kind of voice*. Even 



* In this respect the solo cantatas mentioned above should 
first be taken into account. Of the others may be mentioned 
Nos. 25, 31, 52, 68, 72, 94, 115, 127, 133, 146, 149, as containing 
particularly fine soprano numbers; Nos. 20, 108, 114, 115, 125, 148, 
161, 187 for particularly fine alto numbers; Nos. i, 19, 22, 48, 65, 



Cantatas suitable for Perfonnance. 463 

many professional singers have only a limited knowledge 
of the works that concern them. If it should come about 
that the cantatas are performed publicly, but at the same 
time fall into disuse in domestic circles — in which the 
first enthusiasm for Bach sprang up about a century ago — 
we should have won only half the victory. Perhaps the 
finest feature of Bach*s destiny is that, without his ever 
having dreamt of it, he has provided the world with a 
spiritual domestic music. The performances of the can- 
tatas by a few singers with pianoforte accompaniment 
may be imperfect; but if the performers only have their 
heart in their work they are fully conscious of the beauty 
of the music, and their souls feel the consecration of it 
perhaps more than in listening to the most perfect per- 
formance. 

The reason for so few cantatas being given, especially 
by the church choral societies, is sometimes economic. 
Bach's almost invariable practice of writing for four soloists 
makes the works costly to produce. This, however, need 
be no hindrance. Quite good performances of the cantatas 
can be given with only two soloists, or even one. The 
inner connection of the separate numbers of a cantata 
is often very loose ; it is not a crime, therefore, to construct 
out of the choruses and solos of four or five cantatas of 
the same internal spirit a kind of ideal cantata that will 
fiU out the evening, arranging it in such a way that only 
particular voices — say alto and bass, or soprano and 
tenor — are required for the solos and duets. A perform- 
ance of this kind ranks much higher artistically than the 
ordinary one, in which three or four cantatas are strung 
together without regard to their textual connection. 



7Sp ^$9 9i> 95> 9^9 114' i23> i24> i^i» U^* ^^ ^^^ particularly fine 
tenor numbers; and Nos. 27, 46, 66, 69, 73, 75, 104, 145 for par- 
ticularly fine bass numbers. Splendid duets for alto and tenor 
will be found in Nos. 63, 80, 1 1 1 ; for alto and bass in No. 106; for 
soprano and bass in Nos. 140, 1 52 ; for soprano and alto in Nos. 172, 
184, 186. 



464 XXXV. The Perf ormance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

Of course there are a number of cantatas that should 
be produced intact, since they constitute complete religious 
"dramas of ideas"; on the other hand there are dozens* 
that have so little inner cohesion, and of which the texts 
are so unequal in quality, that a full performance would 
merely serve to reveal their poetic imperfections. 

In a cantata made up out of several others, the choruses 
and chorales will predominate over the solos, and the 
total picture will be richer and more varied than that of 
the single Bach cantata; but this ought not to be regarded 
as a disadvantage. In the last resort we have done nothing 
more than reach past the uninteresting Neumeister can- 
tata-form — which Bach adopted because no one would 
give him any other texts — to the rich German cantata of 
an older day. 

In any case intelligent musicians ever3n??here ought to 
acknowledge the claim that when cantatas are performed 
together they should have some kind of poetic connection 
among themselves, and that even in these \mecclesiastical 
dayg the particular church period should not be so dis- 
regarded in our programmes as it ever3rwhere is at present. 
Art hke Bach's can only make itis way as a rehgious and 
Uturgical barbarity of this kind gradually falls into dis- 
credit ; and the time will probably come when our concert 
performances of his music will be arranged in accordance 
with the season — All Saints Day, Advent, Christmas, 
New Year, Epiphany, the Passion, Easter or Whit. The 
Trinity cantatas can be grouped according to definite 
poetic or religious ideas, or connected with cantatas per- 
taining to the feast time. 

There are more specimens in the cantatas than is com- 
monly imagined of simple service music within the capa- 
cities of church choirs that would not be equal to Bach as 
a whole, so that he could be made use of in simple liturgical 



* This refers only to the chorale cantatas of the last period. 
See p. 353. 



Simple Service Music in the Cantatas. 46$ 

ceremonies much more frequently than he is at present. 
This is especially true of the motet-like choruses in the 
cantatas Nos. 2, 8, 12, 28, 37, 38, 64, 116, 118, 121, 144, 
150, and 179; they could be given, in case of need, with 
organ alone, or with the addition of a very modest or- 
chestra. 
Other choruses of a simple kind are the following: 
"Weinen, Klagen" from No. 12 ; "AUer Augen warten, 
Herr" from No. 23; "Nimm von uns, Herr" from No. loi; 
"Das neugebome Kindelein" from No. 121 ; "Meinen Jesum 
lass ich nicht" from No. 124; "Aus der Tiefe" from No. 131 ; 
"Ich will den Namen Gottes" from No. 142 ; "Wenn es 
meines Gottes Wille" from No. 161 ; "Riihre, Hochster, 
unsem Geist" from No. 173; "So lasst uns gehen in Salem 
der Freuden" (No. 182). 

Besides these there are a number of simple or plainly 
figured chorales with orchestral accompaniment. Fine 
specimens will be found in the cantatas Nos. i, 15, 22, 

23, 24. 29, 33, 46, 75, 76, 79> 98* 99» ioi> ^05, 107, 109, 113, 
124, 133, 138, 142, 147, 167, 171, 172, 173, 186, and 190. 
The wind instruments in the accompaniment to the chorsdes 
in the cantatas Nos. 31, 41 and 100 could be replaced by 
the organ, as the parts are very simple. For use in liturgical 
services, again, the unison chorale melodies with instru- 
mental accompaniment are appropriate; they could be 
stmg by several good boys' voices. Numbers of this kind 
¥rtll be found in cantatas Nos. 6, 36, 51, 85, 86, 92, 95, 130, 
140, 143, 166, 178. 

Further there are many simple and easy solos that could 
be put to good use in the church service, — for example: 
O Menschenkind", duet for alto and tenor, from No. 20; 
Gott, der du die Liebe heisst", duet for tenor and bass, 
from No. 33; "Nun komm' der Heiden Heiland", duet 
for soprano and alto, from No. 36 ; "Entziehe dich eilends, 
mein Herze, der Welt'*, duet for soprano and alto, from 
No. 124; "Lass, o Fiirst der Cherubine", tenor solo, from 
No. 130; "Handen, die sich nicht verschliessen", duet for 

Schweitser, Bach. 11. 30 






466 XXXV. The Performaiice of the Cantatas and Passions. 

soprano and bass, from No. 173 ; "J^^» ^^^ss durch Wohl 
und Weh", tenor solo, from No. 182 ; "Barmherziges Herze 
der ewigen Liebe", duet for soprano and tenor, from No. 185 ; 
"Darmn sollt ihr nicht sorgen**, bass solo, from No. 187; 
"J^iis soil mein alias sein", duet for tenor and bass, from 
No. 190. 

Many duets and trios are so simple that, as has already 
been pointed out, they could be sung by the choir with 
severaJ voices to each part, — for example: 

"Er denket der Barmherzigkeit" (alto and tenor) from 
No. 10 ; "Herr Gott, Vater" (for soprano and alto) from 
No. 37; "Wenn meine Triibsal" (soprano, alto and bass) 
from No. 38; "Wir eilen mit schwachen" (soprano and alto) 
from No. 78; "Gott, ach Gott, verlass*' (soprano and bass) 
from No. 79; "Ach, wir bekennen" (soprano, tenor and 
bass) from No. 116; "1st Gott versohnt" (soprano, alto 
and tenor) from No. 122 ; "Zedem miissen von den Winden" 
(alto, tenor and bass) from No. 150. 

When the great Bachgesellschaft edition was being pre- 
pared, subscriptions were chiefly expected from the church 
choirs; but these did not respond. Nor have they as j^t 
done what may be expected of them in the way of perform- 
ing the cantatas. This was mostly due to the mistaken 
notion of the conductors that Bach could not be performed 
in the original form; they waited for the time when the 
whole of Bach should be issued in an "edition for practical 
use", and meanwhile sat with their hands folded. It is 
hardly credible that they wiU continue to hold back in this 
way; from articles by Seiffert (Bachjahrbuch for 1904) 
and Voigt (Bachjahrbuch for 1906) they can learn that 
they can make the practical arrangement out of the score 
for themselves, to suit the capacity and numbers of their 
choirs. On the whole, articles of this kind, recounting 
experiences and giving suggestions for the study and per- 
formance of Bach's works, are what is most needed at 
present. It is desirable that many other Bach experts 
should contribute to the discussion of this question in the 



Conclusion. 467 

Bachjahrhuch. What results, for example, might not be 
hoped for if an aesthetician and practical man like Kretzsch- 
mar would take a dozen cantatas, and discuss in detail 
everything that concerned the study and performance of 
them with the modest forces of the ordinary choir! 

We must not, of course, expect complete agreement 
upon the many points involved m the performance of 
Bach's works. We are still in the experimental epoch. 
But if people will take the experiences of others and examine 
them, form their own opinion of them, and carry them 
still further, we shall attain to principles that are univer- 
sally valid, the fruit of all-round examination. Without 
inquiry and discussion of this kind there can be no 
progress. The problem of the correct way of performing 
Bach can be solved only by artistic experiments conducted 
with a consciousness of the end in view. 

But even when we attain to a general understanding 
as to the technical questions, a diversity of opinion upon 
the artistic conception will still have to be reckoned with. 
This will, proceed not only from us but from Bach*s work 
itself. "Bach", says a distinguished student of him*, 
"has at present a Janus head; one face looking back to 
the epoch of formal architectonic structure, the other 
turned towards the future, — towards the freest subjec- ' 
tivity of inward speech.** We cannot help modernising 
him; on the other hand, experience has led us back to 
the point of striving more than ever to bring out the 
architectonic form. We get a different Bach according 
as we stress the modem or the formal element in him. 

"It is with Bach's music", Gevaert once wrote**, "as 
with the Gospel: we know it only according to Matthew, 
or Mark, or Luke, or John ; the Evangelists deviate widely 
from each other, and yet they give us the 'Gospel'; any- 
one who seeks for this in them can find it, and can com- 



♦ Von Lupke, — in a letter to the author on the subject of 
Bach -aesthetic. 

** In a letter to the author. 

30* 



468 XXXV. The Performance of the Cantatas and Passions. 

municate it to others. So is it with Bach's works; the 
only thing is that we must seek Bach, not ourselves, in 
them, and have a reverent consciousness of offering man- 
kind something precious not only for the artistic sense 
but for soul and spirit; then it is always the true Bach, 
no matter in how many different ways he sounds.'* 

Bach's music depends for its effect not upon the per- 
fection but upon the spirit of the perfermance. Mendels- 
sohn, Schelble and Mosewius, who were the first to waken 
the Cantatas and Passions to new life, were able to do so 
because they were not only musidans but sincere and deep- 
feeling men. Only he who sinks himsdf in the emotional 
world of Bach, who lives and thinks with him, who is simple 
and modest as he, is in a position to perform him properly. 
If the director and the performer do not feel themselves 
in a consecrated mood, they cannot communicate such a 
mood to the hearer; something cold will settle upon the 
music and deprive it of its best strength. ^'One thing is 
needful", said Mosewius in 1845, when he was trjring to 
interest the world in Bach's cantatas; and it is perhaps 
more needful now than ever it was. '^An inner unity of 
soul", he says at the end of his essay, **is absolutely indis- 
pensable in performing Bach ; and every individual chorister 
must not only have thoroughly mastered the work technic- 
ally but must preserve his spiritual forces unbroken throu^- 
out." 

May this perception penetrate everywhere; then will 
Bach help our age to attain the spiritual unity and fervour 
of which it so sorely stands in need. 



INDEX. 



"Abendmnsikeii" at Ubeck, 

I. 76 ff. 
Accentuation in Bach's music, 

I. 365^-. 375*^-; n. 391*^- 
Adkr, Guido, II. 26. 

Adlung, Jacob, I. 71, 199, 201, 

203, 204. 

Aesthetics and Bach's music, 

II. 5 «. 

Aesthetics of music, II. 8 if. 
Agiicola, M., I. 55. 99 n., 199 if., 

215, 225, 422; II. 172. 
Ahle, J. G., I. 74 n., 103. 
Ahle, J. R., I. 70, 74; II. 251. 
Albert, Eugen d', I. 319. 
Albinoni, I. 192, 197, 218, 339. 
Albrecht, L., I. 199. 
Altnikol, I. 145, i$o, 215, 223, 

395. 424. 
Amalie, Princess of Prussia, 

I. 215, 234, 405. 417. 

Ambrose, I. 5. 

Azmunzio, Gabriele d', I. 261. 

Ansorge, I. 319. 

Aristotle, I. 96. 

Amd, I. 168. 

Amdt, £. M., I. 14. 

Aron, P., I. 333. 

Artistic perception, complex na- 
ture of, II. 14 ff. 

Arts, interblending of the, II. 
8ff. 

Attaignant, P., I. 19. 
Aufkl&rung", the, I. 113 n. 



II 



Babst, v., I. 9, 13. 
Bach family, history of, I. 97 ff. 
Bach, Anna Carolina (J. S. B's 
granddaughter) I. 234. 



Bach, Anna Magdalena, I. 94, 
107 ff., 116, 144, 156, 159, 
160, 234, 386; II. 235, 256, 

279. 301- 

— Bemhard, I. 156. 

— Bemhard (nephew of }. S. 
B.), I. 214. 

— Christoph, I. 98. 

— Ernst, I. 103. 

— Hans Caspar, I. 98. 

— Heinrich, I. 97. 

— Johann Ambrosius, I. 98. 

— Johann Christian (brother 
of J. S. B.), I. 344. 

— Johann Christoph (of Eise- 
nach, uncle of J. S. B.), 
I. 44, 74, 97, 98; II. 2951k 

(of Amstadt) I. 98. 

— Johann Elias, I. 147, 157, 
158, 215. 

— Johann Ernst, I. 215. 

— Johann Jacob (brother of 
J. S. B.), I. 343. 

— Johann Ludwig (of Meinin- 
gen), I. 173. 

— Johann Michael (of Gehren, 
uncle of J. S. B.), I. 44, 74, 
97. 103. 

— Ludwig, I. 156. 

— Maria Barbara, I. 103, I45i^* 

— Samuel Anton, I. 215; II. 
44. 

— Sebastian (son of C. P. E. 
Bach), I. 148 n. 

— Veit, I. 97, 98. 

— W. F. E. (son of J. C. F. 
Bach), I. 148 n. 

Bach Festivals, I. 265. 
Bach Museum, I. 265 n. 



470 



Index. 



Bach Societies, I. 257; Paris, 
I. 259; II. 15711; Rome, 
I. 261 ; Hamburg, I. 263. 

Bachgesellschaft, I. 251 ff. 

— (New), I. 265 n. 

Bach, Johami Sebastian: 

if fs life: 

His father, I.98 ; mother, 
99; birth, 99; at Ohrdruf 
and Luneburg, 99; jour- 
neys to Hamburg and 
Celle, 100 ; at Weimar, 
100; at Amstadt, 100; 
organ studies at Amstadt, 
loi; exceeds leave of ab- 
sence at Lubeck, loi; 
difficulties with church 
authorities and choir, 10 1, 
102; fracas with Geyers- 
bach, 102 ; at Muhlhausen, 
103; marries Maria Bar- 
bara Bach, 103 ; settles in 
Weimar, 104; his position 
and salary there, 105; at 
Cdthen, 106; death of 
Maria Barbara, 107 ; mar- 
ries Anna Magdalena Wul- 
ken, 107 ; tries for post at 
Hamburg, 109 ff.; settles 
at Leipzig, 1 1 1, 112; con- 
ditions of service, 112 ff.; 
his income and its sources, 
115 ff.; state of St. Tho- 
mas's school, 116 ff. ; 
Kuhnau's memorials, 117; 
the question of the uni- 
versity church service, 
ii9ff.; Bach appeals to 
the King, 121; result of 
the struggle, 121; the 
church service at Leipzig 
(see under Leipzig); quar- 
rel with Gaudlitz and the 
consistory, 131 ; first con- 
flict with the council, 
132 ff.; criticism of Bach 
by the council, 133; dis- 
orderly state of the choir, 



133; Bach's memorial to 
the council, 1 34 ; the coun- 
cil reduces his emoluments, 
135; he writes to Erd- 
mann, 136; seeks and ob- 
tains the title of court 
composer, 138 ff., 140; 
quarrel with Emesti, 1 40ff . ; 
gives up direction of the 
Telemann Society, 143 ; 
retires from Leipzig public 
life, 144; intimacy with 
Picander, 144; domestic 
troubles, 144; his children, 
145 ff. ; encounter with 
Marchand, 153, 173; joins 
the Mizler Society, 161; 
his journeys, i7off. ; made 
Weissenfels court com- 
poser, 175; criticised by 
Mattheson and Scheibe, 
178 ff. ; Gesner's pane- 
gyric, 184; Hudemann's 
tribute, 185; scarcity of 
contemporary references 
to him, 185 ; eye troubles, 
222, 223; his final woiks, 
223; death, 224; tributes 
to his memory, 225 fL 

His grave, 162; dis- 
covery of his skull, 163; 
slow recognition of his 
greatness, 227 ff. ; fate of 
his M.S.S., 234 ff. ; revival 
in the 19th century: For- 
kel, Rochlitz and others, 
235 ff.; revival of the 
St. Matthew Passion, 
241 ff. ; the St John Pas- 
sion, 245; the B minor 
Mass, 245; publication of 
his works, 249 ff . ; growth 
of his fame, 257 ff. ; his 
influence on modem mu- 
sic, 261. 

Character, Appearance, Hob- 
its, etc. 

Defects as pedagogue 
and organiser, I. 102, 133; 



Index. 



471 



irascibility, 102, 133, 151; 
stubbornness, X02, 15 1 ; 
amiability and modesty, 
151 ff.; impartiality, 151; 
benevolence, 152; dignity 
153; industry, 154; at- 
titude towards other men's 
works, 156; hospitality, 
157; economy and busi- 
ness sense, 157 ff.; por- 
traits, 160 ff. ; appearance, 
164; his objective and 
subjective life, I. 164 ff., 
170; disregard of his own 
works, 165, 166; his piety, 
166, 167; humour, 167; 
culture, 168, 182, 187 ff.; 
religion, 168, 169; mys- 
ticism, 169; II. 202, 207, 
280; preoccupation with 
death, I. 169, 170; fond- 
ness for travel, 170; re- 
putation as a pexiormer, 
178; his reading, 188; 
friends, 186; his reserve, 
186, 187; self-taught, 188, 
192, 198; his indifference 
to theory, 189, 198; learn- 
ed from other musicians, 
192 ; transcriptions of other 
music, 192 ff. ; interest in 
inventions, 198 ff. ; views 
on clavier and organ build- 
uig, 199 ff. ; preference for 
the clavichord, 203 ff. ; his 
inventions, 204, 205; his 
innovations in fingering, 
206; clavier playing, 207; 
organ playing, 208; violin 
playing, 208; viola play- 
hig* 209 ; improvisation, 
209 ff. ; organ registration, 
210; method of composi- 
tion, 2 1 1 ff . ; mathematical 
habit of mind, 212; acoustic 
sense, 213; as a teacher, 
214 ff.; his pupils, 2i4ff.; 
his affinity with Wagner, 
258. 



Bench's children: 
Bemhard, I. 145 n. 
Carl Philipp Emmanuel, 
I. 22, 71, 74, 97, 99 n.. 
107, 145; life, 147 ff.; 
his avarice, 158; his 
hospitality, 159; neglect 
of his stepmother, 159, 
160, 188; on fingering, 
206, 207 ; on his father's 
improvisation, 210, 216; 
as a composer, 220, 
221, 223, 225, 227, 229; 
neglect of his father's 
church music, 232, 234; 
235» 237. 2520., 253, 
275, 278, 281, 291, 316, 

322, 335. 347 «•. 395. 

415, 416, 424, 425; II. 

30, 31, 44, 129, 167, 

168, 172, 176, 260, 302, 

312, 323, 450. 
Catharina Dorothea, 1. 107, 

145 n. 
Christian Gottlieb, 1. 14$ n. 
Christiane Benedicta, I. 

145 n. 
Christiane Dorothea, I. 

145 n. 
Christiane Sophia Hen- 

riette, I. 145 n. 
David (?). I. 145. 
Elisabeth Juliane Friede- 

rike, I. 145 n., 150. 
Emestus Andreas, I. I45n. 
Gottfried Heinrich, I. 14$. 
Johann August Abraham, 

I. 145 a. 
Johann Christian, I. I45n., 

149. 159. 

Johann Christoph Fried- 
rich, I. 145 n., 148. 

Johann Gottfried Bem- 
hard, I. 107, 148. 

Johanna Caroline, I. I45n., 

150. 
Regina Susanna, I. 145 n., 

150, 239. 

Regine Johanna, I. 145 n. 



473 



Index. 



Wilhelm Friedemann, I, 
I07, 109, 144 If., 160. 
175 if., 188, 201 n., 216. 
220 if.. 234 ff., 27 S» 278, 
279» 323, 335, 386, 395, 
399, 415, 424. 425; II. 
129, 290. 354. 
As artist: 

Bach an objective art- 
ist, I. i; zelation to his 
piedeceflBOTBand hb epoch, 
I — 4, 96; nae of old cho- 
rales, II, 12, 13, 16, 19, 
20, 21; inOuenced by 
Italian music, 22, 30; in- 
fluenced by French organ 
music, 37 n. ; writes in the 
style of Pachelbel, Bdhm, 
and Buxtehude, 44 ff. ; 
makes the chorale prelude 
poetical, 48 ff. ; his rela- 
tion to Schutz, 67; ends 
an epoch,96 ; as conductor, 
126; pictorial quality of 
his music, I. 247; II. 2 ff., 
42 ff., 55. 56 ff., 74 ff., 
132, 143, 145, 146 ff., 159, 
162. 169, 187, 191, 195, 
213, 215 ff., 227 ff.. 244, 

256, 307. 351. 358» 360, 
362, 366, 374 ff-; archi- 
tectonic quality of his 
music, I. 213; Gothic 
quality of his art, 213; 
relation of his music to 
his text, II. 25 ff., 42 ff., 
68 fl ; structure of his 
phrases, II. 27 ff . ; dis- 
regard of rtiyme endings, 
II. 28; his declamation, 
II. 29 ff., 132, 145, 215; 
"harmonises the words" 
of the chorales, II. 30 ff . ; 
his conception of Bible 
words, II. 35; drastic 
quality of his expression, 
II. ^6; his attitude to- 
wards programme music, 
II. 39; his attitude to- 



wards opera, II. 41; his 
nature-painting, II. 43 ; 
his symbolism, II. 48 ff., 
1 84 If.; his definite for- 
mulae constitute a mu- 
sical language, II. 49 ff.; 
origin and development of 
his musical language, II. 
55 ff.; the musical lang- 
uage of the chorales and 
cantatas, II. 56 ff., 74 if., 
120 ff.; his organ tech- 
nique and studies, I.268ff. ; 
his poetic and pictorial 
treatment of the organ 
chorale, I. 283 ff. 
"Motives" in his works: 
Grief: II. 34, 51. 64 ff., 
73* "OS ff., 205 ff., 
212, 217, 225, 255, 

332. 

Peace: II. 34, 51, 63 ff., 
207. 

Joy: II. 34, 51, 65 ff., 
70, 109 ff., 167 ff., 
202, 207, 235, 241 n., 
245 n., 250 n., 316, 

332. 336, 337. 338. 

341* 355 ff- 3^. 362, 

3^, 367* 371. 373. 

39;. 
"Step"-motives: II. 51, 

60 ff., 73, 86 ff., 187, 

215, 224, 225, 234, 

322, 335. 337. 361. 

371. 
Exhaustion : II. 5 1 , 62 ff .» 

92 ff. 
Tumult: II. $1, 90 ff., 

141, 192, 245, 327, 

331- 
Satan: II. 51, 7B. 
Angels: II. 51, 80, 195. 
Felicity: II. 54. 99 ff., 

235- 
"Speaking" motives: II. 

67 ff. 

Resurrection: II. 74. 



Index. 



473 



Waves: II. 75 if., 159* 
206, 255, 256, 356, 

364. 
Solemnity: II. 94 H., 

20s, 344. 356, 367* 

395. 
Passion: II. 95, 96. 

Terror: II. 103 if., 189, 

219. 
Co-operation of motives, 

II. 1 14 if. 
RepresentatioD of bells, 
II. 77, 189. 193, 206, 
230, 249, 275, 368; 
laughter. II. 7S; ser- 
pents, II. 78 if., 96, 154, 
164. 194* 244> 263 ; time, 
II. 198, 240; ascent, II. 
8iy 82; wings, II. 82, 
369; falling, II. 82 if., 
373 ; movement, II. 84 f f . , 

234. 355. 370. 
Bader, I. 242. 
Barblan, I. 425. 
Bamier, T., I. 260. 
Barth, H., I. 256 n. 
Batka, R., I. 256 n. 
Becker, Augnst, I. 172. 

— C, I. 64 n. 

— K. F., I. 251. 
Beerens, J., I. 71. 
Beethoven, I. 22, 163 n., 164, 

165, 236 n., 237 n., 239, 240, 
249, 251, 257, 364, 395; 
II. 7, 14, 19 £f., 40 ff., 49 if., 

323. 393. 
Bellermann, I. 171. 

Benedict, Julius, II. 18. 

Berlin Singakademie, I. 120 n., 

233 n., 241, 243 ff., 252 n., 

416. 
BerUos, II. 5, 7, 21 ff., 42 if., 

195, 248. 
Bemhard, Christoph, I. 59, 70, 

75. 78. 
Biedermann, II. 275 ff., 292. 

Bimbaum, I. 181 £f., 187, 188; 

II. 288. 

Bischof, I. 337 n. 



Bitter, C. H., I. 255, 336. 

Bocklin, II. 10, 11. 

Bohm, I. 2, 41, 42 ; his treatment 

of the chorale prelude, I. 

45 ff., 99, 100 n., 282, 283, 

291 ff., 300; II. 62. 
Bordds, I. 259. 
Bouchor, M., I. 259. 
Bouvet, C, I. 259. 
Boyvin, I. 37 n. 
Brahms, I. 48, 222, 254, 257. 
Brandenburg, Margrave of, I. 

403. 
Breslau Singakademie, I. 246. 

Bret, G., 259, 260; II. 37 n. 

Briegel, W. K., I. 74. 

Brockes, B. H., I. 93; II. 174, 

209. 

Bmhns, N., I. 47 n., 385. 

BuU, Ole, I. 390. 

Bulow, Hans von, I. 221 n., 

355. 382. 

Bumler, I. 225 n., 227. 

Bnmey, Dr., I. 221, 229, 230, 
232, 295. 

Busolt, I. 242. 

Busoni, I. 319, 355, 382. 

Buxtehude, I. 2, 41, 42, 44 n.; 
his treatment of the chorale 
prelude, 46 ff., 75, 76; and 
the "Abendmusiken", 77 ft,, 
84 n., 89 n., loi, 19(6, 267, 
268, 276, 280 ff., 291 ff., 
38s; II. 124. 

Byrd, W., I. 83 n. 

Caccini, I. 57 n. 

Caldara, I. 156, 195. 

Calvin, I. 7, 20. 

Calvisius, I. 33. 

Cantata, grows out of the motet, 
I. 3, 51, 68; its struggle for 
admission into the church, 
3 ; Bach's relation to, 3 ; its 
popularity in the i8th cen- 
tury, 39; its liturgical and 
musical history, 51 ff.; the 
problem of the text, 61 ff.; 
strophic form and madrigal 



474 



Index. 



form, 63 if. ; early titles for 
the cantata form, 68; tran- 
sitional forms, 73; brilliant 
treatment of the orchestra, 
yS ff. ; growth of the instru- 
mental style of vocal writ- 
ing* 79 i treatment of the 
chorale, 80; the new cantata, 
80 ff. ; influence of dramatic 
ideas, 81 ff.; distinction of 
aria and recitative, 81 ; Neu- 
meister's texts, 91 ff., II. 131, 
138. 139. i45» ^01; Salomo 
Franck's texts, I. 92 ; II. 131, 
136, 140 ff., 152, 153, 161 ff., 
196, 261; Bach's cantatas 
and modem cond[ition&, I. 
262 ff . ; question of perform- 
ing the preludes in the con- 
cert-room, I. 409 ff. 

Cantica de tempoxe, I. 38, 39, 
288. 

Carissimi, I. 69 n. 

Cart, W., I. 256 n. 

Catechism hymns, I. 38, 289. 

Cavaill6-Coll, I. 299 n., 300 n. 

Celli Tablature, I. 38. 

Cembalo: see Clavicembalo. 

Chaconne, I. 280. 

Choir, the, in Bach's music, 
II. 417 ff., 443 ff. 

Choir singing in the German 
service, I. 24 ff . 

Chorale [see also "Hymn"], the 
foundation of Bach's work, 
I. 2 ; he harmonises the text 
as well as the melody, 2; 
history of the chorale texts, 
4 — 14; history of the melo- 
dies, 14 — 24; organ accom- 
paniment to in the 17 th 
century, 36; and the art- 
song, 64. 

Chorale cantatas, I. 80; II. 
240 ff., 352 ff. 

Chorade prelude (and fantasia), 
Bach's relation to, I. 2, 
283 ff. ; early history of, 
40 ff.; treatment of by 



Pachelbel, Bdhm and Buxte- 

hude, 42 ff.; poetical and 

musical treatment of, 48, 

49 ; Bach expresses the texts. 

283 ff. 
Christian, Duke of Weissenfels, 

I. 186; II. 261, 263. 
Christiane Eberhardine, Queen, 

I, 121 ff.; II. 186, 203, 208. 
Church service, music in the 

German, I. 24 ff., 39 ff., 

high estimate of in Germany, 

I. 69 ff., 233, 248 ft 
Qaudin von Sermisy, I. 83 n. 
Clavecin: See Clavicembalo. 
Clavicembalo, mechanism of, 

I. 201, 208; works written 

for, 324. 
Clavichord, mechanism of, I. 

200; Bach's preference for, 

203 ff., 208. 
Clavier, varieties of in Bach's 

time, I. 200 ff. 
Clement VIII, Pope, I. 25. 
Clementi, I. 335, 369. 
C16rambault, I. 37 n. 
Collegium musicum at Leipzig: 

see Telemaim SingingSociety. 
Combarieu, J., II. 7. 
Concordia Formula, I. 113. 
Conducting in the i8th century, 

I. 126. 

Congregational singing in the 
German service, I. 24 ff . ; in 
Bach's time, 38 ff . ; in Bach's 
works, 39; in the epoch after 
Bach, 39, 40; in the future, 
40. 

Copernicus, I. 96. 

Corelli, I. 192, 197, 268, 390 n., 

395. 
Cometto in Bach's scores, II. 

433 «. 
Costa, A., I. 261. 

Council of Trent, I. 25. 

Couperin, P., I. 37 n., 192, 206, 

229. 327. 414 n. 
Cramer, I. 369. 

Cranach, Lucas, I. 28. 



Index. 



475 



Cristofori, I. 201. 
Cniger, J., I. 13. 21. 
Cyprian de Rore, I. 56 n. 
Czemy, I. 327 n., 364 n., 369. 

Da capo aria, I. 62, 81, 88; 

Dach, Simon, I. 1 1 n. 
Dandrieu, I. 37 n. 
D'Aquin, I. 37 n. 
"Daughter of Zion", I. 93. 
Decius, N., I. 8, 16. 
Dehn, I. 251 n., 252 n., 275. 
Devrient, E., I. 242, 243. 

Deyling, Salomo, I. 113, 129, 
142, 143, 238 n. 

Didier-Pouget, II. 14. 
Dieskau, K. H. von, II. 289. 
Dieuport, I. 156. 
Doles, J. F., I. 215, 231, 232; 

II. 268, 275, 354. 
Dorffel, I. 253. 

Dresden, condition of musicians 

in, I. 116. 
Drese, J. S., I. 105. 
— J. W., I. 105, io6. 
Duben family, I. 78. 
Du Mage, I. 37 n. 
Durandus, I. 82. 
Durer, I. 237, 238. 
Dutch organ playing, I. 36. 
Dynamics: see Nuances. 

Eccard, I. 2, 34, 35, 68 n., 248; 

II. 30. 
Editions of Bach's works, defects 

of, I. 382 ff. ; II. 446 n. 
Eilmar, G. C„ I. 168; II. 124. 
"Ein' feste Burg", origin of, 

I. 16 ; three typical forms of, 

I. 23* 24. 
Einicke, G. R, I. 215; II. 276. 
Eitner, I. 229. 

Elmenhorst, H., I. 84, 85, 89, 90. 
English Handel Society, I. 251. 
Erard, S.. I. 208. 352. 
Erdmann, I. 99, iii, 115, 136, 

145. 158- 



Erfurt Enchiridion, I. 7, 8, 13, 

15, 28. 
Erk, L., II. 31. 
Ernst Aug^t (Duke) of Weimar, 

I. 17s, 186. 

Emesti, Heinrich, I. 117, 133; 

II. 295. 

Emesti (the younger), I. 133, 
140 ff., 158, 174 n., 176; 
II. I33» 288. 

Fasch, J. P., I. 119, 241 n. 

— K. F. C, I. 120 n., 241 n. 
Faur6, Gabriel, I. 259. 
Figured bass in Bach's works, 

I. 400 ff., 444 ff. 
Fingering, Bach's innovations 

in, I. 206; his method, 207. 
Fischer (Freiburg), I. 422. 

— W., I. 152 n. 
Flemming, Count, I. 154; II. 

292. 

— Paul, I. 1 1 n. 
Flugel: see Clavicembalo. 
Flute, I. 205 ; Bach's use of the, 

I, 408; II. 432 ff. 
Forkel, I. 74, 97, 151, 153, 155, 

187, 196, 202, 208, 210, 
216 ff., 234; his life of Bach, 
235 ff., 252 n., 255, 279, 295, 
328, 336, 416, 425, 426; 

II. 205, 209. 

Pranck, Johann, I. 11, 12, 21, 
196. 

— Salomo, I. 92; II. 127, 131, 

133. 136. 138. 140, 142. 

144 ff., 152, 153, i6x ff., 210, 

261. 
Frankfort Cacilienverein, I. 

233 n., 245; II. 126. 
Franz, Robert, I. 257; II. 446, 

447, 450 n. 
Frederick the Great, I. 147, 153, 

176 ff., 202, 225, 241 n., 417. 
French organ composers, in- 
fluence of on Bach, I. 192. 

— organ playing, I. 36, ^7. 

— songs in the German psalter, 
I. 19, 20. 



476 



Index. 



Frescobaldi, I. 37* 43, 460. 

75, 156, 192. 267, 268, 276. 
F^eudenberg (Frankenberg). I. 

8911. 
Freylinghausen, J. A., I. 13. 
Friedrich August II., II. 270^ 

373. 285. 
Friedrich Wilhelm, Electoral 

Prince, I. 12. 
Friese, H., I. 109. 
Frdber, G., II. 232. 
Froberger, I. 99, 192; II. i. 
Frohne, L 168. 
Fuchs, Henriette, I. 259. 
Fugues on the name of Bach, 

I. 425- 
Fox, I. 227. 

Oabrieli, A., I. 56. 

— G., L 56, 57, 66. 69x1. 
Galileo, I. 96. 
Gastoldi, I. 19. 
Gaudlitz, I. 131. 
Gaudon, I. 100. 

GeUert, I. 23. 

Georg Wilhelm, Duke of Bruns- 
wick, I. 100. 

Gerber, E. L., I. 71, 205, 217 n., 
227 n., 326, 332, 394; n. 295, 
297 n. 

— J. N., I. 214, 216, 218. 332; 

II. 450 n. 

Gerhardt, Paul, I. 12, 13, 19, 21. 

Gerold, T., II. 408 n. 

Gesnei", J. M., I. 138, 140, 183, 

188; II. 265. 
Geulinx, II. 4. 
Gevaert, I. 259, 260; II. 438, 

439. 453. 467. 
Gewandhaus concerts, origin of, 

I. 144. 
Geyersbach, I. 102. 
Gigault, I. 37 n. 
Gigout, I. 259, 297 n. 
Ghick, I. 81, 181. 
Goethe, I. x6i, 229 n., 236, 240, 

241 n., 250, 402, 405 ; 11. 8 if., 

12, 16, 297, 325. 
Goldberg, J. T., I. 215, 322. 



G6mer» I. 120 if., 151, 157 s 
II. 204, 268, 271, 273. 

Gottsched, I. 95, xi6. 144, 180; 
II. 204, 20s. 

Gounod, I. 259. 

Grassi, Cecilia, I. 149. 

Graun, I. 183, 199. 215, 227, 

231. 243. 
Graupner, I. xii, X12. 
Gregory, Pope, I. 5. 
Greuter, I. 160. 
Griepenkerl, 1. 250 n., 288, 425 n. 
Grigny, I. 37 n., 156. 
Grove, George, I. 335. 
Guilmant, I. 259, 297 n. 
Gumprecht, J. G., I. 76. 

— Otto, I. 256 n. 

BUunburg, music in, I. 39, 75^ 
79. 232, 233; the opera in, 
84 ff.; religious music in- 
fluenced by opera, 86 ff. 

Hammerklavier, I. 201. 

Hammerschmidt, I. 73. 

Hampel, A., II. 441. 

Handel, I. 2, 44 n.. 69 n., 71, 

«5. 87. 93. 94. 105, 1470., 
156, 185. 190, 215, 222, 227, 
230, 231, 233 n., 238, 260, 
295. 3^5; H- 25, 174. 281, 
306, 393, 450 n. 

Hanslick, II. 17, 19, 446. 

"Harmonic Labyrinth", I. 2 ion. 

Harmonium, the, in Bach's 
works, II. 453. 

Harrer, G,, I. 231. 

Hasse, I. 175, 186, 227, 230, 231. 

Hassler, Hans Leo, I. 19, 33. 

Hauptmann, M., I. 246, 251, 
253 n., 2565 II. 127 n. 

Hauser, F., I. 246 n., 251, 252 n., 
254. 

— J., I. 252 n. 

Haydn, I. 220, 221, 229, 236 n., 

257. 
Heermann, J., I. 11 n., 55; 

II. 146. 

Hegel, I. 244, ^8 n. 

Heine, II. 10. 



Index. 



477 



Heinichen, J. D., I. 107, 210 n., 

334. 
Heinrich Postumus von Reuss, 

I. 65 n. 

Heitmann, J. J., I. no. 

Helbig, II. 146, X48. 

— Frau, I. 261. 
Helmholtz, II. 7. 
Hennicke, J. C, II. 289, 348. 
Henrici, C. F. (see Picander). 
Herberger, V., I. 11. 
Hergott. I. 8. 

Hering, II. 176. 
Hennann, N., I. 16, 55. 
Herpol, H., I. 55. 
Herthum, C., I. xoi. 
Hildebrand, Z., I. 204; II. 165. 
Hilgenfeldt, C. L., I. 255 n., 

336. 415 n. 
Hiller, J. A., I. 22, 160, 227, 

231. 444. 
His, WUhelm, I. 162 n. 

Hoffmann, I. 204. 

Homilius, G. A., I. 215. 

Horn in Bach's scores, II. 433 ff. 

Hoademann, I. 423. 

Hudemann, P., I. 185. 

Huguenot Psalter, I. 20. 

Hunold ("Menantes"), I. 93 if. 

Hurlebusch, H. L., I. 154. 

Hymn [see also Chorale], de- 
velopment of the German, 
I. 5 ff ., 38 ; place in the Ger- 
man Protestant service, 5 3 ff . ; 
Gospel hymns, 53 ff. ; the 
strophic form and the mad- 
rigal form, 64 ff . ; the French 
hynm, L 7. 

Indy, Vincent d', 1. 259 ; II. 31 n. 
Isaac, H., I. 18, 29, 30. 
Italian influence on German 

church music, I. 21, 30, 68 n., 

82. 

— — on Bach, I. 22, 23, 196, 

198, 268 n. 

on Schutz, I. 56, 66. 

Italian organ playing, I. 36, 37, 
46 n. 



Italian songs in the German 
psalter, I. 19, 20. 

Jahn, Otto, I. 251. 

Job, I. 134. 

Johann Ernst (Duke of Weimar), 

I. 100, 193, 194 n., 384. 
Jonas, Justus, I. 7, 28. 
Josephus, I. 188. 

Josquin des Prds, I, 29, 56 n. 

BLant, I. 163 n., 214. 
Kayserling, Baron von, I. i86« 

215, 322. 
Keiser, I. 8$, 86. 93 ff., 156; 

II. 174. 
Keller, G., II. 10. 

— H., I. 273. 

Kellner, J. P., I. 189 n., 271, 
386; II. 266, 4$on. 

Kerl, I. 99. 

Keudel, von, I. 261. 

Kirchbach, Herr von, I. 121, 
122, 144; II. 204. 

Kirleisen, I. 5. 

Kimberger, I. 158, 161, 215, 
222, 227 n., 235, 252, 401, 
405, 422; II. 298, 299 n., 
450. 

Kittel, I. 161, 215, 266. 

Klemm, Herr and Fran, 1. 148 n. 

Klopstock, I. 148 n., 220 n. 

KoUer, J. P., I. 143. 

KoUmann, I. 337. 

Komer, II. 12. 

Kortte, G., II. 271. 

Kostlin, I. 15. 

Krause, GottUeb T., I. 140. 

— Gottfried, II. 278. 

— Johann G., I. 140 ff., 174 n. ; 
II. 296. 

Krebs, J. L., I. 144, 215, 221, 
246; II. 33. 

— J. T., I. 214. 
Kretzschmar, II. 467. 
Kriegel, A., I. 225. 
Krieger, P., I. 91. 
Kroll, I. 337. 



478 



Index. 



Kuhnao, I. 44 n., 71, 90, 96, 
III, ii2« 115; his struggles 
with the Leipzig Council, 
11711, 123 n., 124; his an- 
tipathy to the new art, 118; 
121, 127, 128, 130. 13s, 172. 
178. 321, 342, 344; 11. I, 140, 
149, 150. 155, 167, 174, 297. 

Kuntzen, J. R., I. 89 n. 

Kuttler, I. 141. 

Lamartine, II. 12. 

Lambo, I. 159. 

Landowska, Wanda, I. 353. 

Lassus, Orlando, I. Ss n. 

Legrenzi, J. 192, 197, 268. 

Leipzig, church music in, I. 39; 
musical conditions in, 1 13 ff. ; 
quarrel between council and 
consistory, 113; Bach's du- 
ties at St. Thomas's, 114; 
remuneration of musicians, 
116; state of St. Thomas's 
school, ii6ff. ; choir and 
orchestra at the four churches, 
123 ff. ; quality of Bach's 
singers, 124; his orchestra, 
125; duties of the cantor 
and prefects, 125; routine 
of the church service, 125 ff., 
129, 173; place of the can- 
tata in the service, 126, 127; 
the sermon, 127; the organ 
preludes, 127; the service 
on feast days, 129; the Pas- 
sion, 130; use of Latin, 130; 
the hymn-book, 131; Bach's 
criticism of the choir and 
orchestra, 134; Gesner re- 
organises the school, 138; 
attitude of the council to- 
wards Bach, 138. 

Lenmiens, I. 297 n. 

Leopold t., I. loi. 

Leopold, Prince of Anhalt- 
Cothen, I. 106, 174, x86, 
332, 403; II. 208, 265. 

Lessing, I. 95. 

Lituus, the, 11. 371, 434 n. 



Liszewski, I. 161. 

Liszt, L 254, 257, 319, 355, 425; 

11. I, 19. 
Lobwasser, A., I. 20. 
Lohenstein, von, I. 180. 
Lotti, I. 156, 192, 198. 
Lotze, II. 7. 
Louise, Queen of Prussia, I. 

149 n. 
Lute-clavicembalo, I. 204. 
Luther, I. 6ff., 15; and the 

melodies of the German 

chorales, 1 5 ff., 24, 26, 28 ; 

and the church service, 29 ff., 

51 ; and the Mass, 51 ff., 66, 

168; II. 60, 61. 

Rladrigal, I. 60 ff. 

Magdeburg, Joachim, I. 19. 

Mahaut, A., II. 31 n. 

Majer, Caspar, I. 389 n. 

Maler, I. 7. 

Marcello, I. 193, 194 n. 

Marchand, I. 3711.. 153, 173, 
^77» 225, 327. 

Maxpurg, I. 71, 227, 235, 252, 
422 ff. 

Martini, Padre, I. 149. 

Mass in the Protestant service, 
I. 5 1 ff. ; statutory hymns 
replaced by German hymns, 
54; neglect of the statutory 
portions by Protestant com- 
posers, 54. 

Mattheson, I. 39, 43, 44, 64. 
70, 71, 85 ff., 94, TOO, no; 
criticises Bach, 178 ff.; 185, 
189, 193* 203, 226, 325, 334, 
392 ff„ 426; II. I, 132, 136, 
152, 174, 276, 297, 371, 
450 a. 

Melanchthon, I. 83, 113 n. 

Mendelssohn, I. 12, 147 n., 
240 ff., 245 ff., 251, 252 n., 
257, 260, 261, 267 n., 269 n., 
272, 273, 285, 292, 335, 387, 
402, 405, 409; II. 20, 50, 165, 
216, 296, 299 n., 462, 468. 

— Fanny, I. 243, 2460. 



Index. 



479 



Mengarini, Frau, I. 261. 
Merulo, Claudio, I. 460., 56. 
Meyer, J., I. 89. 
Michelangelo, II. 10, 161. 
Milder, I. 242. 
Mizler, I. 189 ff. 
Mizler Musical Society, I. 161, 
189/1, 192, 223, 225, 281. 
Monteverde, I. 56 ff., 66, 81. 
Moritz of Hesse-Cassel, I. 56. 

— of Saxony, I. 1 5 n. 
Mosewius, I. 246 fl, 249, 256; 

II. 2, 3, 468. 

Motet, develops into the can- 
tata, I. 3, 30, 51, 68. 

Motta, Vianna da, I. 319, 355, 
408. 

Mozart, I. 150 n., 232, 236 n.; 

II- 7. 37. 50. 297, 393. 
Moffat, G., I. 46 n., 198 n., 322, 

38911. 
MuUer, A. £., I. 160, 246. 

— A. F., II. 269. 

— (of Brunswick), I. 335. 
Munch, Prof., I. 264 n. 
Musculus, Wolfgang, I. 27, 31. 
Musicians, status and culture 

of in 17th and i8th cen- 
turies, I. 69 ff., 134, 135. 

Miithel, J. G., I. 215. 

Mystery Pla3rs, I. 5. 

Naumann, I. 253. 

Neefe, I. 240. 

Neumeister, E., I. 91 ff., 109, 

no; II. 127, 131, 138, 139. 

145, 152, 201. 
Nicolai, P., I. 11, 20, 21. 
Nietzsche, I. 6; II. 12. 
Nuances in Bach's works, I. 

355 «.* 397. 407; II. 41. 
409 ff. 

Oboe, Bach's use of the, II. 433. 
Oboe da caccia, 11. 433. 
Oboe d'amore, invention of, 

I. 205; Bach's use of the, 

II. 128 ff., 433. 
Obrecht, J., I. 83. 



Ochs, Siegfried, II. 247, 325, 

418, 443- 

Offenbach, II. 279. 

Olbreuse, Desmier d', I. 100. 

Opera, origin of, I. 57. 

Opitz, I. 59 n. 

Orchestration of Bach's can- 
tatas, II. 421 if. 

Organ, ancient and modem, 
I. 295 ff., 304, 310. 

— in the German church ser- 
vice, I. 24 ff. 

— playing, early, I. 26, 41, 
42 ; development of from tiie 
chorale, I. 36, 42 ff. 

— playing, Bach's, I. 208, 
294 ff. 

— and the thorough-bass part 
in Bach's works, II. 447 ff. 

— building, early, I. 42. 

Bach's views on, I. I99ff. 

Ornaments in Bach's works, 

I. 216, 279, 316 ff., 354 ff.; 

II. 405 ff. 
Osiander, I. 32. 

Pachelbel, I. 2, 39, 41 ; his treat- 
ment of the chorale prelude, 
42 ff . ; his influence on Ger- 
man organ playing, 43 ff . ; 
99, 196, 283, 291 ff., 298, 
414 n.; II. 137, 245, 329. 

Painting, German and French, 
11. II. 

Palestrina, I. 156, 198; II. 15. 

Palschau, I. 266, 385. 

Passacaglia, I. 280. 

Passion, the, I. 3; history of, 
82 ff. ; varieties, 83 ff. ; the 
new theatrical Passion, 93ff. ; 
Brockes' poem, 93 ff. ; intro- 
duction of chorale strophes, 
93 ; the Passion in the Leip- 
zig church service, 130. 

Pedal-glockenspiel, designed by 
Bach, I. 204. 

Peri, Jacopo, I. 57 n. 

Petzold, I. 114, 133. 

Philipp, Isidor, I. 319. 



48o 



Index. 



Phrasing in Bach's music, I. 
312 If.. 365 ff., 379 tt. 

Pianoforte, the, I. 201 ff., 208, 
352 ff., 398 ff. 

PIcander, I. 144; II. 42, 74, 130, 

152, 155, 159. 164, 172 fL, 

186, 202, 208 fL, 231, 233, 

235. 243. 252, 260, 268 ff., 

^73» ^7^» ^7^> 280, 286, 289, 

305. 331. 343» 352, 366. 367. 

375. 
Pietism, I. 39, 168, 248. 

Pigalle, IL 234. 

Pino, A., I. 256 n. 

Pisendel, I. 227. 

Pitschel, I. 196. 

Pdlchau, I, 97 n., 252, 385, 

386; II. 166. 
Polyphonic violin playing, I. 

380 ff. 
Pdnickau, J. C. von, II. 202. 
Postel, I. Z7 n., 93. 
Ptaetorius, I. 2, 34, 35, 58,69n., 

71, 86 n.; II. 30. 
Programme music, 1. 194 n., 249; 

II. I ff., 8 ff., i8 ff., 39 ff. 
Prout, E., I. 335. 
Prussian Fugue", I. 158. 



«r 



Quantz, I. 22, 227, 450 n. 
Quartgeige, I. 409. 
Quintilian, I. 184. 

Raison, I. 37 n. 

Rameau, I. 227. 

Ramler, I. 220 n. 

Rationalism emd the old church 

music, I. 14, 23 ; 39 ; and the 

new music, I. 228; 234; 248. 
Ranch, I. 85 n. 
R^, Ren6 de, I. 255. 
Reger, Max, I. 48, 261, 319, 

425. 
Reichardt, I. 159, 230, 266. 
Reimarus, I. 148 n. 
Reinken, J. A., I. 4$, 84, 109, 

no, 174, 194, 225, 272,283, 

293» 342. 
Reiser, Anton, I. 85 n. 



Reissmann, I. 256 n. 

Rhaw, G., I. 83. 

Ricercare, I. 419. 

Richter, E. F. E., I. 253 n. 

Riemann, I. 221 n. 

Riesemann, O. von, I. 136. 

Rietz, I. 242; II. 223. 

Rinck, II. 266. 

Ringwalt, B., I. 55. 

Rinkart, M., I. 11. 

Rinuccini, I. 59 n. 

Rist, Johann, I. ii; IL 196 n* 

Rivinus, II. 266. 

Roberday, I. 37 n. 

Rochlitz, I. 145, 150 n., 232, 

237 ff., 249. 252 n., 338, 

354; II. 449, 450. 
Roitsch, I. 250 n., 425 n. 
Rolle, I. 172. 
Rubens, I. 238. 

Rudolstadt, Prince of, I, 202. 
Ruetz, I. yy. 
Rupff, Conrad, I. 15. 
Rust, F. W., I. 253. 

— W., I. 253, 266, 290, 293, 
316, 400, 424; II. 128, i66» 
208, 209. 309. 

St. Thomas's school and chmch 
[see Leipzig]. 

— cantors of, I. 35, 44 n., 90, 
160, 23 T, 246, 253. 

Sachs, Hans, II. 367. 
Saint^a6ns, I. 259, 319. 
Scarlatti, A., I. 81 n., 341. 

— D., I. 341. 
Schatzel, I. 242. 

Scheibe, J., I. 151, 152, 174. 

— J. A., L 151, 152, 178 tt., 
i87ff., 208, 227 n., 280, 295, 
322, 351; IL 276, 288. 

Scheidemann, H., I. 45. 
Scheidt, S., I. 35 ff., 46. 
Schein, J.H., I. 35, 63. 
Schelble, I. 245, 246, 251; 

II. 126, 468. 
Schemelli, I. 22; II. 32 n., 300. 
Schenkendorf, Max von, I. 14. 
Schering, A., I. 193, 264, 388 ft 



I 
I 



Index. 



481 



Schicht, J. G.. I. 246, 250, 

2520.; II. 295. 
Schiefferdecker, I. 75, 89. 
Schiller, II. 11. 
Schmidt, B., I. 322, 335. 

— (of Zella), I. 423. 
Schneider, Johann, I. 215; II. 

237. 
Schola cantorum, I. 259. 

Schopenhauer, I. 244; II. 7. 

Schott, G., I. 84. 

Schreck, II. 414. 

Schrdter (of Nordhauaen), II. 

276. 

— G., I, 201, 202. 
Schubart, J. M., I. 214. 
Schubert, I. 163 n.; II. 7, 21 ff., 

27* 5I1 75. 
Schubler, I. 417, 423. 

Schumann, R., I. 12, 245, 251, 

252, 292, 386, 425; II. 22. 

— Clara, I. 285. 

Schutz. H., I. 3, 56 ff., 63 ff., 
70 ff., 79 n., 80 ff., 93 n.» 
102. 

— (of Berka), I. 240. 
Schwenke, I. 158, 159, 252 n., 

331, 336; II. 325. 
Sebastiani, J., I. 93 n. 
Seffner, I. 163. 

Sei^ert, I. 365 ; II. 453 n., 466. 
Selnekker, N., I. 8. 
Senfl, Ludwig, I. 30. 
Serpent, the, II. 434. 
Silbermann organs, I. 175, 200, 

296, 299, 311; II. 452, 453. 

— pianos, I, 177, 202, 203. 
Singers and Bach's music, II. 

412 ff. 
Sorge, G. A., I. 155, 334. 
Spener, P. J., I. 168 n., 169. 
Speratus, P., I. 8. 
Spinet, the, I. 201 n. 
Spiro, F., I. 408. 
Spitta, Fr., I. 84 n., 254 n. 

— Ph., I. 14. 

— Philipp (biographer of Bach), 
I. 42, 92, 105, 253 n.; his 
Life of Bach, 254 ff. ; 267, 

Schwcitxer, Bach. H. 



279, 288, 291, 293; fails to 
see the pictorial bent of 
Bach, II. 3ff., 46 ff.; 52, 
128, 132, 140, 144, 150* 160, 
165 n., 167, 203, 209, 28i« 

349. 351. 
Spohr, I. 390 n. 

Spontini, I. 243. 

Sporck, Count, II. 312. 

Stade, L 33711. 

Stauber, J. L., I. 103; II. 123 n. 

Steffani, A., I. 69 n. 

Steinbach, Fritz, I. 408. 

— G. A., II. 123 n. 

Stockhausen, J., II. 126, 247^ 

407 n., 408, 417. 
Stolzel, I. 225 n., 227. 
Straube, R., I. 215. 
Strauss, Richard, II. i. 
Strecker, A., II. 123 n. 
Stunner, I. 242. 
Suite, history of the, I. 326 ff. 
Sweelinck, I. 36, 45. 
Swieten, von, I. 236 n. 
Symbolical element in musical 

expression, II. 16 ff. 

Taille, the, II. 433 n. 

Taine, II. 10. 

Tappert, W., I. 334. 

Tauler, I. 168. 

Telemann, I. 70, 85 ff., 106, 
iiiff., 119, 120, 148, 156, 
176, 183, 186, 190, 193 tt-. 
225, 227, 235; II. I, 2. 149. 

Telemann Singing Society, I. 
86 n., 119, 132, 340, 402, 
412; II. 263, 268, 270, 276, 

280, 286, 292, 303. 
Tempo in Bach's works, I. 381, 

398, 408; II. 400 ff 
Theile, I. 84. 
Thibaud, I. 242 n. 
Thirty Years' War, I. 10, 37, 

58. 72, 75. 
Thomas Aquinas, I. 25. 

Tilgner, I. 92. 

Titelonze, I. 37 n. 

Toccata, organ, I. 46. 

3« 



482 



Index. 



Transcriptions of Bach's works, 

I. 257, 262. 317 ft. 
Trauschel, C, I. 215. 
Trent, CoancU of, I. 25. 
"Tromba da tirarsi", II. 434 n. 
Trombone in Bach's scores, 

n. 433 «. 
Trumpet in Bach's scores, I. 

408, 409 ; II. 433 ft- 
Trutebulsch, I. 7. 
Tunder, I. 44 n., 46, 75, yS, 79. 
Turck, II. 450 n. 
Turrschmiedt, I. 242. 

Uthe, I. 102. 

Viadana, L. G. da, I. 68 n., 69n. 
Viola, Bach and the, I. 209, 384. 
Viola da gamba, 1. 408 ; II. 43off . 
Viola d'amore, II. 430 ff. 
Viola pomposa, I. 204, 393, 394; 

II. 430 ft. 

Violin, Bach and the, I. 197, 

208, 384. 
Violin playing in Bach's time, 

I. 209, 385, 388. 
Violino discord ato, the, I. 402. 
Violoncello piccolo, the, II. 4 3 1 ft. 
Violone, the, II. 430 ft., 457. 
Vivaldi, I. 192, 268, 405, 415. 
Vogler, Abt, II. 30, 43. 

— J. L., I. 214. 

Voigt, W., I. 264 n., 466. 
Volbach, Fritz, I. 163. 
Volkmann. I. 336. 
Volumier, I. 153. 
Voss, Count, I. 201, 234 n., 399. 
Vulpius, M., I. 33, 35. 

Wagner, G. G., I. 152 n. 

— Richard, I. 57, 60, 81, 165, 
181, 248 n., 249, 257 ff., 260, 
261, 398; II. 5, 7, 8, 13, 16, 
21 ff., 26, 27, 32, 35, 41 ff., 

49ft-» 53. 277. 
Waldersee, Count, I. 253. 
Walker organs,. 297 n, 
Walther, Johann, I. 15, 16, 18. 

28, 66, 83. 



Walther, J. G., 1. 43, 67 n., 71, 86, 
los, 154 n.. 170, 186, 193, 
19s. -05, 2i4,^j*f^ 295, 302, 
423, 425; II. 371. 

Weber, B. C, I. 334. 

— C. M. von, II. 18, 30, 31, 43- 
Weckmann, M., I. 75, 7B, 79. 
Wedermann, I. 103. 

Weigel, C, I. 322. 
Weisse, I. 113. 
Wenzky, I. 226. 
Weppler, I. 242. 
Werkmeister, A., I. 333. 
Werner, L. F., I. 14 n. 
Wesley, EUza, I. 335. 

— S., I. 337 n. 
Westphal, I. 375, 
Widor, I. 259. 297 n. 
Winkler, II. 273 n. 

Wilhekn Ernst, Duke of Wei- 
mar, I. 104, 175. 

Willaert, A., I. 56. 

Winterfeld, Carl von, I. 248, 401. 

Witt, C. F., I. 325. 

Wittenberg chorale book, I. 28. 

Wolirum, Philipp, I. 256 n.; 
11. 317 n. 

Women singers in German 
churches, I. 88, 89. 

Wotquenne, A., I. 221. 

Wulken, J. C, I. 107. 

Wullner, I. 253. 

Wustmann, G., I. 162 n. 

Zachau, I. 44 n., 171. 

Zarlino, I. 56 n., 333. 

Zehmisch, I. 144. 

Zell, Catharina, I. 28. 

Zelter, I. 148, 161, 229, 231, 
234 n., 236, 240 ff., 243 n., 
244, 246, 250, 337, 394, 405, 
416; II. 126, 154, 168, 296 ff., 
325, 344, 445. 

Ziegler, C, I. 61 ff. 

— J. C, I. 214. 

— Marianne von, I. 92, 115, 
ii6n., 144; 11. 331, 334. 

337. 343- 
Zwingli, II. 61. 



BACH'S WORKS. 

Manner of performing, I. 265 ; II. 297 ff., 345 ff., 379 ff.; airange- 
ments and transcriptions, I. 355; II. 447 ff. 



VOCAL WORKS- 

Cantatas, chronology of, II. 128 ff. ; cantatas of the pre-Leipzig 
period, 122 ff.; Leipzig cantatas of 1723 and 1724, 148 fl.; 
cantatas of 1725 — 1727, 186 ff. ; cantatas of 1728 — 1734* 222 ff. ; 
cantatas after 1734, 328 ff. 

Church Cantatas. 

Ach Gott, vom Himmel sieh darein. No. 2. II. 85, 299 n., 376, 

434, 465. 
Ach Gott, wie manches Herzeleid. No. 3. II. 360. 

Ach Gott, wie manches Herzeleid. No. 58. II. 96, 97, 250 ff.. 380, 

388, 422, 462. 

Ach Herr, mich aimen Sunder. No. 135. II. 87, 376, 461. 

Ach, ich sehe, jetzt da ich zur Hochzeit gehe. No. 162. II. 109, 

133. 134. 409. 
Ach, lieben Christen, seid getrost. No. 114. II. 36, 37, 116, 227, 

368, 378, 460, 462 n., 463 n. 

Ach, wie fluchtig, ach, wie nichtig. No. 26. II. 57, 76, 88 n., 365, 

398. 459 n. 
Allein zu dir, Herr Jesu Christ. No. 33. II. 371, 421 n., 465. 
Alles nur nach Gottes Willen. No. 72. II. 48, 198, 240 n., 326, 

462 n. 
Also hat Gott die Welt geliebt. No. 68. I. 246 n., 251 n. ; II. 103, 

263, 299 n., 337, 462 n. 
Am Abend aber desselbigen Sabbats. No. 42. I. 410; II. 104, 

339, 380, 410, 431 n., 460. 
Argre dich, o Seele, nicht. No. 186. II. 152, 401 n., 463 n., 465. 
Anf Christi Himmelfahrt aUein. No. 128. II. 100, 332 n., 336. 
Aus der Tiefe rufe ich, Herr, zn dir. No. 131. II. 124, 127, 128^ 

461, 465. 
Aus tiefer Not schrei' ich zu dir. No. 38. II. 299 n., 371, 421 n., 

461, 465, 466. 
Barmherziges Herze der ewigen Liebe. No. 185. I. 251 n. ; II. 140, 

466. 

31* 



484 Index to Bach's Compositions. 

Bereitet die Wege, bereitet die Bahn. No. 132. II. 142, 431 n. 
Bisher habt ihr nichts gebeten in meinem Namen. No. 87. II. loi, 

102, 332 n.. 333, 462. 
Bleib bei uns, denn es will Abend werden. No. 6. II. 338, 380, 465. 
Brich dem Hungrigen dein Brot. No. 39. I. 241 ; II. 46, 52, 92, 

343 «• 
Bringt dem Herrn Ehre seines Namens. No. 148. II. 201, 462 n. 

Christen, atzet diesen Tag. No. 63. II. 105, 153, 404, 458 n., 

463 n- 
Christ lag in Todesbanden. No. 4. II. 94, 161. 

Christum wir soUen loben schon. No. 121. II. 86, 143, 299 n^ 

357. 465. 
Christ unser Herr zum Jordan kam. No. 7. I. 246 n.; II. 58, 

75, 206, 356, 363, 380, 389. 
Christus, der ist mein Leben. No. 95. I. 170 n. ; II. 77, 94, 242 n., 

248. 3S5» 379 n.. 380. 409, 425, 460. 463 n., 465. 
Das ist je gewisslich wahr. No. 141. II. 146, 147. 
Das neugebor'ne Kindelein. No. 122. II. 81, 410, 461, 466. 
Dazu ist erschienen der Sohn Gottes. No. 40. II. 79* 153, 326 n. 
Denn du wirst meine Seele nicht in der HoUe lassen. No. 15. 

II. 122, 465. 
Der Friede sei mit dir. No. 158. II. 202, 461. 
Der Herr denket an uns (Wedding Cantata). No. 196. II. 123 n., 

431 n. 
Der Herr ist mein getreuer Hirt. No. 112. II. 242 n. 
Der Himmel lacht, die Erde jubilieret. No. 31. I. 410 n.; II. 95, 

109. i37» 138. 141 n., 404 n., 462 n.. 465. 
Die Elenden soUen essen. No. 75. I. 411 n. ; II. 150, 463 n., 465. 
Die Himmel erzahlen die Ehre Gottes. No. 76. I. 278 ; II. 83, 

129, 151, 419, 45711., 461, 4^5- 
Da Friedefurst, Herr Jesu Christ. No. 116. II. 378, 421 n., 460, 

465, 466. 
Du Hirte Israel, hdre. No. 104. I. 250; II. 201, 359, 420, 461, 

463 n. 
Du sollst Gott, deinen Herrn. No. 77. II. 199, 429, 456. 
Du wahrer Gott und Davids Sohn. No. 23. II. 160, 175, 176, 

327, 400 n., 461, 465. 
Ein' feste Burg ist unser Gott. No. 80. I. 238, 246, 250; II. 78, 

90, 146 n.. 242 n.. 245 £f., 331, 355, 456, 459 n.. 463 »• 
Ein Herz, das seinen Jesum lebend weiss. No. 134. II. 148, 266. 
Ein ungefarbt Gemute. No. 24. II. 152, 419, 465. 
Erforsche mich, Gott, und erfahre mein Herz. No. 136. II. 200, 

326 n. 
Erfreut euch, ihr Herzen. No. 66. II. 338, 380, 409, 463 n. 
Erfreute Zeit im neuen Bunde. No. 83. II. 88, 109, 159, 461. 
Erhalt' uns, Herr, bei deinem Wort No. 126. II. 83, 373. 
Erhdhtes Fleisch und Blut. No. 173. II. 100, 265, 465, 466. 
Er rufet seinen Schafen mit Namen. No. 175. II. 332 n., 338, 429. 
Erschallet, ihr Lieder. No. 172. II. 99, 162, 237 n.,429, 463 n., 465. 



Index to Bach*s Compositions. 485 

Erwunschtes Freudenlicht. No. 184. II. 162, 460, 463 n. 

Es erhub sich ein Streit. No. 19. II. 78 n., 80, 194, 246, $7$, 441, 

460, 462 n. 
£s ist das Heil uns kommen her. No. 9. II. 83, 242 n., 245 n., 461. 
Es ist dir gesagt, Mensch, was gut ist. No. 45. II. 343 n., 344. 
£s ist ein trotzig und verzagt Ding. No. 176. II. 47* $2, 343 n., 345. 
Es ist euch gut» dass ich hingehe. No. 108. II. 86, 299 n., 332 n., 

333* 335» 462 n. 
Es ist nichts Gesundes an meinem Leibe. No. 25. II. loi, 224, 

259, 260, 392, 429, 460, 462 n. 
Es reifet euch ein schrecklich Ende. No. 90. II. 120, 348 n.« 351, 

462. 
Es wartet alles auf dich. No. 187. II. 326 n., 343 if., 380, 410, 

460, 462 n., 466. 
Falsche Welt, dir trau' ich nicht. No. 52. I. 409; II. 252, 462 n. 
Fteue dich, erloste Schar. No. 30. II. 289, 348. 
Geist und Seele wird verwirret. No. 35. I. 412 n. ; II. 237 n., 238. 
Gelobet sei der Herr, mein Gott. No. 129. II. 113, 242 n., 243, 

245 n., 448 n. 
Gelobet seist du, Jesu Christ. No. 91. II. 95, 105, 357, 367, 410, 

460, 463 n. 
Gleich wie der Regen und Schnee vom Himmel £ftllt. No. 18. 

I. 410 n.; II. 27, 145. 

Gott, der Herr, ist Sonn' und Schild. No. 79. II. 91, 326 n., 330, 

421 n., 459 n., 465, 466. 
Gott fahret auf mit Jauchzen. No. 43. II. 63, 85, 331 n., 334, 460. 
Gott ist mein Konig. No. 71. I. 321 n. ; II. 123, 128, 419. 
Gott ist unsre Zuversicht (Wedding Cantata). No. 197. II. 233. 
Gottes Zeit ist die allerbeste Zeit. No. 106 (Actus tragicus). I. 246, 

250, 411 n.; II. 124 ff., 131, 400 n., 432 n., 459 n., 463 n. 
Gottlob, nun geht das Jahr zu Ende. No. 28. II. 201, 465. 
Gott, man lobt dich in der Stille. No. 120. II. iii, 250. 
Gott soil allein mein Herze haben. No. 169. I. 41 1 n. ; II. 237 n., 

238, 239- 
Gott, wie dein Name, so ist auch dein Ruhm. No. 171. II. 233, 

31 3» 465. 
Halt im GedlLchtnis Jesum Christ. No. 67, II. 81, 91, 103, 115, 

192, 235, 240, 326, 405, 459 n. 
Herr Christ, der ein'ge Gottessohn. No. 96. II. 82, 93 n., 372, 

430. 463 n. 
Herr, deine Augen sehen nach dem Glauben. No. 102. I. 250; 

II. 259, 260, 326 n., 460. 

Herr, gehe nicht ins Gericht. No. 105. I. 250; II. 77 n., 93 n., 

188, 195, 254, 380, 409, 426, 448 n., 460, 465. 
Herr Gott, Beherrscher aUer Dinge (incomplete), II. 250 n. 
Herr Gott, dich loben aUe wir. No. 130. II. 363, 426, 429, 465. 
Herr Gott, dich loben wir. No. 16. II. iii, 202. 
Herr Jesu Christ, du hdchstes Gut. No. 113. II. 78, 377, 421 n., 

465. 



486 Index to Bach's Compositions. 

Herr Jesu Christ, wahr'r Mensch and Gott No. 127. II. i/f n., 

95. "4» 367. 43*. 462 n. 
Herr, wie du willst, so Schick's mit mir. No. 73. II. 117, 193, 

382, 461, 463 n. 
Herz und Mund und Tat und Leben. No. 147. II. 142, 409, 465. 
Hinimelskdnig, sei willkommen. No. 182. I. 251 n., 410 n.; 

II. 94, 108, 136, 460, 465, 466. 
Hdchst erwunschtes Freudenfest. No. 194. II. 165. 
Ich armer Mensch, ich Sundenknecht. No. 55. II. 254, 462. 
Ich bin ein guter Hirt. No. 85. II. 331 n., 332, 379 n., 386, 462, 

463 n., 465. 
Ich bin vergnugt mit meinem Glucke. No. 84. II. 235, 409. 
Ich elender Mensch, wer wird mich erlosen. No. 48. II. 31, 48^ 

258, 341, 410, 461, 462 n. 
Ich fceue mich in dir. No. 133. II. no, 356, 410, 462 n., 465. 
Ich geh' und suche mit Verlangen. No. 49. I. 411 n.; II. 237 n.« 

238, 431 n. 
Ich glaiibe, lieber Herr. No. 109. II. 55, 93, 258, 4x9, 465. 
Ich habe genug. No. 82. I. 170 n. ; II. 94, 114, 256, 380, 382, 389^ 

462. 
Ich habe meine Zuversicht. No. 188. II. 82, 236, 237, 238 n. 
Ich hab' in Gottes Herz und Sinn. No. 92. II. 43 n., 82, 366, 465. 
Ich hatte viel Bekummemis. No. 21. I. 178, 273,. 411 n. ; II. 107, 

131, 419, 459 n. 
Ich lasse dich nicht, du segnest mich denn. No. 157. II. 136, 462. 
Ich liebe den Hdchsten von ganzem Gemute. No. 174. I. 410; 

II. 235, 422. 
Ich mf zu dir, Herr Jesu Christ. No. 177. II. 242 n., 448 n. 
Ich steh' mit einem Fuss im Grabe. No. 156. I. 411 n. ; II. 53, 92, 

234. 
Ich weiss, dass mein £rl6ser lebt. No. 160. II. 138. 
Ich will den Kreuzstab geme tragen. No. 56. II. 75, 108. 255, 

380, 423, 458, 459 n. 
Ihr, die ihr euch von Christo nennet. No. 164. I. 108; II. 153. 
Ihr Menschen, ruhmet Gottes Liebe. No. 167. II. loi, no, 116, 

201, 238 n., 465. 
Ihr werdet weinen und heulen. No. 103. I. 241 n., 250; II. 39, 

"3. "5. 332. 336. 3*0, 404» 461. 
In alien meinen Taten. No. 97. II. 93, 1 14, 242 n., 245, 385, 448 n. 
Jauchzet Gott in alien Landen. No. 51. II. 252, 414, 462, 465. 
Jesu, der du meine Seele. No. yZ, I. 246 n.; II. 88, los, 115, 377, 

421 n., 466. 
Jesu, nun sei gepreiset. No. 41. II. 355, 404n., 425, 431 n.,46o, 465. 
Jesus nahm zu sich die Zwdlfe. No. 22. I. 112, 241; II. 149, 160, 

189 n., 202, 462 n., 465. 
Jesus schlaft, was soil ich hoifen. No. 81. I. 75 ; II. 157, 158, 392, 

426, 432 n., 446 n. 
Komm, du susse Todesstunde. No. 161. II. 77 n., 133, 134, 460, 

462 n., 463 n., 465. 



Index to Bach's Compositions. 487 

Leichtgesinnte Flattergeister. No. 181. 11. 199, 386. 

Liebster Gott, wann werd' ich sterben. No. 8. I. 246 n. ; II. jj^ 

202, 206. 380, 383, 388, 406, 409, 460, 465. 
Liebster Immanuel, Herzog der Frommen. No. 123. II. 1^43, 

358, 420, 428, 461, 463 n. 
liebster Jesu, mein Veriangen. No. 32. II. 109, 114, 332 n., 

348 D.. 350, 380, 387, 391. 410, 462. 
Lobe den Herm, den machtigen Kdnig der Ehren. No. 137. 

11. 242 n., 243, 387. 
Lobe den Herrn, meine Seele. No. 69. IL 112, 164, 463 n. 
Lobe den Herm, meine Seele. No. 143. II. 100, 328, 429, 465. 
Lobet Gott in seinen Reichen. No. 11 (Ascension Oratorio). 

II. 310 ff., 314. 
Mache dich, mein Geist, bereit. No. 115. II. 38, 82, 368, 382, 

400 n., 407 n., 460, 462 n. 
Man singet mit Freuden vom Sieg. No. 149. II. 236, 263, 431 n.» 

462 n. 
Mein Gott, wie lang, ach lange. No. 155. II. 135, 199, 401 n., 461. 
Mein liebster Jesus ist verloren. No. 154. II. jj, 112, 157, 175, 

409, 448 n., 461. 
Meinen Jesum lass ich nicht. No. 124. II. jj n., 88 n., 359, 421 n., 

460, 463 n., 465. 
Meine Seel' erhebt den Herrn. No. 10. II. 76, 90, iii, 362, 421 n.» 

451 n., 460, 406. 
Meine Seele ruhmt und preist. No. 189. I. 251 n.; II. 140, 461 n., 

462. 
Meine Seufzer, meine Tranen. No. 13. II. 106, 109, 118, 348 n.» 

351. 380, 462. 
Mit Fried' und Freud' fahr' ich dahin. No. 125. II. 92, 361, 421 n., 

462 n. 
Nach dir, Herr, verlanget mich. No. 150. I. 411 n. ; IL 124, 465, 

466. 
Nimm von uns, Herr, du treuer Gott. No. loi. I. 250; II. 100, 

37S» 380, 385, 465. 
Nimm, was dein ist und gehe bin. No. 144. I. 251 n.; II. 200, 

465. 
Nun danket alle Gott. No. 192 (incomplete: B. G. XLI). II. 242 n. 
Nun ist das Heil und die Kraft. No. 50. II. 29, 89, 118, 341, 460. 
Nun komm' der Heiden Heiland. No. 61. I. 129, 173; II. 27, 38, 

78, 139, ISO. 400 n., 451 n., 461. 
Nun komm' der Heiden Heiland. No. 62. II. 90, iii, 242 n., 

245 n., 457 n. 
Nur jedem das Seine. No. 163. II. 146. 
O ewiges Feuer, o Ursprung der Liebe. No. 34. II. 347. 
O Ewigkeit, du Donnerwort. No. 20. II. 195, 342, 401 n., 462 n., 

465. 
O Ewigkeit, du Donnerwort. No. 60. IL 96, 97, 103, 141, 157, 

219, 250 if., 380, 421 n., 462. 
O heil'ges Geist- und Wasserbad. No. 165. I. 108; II. 79. 163. 



488 Index to Bach's Coxnpoatkxi*. 

O Jesu Chriat, mein'a Lebens Lidit No. 118. II. 371, 434 n., 465. 

Preiae, Jerusalem, den Herm. No. 119. II. 164, 429. 

Schauet doch and aehet, ob irgend ein Schmerz aei. No. 46. II. 104, 

106, 188, 190, 195, 313. 409» 448 n., 460, 463 n-. 465. 
Schau', lieber Gott, wie meine Feind*. No. 153. II. 155, 461. 
Schlage doch» gewunschte Stunde. No. 53. II. 253, 462. 
Schmucke dich, o liebe Seele. No. 180. I. 12; II. 373, 463 n. 
Scbwingt freudig euch empor. No. 36. II. 266, 465. 
Sehet, welch' eine Liebe. No. 64. II. 87, 154, 461, 465. 
Sehet» wir geh'n hinauf nach Jerusalem. No. 159. II. 86, 234, 461. 
Sei Lob und Ehr'. No. 117. I. 246; 11. 242 n., 243, 244, 431 n. 
Selig ist der Bilann. No. 57. II. 28, xo8, 348 n., 349, 400 n., 423* 462. 
Siehe, ich will viel Fischer. No. 88. II. 44, 76, 100, 256, 448 n., 462. 
Siehe zu, dass deine Gottesfurcht. No. 179. II. i64» 186, 326 n., 

465. 
Sie werden aus Saba alle konmien. No. 65. I. 277; II. 37 n., 137, 

156. i75» 461, 46211. 
Sie werden euch in den Bann tun. No. 44. II. 197, 425. 
Sie werden euch in den Bann tun. No. 183. II. 332 n., 336, 429. 
Singet dem Herm ein neues Lied. No. 190. II. 155, 250, 465, 466. 
So du mit deinem Munde bekennest. No. 145. 11. 81, 116, 235, 

343* 463 n. 
Susser Trost, mein Jesu kommt. No. 151. II. 348 n., 349, 380, 

400 n., 410, 423, 462. 

Trauerode. No. 198. II. 77, loi, 107, 173, 186, 203 ff. 

Tritt auf die Glaubensbahn. No. 152. I. 275, 319, 4 ion. ; II. 87^ 

144. I45i 463 n. 
Tue Rechnungl Donnerwortl No. 168. II. 85, 196. 

Unser Mund sei voU Lachens. No. no. I. 241 n., 410, 411 n. ; 

II- 78, 343 n.. 345 ff.. 419. 
Uns ist ein Kind geboren. No. 142. II. 143, 461, 465. 
Vergnugte Ruh', beliebte Seelenlust. No. 170. II. 237 n., 238. 
Wachet auf, ruft uns die Stimme. No. 140. I. 11, 251, 282 n. ; 

II. 38, 82, 113, 242 n., 245 ff., 368, 398, 459 n-, 463 a-. 465. 
Wachet, betet, seid bereit. No. 70. II. 91, 104, 140, 431 n., 460. 
War' Gott nicht mit uns diese Zeit. No. 14. II. 299 n., 329. 
Wahrlich, ich sage euch. No. 86. II. 114, 187, 425, 461, 465. 
Warum betrubst du dich. No. 138. I. 251 n.; II. 106, 326 n., 

3^7, 465. 
Was frag* ich nach der Welt. No. 94. II. 77, $$$, 356, 423, 462 n. 

Was Gott tut, das ist wohlgetan. No. 98. II. 242 n., 465. 

Was Gott tut, das ist wohlgetan. No. 99. II. 242 n., 243, 448 n., 

465. 
Was Gott tut, das ist wohlgetan. No. 100. II. 114, 242 n., 244, 

457 n., 465. 
Was mein Gott wiU, das g'scheh' allzeit. No. in. II. 36, 360, 

397, 461, 463 n. 
Was soil ich aus dir machen, Ephraim? No. 89. II. 117, 257, 462. 
Was willst du dich betniben. No. 107. II. 242 n., 244, 465. 



Index to Baches Compositions. 489 

Weinen, Klagen, Sorgen, Zagen. No. 12. II. 99, 108, 161, 313, 

358, 400 n., 465. 
Wer da glaubet und getauft wird. No. 37. II. 82, 260, 461, 465, 

466. 
Wer Dank opfert, der preiset mich. No. 17. 11. 326 n., 343 n., 345. 
Wer mich liebet, der wird mein Wort halten. No. 59. II. 138, 

337. 338 n. 
Wer mich liebet, der wird mein Wort halten. No. 74. II. 332 n., 

337. 45 1 n. 
Wer nur den lieben Gott lasst walten. No. 93. I. 246 ; II. 11 2, 241 . 
Wer sich selbst erhdhet, der soil emiedrigt werden. No. 47. II. 84, 

146, 380, 383. 385. 
Wer weiss, wie nahe mir mein Ende. No. 27. II. 48, 91, 11 5» 

237 n.. 238, 240, 241, 463 n. 
Widerstehe doch der Sunde. No. 54. II. 253. 
Wie schon leuchtet der Morgenstem. No. i. I. 11; II. 362, 429, 

462 n., 465. 
Wir danken dir, Gott, wLr danken dir. No. 29. I. 392; II. 102, 

2370-. 238 n., 239, 240, 313, 382, 465. 
Wir mussen durch viel Triibsal in das Reich Gottes eingehen. 

No. 146. I. 411 n.; II. 108, 345 if.» 462 n. 
Wo gehest du hin. No. 166. II. y^S, 87, 187, 461, 46$. 
Wo Gott der Herr nicht bei uns halt. No. 178. II. 82, 374, 465. 
Wo soil ich fliehen hin. No. 5. II. 356, 391. 
Wohl dem, der sich auf seinen Gott. No. 139. II. 117, 374, 448 n. 

Secfdar Cantatas. II. 261 If. 

Amore traditore, II. 192. 

Andro dall coUe al prato (lost), II. 292 n. 

Angenehmes Wiederau, II. 129, 288 ff., 291 n., 348. 

Auf, schmettemde Tone (Vereinigte Zwietracht der wechselnden 

Saiten), II. 102, 271, 272. 
Der zuMedengestellte Aeolus (Blast Larmen, ihr Feinde), II. 57, 

76, 78. 233 n.. 269 ff., 285, 293, 294, 386, 414. 
Die Ws^l des Herkules (Herkules auf dem Scheidewege), II. 280 ff., 

293» 303. 
Durchlauchster Leopold, II. 264, 338 n. 

Mer hahn en neue Oberkeet (Peasant Cantata), I. 251 n., 289 n., 

293- 
Mit Gnaden bekrone der Himmel die Zeiten, II. 266. 

Non sa che sia dolore, II. 292. 

O angenehme Melodei, II. 292, 293. 

O holder Tag, erwunschte Zeit (Wedding Cantata), II. 291, 294, 

380, 409, 431 n., 457 n. 

Phoebus und Pan, II. 144, 236, 273 ff., 291, 292, 293, 380. 

Preise dein Glucke, gesegnetes Sachsen, II, 76, iii, 285, 303 n., 

314. 382. 
Schleicht, spielende Wellen, II, 74, 129, 286, 293, 294, 363 n., 
3«o, 385, 386, 387 n., 409. 



490 Index to Bach% Compositions. 

Schweigt stille, plaudert nicht (Coffee Cantata), I. 25 1 n. ; II. 273 fL, 

293. 388. 
Schwingt freudig euch empor (Die Freude reget sich; Steigt freudig 

in die Luft), II. 265, 266, 269 n. 
T6net, ihr Pauken, II. 284, 303, 385. 

Von der Vergnugsamkeit (Icn bin in mir vergnugt), IL 76, 279. 
Was mir behagt ist nur die muntre Jagd, II. 236, 261, 337. 
Weichet nur, be^rubte Schatten (Wedding Cantata), I. 396; II. 43 n., 

75* 71, 113. 266, 291 n., 293, 350. 

Lost Cantatas. 

Entfemet euch, ihr heitem Sterne, II. 273. 

Froher Tag, verlangte Stunden, II. 272. 

Siehe, der Huter Israels, II. 272. 

Thomana sass aunoch batrubt, II. 288. 

Vergnugte Pleissenstadt, II. 273. 

WDlkommen, ihr herrschenden Getter der Erden, II. 288. 

Wunschet Jerusalem Gluck, II. 250. 

Cantatas suitable for performance, II. 460^. 

B minor Mass, I. 232, 245, 246 n., 250 n., 252, 261, 264, 343; 

II. 67, 81, 88, 106, no, 125, 129, 141, 161, 190, 233, 286, 311 fL. 

380, 389 ff., 404 n., 410 n., 417, 427. 
The Smaller Masses, I, 250 n.; II. 154, 200 n., 326 ff., 344 n., 

367 n. 
Christmas Oratorio, I. 245, 246, 264; II. 80, 81, 89, 115, 117, 130, 

166, 281 ff.. 302 ff., 358, 380, 387, 388. 
Easter Oratorio, II. 88 n., loi, 181, 309 ff., 365, 380, 421, 423. 
Magnificat, I. 246 n., 250, 252 n.; II. 89, 166 ff., 346 n. 
St. Luhe Passion (doubtiul), II. 171. 
St. Marh Passion, II. 173. 
St. John Passion, I. 212, 238, 245, 251; II. 43, 88, 92, 96, 120, 157, 

173 ff., 212 ff., 223, 251, 402, 406, 417. 
St. Matthew Passion, i. 13, 18 n., 19 ff., 62, 120 n., 124 n., 145, 

157, i7S, 183, 241 ff., 245, 247 n., 250, 257, 259, 395, 40S; 

II. 6, 27, 28, 35, 44. 45. 73» 82, 85, 87, 96, 103, 104, 107. 119, 

126, 166, 175, 177, 180, 197, 208 ff., 258, 260, 277, 333, 335. 

339. 350. 374» 37^» 380. 383, 389, 392, 394 «•, 406, 407. 445 ^-t 

451 n., 455, 458. 
Motets, I. 12, 232; II. 294 ff. 

Hymns for Schemellfs hymn-booh, 1. 22; II. 300 ff. 
Organ Works, I. 6, 9, 10, 12, 266 ff., 281 ff. 
Performance of the organ works, I. 294 ff. 
The "Eighteen Chorales", I. 290. 
The Schubler Chorales, I. 294. 
Organ Sonatas, I. 278 ff. 
Eight little preludes and fugues, I. 278. 
Orgelbuchlein, I. 167, 217, 281, 283 ff., 291, 293, 294, 298 ff.; 

II. 55, 61, 67, 105. 



I 



Index to Bach*s Compositions. 491 

Chorale Preludes, Fantasias, etc, 

Ach, was soil ich Siinder machen, I. 282 n. 

Ach, wie fluchtig, II. 57, 365, 

Alle Menschen mussen sterben, II. 64, 162. 

Allein Gott in der Hoh sei Ehr, I. 282 n., 292; II. 57, 68, 

70. 85. 
An Wasserflussen Babylons, I. 282, 292, 293, 301. 
Aus tiefer Not, I, 301 ; II. 6y n., 70. 
Christ, der du bist der helle Tag, I. 282. 
Christ lag in Todesbanden, I. 293; II. 54; 63. 
Christ unser Herr zum Jordan kam, II. 35, 58, 363. 
Christum wir sollen loben sclion, II, 67. 
Christus, der uns selig macht, II. 65. 
Da Jesus an dem Kreuze stund, II, 62. 
Das alte Jahr vergangen ist, I. 287; II. 65, 6S, 
Der Tag, der.ist so freudenreich, II. 66. 
Dies sind die heiligen zehn Gebot, II. 59, 67. 
Durch Adams Fall, I. 287; II. 3, 56, 83. 
Ein' feste Burg, I. 171, 293, 295, 302. 
Erbarm dich mein, I. 293. 
Erschienen ist der herriich' Tag, II. 66. 
Erstanden ist der heilige Christ, II. 56, 65, 71. 
Es ist das Heil uns kommen her, I. 287; II. 65. 
Gelobet seist du, Jesus Christ, II. 64. 
Gottes Sohn ist kommen, I. 300; II. 65. 
Gott Schopfer, heiliger Geist, I. 292. 
Helft mir Gottes Gute preisen, II, 6y. 
Herr Gott, dich loben wir, I. 294; II. 33. 
Herr Gott, nun schleuss den Himmel auf, I. 287; II. 62. 
Herr Gott, nun sei gepreiset, II. 63. 
Herr Jesu Christ, dich zu uns wend', II. 68. 
Herzlich tut mich verlangen, I. 287. 
Heut' triumphieret Gottes Sohn, II. 63. 
Hill, Gott, dass mir's gelinge, II. 62. 
In dich hab' ich gehoffet, II. 66, 157. 
In dir ist Freude, I. 287; II. 65, 66, 69. 
In dulci jubilo, I. 300; II. 33, 65. 
Jesu meine Freude, I. 263, 293; II. 54, 64. 
Jesus Christus, unser Heiland, I. 223, 292, 372; II. 55, 60, 71, 73, 

341. 364- 
Komm, Gott Schopfer, heiliger Geist, I. 288. 

Komm, heiliger Geist, Herre Gott, I. 292; II. 69. 

Liebster Jesu, wir sind hier, I. 287. 

Lob sei dem allerhochsten Gott, II. 64. 

Lobt Gott, ihr Christen, allzugleich, II, 66, 366. 

Mit Fried' und Freud' ich fahr dahin, I. 287; II. 36, 66. 

Nun danket aUe Gott, I. 292. 

Nun freut euch, I. 293. 



492 Index to Bach's Compositiops. 

Nun komm der Heiden Heiland, I. 292. 

O Gott, du irommer Gott, I. 282; II. S3* ^» ^5- 

O Lamm Gottes, I. 293, 300 n.; II. 6$, 71, 72. 

O Mensch, bewein' dein' Sunde gross, II. 6$, 69, 212. 

Puer natus in Bethlehem. II. 62, 66, 71. 

Schmucke dich, o liebe Seele, I. 245, 292. 

Sei gegrusset, Jesa gutig, I. 282. 

Valet will ich dir geben, II. 69. 

Vater unser im Himmelreich, II. 64, 67, 68. 

Vom Himmel hoch da komm' ich her, I. 190, 223, 281, 283, 293, 

300; II. 33, 56. 57. 
Vom Himmel kam, II. 56. 
Von Gott will ich nicht lassen, I, 292; II. 66. 
Wachet auf, raft uns die Stimme, I. 282 n. 
Wenn wir in hdchsten Ndten sind, I. 223, 276, 291, 424; II. 6Sg 

Wer nur den lieben Gott lasst walten, II. 36, 66. 
Wir Christenlent' ban jetzund Fread\ II. 60. 
Wir danken dir, Herr Jesa Christ, II. 66. 
Wir glauben all' an einen Gott, I. 293; II. 60, 68. 

Clavier Works. 

Aria variata alia maniera italiana, I. 323. 

Capriccio on departure of a brother, II. 2, 39, 54, 65. 

Clavierbiichlein, I. 108, 167, 206 n., 216, 218, 323, 326, 329 ff.« 

345, 347; II- 301. 450 n. 
Clavierubung, I. 186, 201, 266, 276, 281, 288 ff., 321 ff., 341, 402; 

II. 61, 73. 
Chromatic fantasia and fugue, I. 246 n., 262, 340 ff„ 355, 356, 

382. *^ 

English Suites, I. 253, 262, 325 ff. 

Fantasias and Sonatas, I. 34 ff. 
French Suites, I. 252, 262, 325 ff. 

Goldberg Variations, I. 201, 215, 321, 322 ff., 351; II. 290. 
Inventions, I. 216, 217, 237, 241 n., 250 n., 262, 328 ff. 
Isolated preludes and fugues, I. 339 ff. 
Italian concerto, I. 183, 198 n., 201, 262, 321, 322 ff., 351, 356, 

358, 3^7» 379. 38"i- " ^ 
Organ sonatas (so-called), I. 201. 

Partitas, I. 321 ff., 356. 

Smaller clavier works, I. 344. 

Smaller Suites, I. 325 ff. 

Toccatas and Capriccios, I. 342 ff. 

Twelve httle preludes, I. 216, 328. 

Well-tempered Qavichord, I. 216, 230, 235 ff., 250 n., 262, 278, 

324, 328. 331 «•. 346, 351. 353» 357 «•» 365. 383. 3«6, 490; 
II. 52. 



Index to Bach*s Compositions. 493 

Orchestral Works. 

Suites (overtures), I. 241, 357, 402 ff.; II. 346. 
Brandenburg Concertos, I. 188, 262, 304, 357, 361, 366, 403 ff., 
413 n., 415 n.; II. 52, 235, 252, 271, 380, 436, 440, 442n. 

Clavier and oiher Concertos. I. 262, 366, 411 ff.; II. 346. 

Violin, I. 209, 267 n., 342, 366, 384 ff. ; II. 52, 103 

Violoncello, I. 393 fl 

Clavier and Violin, I. 394 ff.; II. 267. 

Clavier and other instruments, I. 401 ff. 

Lute, I. 344. 

Art of Fugue, I. 158, 224 n., 226, 234, 235, 291, 423 ff. 

Musical Offering, I. 153, 177, 417 ff. 



THE CHURCH CANTATAS ARRANGED 

NUMERICALLY. 



B. G. I. 

No. I. Wie schdn leuchtet der 
Morgenstem. 

2. Ach Gott, vom Himmel 
sieh darein. 

3. Ach Gott, wie manches 
Herzeleid. Erste Bear- 
beitung. 

4. Christ lag in Todesban- 
den. 

5. Wo soil ich fliehen hin. 

6. Bleib' bei uns, denn es 
will Abend werden. 

7. Christ unser Herr zum 
Jordan kam. 

8. Liebster Gott, wann 
werd' ich sterben? 

9. Es ist das Heil uns 
kommen her. 

- 10. Meine Seel* erhebt den 

Herml 

B. G. II. 

No. II. Lobet Gott in seinen 
Reichen. 

- 12. Weinen, Klagen, Sor- 

gen, Zagen. 

- 13. Meine Seufzer, meine 

Tranen. 

- 14. War* Gott nicht mit uns 

diese 2^it. 

- 15. Denn du wirst meine 

Seele nicht in der HoUe 
lassen. 

- 16. Herr Gott, dich loben 

wir. 

- 17. Wer Dank opfert, der 

preiset mich. 



No. 18. 



- 19. 

- 20. 



No. 21. 

- 22. 

- 23- 

- 24- 

- 25- 

- 26. 

- 27. 

- 28. 

- 29. 

- 30. 



Gleich wie der Regen 
und Schnee vom Himmel 

Es erhnb sich ein Streit. 
O Ewigkeit, du Donner- 
wort Erste Bearbeitong. 

B. G. V. 

Ich hatte viel Bekum- 

memis. 

Jesus nahm zu sich die 

Zwolfe. 

Du wahrer Gott und 

Davids Sohn. 

Ein ungefarbt Gemute. 

Es ist nichts Gesundes 

an meinem Leibe. 

Ach wie fluchtig, ach 

wie nichtig. 

Wer weiss, wie nahe mir 

mein Ende. 

Gottlobl Nun geht das 

Jahr zu Ende. 

Wir danken dir, Gott, 

wir danken dir. 

Freue dich, erloste Schar. 



B. G. VII. 

No. 31. Der Himmel lacht, die 
Erde jubilieret. 

- 32. Liebster Jesu, mein Ver- 

langen. 

- 33. Allein zu dir, Herr Jesu 

Christ. 

- 34. O ewiges Feuer, o Ur- 

sprung der Liebe. 

- 35. deist und Seele wird 

verwirret. 



The Church Cantatas arranged numerically. 



495 



No. 36. Schwingt freudig euch 
empor. 

- 37. Wer da glaubet und ge- 

tauft wird. 

- 38. Aus tiefer Not schrei' 

ich zu dir. 

- 39. Brich dem Hungrigen 

dein Brot. 

- 40. Dazu ist erschienen der 

Sohn Gottes. 

B. O. X. 

No. 41. Jesu, nun sei gepreiset. 

- 42. Am Abend aber des- 

selbigen Sabbats. 

- 43. Gott fahret auf mit 

Jauchzen. 

- 44. Sie werden euch in den 

Bann tun. 

- 45. Esistdirgesagt.Mensch, 

was gut ist. 

- 46. Schauet doch und sehet, 

ob irgend ein Schmerz 
sei. 

- 47. Wer sich selbst erhdhet, 

der soil emiedrigt wer- 
den. 

- 48. Ich elender Mensch, wer 

wird mich erlosen? 

- 49. Ich geh' und suche mit 

Verlangen. 

- 50. Nun ist das Heil und 

die Kraft. 

B. G. XII. 

No. 51. Jauchzet Gott in alien 
Landen. 

- 52. Falsche Welt, dir trau* 

ich nicht. 

- 53. Schlage doch, gewunsch- 

te Stunde. 

- 54. Widerstehe doch der 

Siinde. 

- 55. Ich armer Mensch, ich 

Sundenknecht. 

- 56. Ich wiU den Kreuzstab 

gerne tragen. 

- 57. Selig ist der Mann. 



No. 58. Ach Gott, wie manchea 
Herzeleid. Second Com- 
position. 

- 59. Wer mich liebet, der 

wird mein Wort halten. 
First Composition. 

- 60. O Ewigkeit, du Donner- 

wort. Second Composi- 
tion. 

B. G. XVI. 

No. 61. Nun komm, der Heiden 
Heiland. First Compo- 
sition. 

- 62. Nun konmi, der Heiden 

HciJand. Second Com- 
position. 

- 63. Christen, atzet diesen 

Tag. 

- 64. Sehet, welch' eine Liebe 

hat uns der Vater er- 
zeiget. 

- 65. Sie werden aus Saba 

alle kommen. 

- 66, Erfreut euch, ihr Her- 

zen. 

- 67, Halt' im Gedachtnis Je- 

sum Christ. 

- 68. Also hat Gott die Welt 

geliebt. 

- 69. Lobe den Herm, meine 

Seele. 

- 70. Wachet, betct, seid be- 

reit allezeit. 

B. G. XVIII. 

No. 71. Gott ist mein Konig. 

- 72. Alles nur nach Gottes 

Willen. 

- 73. Herr, wie du wiUst, so 

Schick's mit mir. 

- 74. Wer mich liebet, der 

wird mein Wort halten. 
(2Q<i enlarged arrange- 
ment.) 

- 75. DieElendensoUenessen. 

- 76. Die Himmel erzahlen 

die Ehre Gottes. 



496 



The Church Cantatas arranged numerically. 



No. 77. Du soUat Gott, deinen 
Herm, lieben. 

- 78. Jesu, der du meineSeele. 

- 79. Gott der Herr ist Sonn' 

und Schild. 

• 80. £in' feste Burg ist unser 

Gott. 

B. G. XX. 

No. 81. Jesus schlaft, was soil 
ich hoffen. 

• 82. Ich habe genug. 

- S$, Erfreute Zeit im neuen 

Bunde. 

• 84. Ich bin vergniigt mit 

meinem Glucke. 

- 85. Ich bin ein guter Hirt. 

• 86. Wahrlich, ich sage euch. 

- Sy. Bisher habt ihr nichts 

gebeten in meinem Na- 
men. 

- 88. Siehe, ich will viel Fi- 

scher aussenden, spricht 
der Herr. 

- 89. Was soil ich aus dir 

machen, Ephraim? 

- 90. Es reifet euch ein 

schrecklich Ende. 

B. G. XXII. 

No. 91. Gelobet seist du, Jesu 
Christ. 

- 92. Ich hab' in Gottes Herz 

und Sinn. 

- 93. Wer nur den lieben Gott 

lasst walten. 

- 94. Was frag* ich nach der 

Welt. 

- 95. Christus, der ist mein 

Leben. 

- 96. Herr Christ, der ein'ge 

Gottessohn. 

- 97. In alien meinen Taten. 

- 98. Was Gott tut. das ist 

wohlgetan. First Com- 
position. B flat major. 
• 99- Was Gott tut, das ist 
wohlgetan. Second Com- 
position. G major. 



No. 100. Was Gott tut. das ist 
wohlgetan. Third Com- 
position. 

B.G. XXIII. 

No. 101. Ninmi von uns Herr, 
du treuer Gott. 

02. Herr, deine Augen se- 
hen nach dem Glauben. 

03. Ihr werdet weinen und 
heulen. 

04. Du Hirte Israel, hoie. 

05. Herr, gehe nicht ins 
Gericht. 

06. Gottes Zeit ist die aller- 
beste Zeit. 

07. Was willst du dich be- 
triiben. 

08. Es ist euch gut, dass 
ich hingehe. 

09. Ich glaubc,lieber Herr. 

10. Unser Mund sei voll 
Lachens. 

B. G. XXIV. 

No. III. Was mein Gott will, 
das g'scheh' allzeit 

12. Der Herr ist mein ge- 
treuer Hirt. 

13. Herr Jesu Christ, du 
hochstes Gut. 

14. Ach, lieben Christen, 
seid getrost. 

15. Mache dich, mein Geist, 
bereit. 

16. Du Friedensfiirst, Herr 
Jesu Christ. 

17. Sei Lob und Ehr' dem 
hochsten Gut. 

18. O Jesu Christ, meins 
Lebens Licht. 

19. Preise, Jerusalem, den 
Herm. 

20. Gott, man lobt dich in 
der Stille. 

B. G. XXVI. 

No. 121. Christum wir solien 
loben schon. 



The Church Cantatas arranged numerically. 



497 



No. 122. Das neugebor'ne Kin* 
delein. 

- 123. Liebster Immanuel» 

Herzog der Frommen. 

- 124. Meinen Jesumlass' ich 

nicht. 

- 125. Mit Fried' und Freud 

ich fahr' dahin. 

- 126. Erhalt' uns, Herr, bei 

deinem Wort. 

- 127. Herrjesu Christ, wahr'r 

Mensch und Gott. 

- 128. Auf Christi Himmel- 

fahrt allein. 

- 129. Gelobet sei der Herr, 

mein Gott. 

- 130. Herr Gott, dich loben 

alle wir. 

B. G. XXVIII. 

No. 131. Aus der Tiefe rufe ich, 
Herr, zu dir. 

- 132. Bereitet die Wege, be- 

reitet die Bahn. 

- 133. Ich freue mich in dir. 

- 134. Ein Herz, das seinen 

Jesum lebend weiss. 

- 135. Ach Herr, mich armen 

Sunder. 

- 136 Erforsche mich, Gott, 

und erfahre mein Herz. 

- 137. Lobe den Herren, den 

machtigen Konig der 
Ehren. 

- 138. Warum betrubst du 

dich, mein Herz. 

- 139, Wohl dem, der sich 

auf seinen Gott. 

- 140. Wachet auf, ruft uns 

die Stimme. 

B. G. XXX. 

No. 141. Das ist je gewisslich 
wahr. 

- 142. Uns ist ein Kind ge- 

boren. 

- 143. Lobe den Herm, meine 

Seele. 

- 144. Ninmi, was dein ist. 

Schweicier, Bach. IL 



No. 145. So du mit deinem 
Munde. 

- 146. Wir mussen durch viel 

Trubsal. 

- 147. Herz und Mund und 

Tat und Leben. 

- 148. Bringet dem Herm 

Ehre seines Namens. 

- 149. Man singet mit Freu- 

den vom Sieg. 

- 150. Nach dir, Herr, ver- 

langet mich. 

B. G. XXXII. 

No. 151. Susser Trost, mein Je- 
sus kommt. 

- 152. Tritt auf die Glanbens* 

bahn. 
• 153. Schau, lieber Gott. 

- 154. Mein liebster Jesus. 

- 155. Mein Gott, wie lang. 

- 156. Ich steh* mit einem 

Fuss. 

- 157. Der Friede sei mit dir. 

- 158. Ich lasse dich nicht. 

- 159. Sehet, wir geh'n hln- 

auf gen Jerusalem. 

- 160. Ich weiss, dass mein 

Erloser lebt. 

B. G. XXXIII. 

No. 161. Komm, du siisse Todes^ 
stunde. 

- 162. Ach, ich sehe, jetzt da 

ich zur Hochzeit gehe. 

- 163. Nur jedem das Seine. 

- 164. Ihr, die ihr euch von 

Christo nennet. 

- 165. O heil'ges Geist- und 

Wasserbad. 

- 166. Wo gehest du hin. 

- 167. Ihr Menschen, ruhmet 

Gottes Liebe. 

- 168. Tue RechnungI Doo- 

nerwort. 

- 169. Gott soil allein mein 

Herze haben. 

- 170. Vergnugte Ruh', be- 

liebte Seelenlust. 

32 



498 



The Church Cantatas arranged numerically. 



B. G. XXXV. 

No. 171. Gott, wie dein Name, 

80 ist auch dein Ruhm. 

• 172. Erschallet, ihr Lieder. 

- 173. Erhdhtes Fleiach und 

Blut. 

- 174. Ich liebe den Hdchsten 

von ganzem Gemiite. 

- 175. £r rufet seinen Schafen 

mit Namen. 

- 176. £s ist ein trotzig und 

verzagt Ding. 

- 177. Ich ruf zu dir, Herr 

Jesu Christ. 

- 178. WoGottderHerrnicht 

bei uns halt. 

- 179. Siehe zu, dass deine 

GottesfurchtnichtHeu- 
chelei sei. 

- 180. Schmiicke dich, o liebe 

•^eeie. 

B. G. XXXVII. 

No. 181. Leichtgesinnte Flatter- 
geister. 

- 182. Himmelskdnig, sei will- 

konmien. 

- 183. Sie werden euch in den 

Banntun. Second Com- 
position. 



No. 184. Erwunschtes Freaden* 
Ucht. 

- 185. Barmherziges Herze 

der ewigen Liebe. 

- 186. Argre dich, o Seele, 

nicht. 

- 187. Eswartetallesaufdich. 

- 188. Ich habe meine Zuver- 

sicht. 

- 189. Meine Seele ruhmt and 

preist. 

- 190. Singet dem Herm ein 

neneslied. (LobeZion, 
deinen Gott.) 

B. G. XLI. (Supplementary 

Volume.) 

Incomplete Cantatas. 

Nun danket alle Gott. 

Ihr Pforten zu Zion. 

Ehre sei Gott. 

O ewiges Feuer (incomplete 
Wedding Cantata). 

Herr Gott, Beherrscher (incom- 
plete Wedding Cantata). 

B. G.XIIIi. Wedding Cantatas. 

Dem Gerechten muss das Licht. 
Der Herr denket an uns. 
Gott ist unsre Zuversicht. 



I 



Corrigenda. 
VOLUME I. 

Page Line 

55 13 For Hermann read Heermann, 

58 13 For // read It. 

69 34 Delete comma after German. 

75 25 Insert and before the predecessor. 

79 35 Delete comma after or. 

99 last line. For Misler read Mitler. 

145 26 For Anna read Maria. 

152 14 For his regard read this regard. 
164 6 Delete like. 

166 29 For fTor^ read works. 

166 34 For Cerdo read Credo. 

175 16 For composers read composer's. 
iBi 2 For vt^w read views. 

184 29 For helieve read believe. 

195 16, 17. For original read originals. 

19^ 33 For c/o5« read c/05^5. 

200 23 For predominence read predominance. 

225 21 For m«m&^5 read m«m6^. 
240 7 For or read fr. 

251 30 For du read lu. 

264 18 For showed read sAottw. 

291 4 Delete comma after forms. 

292 I For kommt read homm*. 
326 12 For Germer read Gerber. 
333 29 Delete tA« before several. 

391 last line of note. Insert a before string. 
416 do. For compositions read composition. 

VOLUME II. 

17 5 For imporatnt read important. 

18 23 Delete /A« before absolute. 

25 7 For the second Ift^m read Aim. 

88 7 For t5 read are. 

134 I For /or read when. 

— — For is read shall be. 

15s 36 For hr read t'Ar. 

32* 



J 



500 Corrigenda 

Page Line 

<55 37 Fo^ imeinen read meinen. 

i6o 8 For import read imparts, 

20I 17 For a/ read /or. 

204 25 The note appears on page 205. 

339 10 For alteration read alternation. 

340 18 For /orm read former, 

249 z Insert the before lassitude. 

250 24 For wear read F^ar. 

368 after line 17. For cantatat read cantata. 

427 The note follows "timbre" (line 25). 

433 20 For reasonable read reasonably, 

445 15 Insert on after only, 

458 32 For /^ read feel. 



J. 

25 

DrucV von Breitkopf & Hartel in Ldpzig. 



I 



